This week's Start II treaty signed in Moscow is little more than wishful thinking, at least while it lacks the support of other ex-Soviet republics than Russia.LYMPHOCYTE migration from blood into tissue depends on integrin-mediated adhesion to endothelium^1–4. Adhesion requires not only integrin ligands on the endothelium, but also activation signals because T-cell integrins cannot bind well until they are activated. The physiological 'triggers' for T-cell adhesion are unknown, but cytokines may be good candidates as they are released during inflammation and trigger adhesion in neutrophils and monocytes^2,5,6. We have identified a cytokine, macrophage inflammatory protein-1β (MIP-1β), that induces both chemotaxis and adhesion of T cells; MIP-1β is most effective at augmenting adhesion of CD8^+ T cells to the vascular cell adhesion molecule VCAM-1. We reasoned that, as cytokines in vivo will be rapidly washed away, MIP-1β might be bound to endothelial surfaces and so induce adhesion in its immobilized form. Here we show that: (1) M IP-1β is present on lymph node endothelium; (2) immobilized MIP-1β induces binding of T cells to VCAM-1 in vitro . M IP-1β was immobilized by binding to proteoglycan: a conjugate of heparin with bovine serum albumin and cellular proteoglycan CD44 were both effective. We propose that MIP-1β and other cytokines with glycosaminoglycan-binding sites will bind to and be presented by endothelial proteoglycans to trigger adhesion selectively not only of lymphocyte subsets, but also of other cell types.PHOTOBLEACHING of rhodopsin in rod photoreceptors activates the visual cascade system leading to a decrease in cyclic GMP and the closure of cGMP-gated channels in the rod outer segment plasma membrane^1–4. Calcium plays an important role in the recovery of the rod outer segment to its dark state by regulating the resynthesis of cGMP by guanylate cyclase^5–7. Here we report that calmodulin, a Ca^2+-binding protein present in the rod outer segment^8,9, increases the apparent Michaelis constant of the channel for cGMP. This results in a decrease in the rate of cation influx into the rod outer segment by two- to sixfold at low cGMP concentrations and has the effect of increasing the sensitivity of the channel to small changes in cGMP levels during phototrans-duction. Biochemical studies indicate that calcium–calmodulin binds to a protein of M _r 240K which is tightly associated with the channel^10. On the basis of these studies, Ca^2+ is suggested to play a central role in photorecovery and light adaptation, not only by regulating guanylate cyclase, possibly through recoverin^6,7, but also by modulating the cGMP-gated channel through calmodulin interaction with the 240K protein.THE mouse pink-eyed dilution ( p ) locus on chromosome 7 is associated with defects of skin, eye and coat pigmentation^1. Mutations at p cause a reduction of eumelanin (black-brown) pigment and altered morphology of black pigment granules (eumelano-somes), but have little effect on pheomelanin (yellow-red) pigment^2. We show here that the human complementary DNA DN10 , linked to the p locus in mice^3–5, identifies the human homologue ( P ) of the mouse p gene, and appears to encode an integral membrane transporter protein. The expression pattern of this gene in various p mutant mice correlates with the pigmentation phenotype; moreover, an abnormally sized messenger RNA is detected in one mutant, p ^un, which reverts to the normal size in p ^un revertants. The human P gene corresponds to the D15S12 locus within the chromosome segment 15qll–ql3, which is typically deleted in patients with Prader–Willi and Angelman syndrome (see ref. 5 for review). These disorders are phenotypically distinct, depending on the parent of origin of the deleted chromosome^5–7, but both syndromes are often associated with hypopigmentation of the skin, hair and eyes (see ref. 8 for review), and deletion of the P gene may be responsible for this hypopigmentation. In addition, we report a mutation in both copies of the human P gene in one case of tyrosinase-positive (type II) oculocutaneous albinism, recently linked to 15qll–ql3 (ref. 9).LIMB development is dependent on epithelial–mesenchymal interactions. The apical ectodermal ridge (AER), a specialized epithelium at the limb tip, stimulates proliferation of underlying mesenchyme, causing directed limb outgrowth^1 (for review see ref. 2). Several genes are expressed in the mouse AER^3–10, including Fgf-4 (fibroblast growth factor-4)^11,12 and Bmp-2 (bone mor-phogenetic protein-2)^13, both of which encode secreted signalling molecules. Using a culture system developed to explore the function of molecules produced by the AER, we have shown that FGF-4 protein stimulates proliferation of mesenchyme in the early mouse limb-bud. This suggests that FGF-4 serves that major function of the AER. In contrast, BMP-2 inhibits limb growth, suggesting that as a result the AER may serve a hitherto unrecognized inhibitory function. Furthermore, the extent of limb outgrowth can be modulated by mixing the two signalling molecules, suggesting that limb growth is regulated by a combination of stimulatory and inhibitory signals from the AER.CYTOPLASMICALLY inherited microorganisms are widespread in insects and have been implicated as causes of female parthenogenesis (females developing from unfertilized eggs) and cytoplasmic incompatibility^1–15. Normal sexual reproduction can be restored by treatment with antibiotics^1–4. Sequence analysis of the DNA encoding 16S ribosomal RNA has shown that cytoplasmic incompatibility bacteria from diverse insect taxa are closely related (they share >95% sequence similarity) and belong to the alpha subdivision of Proteobacteria^5–7. Here we show that parthenogenesis-associated bacteria from parasitoid Hymenoptera also fall into this bacterial group, having up to 99% sequence similarity to some incompatibility microorganisms. Both incompatibility and parthenogenesis microorganisms alter host chromosome behaviour during early mitotic divisions of the egg^13–17. Incompatibility bacteria act by interfering with paternal chromosome incorporation in fertilized eggs, whereas parthenogenesis bacteria prevent segregation of chromosomes in unfertilized eggs. These traits are adaptive for the microorganisms. On the basis of their sequence similarities, we conclude that parthenogenesis bacteria and cytoplasmic incompatibility bacteria form a monophyletic group of microorganisms that 'specialize' in manipulating chromosome behaviour and reproduction of insects.WE report here the discovery of a primitive dinosaur skeleton from Upper Triassic strata in northwestern Argentina. The 1-m-long skeleton represents a new taxon, Eoraptor lunensis gen. et sp. nov., which is close to the predicted structure and size of the common dinosaurian ancestor^1–5. The skull, which has a unique heterodont dentition, does not exhibit any of the specializations of the major dinosaurian clades (Ornithischia, Sauropodomorpha, Theropoda). The forelimbs are less than half the length of the hind limbs, which suggests an obligatory bipedal posture. Although close in overall form to the common dinosaurian ancestor, the functionally tridactyl, grasping/raking hand and other features show that Eoraptor is allied phylogenetically with theropods. The discovery of Eoraptor supports the hypothesis that dinosaurs diverged rapidly at small body size from a common ancestor, with the principal herbivorous and carnivorous lineages present by the middle Carnian.ATMOSPHERIC CO_2 concentration was 160 to 200 μmol mol^−1 during the Last Glacial Maximum (LGM; about 18,000 years ago)^1, rose to about 275 (μmol mol^−1 10,000 years ago^2,3, and has increased to about 350 μmol mol^−1 since 1800 (ref. 4). Here we present data indicating that this increase in CO_2 has enhanced biospheric carbon fixation and altered species abundances by increasing the water-use efficiency of biomass production of C_3 plants, the bulk of the Earth's vegetation. We grew oats ( Avena sativa ), wild mustard ( Brassica kaber ) and wheat ( Triticum aes-tivum cv. Seri M82 and Yaqui 54), all C3 annuals, and selected C4 grasses along daytime gradients of Glacial to present atmospheric CO_2 concentrations in a 38-m-long chamber. We calculated parameters related to leaf photosynthesis and water-use efficiency from stable carbon isotope ratios (^13C/^12C) of whole leaves. Leaf water-use efficiency and above-ground biomass/plant of C3 species increased linearly and nearly proportionally with increasing CO_2 concentrations. Direct effects of increasing CO_2 on plants must be considered when modelling the global carbon cycle and effects of climate change on vegetation.THE vertebrate skeleton is formed primarily by endochondral ossification, starting during embryogenesis when cartilage anlagens develop central regions of hypertrophic cartilage which are replaced by bony trabeculae and bone marrow^1,2. During this process chondrocytes express a unique matrix molecule, type X collagen^3. We report here that mice carrying a mutated collagen X transgene develop skeletal deformities including compression of hypertrophic growth plate cartilage and a decrease in newly formed bone, as well as leukocyte deficiency in bone marrow, reduction in size of thymus and spleen, and lymphopenia. The defects indicate that collagen X is required for normal skeletal morphogenesis and suggest that mutations in COL10A1 are responsible for certain human chondrodysplasias, such as Spondylometaphyseal dysplasias and metaphyseal chondrodysplasias^4.SEVERAL bacterial pathogens of medical importance are able to persist and replicate inside host mononuclear phagocytes. Protective immunity depends on specific T lymphocytes that induce granulomatous lesions at the sites of bacterial multiplication^1,2. Listeria monocytogenes is an intracellular pathogen that replicates inside mononuclear phagocytes and hepatocytes of mice^1–4. Invasion from the phagosomal compartment into the cytoplasmic compartment is the principal mechanism of intracellular survival^5. Early in infec-tion, resistance against L. monocytogenes is mediated by polymor-phonuclear phagocytes which destroy infected liver cells, followed by natural killer cells which activate macrophages by means of interferon-γ (refs 6, 7). A specific immune response by T cells then develops which leads to sterile eradication of the microbes^1,2,8. T cells are also responsible for the highly effective protection in vaccinated mice against secondary infections^1,2. Although the role of αβ T cells has been demonstrated in these immune responses, that of γδ T cells is unclear^2,9,10. Here we use mice that selectively lack either αβ or γδ T cells as a result of targeted germ-line mutations in their T-cell receptor genes^11,12 to investigate the relative roles of these T-cell populations during experimental infection with L. monocytogenes . We find that in primary listeriosis, either αβ or γδ T cells are sufficient for early protection. Resistance to second-ary infection is mediated mainly by αβ T cells but also involves γδd T cells. Thus αβ T-cell-deficient mice can be rendered partially resistant by vaccination, and γδ T cells are shown to be responsible for this protective effect. In infected γδ T-cell-deficient mice we noticed the appearance of unusual liver lesions, indicating that γδ T cells have a unique regulatory role in this bacterial infection.MANY lines of evidence suggest that the cerebellum is involved in motor control^1. But what features of these movements are encoded by cerebellar neurons? For slow-tracking eye movements, the activ-ity of Purkinje cells in the ventral paraflocculus of the cerebellum is known to be correlated with eye velocity^2–5 and acceleration^5. Here we show that the complex temporal pattern of the firing frequency that occurs during the ocular following response elicited by movements of a large visual scene^6–8 can be reconstructed by an inverse-dynamics representation, which uses the position, velocity and acceleration of eye movements. Further analysis reveals that the velocity and acceleration components can provide appropriate dynamic drive signals to ocular motor neurons, whereas the position component often has the wrong polarity. We conclude that these Purkinje cells primarily contribute dynamic command signals.BACTERIAL production of magnetite (Fe_3O_4)^1 makes an important contribution to iron biomineralization and rcmanent magnetization of sediments^2,3. Accurate magnetostratigraphy, reconstruction of the Earth's past magnetic-field behaviour and extraction of environmental information from the geomagnetic record depend on an understanding of the conditions under which bacterial magnetite is formed. In aquatic sediments, the process is thought to be restricted to a zone between the levels at which nitrate and iron reduction occur^4. In sulphate-reducing habitats, deeper in the sediment, the presence of H_2S reduces iron oxyhydroxides to iron sulphides^5,6. Thus magnetite would not be expected to form under such reducing conditions^5,7. We report here the isolation and pure culture of a dissimilatory sulphate-reducing bacterium, designated RS-1, which can synthesize intracellular magnetite particles. RS-1 is a freshwater anaerobe which is also capable of extracellular iron sulphide precipitation. This isolate illustrates the wider meta-bolic diversity of magnetic bacteria and suggests the presence of a novel mechanism of magnetic biomineralization. The discovery of such bacteria may also explain why large quantities of magnetite have been observed in sulphate-rich, oil-bearing, sedimentary deposits^8–11. In addition, these results significantly enlarge the environments in which biogenic magnetite may be expected to occur and have important implications regarding the evolution of the ability to synthesize magnetite.THE duration of rupture is a fundamental characteristic of earthquakes, and is important for understanding the mechanics of faulting^1,2. The complexity of the seismic source and the incoherence of the high-frequency seismic wavefield often inhibit the identification, location and timing of features in the later part of earthquake rupture. Here we sum many teleseismic records from regional seismic arrays, producing an unusually clear depiction of the earthquake source at short periods by suppressing background noise and coda generated near the receivers. The ending, as well as the beginning, of rupture is clearly identifiable for most earthquakes examined. Measurements of 130 large earthquakes show that near 100 km depth, rupture duration averages 11 s when scaled to a moment of 10^26 dyn cm; this decreases to 5.5 s at 650 km depth. Models of faulting suggest that duration should be inversely proportional to the shear-wave velocity and the cube root of stress drop. Thus, to explain the observed twofold decrease in duration with depth, stress drops would have to increase by a factor of four, as shear velocity increases with depth by only about 20%. However, observed stress drops show no strong trend with depth^3,4, suggesting that the faulting process changes with depth.CARBON and hydrogen are only trace constituents of the Earth's mantle, yet carbon- and hydrogen-bearing fluids have an important effect on magma genesis, mantle rheology and mantle chemistry. Many mantle-derived rocks record interactions with such fluids, but direct samples of the fluids themselves are rare. Diamonds, owing to their robust nature, constitute effective sampling devices for such deep-seated fluids^1; for example, carbonates and water have been found^2,3 in fluid inclusions in fibrous diamonds^4. In addition, CO_2, H_2O, CO, CH_4, H_2 and N_2 have been detected in gases released from diamonds by crushing^5 or heating^6,7, but their primary nature could not be confirmed beyond doubt^1. Here we report the discovery of solid CO_2 in a natural diamond. Infrared spectroscopy indicates that the CO_2 is presently at a pressure of 5 GPa (50 kbar), and must therefore have been trapped at even greater pressures in the hot mantle, corresponding to depths of about 220–270 km. At these pressures, free CO_2 should react with olivine and pyroxene; thus, its survival indicates the presence at depth of an environment of different mineralogy such as a fully carbonated metasomatic vein, or a block of subducted sediments.ELECTRIDES are crystalline salts formed from complexed alkali-metal cations. There has been some dispute as to whether the valence electron from the alkali ion becomes a trapped interstitial anion^1,2 or resides at or near the alkali-metal nucleus^3. If the former description holds, electrides would represent stoichiometric counterparts of ionic insulators containing 'F-centre' electronic defects. Experiments^1,2 have so far failed to resolve the question. Here we present ab initio self-consistent density-functional calculations^4 of the electron distribution in the electride Cs^+ (15-crown-5)_2 · e^-. We find that a spatially localized electron is located at the anion site, in accord with the F-centre model. Although the potential is in fact repulsive in this region, the electron is apparently forced to reside here by the need to lower its kinetic energy. We suggest that this picture may hold for other electrides as well.President Bill Clinton must fight to win agreement to the free-trade pact with Canada and Mexico.SPRINGTIME ozone depletion over Antarctica is thought^1,2 to be due to catalytic cycles involving chlorine monoxide, which is formed as a result of reactions on the surface of polar stratospheric clouds (PSCs). When the PSCs evaporate, CIO in the polar air can react with NO_2 to form the reservoir species C1ONO_2. High concentrations of C1ONO_2 can also be found at lower latitudes because of direct transport of polar air or mixing of CIO and NO_2 at the edges of the polar vortex. C1ONO_2 can take part in an ozone-depleting catalytic cycle^18, but the significance of this cycle has not been clear. Here we present model simulations of ozone concentrations from March to May both within the Arctic vortex and at a mid-latitude Northern Hemisphere site. We find increasing ozone loss from March to May. The C1ONO_2 cycle seems to be responsible for a significant proportion of the simulated ozone loss. An important aspect of this cycle is that it is not as limited as the other chlorine cycles to the timing and location of PSCs; it may therefore play an important role in ozone depletion at warm middle latitudes.A MIXTURE of two dissimilar species (A and B) may freeze to form a substitutionally ordered crystal, the structure of which can vary from a lattice with only a few atoms per unit cell to a complex 'superlattice'. For example, a mixture of sodium and zinc can form a solid with the AB_13 structure with 112 atoms per unit cell^1 (Fig. l a ). One might suspect that very specific energetic interactions are needed to stabilize a structure as complex as this. But recent experiments^2,3 show that the AB_13 structure is also formed in mixtures of spherical colloidal particles with different diameters, which interact only via simple repulsive potentials. This raises the possibility that the formation of an AB_13 superlattice might be sup-ported by entropic effects alone. To investigate this possibility, we present here computer simulations of a binary mixture of hard spheres. Our calculations show that entropy alone is indeed sufficient to stabilize the AB_13 phase, and that the full phase diagram of this system is surprisingly complex. Our results also suggest that vitrification or slow crystal nucleation in experimental studies of colloidal hard spheres can prevent the formation of equilibrium phases.THE 'soft' spectra, short duration and recurrent activity of the three known soft γ-ray repeaters (SGRs) distinguishes them from the majority of cosmic γ-ray bursts^1–4. Although there is no generally accepted model for the repeaters, it has been argued^5 that they are associated with radio pulsars: this is consistent with the coincidence^6of SGR0526 - 66 with the supernova remnant N49 in the Large Magellanic Cloud, and the location of the two other repeaters at low galactic latitudes. Here we show that the well localized repeater SGR1806 – 20 (refs 2,3) is also coincident with a supernova remnant: the amorphous radio nebula G 10.0 – 0.3 (refs 7,8). Taken together, these two associations argue strongly in favour of a neutron-star origin for the repeaters. We suggest that all young pulsars–that is, neutron stars still embedded in their supernova remnants–pass through a brief (∼ 500 year) phase of SGR activity. The detection of pulsar-powered synchrotron nebulae in, or pulsations from, the two supernova remnants coincident with SGRs would confirm this model.CNTF is a cytosolic molecule expressed postnatally in myelinating Schwann cells and in a sub-population of astrocytes. Although CNTF administration prevents lesion-mediated and genetically determined motor neuron degeneration, its physiological function remained elusive. Here it is reported that abolition of CNTF gene expression by homologous recombination results in a progressive atrophy and loss of motor neurons in adult mice, which is functionally reflected by a small but significant reduction in muscle strength.Climate Modes of the Phanerozoic. byL. A. Frakes J. E. Francis andJ. I. Syktus. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 274. £40, $69.95.Getting Here: The Story of Human Evolution. byWilliam Howells Compass: 1993. Pp. 261. £26 (hbk);£14.50 (pbk). (UK distribution, Bailey.)Time Machines: Time Travel in Physics, Metaphysics, and Science Fiction. by paul J. Nahin AIP: 1993. Pp. 408. $45, £40. (Distributed outside North America by OUP.)Out of the Crystal Maze: Chapters from the History of Solid-State Physics. byL. Hoddeson E. Braun J. Teichmann and S. Weart. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 697. £75, £50.Claims of the conversion of carbon to diamond date back to 1880, but it was not until 1955 that the first reproducible synthesis was reported. Bundy et al. describe the high-pressure, high-temperature apparatus that enabled them to reach the stability field of diamond, and prove that the material obtained was indeed diamond. Ironically, some of the same authors discovered 38 years later that the very first diamond grown by their technique was not synthetic after all, but a fragment of a natural diamond that got into the experiment. Fortunately, however, the technique was sound, and marked the beginning of the present synthetic-diamond industry.Cell culture systems for the growth of endothelial cells and keratinocytes, a reagent for the removal of free label from antibody-label conjugate preparations and a radiochromatography flow monitor are featured this week.The simple aggregation of pluripotent ES ßcells with morulae-stage embryos can result in viable chimaeras at a similar frequency to that of blastocyst injection. The savings in time and equipment inherent in the aggregation techniques, however, make this approach well worth considering.An interesting symposium last month suggests that computation and molecular biology, already interdependent, are about to become inextricably linked.The genetics of inherited migraines is proving more tractable than might have been expected given the clinical heterogeneity of the malady.HIGHER eukaryotic cells express a family of essential splicing factors with a characteristic RNA-binding domain and serine arginine-rich (SR) motif^1. These SR proteins, which include SC35^2–6 and SF2/ASF^7–12, are conserved from Drosophila to man, are required for early steps of spliceosome assembly, and can influence splice-site selections. To address their mechanisms of action, SR proteins were examined for their role in committing pre-messenger RNA to the splicing pathway. I report here that SC35 was sufficient on its own to form a committed complex with human β-globin pre-mRNA. Examination of other SR proteins and pre-mRNA substrates revealed that single SR proteins committed different pre-mRNAs to splicing with pronounced substrate specificity. These results suggest that splicing of different pre-mRNAs may require distinct sets of SR proteins, and that the commitment by SR proteins may be a critical step at which alternative and tissue-specific splicing is regulated.Contrary to popular belief, the nuclear industry is not dead. It needs to be kept alive.By imposing an economic ban on China in retaliation for the alleged sale of missile parts to Pakistan, the United States has done the right thing, but has gone only half-way towards the goal of limiting the spread of weapons.THE tumour suppressor p53 specifically interferes with the onset of S phase. The mechanism of the growth suppression action of the protein is unclear, though recent evidence points to transcriptional activation and repression functions of the protein^1. A competing hypothesis suggests that p53 interacts with the DNA replication apparatus and directly interferes with DNA replication. The major evidence for this hypothesis is that p53 interacts with the simian virus 40 (SV40)-encoded protein T antigen and interferes with the ability of T antigen to unwind the SV40 origin of DNA replication, and recruit DNA polymerase α to the replication initiation complex^2,3. Here we report that p53 physically interacts with and inhibits the function of a cellular DNA replication factor, the single-stranded DNA-binding protein complex RPA.VOLTAGE-GATED potassium (K^+) channels display a wide variety of conductances and gating properties in vivo ^1–3. This diversity can be attributed not only to the presence of many K^+-channel gene products, but also to the possibility that different K^+-channel sub-units co-assemble to form heteromultimeric channels in vivo . When expressed in Xenopus oocytes or transfected cells, K^+-channel polypeptides assemble to form tetramers^4. Certain combinations of Shaker-like subunits have been shown to co-assemble, forming heteromultimeric channels with distinct properties^5–7. It is not known, however, whether K^+ -channel polypeptides form hetero- multimeric channels in vivo . Here we describe the co-localization of two Shaker-like voltage-gated K^+-channel proteins, mKvl.l and mKvl.2, in the juxtaparanodal regions of nodes of Ranvier in mye-linated axons, and in terminal fields of basket cells in mouse cerebellum. We also show that mKvl.l and mKvl.2 can be co-immunoprecipitated with specific antibodies that recognize only one of them. These data indicate that the two polypeptides occur in subcellular regions where rapid membrane repolarization may be important and that they form heteromultimeric channels in vivo .A WIDE variety of voltage-gated K^+ channels are involved in the regulation of neuronal excitability and synaptic transmission. Their heterogeneity arises in part from the large number of genes encoding different K^+ channel subunits (reviewed in ref. 1). In addition, heterologous expression studies indicate that assembly of distinct subunits into heteromultimeric channels may contribute further to K^+ channel diversity^2–6. A question has been whether heteromeric K^+ channels actually form in vivo , and if so, whether specific combinations of subunits could account for major K^+ currents identified in neurons. We present here biochemical evidence that Kvl.4 and Kvl.2, two K^+ channel subunits of the Shaker subfamily, co-assemble in rat brain. The Kvl.4/Kvl.2 hetero-multimer combines features of both parent subunits, resulting in an A-type K^+ channel^6. Immunocytochemical evidence suggests that the heteromultimers are localized in axons and nerve terminals. We propose that Kvl.4/Kvl.2 heteromultimers may form the molecular basis of a presynaptic A-type K^+ channel involved in the regulation of neurotransmitter release.THE homeobox is a 183-base-pair DNA sequence originally found in Drosophila segmentation and homeotic genes^1,2. In Drosophila , homeotic genes are clustered in the Antennapedia and Bithorax complexes, collectively called the homeotic gene complex (HOM-C)^3. In the mouse genome, about 40 homeobox genes ( Hox ) are clustered in four chromosomal regions ( Hox A to D). The Hox genes are arranged in the same order and have the same antero-posterior pattern of expression as their structural homologue in the HOM-C^4,5, suggesting that they control mouse pattern formation in the same way that HOM-C members do in Drosophila . Homeobox gene products are believed to be transcription factors that regulate expression of target genes. A few candidate target genes have been identified in Drosophila by various approaches^6 but the Hox gene targets are poorly understood, mostly because of limitations in the available approaches. Here we identify several candidate Hox gene targets, including a mouse homologue of the Drosophila tumour-suppressor gene l(2)gl , by immunopurification of DNA sequences bound to a Hox protein in native chromatin.THE microsomal triglyceride transfer protein (MTP), which catalyses the transport of triglyceride, cholesteryl ester and phospho-lipid between phospholipid surfaces, is a heterodimer composed of the multifunctional protein, protein disulphide isomerase, and a unique large subunit with an apparent M _r of 88K (refs 1–3). It is isolated as a soluble protein from the lumen of the microsomal fraction of liver and intestine^4. The large subunit of MTP was not detectable in four unrelated subjects with abetalipoproteinaemia^5, a rare autosomal recessive disease characterized by a defect in the assembly or secretion of plasma lipoproteins that contain apolipo-protein B (ref. 6). We report here the isolation and sequencing of complementary DNA encoding the large subunit of MTP. A comparison of this sequence to corresponding genomic sequences from two abetalipoproteinaemic subjects revealed a homozygous frameshift mutation in one subject and a homozygous nonsense mutation in the other. The results indicate that a defect in the gene for the large subunit of MTP is the proximal cause of abetalipopro-teinaemia in these two subjects, and that MTP is required for the secretion of plasma lipoproteins that contain apolipoprotein B.THE major active ingredient of marijuana, Δ^9-tetrahydrocannabi-nol (Δ^9-THC), has been used as a psychoactive agent for thousands of years. Marijuana, and Δ^9-THC, also exert a wide range of other effects including analgesia, anti-inflammation, immunosuppression, anticonvulsion, alleviation of intraocular pressure in glaucoma, and attenuation of vomiting^1. The clinical application of cannabinoids has, however, been limited by their psychoactive effects, and this has led to interest in the biochemical bases of their action. Progress stemmed initially from the synthesis of potent derivatives of δ^9-THC^4,5, and more recently from the cloning of a gene encoding a G-protein-coupled receptor for cannabinoids^6. This receptor is expressed in the brain but not in the periphery, except for a low level in testes. It has been proposed that the non-psychoactive effects of cannabinoids are either mediated centrally or through direct interaction with other, non-receptor proteins^1,7,8. Here we report the cloning of a receptor for cannabinoids that is not expressed in the brain but rather in macrophages in the marginal zone of spleen.PARASYMPATHETIC nerve stimulation causes slowing of the heart rate by activation of muscarinic receptors and the subsequent opening of muscarinic K^+ channels in the sinoatrial node and atrium^1–4. This inwardly rectifying K^+ channel is coupled directly with G protein^5–10. Based on sequence homology with cloned inwardly rectifying K^+ channels, ROMK1 (ref. 11) and IRK1 (ref. 12), we have isolated a complementary DNA for a G-protein-coupled inwardly rectifying K^+ channel (GIRK1) from rat heart. The GIRK1 channel probably corresponds to the muscarinic K channel because (1) its functional properties resemble those of the a trial muscarinic K^+ channel and (2) its messenger RNA is much more abundant in the atrium than in the ventricle. In addition, GIRK1 mRNA is expressed not only in the heart but also in the brain.A school board in the town of Vista, California, has ordered the teaching of creationism in public schools.Bruce Babbitt, has had a greater effect on the environment in six months than his predecessors had in years.NONE of the traditional models of surface complexation of ions at oxide–water interfaces, such as the constant-capacitance, double-diffuse-layer and triple-layer models^1–5, provides an explicit, quantitative treatment of ion solvation. Here I show that this process can be included quantitatively in surface-complexation theory by describing it using the Born theory of ion solvation^6,7. In this way, the standard Gibbs free energy of sorption can be decomposed into three terms: the standard coulombic term, a Born solvation contribution and a term intrinsic to the ion alone. Consideration of the Born solvation term shows that the equilibrium constant for sorption depends linearly on the inverse of the dielectric constant of the solid. By this means, all three contributions to the free energy can be estimated empirically or calculated theoretically. Inclusion of this physical description of ion solvation should facilitate the application of the theory of ion sorption to complex natural oxide and silicate minerals.Calnexin, an endoplasmic reticulum transmembrane protein, represents a new type of molecular chaperone that selectively associates in a transient fashion with newly synthesized monomeric glycoproteins in HepG2 cells. Calnexin only recognizes glycoproteins when they are incompletely folded. Dissociation of glycoproteins from calnexin occurs at different rates and is related to the time taken for their folding, which may then initiate their differential transport rates from the endoplasmic reticulum.World Changes: Thomas Kuhn and the Nature of Science. Edited by Paul Norwich. MIT Press: 1993. Pp. 356. $45, £40.50. Reconstructing Scientific Revolutions: Thomas S. Kuhn's Philosophy of Science. By Paul Hoyningen-Huene. University of Chicago Press: 1993. Pp. 310. £30.50, $43. 75 (hbk); £12. 75, $18.25 (pbk).And Yet It Moves: Strange Systems and Subtle Questions in Physics. By Mark P. Silverman. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 266. £35, $49.95 (hbk); £±2.95, $24.95 (pbk).Science as a Way of Knowing: The Foundations of Modern Biology. By John A. Moore. Harvard University Press: 1993. Pp. 530. $29.95, £23.95.B. F. Skinner: A Life. By Daniel W. Bjork. Basic Books: 1993. Pp. 282. $25. To be published in the United Kingdom by HarperCollins in November, £16.99.With the aid of private health organizations and the Howard Hughes Medical Institute, the Jackson Laboratory will become the world's clearinghouse for transgenic and knockout mice - at a reasonable price.A pharmaceutical company's public relations policy is also good for public healthThe inability of the British government to match the qualifications of would-be university students to vacancies in science subjects was inevitable given government policies.The Maastricht Treaty has sown confusion in the names of European institutions.Replication proteins encoded by bacteriophage T4 generate DNA replication forks that can pass a molecule of Escherichia coli RNA polymerase moving in the same direction as the fork in vitro . The RNA polymerase ternary transcription complex remains bound to the DNA and retains a transcription bubble after the fork passes. The by-passed ternary complex can resume faithful RNA synthesis, suggesting that the multisubunit RNA polymerase of E. coli has evolved to retain its transcript after DNA replication, allowing partially completed transcripts to be elongated into full-length RNA molecules.Experiments showing evidence for a heavy neutrino with a mass of 17 keV launched the new particle on an erratic eight-year career, during which it raised questions about the Standard Model of particle physics and about cosmological theories, stimulated many theoretical papers and pushed experimental techniques to their limit. Its demise provides grounds for faith in the efficacy of the scientific method.Species Evolution: The Role of Chromosome Change. By Max King. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 336. £40, $59.95.The Rise and Fall of the Fifth Force: Discovery, Pursuit, and Justification in Modern Physics. By Allan Franklin. American Institute of Physics: 1993. Pp. 141. $29.95, £21. (Distributed in the United Kingdom by Oxford University Press.)The Biological Century: Friday Evening Talks at the Marine Biological Laboratory. Edited by R. Barlow, J. Dowling and G. Weissmann. Harvard University Press: 1993. Pp. 289. $45, £35.95.News from the marketplace this week features a fluorescence imaging system for recording intracellular ion concentrations, a multichannel tissue bath stimulation system and flow-through sensors for organ perfusion studies.In situ expression studies show that the selective pathology of Huntington's disease is not explained by a simple pattern of gene expression in the brain.Nobody disputes that women have health problems that differ from those of men, but NIH may be wasting $625 million or more in pursuit of an ambition to be seen to be politically correct.THE HMR E silencer represses transcription of silent mating-type genes in the budding yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae and contains three redundant regulatory elements A, E and B (ref. 1). The A element contains the 11 base pair consensus sequence that is essential for the firing of DNA replication origins^2. A multisubunit protein called the origin recognition complex (ORC) binds specifically to this consensus sequence within yeast origins in vitro ^3 and in vivo ^4. We isolated mutants in A element-mediated silencing and report here that one of the genes we identified, RRR1 , encodes ORC2, the 72K subunit of ORC. RRR1/ORC2 is an essential gene, but the rrr1-316 allele, which is viable, is defective in the replication of nuclear DNA and the maintenance of the 2-μm episomal DNA. This is, to our knowledge, the first genetic evidence that ORC is involved in DNA replication and silencing.THREE different prenyltransferases have been identified in yeast and higher cells^1–6, the farnesyltransferase and the type I and type II geranylgeranyltransferases (GGTase). The farnesyltransferase and GGTase-I modify peptides in vitro with the CAAX (C, Cys; A, aliphatic residue; X, terminal amino acid) consensus motif^2,7. These enzymes are heterodimers that have different β-subunits and a shared α-subunit^8. In yeast, the RAM2 gene encodes this α-subunit^9. RAM2 is also homologous to MAD2 , a yeast gene whose product has been implicated in the feedback control of mitosis^10,11. We have shown that Bet2p is a component of the yeast GGTase-II (refs 6,12) that geranylgeranylates Yptlp, a small GTP-binding protein that mediates transport from the endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi complex^13–15. Here we report that Mad2p is a component of this enzyme. Bet2p forms a complex with Mad2p that appears to bind geranylgeranyl pyrophosphate, but not farnesyl pyrophosphate. The efficient transfer of geranylgeranyl onto small GTP-binding proteins requires the presence of an additional activity.THE mad2-l mutation inactivates the cell-cycle feedback control that prevents budding yeast cells from leaving mitosis until spindle assembly is complete^1. The gene product of MAD2 shows significant sequence similarity to the α-subunit of prenyltransferases^2. Here we isolate a new temperature-sensitive mad2 mutant, mad2-2 ^ ts , and find that Mad2p is required for the membrane association of Yptlp and Sec4p, two prenylated small GTP-binding proteins involved in protein trafficking. Extracts from mad2-2 ^ ts mutant cells fail to geranylgeranylate a number of substrates at the non-permissive temperature. mad2-2 ^ ts is synthetically lethal with bet2-1 , a mutation in the gene that encodes for the β-subunit of the Yptlp and Sec4p geranylgeranyl transferase^3,4. Therefore MAD2 and BET2 gene products may physically interact to form a geranylgeranyl transferase complex. In addition, the difference between the phenotypes of mad2-l and mad2-2 ^ ts suggests that MAD2 has distinct roles in protein transport and the mitotic feedback control.The appearance of another new journal linked with Nature offers great opportunities.Governments are habitually seeking to regulate the distribution of electromagnetic signals within and even outside their territory, but usually for reasons more concerned with wish-fulfilment than technological logic.GAP junction channels are structurally distinct from other ion channels in that they comprise two hemichannels which interact head-to-head to form an aqueous channel between cells. Intercellular voltage differences together with increased intracellular concentrations of H^+ and Ca^2+ cause closure of these normally patent channels^1. The relative sensitivity to voltage varies with the subunit (connexin) composition of the channels^2. The third of four transmembrane-spanning regions (M3) in connexins has been proposed to form the channel lining^3, and a global 'tilting' of the hemichannel subunits has been correlated with channel closure^4. But specific components involved in transduction of channel gating events have not been identified in either gap junctions or other ion channel classes (however, see model in ref. 5). We have examined a strictly conserved proline centrally located in M2 of connexin proteins. Mutation of this proline (Pro 87) in connexin 26 causes a reversal in the voltage-gating response when the mutant hemichannel is paired with wild-type connexin 26 in the Xenopus oocyte system. This suggests that the unique properties associated with this residue are critical to the transduction of voltage gating in these channels.UREA is the principal end product of nitrogen metabolism in mammals^1. Movement of urea across cell membranes was originally thought to occur by lipid-phase permeation, but recent studies have revealed the existence of specialized transporters with a low affinity for urea ( K _m > 200 mM)^2. Here we report the isolation of a complementary DNA from rabbit renal medulla that encodes a 397-amino-acid membrane glycoprotein, UT2, with the functional characteristics of the vasopressin-sensitive urea transporter previously described in in vitro -perfused inner medullary collecting ducts^3,4. UT2 is not homologous to any known protein and displays a unique pattern of hydrophobicity. Because of the central role of this transporter in fluid balance^1,3–7 and nitrogen metabolism^8, the study of this protein will provide important insights into the urinary concentrating mechanism and nitrogen balance.MYOSIN-I is thought to supply the force for movement of cell membranes relative to actin filaments (reviewed in refs 1, 2), but confirmation of this hypothesis has been difficult because of the presence of multiple isoforms of myosin-I and other unconventional myosins in most cells^3. We report here the first evidence that a myosin-I isoform is essential for a specific class of intracellular membrane movements in vivo . In Acanthamoeba , the contractile vacuole is an autonomous structure which fuses with the plasma membrane to control the water content of the cell. Because myosin-IC is the only myosin-I isoform concentrated in the contractile vacuole complex^4,5, and a protein antigenically related to myosin-IC is located on or near the Dictyostelium (slime mould) contractile vacuole^6, we thought this organelle might provide the best opportunity to demonstrate a relationship between myosin-I and membrane motility. Antibodies that inhibit the activity of Acanthamoeba myosin-IC in vitro interfere with expulsion of excess water by the contractile vacuole in vivo , leading to overfilling of this organelle and cell lysis. Myosin-IC may generate the force required to contract the vacuole and may also be involved in transfer of water to the contractile vacuole during refilling.IT is thought that the sensitivity of mammalian hearing depends on amplification of the incoming sound within the cochlea by a select population of sensory cells, the outer hair cells. It has been suggested that these cells sense displacements and feedback forces which enhance the basilar membrane motion by reducing the inherent damping of the cochlear partition^1–7. In support of this hypothesis, outer hair cells show membrane-potential-induced length changes^1–3 at acoustic rates. This process has been termed 'reverse transduction'. For amplification, the forces should be large enough to move the basilar membrane. Using a displacement-sensitive interferometer^8, we tested this hypothesis in an isolated cochlea while stimulating the outer hair cells with current passed across the partition. We show here that the cochlear partition distorts under the action of electrically driven hair cell length changes and produces place-specific vibration of the basilar membrane of a magnitude comparable to that observed near auditory threshold (about 1 nm). Such measurements supply direct evidence that cochlear amplification arises from the properties of the outer hair cell population.EPISODES of coral bleaching resulting from dissociation of endosymbiotic algae (zooxanthellae) from host coral tissues have occurred with increasing frequency over the past decade on reefs throughout the tropics^1,2. These episodes have usually been attributed to increases in sea water temperatures^3–10, but the mass bleaching events that occurred throughout the Caribbean during 1987 and 1990 were not readily explained by temperature alone^11,12. An additional factor that may have contributed to these bleaching episodes is ultraviolet radiation in the 280–400-nm band. At many localities where bleaching occurred in 1987 and 1990, sea conditions were described as extremely calm with exceptionally clear water^13. In the absence of suspended organic and inorganic matter in the water column, higher than average intensities of ultraviolet radiation probably reached all depths within the photic zone for several consecutive months. Evidence for a possible link between ultraviolet radiation and coral bleaching has not been forthcoming^2. Here we report results of a field experiment showing that, irrespective of high water temperatures, short-term (three weeks) increases in ultraviolet radiation of a magnitude possible under calm, clear water column conditions can readily induce bleaching in reef-building corals.THE Malawi Rift and Pliocene palaeofaunas, which include a hominid mandible attributed to Homo rudolfensis , provide a biogeographical link between the better known Plio–Pleistocene faunal records of East and Southern Africa. The Malawi Rift is in a latitudinal position suitable for recording any hominid and faunal dispersion towards the Equator that was brought on by increased aridity of the Late Pliocene African landscape. The evidence suggests that Pliocene hominids originated in the eastern African tropical domain and dispersed to southern Africa only during more favourable ecological circumstances.After another bomb, long-term institution building should be the goal in Northern Ireland.HISTORICAL geomagnetic measurements covering the past 400 years reveal a symmetrical pattern of four relatively stationary flux concentrations ('lobes') at the surface of the liquid core and regions of rapid change extending from the Atlantic to the Indian Ocean^1. Palaeomagnetic data define a time-average over several thousand years^2 which might reflect the stationary parts of the present field, but unfortunately the historical record is too short to provide a satisfactory average^3. Here we model palaeomagnetic directions from the past 2.5 Myr using the same methods as for modern data^4, and find the two northern lobes in the same position as today, over Arctic Canada and Siberia. In southern regions, by contrast, the field appears to have been smoothed out, as might be expected from the current rapid secular variation^1. We propose that the present geomagnetic field morphology and pattern of secular variation have persisted for several million years, as would occur if the solid mantle controls flow at the top of the core.RECENT studies of abyssal peridotites^1, mid-ocean-ridge basalts (MORBs)^2 and their entrained melt inclusions^3,4 have shown that fractional melting of the upwelling sub-oceanic mantle produces magmas with a much wider range of compositions than erupted MORBs. In particular, it seems that strongly depleted primary magmas are routinely produced by melting beneath ridges^1. The absence of strongly depleted melts as erupted lavas prompts the question of how long such magmas survive beneath ridges, before their distinctive compositions are concealed by mixing with more enriched magmas. Here we report mineral compositions from a unique suite of oceanic cumulates recovered from DSDP Site 334 (ref. 5), which indicate that the rocks crystallized from basaltic liquids that were strongly depleted in Na, Ti, Zr, Y, Sr and rare-earth elements relative to any erupted MORB. It thus appears that the magmatic plumbing system beneath the Mid-Atlantic Ridge permitted strongly depleted magmas to accumulate in a magma chamber and remain sufficiently isolated to produce cumulate rocks. Even so, spatial heterogeneity in the compositions of high-calcium pyroxenes suggests that in the later stages of solidification these rocks reacted with infiltrating enriched basaltic liquids.THE albedo and radiative properties of marine stratus clouds are determined largely by the number density of cloud condensation nuclei (CCN) over the oceans. Modelling studies have suggested that most of these nuclei are sulphate aerosols derived from both anthropogenic and natural sources^1. Here we present evidence that organic aerosols also play a key role in cloud nucleation. We determine the relative contributions of sulphate and organic aerosols to CCN concentrations at a marine site known to be influenced by anthropogenic emissions, and find that organic aerosols account for the major part of both the total aerosol number concentration and the CCN fraction. Thus, in regions that are affected by anthropogenic pollutants, organic aerosols may play at least as important a role as sulphate aerosols in determining the climate effect of clouds.MOST molecular conductors rely on charge transfer to create carriers. For example, the ET salts^1 are hole-doped whereas the C_60 salts^2 are electron-doped. Neutral radical species in which bands are formed by π-orbital overlap would be expected to have half-filled bands and thus to be conducting^3, but no such metals have yet been reported. Here we report the synthesis and characterization of a molecular conductor which combines both of these approaches: energy bands are formed from one-dimensional stacks of neutral π-radicals, and the material is rendered conducting by electron transfer from the conduction band following doping with an acceptor. The radical species is the l,4-phenylene-bis(dithiadiazolyl) diradical 1,4-[(S_2N_2C)C_6H_4(CN_2S_2)] (2 in Fig. 1), reaction of which with iodine vapour leads to crystals of [2][I]. At low temperatures this compound is essentially a diamagnetic insulator, but above 200 K the conductivity and magnetic susceptibility increase markedly, and at room temperature the conductivity reaches l00 S cm^−1, which is comparable to that shown by conventional molecular charge-transfer salts.Helminth parasites are highly prevalent in human communities in developing countries. In an endemic area an infected individual may harbour parasitic worms for most of his or her life, and the ability of these infections to survive immunological attack has long been a puzzle. But new techniques are starting to expose the diverse mechanisms by which these agents modulate or evade their hosts' defences, creating a dynamic interaction between the human immune system and the parasite population.Alexander A. Friedmann: The Man Who Made the Universe Expand. By E. A. Tropp, V. Ya. Frenkel and A. D. Chernin. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 267. £30, $49.95.Earthquakes and Volcanic Eruptions: A Handbook on Risk Assessment. By Herbert Tiedemann. Swiss Reinsurance Company, CH-8022 Zürich, Switzerland: 1992. Pp. 951. $180.Primate Behaviour: Information, Social Knowledge, and the Evolution of Culture. By Duane Quiatt and Vernon Reynolds. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 322. £42.50, $74.95.Compass and Gyroscope: Integrating Science and Politics for the Environment. By Kai N. Lee. Island: 1993. Pp. 243. $24.95, £18.95. (European distribution, Earthscan.)THE origin of Pluto's unusual orbit—the most eccentric and inclined of all the planets—remains a mystery. The orbits of Pluto and Neptune overlap, but close approaches of these two planets are prevented by the existence of a resonance condition^1: Pluto's orbital period is exactly 3/2 that of Neptune, which ensures that the conjunctions always occur near Pluto's aphelion. Long-term orbit integrations^2–5 have uncovered other subtle resonances and near-resonances, and indicate that Pluto's orbit is chaotic yet remains macroscopically stable over billion-year timescales. A suggestion^4 that the orbit may have evolved purely by chaotic dynamics appears unlikely in light of recent orbital stability studies^6, unless one appeals to a well-timed collision to place Pluto in its stable orbit^19. Here I show that Pluto could have acquired its current orbit during the late stages of planetary accretion, when the jovian planets underwent significant orbital migration as a result of encounters with residual planetesimals^7. As Neptune moved outwards, a small body like Pluto in an initially circular orbit could have been captured into the 3:2 resonance, following which its orbital eccentricity would rise rapidly to its current Neptune-crossing value.MILLISECOND pulsars are usually found in binary systems. This is in keeping with the generally accepted model for the formation of such pulsars^14 in which an old neutron star is spun up to high angular velocities by the accretion of matter from a companion star. The millisecond pulsar 1620 – 26 in the globular cluster M4 is no exception: timing measurements^1,2 reveal the presence of a 0.3-solar-mass companion star (probably a white dwarf) with an orbital period of 191 days. But subsequent measurements of this pulsar have identified a small but significant deviation from the expected behaviour^3,4, suggestive of an unusually large second derivative in the pulsar's rotation rate^5. Here we examine several possible sources—both intrinsic and extrinsic—for this derivative, and we find that it is best explained by the presence of a second, weakly bound companion object moving in a wide orbit around the main binary system. The third body in this hierarchical system has an orbital period of ∼100 years and a mass approximately ten times that of Jupiter, and may have been captured during a recent collision with another stellar system^6.The three-dimensional structure of bovine profilin–β-actin has been solved to 2.55 Å resolution by X-ray crystallography. There are several significant local changes in the structure of β-actin compared with α-actin as well as an overall 5° rotation between its two major domains. Actin molecules in the crystal are organized into ribbons through intermolecular contacts like those found in oligomeric protein assemblies. Profilin forms two extensive contacts with the actin ribbon, one of which appears to correspond to the solution contact in vitro .There has been a deluge of reports, in this journal and elsewhere, dealing with the subject of signal transduction and the Ras protein. Why all the fuss? The following is a News and Views article with a difference - an explanation for those not close to events, and a celebration of an achievement in biomedical research.The isotopic compositions of interstellar graphite grains in meteorites provide a record of the stellar environments in which they formed. The grains have ^12C/^13C ratios that range far from the terrestrial value, as well as large variations in ^14N/^15N and ^16O/^18O, and pronounced ^26Mg excesses from the decay of extinct ^26AI. This isotopic variability indicates several types of stellar source, including asymptotic giant branch stars, Wolf–Rayet stars and novae.Virtual reality may be more than an extension of the cinema, but quite what is not yet clear.The decision of the US Congress to kill the Superconducting Super Collider does not and should not spell the death of particle physics, but rather the beginning of a strictly international programme.New on the market this week — a DNA sequencer that delivers typical read lengths of 800 bases per sample, software for HPLC users and a solvent recycling system designed to reduce costs.THIS cover picture of the 3 June issue (Nature 363, issue 6428; 1993) depicted an inhibitor of influenza virus bound to its target, as described on page 418 in an article by M. von Itzstein et al. In the caption to the cover picture given on the Contents page, an acknowledgement was omitted to the authors of the program used to generate this graphic.TWO major unanswered questions concerning the specificity of antibodies are: how do structurally different antigens bind with high affinity to the same antibody, and what are the limits of the antibody combining site complementarity and flexibility that contribute to such crossreactivity? We report here a comparative analysis of the X-ray structures of five conformationally different steroids in complex with the Fab′ fragment of an anti-progesterone antibody DB3 at 2.7 Å. This antibody is unable to complement completely the shape of the hydrophobic antigen so that crossreactivity occurs with other ligands without major structural rearrangements of the binding site. Antigen specificity can be explained through conserved interactions of DB3 with the steroid D-ring, whereas some of the crossreactivity is realized through different binding orientations of the steroid skeleton that place the A-ring into alternative pockets on the antibody surface. The restricted gene usage of the VGAM3.8 family in the generation of anti-progesterone monoclonal antibodies^1,2 may be explained by the specific interaction of VH hallmark residues with the steroid D-ring. This first detailed structure of steroid interactions with a protein could be applied to the understanding of general mechanisms of steroid recognition as well as in the design of specific binding sites for small hydrophobic ligands.CYCLIC AMP-regulated gene expression frequently involves a DNA element known as the cAMP-regulated enhancer (CRE)^1–4. Many transcription factors bind to this element, including the protein CREB^5,6, which is activated as a result of phosphorylation by protein kinase A^7. This modification stimulates interaction with one or more of the general transcription factors or, alternatively, allows recruitment of a co-activator. Here we report that CREB phosphorylated by protein kinase A binds specifically to a nuclear protein of M _r 265K which we term CBP (for CREB-binding protein). Fusion of a heterologous DNA-binding domain to the amino terminus of CBP enables the chimaeric protein to function as a protein kinase A-regulated transcriptional activator. We propose that CBP may participate in cAMP-regulated gene expression by interacting with the activated phosphorylated form of CREB.XERODERMA pigmentosum (XP), a genetically heterogeneous human disease, results from a defect in nucleotide excision repair of ultraviolet-damaged DNA. XP patients are extremely sensitive to sunlight and suffer from a high incidence of skin cancers. Cell fusion studies have identified seven XP complementation groups, A–G^1–3. Group D is of particular interest as mutations in this gene can also cause Cockayne's syndrome and trichothiodystrophy^4. The XPD gene was initially named ERCC2 (excision repair cross complementing) as it was cloned using human DNA to complement the ultraviolet sensitivity of a rodent cell line^5. We have purified the XPD protein to near homogeneity and show that it possesses single-stranded DNA-dependent ATPase and DNA helicase activities. We tested whether XPD can substitute for its yeast counterpart RAD3 , which is essential for excision repair and for cell viability^6. Expression of the XPD gene in Saccharomyces cerevisiae can complement the lethality defect of a mutation in the RAD3 gene^6, suggesting that XPD is an essential gene in humans.THE protein IsK ( M _r 14,500) is present in epithelial cells^1, heart^2,3, uterus^4 and lymphocytes^5 and induces slowly activating K^+ currents when expressed in Xenopus oocytes^1. The finding that mutations of its single transmembrane segment altered channel gating^6 or selectivity^7 has suggested that IsK is a channel-forming protein. But IsK does nof exhibit the K^+ channel hallmarks^8 (a conserved K^+ selective pore (H5) flanked by either six^9–11 or two^12,13 membrane-spanning regions). Here we report that IsK expression in Xenopus oocytes also induces a Cl^− selective current very similar to the Cl^− current produced by phospholemman expression^14 and with biophysical, pharmacological and regulation characteristics very different from those of the IsK-induced K^+ channel activity. IsK mutagenesis identifies amino- and carboxy-terminal domains as critical for the induction of Cl^− and K^+ channel activities, respectively. Our data lead to a model in which the IsK protein (now called IsK, Cl) acts as a potent activator of endogenous and otherwise silent K^+ or Cl^− channels.Reinventing science advisory apparatus in the White House should be good for science.Water in Crisis: A Guide to the World's Fresh Water Resources. By Peter H. Gleick. Oxford Science Publications: 1993. Pp. 473. £40, $55 (hbk); £19.50, $29.95 (pbk).Black Holes and Baby Universes and Other Essays. By Stephen Hawking. Bantam Press: 1993. Pp. 175. $16.99.Hans Krebs: Volume 1: The Formation of a Scientific Life, 1900–1933. By F. L. Holmes. Oxford University Press: 1991. Pp. 491. Volume 2: Architect of Intermediary Metabolism, 1933–1937. By F. L. Holmes. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 481. £40.00, $49.50 each.Last week's folksy gathering off Seattle should not be mistaken for the country fair it has been represented as. Clinton's immediate goals (and success) notwithstanding, it marks the beginning of an historic process.The natural familiarity of graduate science students with computers and software opens up new opportunities in areas both related to science and well away from it, in the financial world.Familial startle disease is among the oddest of disorders. The demonstration of a mutation in the inhibitory glycine receptor points towards a cause of this and similar perturbations.THE Cys_2-His_2 zinc-finger is the most widely occurring DNA-binding motif^1–3. The first structure of a zinc-finger/DNA complex revealed a fairly simple mechanism for DNA recognition^4 suggesting that the zinc-finger might represent a candidate template for designing proteins to recognize DNA^5. Residues at three key positions in an α-helical 'reading head' play a dominant role in base-recognition and have been targets for mutagenesis experiments aimed at deriving a recognition code^6–8. Here we report the structure of a two zinc-finger DNA-binding domain from the protein Tramtrack complexed with DNA. The amino-terminal zinc-finger and its interaction with DNA illustrate several novel features. These include the use of a serine residue, which is semi-conserved and located outside the three key positions, to make a base contact. Its role in base-recognition correlates with a large, local, protein-induced deformation of the DNA helix at a flexible A-T-A sequence and may give insight into previous mutagenesis experiments^9,10. It is apparent from this structure that zinc-finger/ DNA recognition is more complex than was originally perceived.The Fourth Indira Gandhi symposium last week may not have redefined the good society with precision, but it did succeed in showing that the path into the future is beset with contradictions to be resolved.What does the future hold for space research? Wrangles between groups of people with different interests must b resolved if a prescription is to be found.THE neuronal nicotinic α7 (nAChR) and 5-hydroxytryptamine (5HT_3) receptors^1–3 are ligand-gated ion channels with a homologous topological organization and have activation and desensitization reactions in common. Yet these homo-oligomeric receptors differ in the pharmacology of their binding sites for agonists and competitive antagonists^3,4, and in their sensitivity to Ca^2+ ions. The α7 channel is highly permeable to Ca^2+ ions ^5,6 and external Ca^2+ ions potentiate, in an allosteric manner, the permeability response to acetylcholine, as shown for other neuronal nAChRs^7,8. The 5HT_3 channel, in contrast, is not permeable to Ca^2+ ions, but blocked by them^3,9. To assign these properties to delimited domains of the primary structure, we constructed several recombinant chimaeric α7–5HT_3 receptors. We report here that one of the constructs expresses a functional receptor that contains the serotonergic channel still blocked by Ca^2+ ions, but is activated by nicotinic ligands and potentiated by external Ca^2+ ions.ALTHOUGH the biological activity of the insect moulting hormone ecdysone, is manifested through a hormonally regulated transcriptional cascade associated with chromosomal puffing^1–3, a direct association of the receptor with the puff has yet to be established. The cloned ecdysone receptor^4 (EcR) is by itself incapable of high-affinity DNA binding or transcriptional activation. Rather, these activities are dependent on heterodimer formation with Ultraspiracle^5 (USP) the insect homologue of vertebrate retinoid X receptor^6. Here we report that native EcR and USP are co-localized on ecdysone-responsive loci of polytene chromosomes. Moreover, we show that natural ecdysones selectively promote physical association between EcR and USP, and conversely, that high-affinity hormone binding requires both EcR and USP. Replacement of USP with retinoid X receptor produces heterodimers with distinct pharmacological and functional properties. These results redefine the ecdysone receptor as a dynamic complex whose activity may be altered by combinatorial interactions among subunits and ligand.THE HER4/ERBB4 gene encodes a 180K transmembrane protein (HER4/pl80^ erbB4 that is structurally related to the 185K product (HERl/pl85^ erbB2 of the HER2/ERBB2 proto-oncogene^1. A 45K heparin-binding glycoprotein (p45) has been characterized that specifically activates the intrinsic tyrosine kinase activity of HER4 (ref. 2). This HER4 ligand shares several features with the heregulin family of proteins, including molecular mass, ability to induce differentiation of breast cancer cells, activation of tyrosine phosphorylation in MDA-MB453 cells, and amino-terminal protein sequence. Heregulin exists as multiple isoforms and all are presumed to interact directly with HER2 (refs 3–6). We have used binding and phosphorylation studies with recombinant ligand on cell lines expressing recombinant receptors, and report here that heregulin, like p45, is a specific ligand for HER4. Furthermore, heregulin fails to induce phosphorylation of HER2 in the absence of HER4. These findings suggest that activation of the HER4 receptor is involved in signal transduction by heregulin.KINESIN heavy chain and kinesin-related polypeptides (KRPs) comprise a family of motor proteins with diverse intracellular transport functions^1–7. Using pan-kinesin peptide antibodies that react with these proteins^8,9, we haven previously purified from sea urchin eggs a trimeric microtubule-binding and bundling protein, KRP_(85/95) (ref. 8) comprising subunits of M _r115,000 (115K), 95K and 85K. We report here that kinesin-related genes encode the 85K and 95K subunits, and that the protein can be immunoprecipitated from cytosol as a trimeric complex using an 85K monoclonal antibody. We also find that purified KRP_(85/95) directs movements towards the 'plus' ends of microtubules. To our knowledge, this protein is the first kinesin-related motor to be purified from its natural host cell in a native multimeric state.CLONING and sequencing techniques now allow us to characterize genes directly instead of having to deduce their properties from their effects. This new genetics reaches its apotheosis in the plan to obtain the complete DNA sequence of the human genome, but this is far beyond the capacity of present sequencing methods. Small 'model' genomes, such as those of Escherichia coli (4.7 megabases (Mb)^1 and yeast (14 Mb)^2, or even those of Caenorhabditis elegans (100 Mb) and Drosophila (165 Mb), are better scaled to existing technology. The yeast genome will contain genes with functions common to all eukaryotic cells, and those of simple multi-cellular organisms may throw light on the genetic specification of more complex functions. However, vertebrates differ in their morphology and development, so the ideal model would be a vertebrate genome of minimum size and complexity but with maximum homology to the human genome. Here we report the characterization of the small genome (400 Mb) of the tetraodontoid fish, Fugu rubripes ^5. A random sequencing approach supported by gene probing shows that the haploid genome contains 400 Mb of DNA, of which more that 90% is unique. This genome is 7.5 times smaller than the human genome and because it has a similar gene repertoire it is the best model genome for the discovery of human genes.THE taxonomy of Australopithecus afarensis, the oldest known hominid species, has been a matter of debate since its description in 1978 (ref. 1). Some authorities regard all specimens assigned to A. afarensis as belonging to a single taxon^2–4whereas others regard the Tanzanian and Ethiopian specimens as each representing a different species^5,6. Further controversy surrounds the issues of sexual dimorphism and locomotion among these hominids. Resolution of these problems would shed light on hominid phylogeny in general and on the ancestry of later Australopithecus and Homo . Fossils discovered in the Afar of Ethiopia in 1990 constitute the first major addition to the 3–4 million year (Myr) hominid record since the 1970s. We report here the discovery of new fossils from Maka, dated to 3.4 Myr ago, which provide powerful support for the interpretation of A. afarensis as a single, ecologically diverse, sexually dimorphic, bipedal Pliocene primate species whose known range encompassed Ethiopia and Tanzania.CONSIDERABLE controversy exists over the role of density-dependent processes in controlling animal population size. In populations that fluctuate cyclically or erratically, for example many voles and insects^1,2, theory predicts that either density-dependence is weak^1,3, or that density-dependent responses lag behind density^4–6. One key mechanism for lagged density-dependence is a delay in regeneration of food resources following heavy exploitation. Here we show that meadow vole (Microtus pennsylvanicus) populations respond immediately to high density by reducing breeding effort and hence population growth, disproving the hypothesis that density-dependence is weak. In addition, vole populations do not show a delay in growth following marked reduction in plant biomass (their source of food and cover). We conclude that intrinsic density-dependence processes tend to stabilize vole populations, and that cyclic dynamics are not caused by lagged effects of resource exploitation.INCLUSION-BEARING diamonds erupted by kimberlites are time capsules from the sub-continental mantle. Diamonds with peridotitic mineral inclusions ('peridotitic diamonds') from Cretaceous kimberlites in southern Africa have resided in stable mantle beneath the Kaapvaal craton since the Archaean^1. Diamonds with eclogitic inclusions ('eclogitic diamonds') reflect episodic mantle events during the Proterozoic^2–3. Here we discuss and present isotope data for a further category of diamonds from the Proterozoic Premier kimberlite, in which peridotitic inclusion minerals have compositions reflecting an origin in both harzburgitic (clinopyroxene-free) and Iherzolitic (clinopyroxene-bearing) assemblages. The harzburgitic garnet inclusions and their counterparts found as isolated minerals ('macrocrysts') in the kimberlite host rock^4 have neodym-ium and strontium isotope signatures consistent with an Archaean age (>3,000 Myr) and metasomatized mantle source. Lherzolitic garnet and clinopyroxene inclusions yield a preferred Sm-Nd isochron age of 1,930 Myr, which is ∼100 Myr less than that of the adjacent Bushveld Complex^5, suggesting a link analogous to that between harzburgitic diamond formation and komatiitic magma tism in the Archaean^1. The final generation of diamonds, those with eclogitic inclusions, were formed ∼1,150 Myr ago, just before kimberlite emplacement^6.THE pathways by which silicate minerals transform to solutes, clays and amorphous solids are relevant to a wide range of natural, industrial and even medical concerns. For example, weathered layers on silicate may have a high sorptive capacity, affecting nutrient and contamination retention in soils; less obviously, such layers on inhaled silicate grains might affect their interaction with lung tissue. Here we report the observation, in dissolution experiments on a range of chain-silicate minerals, of the formation of a near-surface amorphous region enriched in silicon and hydrogen, and depleted in other metals. Raman spectroscopy and ion-beam elemental analysis show that portions of the polymeric silicate anion in this region spontaneously reconstruct to form a network that contains four-member silicate rings and areas of incipient crystallization. If hydrolysable metals interact with the silicate anion during this reconstruction, clays and amorphous products may form directly. This process complements traditional dissolution-precipitation pathways of mineral diagenesis^1, as the silicon does not have to be present in solution before being incorporated into a growing secondary phase.GLOBAL warming potentials for radiatively active trace gases (such as methane and chlorofluorocarbons) have generally been expressed^1–2 relative to the time-integrated climate forcing per unit emission of carbon dioxide. Previous attempts to estimate the integrated climate forcing per unit CO_2 emitted have focused on perturbations to steady-state conditions in carbon-cycle models. But for non-steady-state conditions, the integrated climate forcing from a CO_2 perturbation depends both on the initial conditions and on future atmospheric CO_2 concentrations. As atmospheric CO_2concentrations increase, the radiative forcing per unit CO_2 emitted will become smaller because the strongest absorption bands will already be saturated. At the same time, higher concentrations of dissolved carbon in the surface ocean will reduce the ocean's ability to absorb excess CO_2from the atmosphere. Each of these effects taken alone would affect the climate forcing from a pulse of emitted CO_2 by a factor of three or more; but here we show that, taken together, they compensate for each other. The net result is that the global warming potential of CO_2 relative to other radiatively active trace gases is nearly independent of the CO_2emission scenario. Thus, the concept of the global warming potential remains useful, despite the nonlinearities in the climate system and uncertainties in future emissions.POLYMORPHISM of crystal structures—alternative crystal structures resulting from variations in ionic and molecular packing^1 and conformation^2—is important in a number of fields in solid-state chemistry, including biomineralization^3 (in the mineral phases of calcium carbonate^3, for example), polymer science (polypropylene^4, for example), explosives (ammonium nitrate, lead azide^5), nonlinear optical materials^6, ceramics and catalysis (zeolites and metal oxides^7). In the pharmaceutical and fine-chemicals industries, polymorphism is central to both production process design and product activity^8. Here we show that crystal twinning can stabilize a crystal polymorph that is otherwise not the most stable form. We use electron microscopy, X-ray diffraction and Raman spectroscopy to show that the apparently indefinite persistence of a metastable polymorph of terephthalic acid can be explained on this basis. If twinning can be engineered, it may therefore provide a means for stabilizing crystal phases with useful physical properties.HIGH-ENERGY astrophysical sources can be difficult to image. Photons with energies above ∼5 keV are hard to focus, so experiments usually employ coded masks^1–4 or moving collimators^5–9 to modulate the flux received by the detectors; the resulting signals are then deconvolved to form the images. Here we demonstrate a new approach which makes use of the large-area, non-collimated detectors of the Burst and Transient Source Experiment on the Compton Gamma-Ray Observatory. As the spacecraft moves in its orbit, the Earth itself acts as a stable occulting disk. Changes in the measured signal during a single occultation correspond to the integrated intensity of sources positioned along the arc described by the Earth's edge (limb). The low-altitude, moderately inclined orbit of the spacecraft ensures that the angle at which the limb traverses a source region varies between occultations, and thus data from a series of occultations can be transformed into an image. This imaging process is conceptually and mathematically similar to those used in fan-beam aperture-synthesis radio-astronomy^10 and medical computer-assisted tomography^11, and holds great promise for all-sky imaging with relatively simple (and hence inexpensive) detectors.QUASARS have long been known to vary in magnitude^1, and it now appears that all quasars are to some extent variable^2. In a few extreme cases, quasar luminosities have varied over several magnitudes on a timescale of months; this behaviour is normally accompanied by other phenomena (such as radio emission or enhanced polarization) indicative of processes intrinsic to the quasars. Long-term luminosity variations, while less dramatic, are much more common, but their origin remains poorly understood. Here I investigate this longer-term behaviour for a sample of approximately 300 quasars at redshifts ranging from 1 to 3, whose optical magnitudes have been measured periodically for 17 years. I show that there is a positive correlation between the timescale of variability and the average luminosity, but little evidence for an increase in timescale due to redshift (and hence time dilation). These findings are inconsistent with any known variability mechanism intrinsic to quasars, but can be explained by gravitational lensing of the quasar images by compact substellar objects along the lines of sight. If this interpretation is correct, the population of lensing objects must have a density of at least 0.1 of the critical cosmological density.High-quality palaeointensity data have been obtained from Thellier-Thellier experiments on recent and Cretaceous submarine basaltic glasses. Whereas the recent samples faithfully yield today's geomagnetic intensity at the site, the palaeointensities for the beginning and end of the Cretaceous normal superchron are only 45% and 25%, respectively, of today's value. The data thus extend the 'Mesozoic dipole low' into the Cretaceous superchron, and confirm that submarine basaltic glass is an excellent material for palaeointensity studies.A long and continuous record of the geomagnetic field intensity shows that intensity variations are dominated by two modes. Major episodes of field regeneration prevail on timescales of a few thousand years immediately after most reversals, whereas stable polarity states are characterized by a slow (∼0.5 Myr) relaxation process. Reversals can be seen as the consequence of a progressive degradation of the dipole field.The reaction mechanism of protein folding by the chaperonin GroEL and its regulator GroES has been defined. GroES and substrate protein counteract each other's effects on GroEL: whereas GroES stabilizes GroEL in the ADP-bound state, binding of unfolded polypeptide within the cavity of the GroEL cylinder triggers ADP and GroES release. Upon ADP-ATP exchange, GroES reassociates with GroEL and ATP hydrolysis discharges the bound protein for folding. Partially folded protein rebinds to the chaperonin, thus perpetuating the cycle until folding is complete.The intense controversies that surrounded the youth of punctuated equilibrium have helped it mature to a useful extension of evolutionary theory. As a complement to phyletic gradualism, its most important implications remain the recognition of stasis as a meaningful and predominant pattern within the history of species, and in the recasting of macroevolution as the differential success of certain species (and their descendants) within clades.Fault Mechanics and Transport Properties of Rocks. Edited by Brian Evans and Teng-Fong Wong. Academic: 1992. Pp. 524. £45, $99.Public & Private Science: The King George III Collection. By Alan Q. Morton and Jane A. Wess. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 710. £55Critical Assembly: A Technical History of Los Alamos During the Oppenheimer Years, 1943-1945. By Lillian Hod-deson, Paul W. Henriksen, Roger A. Meade and Catherine L. Westfall. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 509. £45, $39.95.The Sputnik Challenge: Elsenhower's Response to the Soviet Satellite. By Robert A. Divine. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 245. $25, £19.95.The Non-Proliferation Treaty may collapse at the review conference in 1995 unless several urgent problems are dealt with before then. Either way, attention should shift from the avoidance of weapons to the avoidance of war.THE sense of smell is highly evolved in mammals, allowing discrimination between a vast number of odorants, with detection thresholds as low as 10^−17M (ref. 1). Although several features of mammalian olfactory transduction have been revealed by biochemical and molecular biological studies^2–11, the odorant-induced membrane current has remained elusive. In amphibians this current is mediated by cyclic-nucleotide-gated channels^12–15, which depolarize the cell by Na^+ and Ca^+influx^16,17 and consequent Cl^- efflux through Ca^2+-dependent Cl^- channels^18,19. The Cl^- current may be absent in mammals, however, because its proposed role is linked to the aquatic habitat of amphibians^18. Here we show that the transduction current in rat olfactory receptor cells is initiated by cyclic-nucleotide-gated channels. The Cl^- current is also present and endows the transduction current with a steep sigmoidal dependence on cyclic AMP concentration in both rat and in an amphibian, indicating a new function for the Cl^- channel: nonlinear amplification of the transduction signal, whereby suprathreshold responses are boosted relative to basal transduction noise.Recent seismic models of three-dimensional mantle structure and topography on the transition-zone seismic discontinuities permit the direct evaluation of the buoyancy forces that drive large-scale mantle flow. This buoyancy distribution, coupled with radial viscosity models that are consistent with the observed geoid, predicts flow patterns with significant vertical flow through the 660-km phase boundary. The observed topography on the 660-km discontinuity acts to inhibit convection across the boundary, but is two to four times too small to prevent whole-mantle convection.Advanced Materials for Optics and Electronics. Editor-in-chief D. J. Cole-Hamilton. Wiley. 6/yr. $595 (institutional); $445 (personal). Molecular Engineering. Editors J.-M. Lehn, J. Maruani and J. Zyss. Kluwer. 4/yr. DFL382. Molecular Materials. Editor-in-chief L. M. Blinov. Gordon and Breach. 4/yr. $384 (institutional); $85, £57 (personal).Materials World. Editor Nuna Staniaszek. Institute of Materials. 12/yr. Europe £136, elsewhere $283.Natural Product Letters. Editors-in-chief Atta-ur-Kahman and E. Wenkert. Harwood Academic. 4/yr. $258 (institutional); $65, £43 (personal).Natural Toxins. Editors-in-chief John W. ApSimon and J. David Miller. Wiley. 6/yr. USA $195, Canada and Mexico $255, elsewhere $277.50 (institutional); USA, Canada and Mexico $97.50, elsewhere $127.50 (personal).The seismic causes of last week's tragedy are less forbidding than the ultimate cause: rural poverty.If the fighting on the streets of Moscow gets out of hand, Russian science will be finished, but this or the next Russian government needs outside advice on how it should reorganize the research enterprise.Evolutionary Anthropology: Issues, News, and Reviews. Editor J. G. Fleagle. Wiley. 6/yr. USA $145, Canada and Mexico $205, elsewhere $227.50 (institutional); USA, Canada and Mexico $36, elsewhere $54 (personal).Molecular Ecology. Editors Terry Burke, Ray Seidler and Harry Smith. Blackwell Scientific. 6/yr. USA and Canada $335, Europe £205, elsewhere £225 (institutional); USA and Canada $61, Europe £35, elsewhere £41 (personal).Journal of Liposome Research. Editor Leaf Huang. Dekker. 3/yr. $225 (institutional); $112.50 (personal).Molecular Marine Biology and Biotechnology. Editor-in-chief Dennis Powers. Blackwell Scientific. 6/yr. USA $160, Canada and Mexico $170, elsewhere $190 (institutional); USA $70, Canada and Mexico $80, elsewhere $100 (personal). Fish and Shellfish Immunology. Editors A. E. Ellis and M. F. Tatner. Academic. 7/yr. £135, $255.Current Directions in Psychological Science. Editors S. Scarr and C. R. Gallistel. Cambridge University Press. 6/yr. $125, £69 (institutional); $63f £35 (personal). The International Journal for the Psychology of Religion. Editors L. B. Brown, Ralph W. Hood Jr and H. Newton Malony. Lawrence Erlbaum. 4/yr. USA and Canada $125, elsewhere $150 (institutional); USA and Canada $35, elsewhere $60 (personal).Developmental Dynamics. Editor-in-chief Paul F. Goetinck. Wiley. 12/yr. USA $1,135, Canada and Mexico $1,255, elsewhere $1,300.Pharmacology Communications. Editors-in-chief N. G. Bowery and R. R. Ruffolo Jr. Harwood Academic. 4/yr. $242 (institutional); $95, £63 (personal). Pharmaceutical and Pharmacological Letters. Editors P. Dominiak et al. Springer. 6/yr. DM360, $225.50.Basic and Applied Myology. Editor-in-chief U. Carraro. Unipress, Padova, Italy. 4/yr. Italy IL150,000, elsewhere $150 (institutional); Italy IL100,000, elsewhere $100 (personal). Neuromuscular Disorders. Editor-in-chief V. Dubowitz. Pergamon. 6/yr. £217, $335 (institutional); £80, $123 (personal).Journal of Genetic Counseling. Editor-in-chief Deborah L. Eunpu. Human Sciences. 4/yr. USA $95, elsewhere $100 (institutional); USA $40, elsewhere $45 (personal).Helix: Amgen's Magazine of Biotechnology. Editor James Geary. 3/yr. Bugamor International, Haak 58, 1353 AE Almere-Haven, The Netherlands. Distribution details available on application to publisher.Nature 364, 806-809 (1993) DURING the production process, a line of text in this letter was accidentally omitted. The fourth sentence of the last paragraph should read, "The liver showed gross injury by administration of the anti-Fas antibody and acute hepatic failure seems to be responsible for thedeath of mice, although we cannot rule out lethal damage in tissues such as heart and lung.DNA ANALOGUES are currently being intensely investigated owing to their potential as gene-targeted drugs^1–3. Furthermore, their properties and interaction with DNA and RNA could provide a better understanding of the structural features of natural DNA that determine its unique chemical, biological and genetic properties^3,4. We recently designed a DNA analogue, PNA, in which the backbone is structurally homomorphous with the deoxyribose backbone and consists of N -(2-aminoethyl)glycine units to which the nucleobases are attached^5–9. We showed that PNA oligomers containing solely thymine and cytosine can hybridize to complementary oligonucleotides, presumably by forming Watson–Crick–Hoogsteen (PNA)_2–DNA triplexes, which are much more stable than the corresponding DNA–DNA duplexes^5–7, and bind to double-stranded DNA by strand displacement^5,8. We report here that PNA containing all four natural nucleobases hybridizes to complementary oligonucleotides obeying the Watson–Crick base-pairing rules, and thus is a true DNA mimic in terms of base-pair recognition.THE eukaryotic TATA-binding protein TBP, which is required for transcription by RNA polymerase II, is tightly associated with a particular set of factors in the TFIID complex^1–5, and as such provides a target for transcriptional regulation exerted by upstream factors. An embryonic carcinoma (EC) cell-specific activity like that of the viral factor ElA has been implicated in the mediation of transactivation from the retinoic acid receptor to human TBP, but yeast TBP cannot perform this function^6. Using TBP mutants with an altered TATA-box-binding specificity^7, we show here that yeast TBP can mediate transcriptional activation in mammalian cells and that its inability to convey retinoic acid-dependent transactivation in EC cells is due to specific residues in its core region. These residues preclude a functional association with the cellular ElA-like activity. TBP is thus a target for retinoic acid-dependent transactivation in EC cells by providing a surface for interaction with the EC cell-specific ElA-like activity.THERE have been few investigations into the role of ion channels in mammalian early embryonic development^1–4, despite studies showing that changes in ion channel activity accompany the early embryonic development of non-mammalian species^5–7 and the proliferation of mammalian cells^8–12. Here we report that a large-conductance, voltage-activated K^+ channel is active in unfertilized mouse oocytes but is rarely observed in later embryos. The channel activity is linked to the cell cycle, being active throughout M and Gl phases, and switching off during the Gl-to-S transition. These changes in channel activity are accompanied by corresponding shifts in membrane potential. Inactivation of the channel during S/G2 can be prevented by exposing the oocytes to dibutyryl cyclic AMP or forskolin, an activator of adenylyl cyclase. Inhibition of protein synthesis with puromycin did not prevent inactivation of the channel at the end of Gl or its subsequent reactivation at the end of G2, indicating that the channel activity is not regulated by mitosis-promoting factor or cyclins.Antisense Research and Development. Editors James Hawkins, Arthur M. Krieg and Cy. A. Stein. Liebert. 4/yr. USA and Canada, $121; elsewhere £161.Biological Signals. Editors-in-chief S. F. Pang, T. Fujita and P. A. Ward. Karger. 6/yr. SFr75, $250 (institutional); SFrl87.50, $125 (personal).GROWTH signalling networks that use glycerophospholipid metabolites as second messengers have been well characterized^1,2, but less is known of the second messengers derived from sphingolipids^3,4, another major class of membrane lipids. A tantalizing link between sphingolipids and cellular proliferation has emerged from the discovery that the sphingolipid metabolites sphingosine and sphingosine-1-phosphate stimulate growth of quiescent Swiss 3T3 fibroblasts by a pathway that is independent of protein kinase C^5,6. Sphingosine-1-phosphate is rapidly produced from sphingosine and may mediate its biological effects^6. Furthermore, sphingosine-1-phosphate triggers the dual signal transduction pathways of calcium mobilization^6,7 and activation of phospholipase D^8, prominent events in the control of cellular proliferation. Here we report that activation of sphingosine kinase and the formation of sphingosine-1-phosphate are important in the signal transduction pathways activated by the potent mitogens platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF) and fetal calf serum (FCS).THE Notch locus of Drosophila melanogaster encodes a 2,703-amino-acid transmembrane protein required for a variety of developmental processes, including neurogenesis, oogenesis and ommatidial assembly^1,2. The Notch protein contains a large extracellular domain of 36 epidermal growth factor-like repeats as well as three Notch/Lin-12 repeats and an intracellular domain with 6 CdclO/ ankyrin repeats, motifs that are highly conserved in several vertebrate Notch homologues^3–9. Truncation of the extracellular domain of the Drosophila Notch protein produces an activated receptor, as judged by its ability to cause phenotypes similar to gain-of-function alleles or duplications of the Notch locus^10. Equivalent truncations of vertebrate Notch-related proteins have been associated with malignant neoplasms and other developmental abnormalities^8,11–13. We present here an analysis of activated Notch function at single-cell resolution in the Drosophila compound eye. We find that overexpression of full-length Notch in defined cell types has no apparent effects but that overexpression of activated Notch in the same cells transiently blocks their proper cell-fate commitment, causing them either to adopt incorrect cell fates or to differentiate incompletely. Moreover, an activated Notch protein lacking the transmembrane domain is translocated to the nucleus, raising the possibility that Notch may participate directly in nuclear events.DURING T-cell development, site-specific DNA rearrangements mediating assembly of β - and α -chain genes of the T-cell receptor (TCR) are developmentally ordered^1,2. In particular, assembly and expression of a complete β -chain gene blocks further rearrangements at the β -locus (a process referred to as allelic exclusion)^3 and drives the generation and expansion of CD4^+ 8^+ cells^4,5. Although the mechanism used by TCR β chains to deliver such signals is unknown, studies in transgenic animals have suggested that the lymphocyte-specific protein tyrosine kinase p56^ lck may impinge on a similar signalling pathway^6. The hypothesis that TCR β chains deliver intracellular signals via p56^ lck makes an explicit prediction: that interference with p56^ lck function will mitigate the effects of a simultaneously expressed TCR β chain. Here we confirm this prediction through examination of allelic exclusion in mice expressing both a functional TCR β chain transgene and a catalytically inactive form of p56^ lck .WE describe here a new view of primary visual cortex (VI) based on measurements of neural responses in V1 to patterns called ‘illusory contours’ (Fig. l a , b ). Detection of an object's boundary contours is a fundamental visual task. Boundary contours are defined by discontinuities not only in luminance and colour, but also in texture^1–3, disparity^4 and motion^5–7. Two theoretical approaches can account for illusory contour perception. The cognitive approach emphasizes top-down processes^8,9. An alternative emphasizes bottom-up processing. This latter view is supported by (1) stimulus constraints for illusory contour perception^10–14 and (2) the discovery by von der Heydt and Peterhans^15–17 of neurons in extrastriate visual area V2 (but not in V1) of macaque monkeys that respond to illusory contours. Using stimuli different from those used previously^15,16, we found illusory contour responses in about half the neurons studied in V1 of macaque monkeys. Therefore, there are neurons as early as V1 with the computational power to detect illusory contours and to help distinguish figure from ground.THE ability to isolate gene sequences and analyse their expression patterns has generated demand for mutations created to assess their biological functions. In Drosophila melanogaster this can be achieved by traditional mutagenesis, but this is time-consuming, labour-intensive and not always successful. Moreover, the functions of genes that are expressed several times during develop-ment are often obscured in the later stages because of disruptions caused by the absence of early gene function. Here we propose a new strategy to create conditional knock-out mutations using a targeted heat-inducible ribozyme. Ribozymes are catalytic RNA molecules that specifically cleave RNAs^1–11 and are potentially useful for studying gene function during animal development because the expression of critical regulatory genes is usually low and their function is often dosage-dependent. The ribozyme can be delivered to a specific region or at a particular developmental stage using a region-specific or inducible promoter. The Drosophila fushi tarazu ( ftz ) gene is a good candidate for testing this approach^12–17. We generated transgenic flies carrying a ribozyme against the ftz gene. The two developmental phases of ftz function can be distinguished by timed induction of the ribozyme. Activation of the ribozyme in the blastoderm disrupts the ftz seven-stripe pattern and produces ftz -like pair-rule defects in larvae. The involvement of ftz in neurogenesis was verified by activation of the ribozyme during the early phase of formation of the central nervous system.THE Drosophila ether-à-go-go (eag) mutant is responsible for altered potassium currents in excitable tissue^1. These mutants exhibit spontaneous, repetitive firing of action potentials in the motor axons of larval neuromuscular junctions^2. The eag gene encodes a polypeptide^3 that shares sequence similarities with several different ionic channel proteins, including voltage-gated potassium channels^3, an inward rectifier^4,5 as well as cyclic-nucleotide-gated channels^6. These formal similarities in the derived primary sequences indicate that eag polypeptides might express a new type of ion channel. Here we report the expression by eag RNA in Xenopus oocytes of such a channel which incorporates properties of both voltage- and ligand-gated channels. The perme-ability of these eag channels to potassium and calcium is dependent on voltage and cyclic AMP. The ability to mediate potassium-outward and calcium-inward currents endows this channel with properties likely to be important in the modulation of synaptic efficiency in both central and peripheral nervous systems.ALTHOUGH the biological basis of schizophrenia is not known, possible causes include genetic defects, viruses^1, amines^2, brain structure and metabolism^3–5, neuroreceptors^6–8, and G proteins^9. The hypothesis of dopamine overactivity in schizophrenia is based on the fact that neuroleptics block dopamine D2 receptors in direct relation to their clinical antipsychotic potencies^10–11. Moreover, dopamine D2 or D2-like receptors are elevated in postmortem schizophrenia brain tissue^8,12,13. This elevation, however, is only found in vivo using [^11C]methylspiperone^14 but not [^11C]raclopride^15. The dopamine D4 receptor gene^16 has not yet been excluded in schizophrenia because the 21 gene variants^17 of D4 have not yet been tested. Because the link between Dl and D2 receptors is reduced in schizophrenia tissue^9, we tested whether one component of this link was sensitive to guanine nucleotide. We report here that the binding of [^3H]raclopride to D2 receptors in schizophrenia was not sensitive to guanine nucleotide. This finding permitted analysis of data^12,18 on the binding of [^3H]emonapride to the D2, D3 and D4 receptors. We conclude that the combined density of D2 and D3 receptors (labelled by [^3H]raclopride^16,19) is increased by only 10% in schizophrenia brain, as found by Farde et al .^15, but that it is the density of dopamine D4 receptors which is sixfold elevated in schizophrenia. These findings resolve the apparent discrepancy, mentioned above, wherein the density of [^11C]methylspiperone-labelled sites^14 (D2, D3 and D4), but not that of [^11C]raclopride-labelled sites^15 (D2 and D3), was found elevated in the schizophrenia striatum.AN anomaly often noted in surveys of sexual behaviour is that the number of female sexual partners reported by men exceeds the number of male partners reported by women^1–3. This discrepancy is sometimes interpreted as evidence that surveys produce unreli-able data due to sex-linked response and sampling bias. We report here that among the 90% of respondents reporting fewer than 20 lifetime partners, however, the ratio of male to female reports drops from 3.2:1 to 1.2:1. The anomaly thus appears to be driven by the upper tail of the contact distribution, an example of the general principle of outlier influence in data analysis. The implica-tion is that sexual behaviour surveys provide reliable data in the main, and that simple improvements can increase precision in the upper tail to make these data more useful for modelling the spread of AIDS and other sexually transmitted diseases.THE mid-Cenozoic immigration of rodents and primates to South America (when it was widely isolated by oceans) represents a pre-eminent problem in the biogeographical history of placental mammals. The unexpected discovery of South America's earliest rodent in the central Chilean Andes provides information critical to resolving the source area and primitive morphology of South American caviomorphs, suggesting an African origin for the group. This rodent is part of a new fossil mammal fauna^1, the first diverse assemblage known for a critical 15–25 million year gap in the fossil record. We report here that cooccurrence of numerous higher-level taxa otherwise restricted to older or younger intervals identifies this fauna as representing a new biochronological interval preceding the Deseadan (South American Land Mammal Age), previously the earliest occurrence of rodents and primates on the continent. Radioisotopic dating corroborates biostratigraphy in identifying the new Andean rodent as the earliest known from the continent.THE relative abundances of immobile elements (such as calcium, aluminium, titanium, zirconium and the rare-earth elements) in the Archaean ultramafik lavas known as komatiites have provided important information about the composition of the early Earth's mantle, but to establish the origin and tectonic setting of these lavas one also needs the abundances of mobile elements, such as the alkali metals, alkaline-earth elements, and uranium and lead. Up to now, it has not been possible to use these elements in constraining komatiite petrogenesis, because of the pervasive effects of alteration in these ancient lavas; recently, however, some remarkably fresh, 2.7-Gyr-old komatiites have been discovered, which contain unaltered olivine crystals and small glass inclusions^1. We report ion micoprobe data for 25 trace elements from these glass inclusions, and show that the ratios of mobile to immobile incompatible elements are similar to those found in modern intraplate basalts, and distinct from modern mid-ocean-ridge and convergent-margin basalts. We infer that these Archaean magmas formed from sources similar to (or slightly depleted relative to) those of modern intraplate basalts, supporting the suggestion^2,3 that komatiites are ancient analogues of modern plume-related magmas.Britain's prime minister has acknowledged in Japan what he would not in Britain — that British science has been mishandled.ZEOLITES derive their catalytic activity from the strong acidity of protons attached to the negatively charged aluminosilicate frame-work, which makes the materials excellent proton donors. Unlike zeolites, the aluminophosphate molecular sieves^1,2 are built from alternating AlO^−_4 and PO^+_4 tetrahedra and are thus electrically neutral. Much attention has therefore been devoted to the generation of Bronsted acidity in these materials by introducing heteroatoms, such as Si, Mg, Fe, Co or Zn, to produce negatively charged frameworks^3–6. Similar arguments apply to gallophosphate molecular sieves^7–10, of which cloverite^9,10 is a remarkable example. This extra-large-pore material contains pore openings in the form of a four-leafed clover, defined by a ring of 20 gallium and phosphorus atoms, some of which are linked to terminal hydroxyl groups. Here we use NMR, X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (ESCA) and infrared spectroscopy to show that the P–OH groups in cloverite are localized versions of those in solid phosphoric acid, H_3PO_4. Cloverite is thus a strong Bronsted acid even though no heteroatoms are present in its framework.GEOMETRICALconstraints, first identified by Euler, dictate that all of the closed carbon cages known as fullerenes must contain twelve pentagonal rings of carbon atoms^1. In all of the fullerenes synthesized so far, each pentagon is surrounded by hexagonal rings^2. Indeed, this has been proposed as a criterion for fullerene stability—the 'isolated-pentagon rule'^1,3—on the basis that adjacent pentagons are expected to be chemically reactive. Buck-minsterfullerene (C_60) is the smallest fullerene for which the isolated-pentagon rule can be satisfied; smaller, adjacent-pentagon fullerenes have not been formed in bulk, but have been identified previously as cations^4–6. Here we report experimental evidence for the heightened chemical reactivity of cations of the adjacent-pentagon fullerenes C^56 and C^58, relative to C^ x +_60, which provides support for the basic assumptions underlying the isolated-pentagon rule. Our findings suggest that, if fullerenes such as C_56 and C_58 are produced as intermediates or byproducts of C_60 generation either in the laboratory or in natural environments, they should form derivatives readily.ABOVE a substance's liquid–vapour critical point ( T _c), the distinction between the liquid and vapour phases disappears. Below the triple point ( T _t), meanwhile (at which solid, liquid and vapour coexist), only the solid and vapour are stable. The liquid range, T _c/ T _t, depends on the nature of the intermolecular forces: for argon, T _c/ T _t = 1.8, whereas for sodium the ratio is 7.5. But might there be molecular substances that have no liquid phase at all? Here we present results which suggest that C_60 is such a substance. We map out the phase diagram using computer simulations in which the C_60 molecules are represented by spheres interacting via Lennard-Jones potentials summed over all 60 carbon atoms. We find that the sublimation line passes above the metastable liquid-vapour coexistence curve. By drawing an analogy with the aggregation of colloidal particles, we expect that solid C_60 formed by nucleation from the vapour phase will be amorphous rather than crystalline.THE theoretical understanding of superconductors is based on the notion of electron pairing into Cooper pairs_1. The first direct evidence for electron pairing was the observation that the flux threading a superconducting ring is always a multiple of the flux quantum, given by the ratio of Planck's constant to the Cooper-pair charge 2 e (refs 2, 3). Here we report a direct measurement of the total charge on a superconducting electrode which is free to exchange electrons with a metallic reservoir through a tunnel junction. The total charge on a non-superconducting metal electrode has been shown previously^4 to increase in jumps of 1 e , corresponding to the addition of single electrons. We have also observed steps of 1 e , with an even–odd asymmetry, for a superconducting electrode when the charging energy exceeds the energy gap between the ground and first excited superconducting state^5. Our present measurements, with the charging energy below the gap, reveal charging steps strictly quantized in units of 2 e , corresponding to the simultaneous tunnelling of two electrons. The 2 e steps break into 1 e steps when the temperature and magnetic field are increased above threshold values, corresponding to the electrostatic breaking of a single Cooper pair. Our results indicate that Cooper pairs can be manipulated in the same way as single electrons in turnstile and pump devices^4.THE active nuclei of Seyfert 1 galaxies are characterized by a small (~0.03 pc) region of intense broad emission lines, indicative of gas moving at extremely high velocities and ionized by a non-thermal radiation field. These spectral features are usually explained by invoking the presence of a central supermassive black hole. Here we present two-dimensional spectra of the Seyfert galaxy NGC3227, from which we have calculated the intensity maps of the emission lines, and the velocity field representing the motion of gas within the central kiloparsec of the galaxy. Surprisingly, we find that the region of broad emission lines is offset from the kinematic centre by about 250 pc, suggesting that the putative supermassive black hole is displaced from the true galactic centre. Possible explanations of this finding include the transient migration of the black hole from the galactic centre, a black hole in orbit about a central concentration of dark matter, or the capture of the black hole during the merger of NGC3227 with another galaxy.The Beast Within: A History of the Werewolf. By Adam Douglas. Chapmans/Orion: 1992. Pp. 294. £15.95 (hbk); £5.99 (pbk) Monstrous Imagination. By Marie-Hélène Huet. Harvard University Press: 1993. Pp. 316. $59.95, £39.95 (hbk); £23.95, £15.95 (pbk).Nature 364, 450-453 (1993) IN this letter an earlier version of Fig. 3c was printed instead of the revised and expanded figure which is discussed in the text and described in the legend. The correct figure is shown here.The c-Rel protein is able to associate in vitro and in vivo with the TATA-binding protein (TBP) of the TFIID complex. Coexpression of TBP with c-Rel augments transactivation from the κB site in Drosophila Schneider cells. DNA-binding mutants of TBP not only fail to cooperate, but they repress transactivation by c-Rel. There may be a direct communication between κB enhancer binding proteins and basal transcription factors which leads to enhanced transcription.Who says that the social sciences are not quantitative? Even in a field supposed to be dominated by people's impulses to buy — that of marketing — there are striking regularities.The flux line lattice inside a single crystal of Bi_2.15Sr_1.95CaCu_2O_8+x has been observed using small-angle neutron diffraction. The diffracted intensity goes rapidly to zero at a magnetic-field-dependent flux lattice melting temperature; this melting coincides with the appearance of finite resistance within the superconducting state. The flux lattice signal can also be made to disappear at low temperatures, by applying a sufficiently high field, probably because of the decomposition of flux lines into two-dimensional 'pancake' vortices.When a membrane-bound receptor acts on a G protein, the GTP-binding or G_ α subunit dissociates from the G_ βγ dimer. Until recently, the G_ α subunit alone was thought to act on the enzymes and ion channels controlled by these proteins. Newer evidence indicates that the G_ βγ . dimer also plays a major part in signal transmission, enhancing the complexity of the possible interactions between the G proteins and their targets.Interferon Gamma: The Immune Interferon. A video produced by Cambridge Scientific Films on behalf of Boehringer Ingelheim. VMS PAL colour; running time, 23 minutes; distribution details available on application to Boehringer Ingelheim.Living Within Limits: Ecology, Economics, and Population Taboos. By Garrett Hardin. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 339. $25. Population Politics: The Choices That Shape our Future. By Virginia Abernethy. Plenum: 1993. Pp. 350. $26.50.Life Cycles: Reflections of an Evolutionary Biologist. By John Tyler Bonner. Princeton University Press: 1993. Pp. 209. $19.95, £14.This week sees the appearance of yet another new section of Nature , under the somewhat old-fashioned title "Progress".Post-war Germany's enviable reputation as a law-abiding state is threatened by the harsh treatment of a handful of academics in the eastern Länder who once belonged to the Communist Party of the German Democratic Republic.Nature 362, 83-87(1993)THIS letter contains an error in the DP-1 cDNA sequence shown in Fig. \b which affects the codon reading frame from amino acid 388. The corrected sequence appears below, starting at position 1,217: ACC CCT GTG TCC TAC GTT GGG GAG GAT GAT GAC GAC GAT GAT GAG TTT AAT GAG AAC GACGAG GAG GAT TPVSYVGEDDDDDDDFNENDEED This correction does not alter any of the conclusions of the paper, although the open reading frame is now 410 amino acids.Featured this week — avidin resin, vector systems, kits galore, assorted gadgets and gismos for yeast geneticists, and an electroporation system.By two-dimensional (2-D) DNA typing a restriction enzyme digest of genomic DNA can be resolved on the basis of both size and base-pair sequence and subsequently analysed by repeat probe hybridization to reveal sequence variants at multiple genomic sites in parallel. The system has been partly automated and allows for large-scale comparative analysis of complex genomes in a cost-effective manner.Nature 363, 625-627 (1993) DURING the production process, the key to Fig. 3 of this letter was inadvertently altered. The correct figure is shown.PROTEINS that contain disulphide bonds are often slow to fold in vitro because the oxidation and correct pairing of the cysteine residues is rate limiting^1,2. The folding of such proteins is greatly accelerated in Escherichia coli by DsbA^3,4, but the mechanism of this rate enhancement is not well understood. Here we report the crystal structure of oxidized DsbA and show that it resembles closely the ubiquitous redox protein thioredoxin^5, despite very low sequence similarity. An important difference, however, is the presence of another domain which forms a cap over the thioredoxin-like active site of DsbA. The redox–active disulphide bond, which is responsible for the oxidation of substrates, is thus at a domain interface and is surrounded by grooves and exposed hydrophobic side chains. These features suggest that DsbA might act by binding to partially folded polypeptide chains before oxidation of cysteine residues.A BASAL level of transcription is usually observed when all but a small region of DNA has been deleted from a eukaryotic gene promoter. These promoter elements, which are necessary and sufficient for specific transcription initiation, are referred to as minimal or core promoter elements. One element that is commonly present in a core promoter is the initiator. It has been demonstrated that the presence of Spl binding sites can greatly enhance the level of transcription initiation at initiator elements^1–4. A binding site for the YY1 transcription factor, located at the initiation site of the adeno-associated virus P5 promoter, functions as an initiator element; a synergistic enhancement of its activity is observed in vitro when upstream Spl binding sites are present^3. Here we report that this synergistic activation probably occurs through protein-protein interactions.ELECTRON transport across a membrane is central to photosynthesis, to mitochondrial respiration and to the design of molecular systems for solar energy conversion. Relatively few synthetic molecules, however, have been shown to facilitate trans-port of electrons across a lipid bilayer^1–3. We report here that C_70 can act as both a photosensitizer for electron transfer from a donor molecule and a mediator for electron transport across a lipid bilayer membrane. The steady-state photocurrent density obtained from the C_70–bilayer system is about 40 times higher, at comparable light intensities, than that of the carotene–porphyrin–quinone system^2, previously the most efficient artificial system. The C_70–bilayer system has a quantum yield of about 0.04, while the stability (tens of minutes) and turnover number (electrons transported per C_70 before decay) of 10^3 are one to three orders of magnitude greater than those of other systems^1–3. We anticipate that other higher fullerenes may also provide the basis for efficient transmembrane electron-transport systems.THE Vela pulsar, PSR0833-45, is a young (10^4 yr) nearby neutron star emitting pulsed radiation in radio, optical and γ-ray bands^1–5. Soft X-ray imaging by the Einstein^6 and Exosat^7 observatories has revealed a point-like source, at the position of the pulsar, embedded in a compact nebula ~2 arcmin in diameter, but the search for pulsed X-ray emission has proved difficult. There were claims in 1973 of a positive detection^8,9 but subsequent observations have failed to confirm them^6,10. Here we report an unambiguous detection, by means of the Rosat satellite^11, of pulsed X-ray emission from the Vela pulsar, and thus put this long-standing enigma to rest. The pulsed signal is soft, appearing mainly at energies <1 keV. The Rosat observations resolve the two sources of emission, and show that the point-like emission centred on the pulsar is soft, whereas the emission from the compact nebula is hard. Despite the common prejudice that it is the archetypal young pulsar embedded in a supernova remnant, these observations show that Vela more closely resembles older (10^5 yr) pulsars.IN cosmological models based on the standard Friedmann–Robertson–Walker geometry, the apparent flux density or angular size of standard candles or standard rods varies with redshift in a way that depends on the deceleration parameter q _0. (Open universes have q _0 < 0.5; closed universes have q _0 > 0.5.) At low redshift, however, observational errors are much greater than the differences in q _0 expected for different cosmological models, while at high redshift observational uncertainties, particularly at optical wavelengths, and apparent systematic evolutionary changes in sources obscure the expected geometrical effects. Here I show that measurements by very-long-baseline interferometry (VLBI) of compact radio sources associated with active galaxies and quasars may be largely free of evolutionary effects even at substantial redshifts. The relation between angular size and redshift for a sample of these sources indicates a value of q _0 close to 0.5, corresponding to cosmological density near the critical value.The origins of jawed vertebrates (gnathostomes) lie somewhere within the ranks of long-extinct jawless fishes, represented today as the lampreys and hagfishes. Recent discoveries of hitherto unknown kinds of jawless fishes (agnathans), together with re-examination of known agnathans and advances in systematic methods, have revitalized debates about the relationships of ancient fishes and given fresh insights into early vertebrate history.Sensory Ecology: How Organisms Acquire and Respond to Information. By David B. Dusenbery. W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 558. á£27.95, $34.95.The Concise Oxford Dictionary of Botany. Edited by Michael Allaby. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 442. £18.95, $35 (hbk); £6.99, $11.95 (pbk).Crowds, Psychology, and Politics, 1871-1899. By Jaap van Ginneken. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 269. £35, $59.95.The Mortal Presidency: Illness and Anguish in the White House. By Robert E. Gilbert. Basic Books: 1992. Pp. 314. $25.Next Wednesday's ceremony in Washington is bound to be an uplifting and even moving ceremony, but not all of the new president's hankerings for change are to be equally keenly awaited.The year started with a bang for astronomers and cosmologists gathered at Phoenix, Arizona, last week, with the report of observations indicating that the Universe is made largely of exotic dark material.Sequence analysis software, structure prediction programs, columns and media, and a range of products for glycobiology research — new products for a new year.To interpret the activity of living human brains, their neuroanatomy must be known in detail. New techniques to do this are urgently needed, since most of the methods now used on monkeys cannot be used on humans.Fundamental information that enhances our understanding of biospecific interactions can be obtained using a new analytical system based on biosensor technology. The functional characteristics of biospecific interaction, such as kinetics, affinity and binding position, are examined by label-free analysis of proteins in free solution binding to an immobilized ligand at a hydrophilic sensor surface.THE Tetrahymena group I ribozyme catalyses a sequence-specific phosphodiester cleavage reaction on an external RNA oligonucleotide substrate in the presence of a divalent metal cation cofactor^1. This reaction proceeds readily with either Mg^2+ or Mn^2+, but no detectable reaction has been reported when other divalent cations are used as the sole cofactor^2–5. Cations such as Ca^2+, Sr^2+ and Ba^2+ can stabilize the correct folded conformation of the ribozyme, thereby partially alleviating the Mg^2+ or Mn^2+ requirement^2–5. But catalysis by the ribozyme involves coordination of either Mg^2+ or Mn^2+ at the active site, resulting in an overall requirement for one of these two cations^5. Here we use an in vitro evolution process^6,7 to obtain variants of the Tetrahymena ribozyme that are capable of cleaving an RNA substrate in reaction mixtures containing Ca^2+ as the divalent cation. These findings extend the range of different chemical environments available to RNA enzymes and illustrate the power of in vitro evolution in generating macromolecular catalysts with desired properties.Dangerously, the British government is being impelled towards further restrictions on the British press.SATELLITE tobacco mosaic virus (STMV) is the spherical satellite to an obligatory rod-shaped helper tobacco mosaic virus (TMV), which is required for replication^1,2. STMV has 60 protein subunits of M_r 17,500 on a T = 1 icosahedral capsid^3 containing a single stranded RNA genome of 1,059 bases^4–6. STMV appears similar to another virus, STNV^7,8, but is ~20 per cent smaller. It shows no amino-acid homology or immunological cross-reactivity with either STNV or its host TMV^4,9. Here we report the X-ray crystal structure of STMV, which shows that the coat protein of STMV contains a ‘Swiss roll’ β-barrel. An amino-terminal strand extends more than 60Å and is primarily responsible for quaternary interactions. Each capsid dimer is associated with a segment of genomic RNA double helix comprising seven base pairs. The dyad of each protein dimer is coincident with that of the central base pair of the associated RNA segment whose helix axis is directed along an icosahedral edge. Protein-nucleic acid interactions are extensive. The RNA helices, which have additional stacked bases at their 3′ termini, differ significantly from canonical nucleic acid helical forms.SMALL spherical viruses are among the simplest replicating systems in biology, yet the factors affecting their assembly, stability and disassembly are still poorly understood. A molecular switch is required for the assembly of icosahedral virus particles containing more than 60 identical subunits because strict symmetry cannot be maintained in subunit packing^1. All previously reported viruses with this type of structure use a portion of the capsid protein to regulate interactions between chemically equivalent but structurally distinct interfaces^2–4. We have investigated the T = 3 quasiequivalent^5 nodaviruses, which are small non-enveloped viruses with a single-stranded RNA genome that infect insects^6, mice^7 and fish^8. They undergo a well-characterized series of steps in assembly and maturation^9,10, which in some respects are similar to the picornaviruses^11, despite their different capsid architecture. Here we report the X-ray structure of Flock House virus at 3.0 Å resolution, which reveals an ordered RNA duplex of 20 nucleotides and a protein segment that control the subunit interactions in this animal virus. The RNA interacts with a helical protein domain of the subunit that lies inside the capsid shell. One of the helices that binds the RNA is part of a 44-amino-acid polypeptide which is autocatalytically cleaved from the initial subunit translation product after virion assembly. The structure indicates that RNA associated with the cleaved polypeptide may be important in the infection process.THE melaminophenyl arsenical melarsoprol is still used to treat African sleeping sickness^1–3, a disease caused by parasitic protozoa of the Trypanosoma brucei subgroup. Based on the observation that melamine antagonizes the trypanocidal activity of this class of drugs^4, we investigated whether other physiological compounds could compete for the same receptor. Here we report that the in vitro trypanolytic effect of melarsen oxide can be specifically abrogated by adenine, adenosine and dipyridamole, all of which compete for uptake by an adenosine transporter. Melarsen-sensitive trypanosomes have two high-affinity adenosine transport systems: a PI type, which also transports inosine; and a P2 type, which also transports adenine and the melaminophenyl arsenicals. Melarsen-resistant trypanosomes lack P2 adenosine transport, suggesting that resistance to these arsenicals is due to loss of uptake.RECOMBINATION between a diffusible reverse transcript and its homologous chromosomal allele has been proposed as a mechanism for the precise removal of introns from DNA and gene conversion of dispersed repeated sequences^1,2. We have reported that RNA-mediated recombination occurs in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae ^3. This recombination requires expression of the retrotransposon Ty, and results in intron loss from a plasmid-borne marker gene and the formation of pseudogenes. Because the pseudogenes are embedded in Ty sequences, chromosomal insertion could have been mediated by Ty integrase or by homologous recombination with endogenous Ty sequences. The structure of the chromosomal recombinants and the fact that plasmid and chromosomal recombination can have different requirements demanded a direct demonstration of RNA-mediated gene conversion of a chromosomal allele. Here we report the first demonstration, to our knowledge, of recombination between a reverse transcript and its chromosomal homologue and describe an assay that specifically detects this novel recombination pathway.MOTOR proteins move unidirectionally along cytoskeletal polymers by coupling translocation to cycles of ATP hydrolysis. The energy from ATP is required both to generate force and to dissociate the motor–filament complex in order to begin a new Chemomechanical cycle^1,2. For myosin, force production is associated with phosphate release following ATP hydrolysis, whereas dissociation of actomyosin is tightly coupled to the binding of ATP^3. Dynein, a microtubule motor, uses a similar cycle^4, suggesting that all cytoskeletal motors might operate by a common mechanism. Here we investigate kinesin's Chemomechanical cycle by assaying microtubule movement by single kinesin molecules when intermediate states in the hydrolysis cycle are prolonged with ATP analogues or inhibitors. In contrast to myosin and dynein, kinesin with bound ADP dissociates from microtubules during translocation, whereas kinesin with unhydrolysed nucleotide remains tightly associated with the polymer. These findings imply that kinesin converts ATP energy into mechanical work by a pathway distinct from that of myosin or dynein.FAST synaptic transmission in the central nervous system can be modulated by neurotransmitters and second-messenger pathways. For example, transmission at glutamatergic synapses can be depressed by the metabotropic glutamate receptor^1,2, providing autoreceptor-mediated negative feedback. Metabotropic glutamate receptor inhibition of Ca^2+ channels may contribute to this pathway^3–6. In contrast, stimulation of protein kinase C can enhance excitatory synaptic transmission^7, whereas both depression and enhancement of Ca^2+ current have been reported^8. Here we show that in hippocampal CA3 and cortical pyramidal neurons, activation of protein kinase C enhances current through N-type Ca^2+ channels and, in addition, dramatically reduces G protein-dependent inhibition of these same channels by the meta-botropic glutamate receptor. In parallel experiments on fast excitatory transmission at corticostriatal synapses, kinase C activators were similarly found to reduce the inhibitory effect produced by stimulation of the metabotropic glutamate receptor. The results show that second-to-second control of Ca^2+ channels by the metabotropic glutamate receptor can itself be modulated on a slower timescale by protein kinase C. These mechanisms may be used in the control of fast excitatory synaptic transmission.γ-AMINOBUTYRIC acid (GABA) is the main inhibitory neurotransmitter in the central nervous system. Two classes of GABA receptors (GABA_A and GABA_B) have been identified. GABA_A receptors are ligandgated chloride channels that are competitively antagonized by bicuculline, noncompetitively blocked by picrotoxin, and often allosterically modulated by barbiturates and benzodiazepines^1–3. GABA_B receptors regulate potassium and calcium channels through G-protein and intra-cellular second-messenger pathways^2,3, are selectively activated by baclofen, and are antagonized by phaclofen and 2-hydroxysaclofen^4,5. For some years, evidence has accumulated that there are GABA receptors, especially prominent along visual pathways, which are neither antagonized by bicuculline nor activated by baclofen, but are activated by certain conformationally restricted analogues of GABA, including cis -4-aminocrotonic acid (CACA)^6–9. These receptors have been designated GABA^C receptors^9. As yet, membrane current responses from isolated neurons that reflect this novel pharmacology have not been reported, although such responses have been recorded from oocytes injected with retinal messenger RNA^10–13. Here we describe a chloridemediated current response from isolated rod-driven horizontal cells (H4) of the white perch retina that has this novel pharmacology.The Volcano Lover: A Romance. By Susan Sontag. Farrar, Straus and Giroux/Jonathan Cape: Pp.419. $22, á£14.99MUCH of the carbon assimilated by plants is allocated to fine root production^1–5, and the amount of carbon and nutrients subsequently returned to the soil from fine root turnover equals or surpasses that returned through leaf litter in many forests^6–9. Unfortunately, limitations in traditional methods of studying roots have prevented us from thoroughly understanding the dynamic nature of fine root mortality in most forests, and better measurements of fine root longevity are needed to quantify and model more accurately ecosystem carbon and nutrient budgets^8–11. We used minirhizotrons^12,13 to follow the mortality of contemporaneous fine root cohorts in two sugar maple ( Acer saccharum Marsh.) forests located 80 km apart (north–south) during 1989 and 1990. We report here that roots in the northern forest consistently lived the longest, principally owing to greater rates of mortality early in the life of roots at the southern site. Differences in site factors suggest that warmer soil temperatures seem to be associated with the more rapid death of roots at the southern site.CONTROVERSY exists over whether large-magnitude extensional deformation can occur along low-angle, master detachment (normal) faults^1–16. Large amounts of Cenozoic extension occurred in the Basin and Range province of the western United States, and master detachment faults related to this extension are currently exposed as subhorizontal structures along crustal arches known as metamorphic core complexes (MCCs)^10,11,17. One set of models suggests that MCCs represent crustal-scale blocks bounded by originally high-angle normal faults which have tilted to sub-horizontal attitudes^1–6. More dynamic models propose isostatically induced flexural tilting of an initial subhorizontal fault, to an active high-angle fault, to final abandonment as a subhorizontal structure^7–9; these models require MCC detachment faults and their footwalls to have been tilted by 30–60°. Alternatively, MCC detachment faults may have originated as subhorizontal or low-angle structures^10–16. Here we test these models with palaeomag-netic data from undeformed portions of the South Mountains, a typical Cenozoic MCC in the southern Basin and Range province^18–24. Comparison with time-averaged expected directions of the geomagnetic field^25–27 yields no evidence for tilting of the footwall. We conclude that the South Mountains master detachment fault was active as a low-angle extensional structure, with a dip of ∼10°.THE superconducting transition temperature, T _C, defines the point at which the free energies of the superconducting and normal states of a material become equal. Just above T _C, thermodynamic fluctuations produce small, transient regions of the superconducting state, giving rise to an anomalous increase in the normal-state conductivity known as paraconductivity. This situation is analogous to the fluctuating regions of correlated spins found near the Curie-Weiss transition in ferromagnets. Such fluctuations are of theoretical significance in that they provide a direct probe of critical phenomena in general, and a stringent test of scaling theories, which describe the approach to the critical point. Paraconductivity effects are strongly dependent on the dimensionality of the system, although for conventional superconductors, three-dimensional fluctuation conductivity has to our knowledge never been observed. Here we report the observation of pure, three-dimensional paraconductivity in single crystals of the recently discovered^1 superconductors K_3C_60 and Rb_3C_60. In addition to probing the critical state near T _c, these measurements allow the indirect determination of the residual, normal-state resistivity.NUMERICAL simulations based on general circulation and energy-balance models consistently indicate that the high latitudes of Gondwana experienced seasonal extremes in climate during the Late Permian period^1–3. But palaeogeographic maps based on the distribution of climate-sensitive rocks^4, palynological and palaeobotanical data^5,6 and dicynodont fossil records^7 all imply a temperate climate. The reason for this discrepancy has not been clear. Recently, it has emerged from studies of Upper Permian fluviolacustrine deposits throughout southern Africa that the geography was dominated by a series of giant lakes, perhaps interconnected within major fluvial frameworks^8. Here I review these data and their implications for a temperate climate. I suggest that the discrepancy between the climate modelling results which indicate seasonal temperature extremes, and the increasing body of geological information documenting a temperate climate, may be explained by the fact that the palaeogeography used in the models does not take into account the existence of these lakes and rivers, which would have had a major influence on the regional climate. The results demonstrate the importance of incorporating accurate palaeogeographies into numerical modelling studies when attempting to reconstruct past climates.REACTIVE chlorine compounds are known to cause ozone depletion in the Antarctic stratosphere, but they can be bound into an inactive form through reactions with nitrogen dioxide. In the spring, NO_2 can be converted to a long-lived reservoir species, HNO_3, on the surface of polar stratospheric clouds^1,2. This removes NO_2 from the stratosphere and allows chlorine-catalysed ozone destruction to proceed. It has been suggested that similar reactions may take place on background sulphate aerosols in the Antarctic stratosphere^3, but as yet there has been no unambiguous evidence for these reactions in the absence of polar stratospheric clouds (although there have been observations of ozone loss attributed to volcanic aerosols^4,5). Here we present measurements of Antarctic stratospheric NO_2 and HNO_3 concentrations taken in 1991. Our results demonstrate that reactive nitrogen was converted to HNO_3 in autumn, before temperatures were low enough for polar stratospheric clouds to form. We conclude that heterogeneous chemistry on background aerosols was responsible for this conversion, which brought with it the potential for additional ozone loss in the autumn.PULSARS that are members of binary systems in globular clusters are all rapidly rotating, and it is assumed that they have been spun up by accretion from binary companions. Here we report an exception: PSR1718-19, in the globular cluster NGC6342, is in a 6.2-hour eclipsing binary system, but has the relatively long period of 1 s. Its magnetic field is strong, ~1012 G, and its spin-down age is small, ~ 10 Myr. Furthermore, the mass of its companion is only 0.1-0.2 solar masses (Má⊙). The eclipses show that the binary system is embedded in a cloud of material which must have been ejected from the companion star, although calculations suggest that the companion is well inside its Roche lobe. The pulsar's radiation may be causing expulsion of material beyond the Roche lobe, as in the ablating binary systems containing PSR-1744-24A and PSR1957 + 20, even though the incident flux at the companion is orders of magnitude smaller than in these cases. Pulsars may therefore have a much greater influence on their companions than has been supposed.WATER-VAPOUR maser emission at 22.23508 GHz has been observed in star-forming regions of our own galaxy and in the active nuclei of other galaxies^1–5. Maser emission from active galactic nuclei is typically 10^5 times more luminous than in our galaxy, and the active galaxies concerned always exhibit radio or optical jets ejected from the nuclei. The superluminous masers are not well understood, but appear to be related to the mass outflow^6. Using 16,000-channel spectrometers at the Nobeyama 45-m radio telescope, we have found H_2O maser emission in the nucleus of the galaxy NGC4258, offset by ± 1,000 km s^−1 from the motion of the nucleus itself. This is much higher than the typical velocities of galactic masers (less than a few hundred kilometres per second). We suggest that the high-velocity maser emission in NGC4258 might be from masers orbiting a massive central black hole, or ejected in a bipolar outflow. More intriguingly, the features may not be Doppler in origin, but due to up- and down-shifted frequencies by Raman scattering in a dense plasma. Further high-resolution observations will be needed to distinguish between these possibilities.The explosion over Tunguska, Central Siberia, in 1908 released 10 to 20 megatons (high explosive equivalent) of energy at an altitude of about 10 km. This event represents a typical fate for stony asteroids tens of metres in radius entering the Earth's atmosphere at common hypersonic velocities. Comets and carbonaceous asteroids of the appropriate energy disrupt too high, whereas typical iron objects reach and crater the terrestrial surface.Nature takes a look into its crystal ball at prospects over the next 12 months in several important areas relating to research and the scientific community.The latest government pronouncement raises questions about the office itself as well as about Gallo.Long-term potentiation of synaptic transmission in the hippocampus is the primary experimental model for investigating the synaptic basis of learning and memory in vertebrates. The best understood form of long-term potentiation is induced by the activation of the N -methyl- d -aspartate receptor complex. This subtype of glutamate receptor endows long-term potentiation with Hebbian characteristics, and allows electrical events at the postsynaptic membrane to be transduced into chemical signals which, in turn, are thought to activate both pre- and postsynaptic mechanisms to generate a persistent increase in synaptic strength.The Search for the Gene. By Bruce Wallace. Cornell University Press: 1992. Pp. 224. $34.95 (hbk), $12.95 (pbk).Economics: Mathematical Politics or Science of Diminishing Returns? By Alexander Rosenberg. University of Chicago Press: 1992. Pp. 266. $37.50, á£25.95.The Pill, Pygmy Chimps, and Degas' Horse: The Remarkable Autobiography of the Award-Winning Scientist Who Synthesized the Birth Control Pill. By Carl Djerassi. Basic Books: 1992. Pp. 319. $25.Ada, the Enchantress of Numbers: A Selection from the Letters of Lord Byron's Daughter and Her Description of the First Computer. Edited by Betty Alexandra Toole. Strawberry (Critical Connection, PO Box 452, Sausalito, CA 94966, USA): 1992. Pp. 439. $29.95, á£24.99. (Distributed in the UK by Pickering and Chatto.)Three groups have successfully isolated the gene responsible for the X-linked Menkes disease, heralding great promise for our understanding of copper metabolism and for diagnosis of the disorder.THE histidine-containing phosphocarrier protein (HPr) is a central component of the phosphoenolpyruvate: sugar phosphotransferase system that transports carbohydrates across the cell membrane of bacteria^1. A typical phosphotransfer sequence is phosphoenolpyruvate → enzyme I → HPr → enzyme II/II^sugar → sugar. This is thermodynamically favourable owing to the participation of the high-energy phosphoenolpyruvate. We report here the structure of HPr from Streptococcus faecalis determined at 1.6 Å resolution. Remarkable disallowed Ramachandran torsion angles at the active centre, revealed by the X-ray structure, demonstrate a unique example of torsion-angle strain that is probably directly involved in protein function. During phosphorylation, the active-centre torsion-angle strain should facilitate the phosphotransfer reaction by lowering the activation-energy barrier. A recently reported Bacillus subtilis HPr structure^2, which represents the phosphorylated state of HPr with no torsion-angle strain, provides direct evidence supporting our hypothesis that torsion-angle strain plays a direct part in the function of HPr. An HPr phosphotransfer cycling mechanism is proposed, based primarily on the structures of HPr and other phosphotransferase system proteins.HUMAN cyclophilin A (CypA), a ubiquitous intracellular protein of 165 amino acids, is the major receptor for the cyclic undecapeptide immunosuppressant drug cyclosporin A (CsA)^1,2, which prevents allograft rejection after transplant surgery^3,4 and is efficacious in the field of autoimmune diseases^5. CsA prevents T-cell proliferation by blocking the calcium-activated pathway leading to interleukin-2 transcription. Besides their ability to bind CsA, the cyclophilin isoforms^6–8 also have peptidyl–prolyl isomerase activity^9–11 and enhance the rate of protein folding^12,13. The macrolide FK506 acts similarly to CsA and its cognate receptor FKBP also has peptidyl–prolyl isomerase activity^14. Inhibition of this enzymatic activity alone is not sufficient to achieve immunosuppression^15,16. A direct molecular interaction between the drug–immunophilin complex (CsA–CypA, or FK506–FKBP) and the phosphatase calcineurin, is responsible for modulating the T-cell receptor signal transduction pathway^17,18. Here we describe the crystal structure of a decameric CypA–CsA complex. The crystallographic asymmetric unit is composed of a pentamer of 1:1 cyclophilin–cyclosporin complexes of rather exact non-crystallographic fivefold symmetry. The 2.8 Å electron density map is of high quality. The five independent cyclosporin molecules are clearly identifiable, providing an unambiguous picture of the detailed interactions between a peptide drug and its receptor. It broadly confirms the results of previous NMR, X-ray and modelling studies, but provides further important structural details which will be of use in the design of drugs that are analogues of CsA.Knees are intricate heavy-duty joints that are now, like many other parts of the body, partially replaceable. A knee surgeons' handbook now published shows what lies ahead.CYCLOSPORIN A, a cyclic undecapeptide, is a potent immuno-suppressant that binds to a peptidyl–prolyl cis–trans isomerase^1,2 of 165 amino acids, cyclophilin^3. The cyclosporin A/cyclophilin complex inhibits the calcium- and calmodulin-dependent phos-phatase, calcineurin^4, resulting in a failure to activate genes encoding interleukin-2 and other lymphokines^5,6. The three-dimensional structures of uncomplexed cyclophilin^7, a tetrapeptide/cyclophilin complex^8,9, and cyclosporin A when bound to cyclophilin^10,11 have been reported. However, the structure of the cyclosporin A/cyclophilin complex has not been determined. Here we present the solution structure of the cyclosporin A/cyclophilin complex obtained by heteronuclear three-dimensional NMR spectroscopy. The structure, one of the largest determined by NMR, differs from proposed models of the complex^12–14 and is analysed in terms of the binding interactions and structure/activity relationships for CsA analogues^15,16.This year's commemorative cornucopia includes sunspots, the cotton gin and some stimulating acronyms. And a new award, 'the year of the anniversary', is introduced.ALL catalytic RNAs (ribozymes) require or are stimulated by divalent metal ions, but it has been difficult to separate the contribution of these metal ions to formation of the RNA tertiary structure^1 from a more direct role in catalysis. The Tetrahymena ribozyme catalyses cleavage of exogenous RNA^2,3 or DNA^4,5 substrates with an absolute requirement for Mg^2+ or Mn^2+ (ref. 6). A DNA substrate, in which the bridging 3′ oxygen atom at the cleavage site is replaced by sulphur, is cleaved by the ribozyme about 1,000 times more slowly than the corresponding unmodified DNA substrate when Mg^2+ is present as the only divalent metal ion. But addition of Mn^2+ or Zn^2+ to the reaction relieves this negative effect, with the 3′ S–P bond being cleaved nearly as fast as the 3′ O–P bond. Considering that Mn^2+ and Zn^2+ coordinate sulphur more strongly than Mg^2+ does^7,8, these results indicate that the metal ion contributes directly to catalysis by coordination to the 3′ oxygen atom in the transition state, presumably stabilizing the developing negative charge on the leaving group. We conclude that the Tetrahymena ribozyme is a metalloenzyme, with mechanistic similarities to several protein enzymes^9–12.LANGERHANS cells (LC) are the principal accessory cells present in epidermis^1. Because LC have limited capacity for self-renewal^2, epidermis is continually repopulated by as-yet uncharacterized bone marrow-derived LC progenitors^3,4. In addition, although LC persist in epidermis for extended periods, LC are induced to migrate from skin to regional lymph nodes after antigen exposure^5. To begin to elucidate mechanisms involved in LC trafficking, we characterized LC-keratinocyte (KC) interactions. Here we report that fresh murine LC express cadherins, and that LC adhere to KC in vitro through E-cadherin. Cultured LC (which may bear a phenotypic and functional relationship to LC that have migrated to lymph nodes^6,7) express lower levels of E-cadherin and exhibitRETINAL rods respond to light with a membrane hyperpolarization produced by a G-protein-mediated signalling cascade that leads to cyclic GMP hydrolysis and the consequent closure of a cGMP-gated channel that is open in darkness^1–7. A protein that forms this channel has recently been purified from bovine retina^8 and molecularly cloned^9, suggesting that the native cGMP-gated channel might be a homo-oligomer^10. Here we report the cloning of another protein from human retina which has only about 30% overall identity to the rod channel subunit. This protein, immunocytochemically localized to rod outer segments, does not form functional channels by itself. However, when co-expressed with the cloned human rod channel protein^11, it introduces rapid flickers to the channel openings that are characteristic of the native channel^12–16. The hetero-oligomeric channel is also highly sensitive to the blocker L- cis -diltiazem, like the native channel^15,17,18. This new protein thus seems to be another subunit of the native rod channel. The hetero-oligomeric nature of the rod channel means that it is no exception to a common motif shared by other ligand-gated channels.DENDRITIC cells, a minor cell population in lymphoid tissues, are specialized for presentation of antigenic peptides to T lymphocytes^1. Thymic dendritic cells are involved in the deletion of self-reactive T lymphocytes^2,3. Although all dendritic cells are ultimately of bone-marrow origin^4–7, it has not been clear whether thymic dendritic cells are produced in the adult thymus from a precursor cell or whether they migrate there preformed from the periphery. Recently we isolated from adult mouse thymus a population of early T precursors that could still form B lymphocytes, but not erythroid or myeloid cells, when transferred intravenously^8,9. Here we show that these thymic lymphoid precursor cells, as well as bone-marrow haematopoietic stem cells, are able to form both dendritic cells and T-cell progeny when transferred into an irradiated thymus. Such linked development may ensure that developing T cells are negatively selected predominantly by self antigens presented on newly formed thymic dendritic cells.VIRUSES that are non- or poorly cytopathic have developed various strategies to avoid elimination by the immune system and to persist in the host^1–3. Acute infection of adult mice with the noncytopathic lymphocytic choriomeningitis virus (LCMV) normally induces a protective cytotoxic T-cell response that also causes immunopathology^4–7. But some LCMV strains (such as DOCILE^8 (LCMV-D) or Cl-13 Armstrong (Cl-13) ^9) derived from virus carrier mice tend to persist after acute infection of adult mice without causing lethal immunopathological disease^4,5. Tendency to persist correlates with tropism^8,10, rapidity of virus spread^8 and virus mutations^11,12. We report here that these LCMV isolates may persist because they induce most of the specific antiviral CD8^+ cytotoxic T cells so completely that they all disappear within a few days and therefore neither eliminate the virus nor cause lethal immunopathology. The results illustrate that partially and sequen-tially induced (protective) immunity or complete exhaustion of T-cell immunity (high zone tolerance) are quantitatively different points on the scale of immunity; some viruses exploit the latter possibility to persist in an immunocompetent host.TO produce a vaccine against cancer, antigens must be found that are preferentially expressed by tumour cells and can induce an immune response against the tumour. The variable regions of the immunoglobulin molecules expressed on malignant B cells (idiotypes) are tumour-specific, but are weak immunogens. To induce an immune response in animals or humans, the idiotypic protein has therefore to be chemically coupled to a strongly immunogenic protein and mixed with an adjuvant^1–8. The resulting response can protect animals from subsequent tumour challenge, and cure animals with established tumours in combination with chemo-therapy. Granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF) augments antigen presentation in a variety of cells^9–12. Here we show that by fusing a tumour-derived idiotype to GM-CSF, it can be converted into a strong immunogen capable of inducing idiotype-specific antibodies without other carrier proteins or adjuvants and of protecting recipient animals from challenge with an otherwise lethal dose of tumour cells. This approach may be applicable to the design of vaccines for a variety of other diseases.THE H19 gene produces an abundant developmentally regulated transcript of unknown function in normal embryos^1. In the mouse it lies on chromosome 7 and is subject to transcriptional regulation by parental imprinting, which results in the maternally inherited gene being expressed and the paternally inherited gene being repressed^2. Embryos carrying maternal duplication/paternal deficiency for distal chromosome 7 (MatDi7) ^3 therefore express a double dose of H19. Here we examine the parental-origin-specific epigenetic modifications that may be involved in this regulation by comparing CpG methylation and nuclease sensitivity of chromatin in MatDi7 embryos with normal littermates. We show that specific sites in the CpG island promoter and 5^′ portion of the gene are methylated only on the paternal allele. Furthermore, active maternal alleles in chromatin of MatDi7 embryos are more sensitive and accessible to nucleases. Therefore hypermethylation and chromatin compaction in the region of the H19 promoter is associated with repression of the paternally inherited copy of the gene. Most, but not all, of these sites are unmethylated in sperm, with methylation of the paternal promoter occurring after fertilization. These results contrast with our findings for the closely linked and reciprocally imprinted gene encoding insulin-like growth factor II (ref. 4).Do the coats on vesicles budded from the Golgi apparatus actually cause the budding, or do they simply coat buds (Fig. 1)? One view (the membrane-mediated budding hypothesis^1) is that budding is an intrinsic property of Golgi membranes not requiring extrinsic coat proteins. Assembly of coats from dispersed subunits is superimposed upon the intrinsic budding process and is proposed to convert the tips of tubules into vesicles. The alternative view (the coat-mediated budding hypothesis^1) is that coat formation provides the essential driving force for budding. The membrane-mediated budding hypothesis was inspired by the microtubule-dependent extension of apparently uncoated, 90-nm-diameter membrane tubules from the Golgi apparatus^2 and other organelles^3–5 in vivo after treatment with brefeldin A, a drug that inhibits the assembly of coat proteins onto Golgi membranes^6–9. This hypothesis predicts that tubules will be extended when coat proteins are unavailable to convert tubule-derived membrane into vesicles. Here we use a cell-free system in which coated vesicles are formed from Golgi cisternae to show that, on the contrary, when budding diminishes as a result of immunodepletion of coat protein pools, tubules are not formed at the expense of vesicles. We conclude that coat proteins are required for budding from Golgi membranes.INTERACTION of cytokines with their membrane receptors induces the proliferation and differentiation of a specific lineage of haematopoietic progenitors^1. The molecular mechanism of cytokine receptor-mediated signal transduction is unclear because these receptors do not have tyrosine kinase activity^1,2. Interleukin-3 and erythropoietin, however, induce transient tyrosine phosphorylation of a common set of proteins as a growth signal^3–6, and interleukin-2 induces phosphorylation of an overlapping but distinct set of proteins^6–8. Here we show that chimaeric receptors consisting of the extracellular domains of the erythropoietin receptor and the cytoplasmic domains of the interleukin-2 (or interleukin-3) receptor induce an erythropoietin-dependent tyrosine phosphorylation in interleukin-3-dependent Ba/F3 cells; however, chimaeric receptors composed of the extracellular domains of the interleukin-2 receptor and the cytoplasmic domains of the erythropoietin (or interleukin-3) receptor apparently transmit an interleukin-2-dependent signal. Our results indicate that these cytokines transmit distinct signals for activation of specific tyrosine kinases through the extracellular rather than cytoplasmic domains of the receptors.DURING its 48-hour cycle inside the red blood cell, the human malaria parasite, Plasmodium falciparum , increases its volume 25-fold and divides asexually. This rapid growth demands large amounts of nutrients, a problem exacerbated by the lower metabolic rate and relative ionic impermeability of the host red blood cell. Direct passage of small nutrients across the two membranes that separate the parasite from the erythrocyte cytosol may be important for parasite development^1 and has been demonstrated for radiolabelled glucose^2, amino acids^3,4 and purine nucleo-sides^4–6. Flux studies on plasmodia are limited, however, to suspensions of erythrocyte-free parasites and so cannot be used to examine the individual transport properties of the two membranes involved. Here we use the cell-attached patch clamp method^7 to overcome this limitation. After removing the intervening red blood cell membrane and forming gigaohm seals on the small (3–5 μm) parasite, we studied transport across the parasitophorous vacuole membrane (PVM), the outer of the two membranes that separate the parasite from the erythrocyte cytosol. A 140-pS channel which is permeable to both cations and anions was identified on the PVM. This channel is present at high density, is open more than 98 per cent of the time at the resting potential of the PVM, and is permeable to lysine and glucuronate. The channel can readily transport amino acids and monosaccharides across the PVM and may be essential for fulfilling the parasite's metabolic demands.THE major postsynaptic density (PSD) protein^1,2 at glutaminergic synapses is calcium/calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II (CaM-K II), but its function in the PSD is not known. We have examined glutamate receptors (GluRs) as substrates for CaM-K II because (1) they are colocalized in the PSD^3, (2) cloned GluRs^4–7 contain consensus phosphorylation sites for protein kinases including CaM-K II, and (3) several GluRs are regulated by other protein kinases^8–12. Regulation of GluRs, which are involved in excitatory synaptic transmission and in mechanisms of learning and memory^13, by CaM-K II is of interest because of the postulated role of CaM-K II in synaptic plasticity^14,15 and its known involvement in induction of long-term potentiation^16. Furthermore, mice lacking the major neural isoform of CaM-K II exhibit deficits in models of learning and memory that require hippocampal input^17,18. We report here that CaM-K II phosphorylates GluR in several in vitro systems, including the PSD, and that activated CaM-K II enhances kainate-induced ion current three- to fourfold in cultured hippocampal neurons. These results are consistent with a role for PSD CaM-K II in strengthening postsynaptic GluR responses in synaptic plasticity.THE mammalian neocortex is generated by waves of migrating cells originating from the ventricular zone^1,2. Radial migration^3 along radial glia^4,5 has been proposed as the dominant mechanism for this process. The radial unit hypothesis^3 is poorly supported by retroviral lineage studies, however, and although some clones show limited radial organization^6, the emphasis appears to be on widespread tangential dispersion^7–10. Here we investigate the pattern of cortical cell dispersion using transgenic mice in which roughly half of the brain cells are coloured by a transgene^11. We find that the neocortex is randomly divided into diffused bands, the majority of cells within each band have the same colour, and their radial orientation suggests radial dispersion. Superimposed upon this was a significant contribution by tangentially dispersed cells that did not respect clonal borders. These observations indicate that cortical specification is not dependent upon a single mechanism of cell allocation, but that both radial mosaicism and tangential cell migration are involved.ONE of the early events in the establishment of regional diversity in brain is the subdivision of the forebrain into the cerebral cortex^1–7 and underlying basal ganglia^8. This subdivision is of special interest, owing to the striking difference in cellular patterning in these two regions. Whereas the dorsal aspect of the telencephalon gives rise to the laminar, cortical regions of brain, the basal aspect gives rise to nuclear, subcortical regions. To examine early events in the regionalization of the forebrain, we visualized cell movement within the ventricular zones of the dorsal and basal regions of the E15 murine telencephalon. Over an 8–24-hour observation period, labelled cells moved extensively in the plane of the cortical ventricular zone. Cell dispersion was restricted, however, at the border between the cortical ventricular zone and the lateral ganglionic eminence, the basal telencephalic ventricular zone. We suggest that this restriction of cell movements establishes a regional pattern of neurogenesis in the developing brain.IN the adult cerebral cortex, many retrovirally labelled clones are widely dispersed^1, though the mechanisms of this dispersion are not well understood. Here we investigate the temporal sequence of clonal dispersion after labelling progenitors of rat cortical cells with replication-incompetent retroviruses at early stages of cortical neurogenesis, 14–15 days after conception (E14/15). The location of labelled daughter cells was determined 3, 6 or 10 days later. Labelled sibling cells were radially arrayed three days after infection (E18). In contrast, by six days after infection (E20/21), 43% of cortical clones were dispersed non-radially by at least 500 μm. Four of these widespread clones were dispersed longitudinally by ≤2 mm, implying sustained rates of dispersion of >15μm per hour. Dispersed sibling cells occurred within proliferative zones of the forebrain in 35% of widely dispersed clones, suggesting that some dispersion reflects movement of dividing cells. Some clones dispersed beyond the neocortex into the olfactory bulb. Progenitor cell dispersion represents a previously unrecognized mode of migration by which sibling cells become widely dispersed in the developing forebrain.TRANSPLANTATION and ablation experiments have led to the generalization that in insects the mesoderm is naive, and that pattern is imposed upon it by the ectoderm^1–6. This has been demonstrated directly by mosaic analysis for the case of one muscle in Drosophila . The unique character of this muscle depends on the activity of sex-determining and homeotic genes, not in the muscle itself, but in the nerve that innervates it^7. Indirect evidence suggests, however, that homeotic genes specify some aspects of mesoderm patterning autonomously. Homeotic genes are expressed in the mesoderm, and are regulated in a segment-specific pattern analogous to, but different from, that seen in the ectoderm^6,8. Moreover, the effects of homeotic mutations on the muscles do not always mirror transformations seen in the epidermis^9,10. Here we examine this problem directly, by expressing homeotic genes ectopically in the mesoderm without altering their expression in the overlying ectoderm. We find that the pattern of adult muscle precursor cells characteristic of the thorax can be converted to that seen in the abdomen by expressing the homeotic gene abdominal-A specifically in the mesoderm.Much of the work on the human genome may be done sooner than expected, but there will still be much to do.The Fontana History of Chemistry. By William H. Brock. Fontana: 1992. Pp. 744. £8.99 (pbk). The Fontana History of the Environmental Sciences. By Peter J. Bowler. Fontana: 1992. Pp. 634. £8.99 (pbk).Genes in Ecology. Edited by R. J. Berry, T. J. Crawford and G. M. Hewitt. Black-well Scientific: 1992. Pp. 534. £50, $109.95 (hbk); £25, $52.95 (pbk).THE standard metabolic rate of an animal is the rate of heat production under conditions that minimize known extra requirements for energy^1,2. In tissues and cells from aerobic organisms, energy expenditure can conveniently be measured as oxygen consumption^3,4. Measurements made using isolated rat hepatocytes have shown that a significant contribution to resting oxygen consumption (and hence heat production) is made by a futile cycle of proton pumping and proton leak across the mitochondrial inner membrane^5. Two important factors affecting standard metabolic rate, thyroid status and phylogeny, also affect the proton permeability^5–10. A third major factor affecting standard metabolic rate is body mass^11,12. Here we show that proton leak decreases with increasing body mass in mammals. We suggest that differences in proton leak may partly explain the differences in standard metabolic rate between mammals of different mass.WHILE ammonites and all other ectocochleate cephalopods became extinct, nautiloids survived relatively unchanged from the Ordovician, suggesting that they are unusually well adapted to their niche. Here we obtain high-resolution tracks of Nautilus positions and depths, combined with telemetered jet pressures, which clarify both its lifestyle and economics. Nautilus is more active in nature than in captivity^1, but its energy costs are lower than projected^2,3. Viewing Nautilus as 'vertic', rather than benthic, resolves this contradiction. Records show that the cost of transport is the same in any direction within a vertical plane. Living on a reef face swept by a lateral current means that vertical movements^4,5 sample large areas for chemical trails. A detected trail can be followed upcurrent in the slow-moving boundary layer, but no effort is wasted on horizontal movement without good prospects for food; long-range movements are downcurrent and made by drifting. Once fed, a Nautilus can reduce its energy costs by moving to deeper, cooler waters, where a single meal can last for months.THE Late Cretaceous rocks of Mongolia have produced unusual and phylogenetically important dinosaurs^1,2. Here we report a startling new example, Mononychus olecranus gen. et sp. nov., an avialian theropod dinosaur with a short, robust forelimb possessing a single stout claw. Several features, including a carinate sternum and reduced fibula, suggest that Mononychus olecranus is more closely related to modern birds than is Archaeopteryx lithographica . The two skeletons are among the best preserved fossils known of a primitive bird, and emphasize the complexity of the morphological transformation from nonavialian theropods to modern birds. The occurrence of such a primitive bird in the Late Cretaceous reflects the paucity of Mesozoic bird fossils and suggests that the early radiation of avialians is only beginning to be sampled.POLAR ice contains a valuable record of past atmospheric mercury deposition, which can provide information about both the natural biogeochemical cycling of this toxic trace metal and the impact of recent anthropogenic emissions. But existing studies of mercury in polar ice and snow cores^1–5 suffer from sample contamination and inadequate analytical procedures. Here we report measurements of mercury concentrations spanning the past 34,000 years from the Dome C ice core, Antarctica, using the stringent trace-metal clean protocols developed by Patterson and co-workers^6. Although this record does not extend into the industrial period, it provides an important baseline for future attempts to identify anthropogenic mercury in Antarctic ice and snow. We find that mercury concentrations were strikingly elevated during the last glacial maximum (18,000 years ago), when oceanic productivity may have been higher than it is today^7. As oceanic mercury emission is correlated with productivity^8,9, we suggest that this was the principal pre-industrial source of mercury to Antarctica; mercury concentrations in Antarctic ice might therefore serve as a palaeoproductivity indicator for the more distant past.Concentrations of atmospheric ozone and of CIO (the predominant form of reactive chlorine responsible for stratospheric ozone depletion) are reported for both the Arctic and Antarctic winters of the past 18 months. Chlorine in the lower stratosphere was almost completely converted to chemically reactive forms in both the northern and southern polar winter vortices. This occurred in the south long before the development of the Antarctic ozone hole, suggesting that ozone loss can be masked by influx of ozone-rich air.THEORETICAL and experimentally based laws for seismic faulting contain a critical slip distance^1–5, D _c, which is the slip over which strength breaks down during earthquake nucleation. On an earthquake-generating fault, this distance plays a key role in determining the rupture nucleation dimension^6, the amount of premonitory and post-seismic slip^7–10, and the maximum seismic ground acceleration^1,11. In laboratory friction experiments, D _c has been related to the size of surface contact junctions^2,5,12; thus, the discrepancy between laboratory measurements of D _ c (∼10^−5m) and values obtained from modelling earthquakes (∼10^−2m) has been attributed to differences in roughness between laboratory surfaces and natural faults^5. This interpretation predicts a dependence of D _c on the particle size of fault gouge^2 (breccia and wear material) but not on shear strain. Here we present experimental results showing that D _c scales with shear strain in simulated fault gouge. Our data suggest a new physical interpretation for the critical slip distance, in which D _c is controlled by the thickness of the zone of localized shear strain. As gouge zones of mature faults are commonly 10^2–10^3 m thick^12–17, whereas laboratory gouge layers are 1–10 mm thick, our data offer an alternative interpretation of the discrepancy between laboratory and field-based estimates of D _c.THE crystallization of 'hard' spheres, which interact only through repulsive forces on contact, is a purely entropic effect and provides a model system for testing theories of freezing transitions in liquids generally^1. Micrometre-sized colloidal particles can be made to approximate hard spheres by grafting of polymers to their surfaces^1. Their slow dynamics make them attractive systems for the study of crystallization kinetics^2–4. As well as undergoing crystallization^1,2, such particles also exhibit a glass transition at a well-defined volume fraction φ_g, which we have shown previously to be related to the cessation of large-scale diffusion on experimental timescales^5,6.. Here we show that the glass transition coincides with a change in the mechanism of crystallization. At volume fractions less than φ_g isometric crystals are nucleated homogeneously throughout the sample, whereas above φ_g crystals forming slowly in the metastable glass phase are highly asymmetric. Regular rocking of the suspension above the glass transition induces more rapid formation of plate-like crystals, indicating that their nucleation is shear-induced.OPTICAL activity manifested by chiral molecules and crystals is of long-standing interest in physics, chemistry, biology and geology^1,2. The structure of chiral lattices in two and three dimensions may provide insights into chiral discrimination, and chiral phases play an important part in the physics and applications of liquid-crystal and amphiphilic films^3–7. Here we report the observation of spontaneous separation of chiral phases in an oriented monolayer of rigid, chiral amphiphiles deposited on mica. Atomic force microscopy of the ordered films reveals domains of mirror-image structures. We propose that this may be the signature of separation into domains of pure enantiomers, although other possibilities exist. This separation of chiral phases in two dimensions may be considered analogous to the spontaneous resolution of enantiomers in three-dimensional crystallization, as exploited by Pasteur in 1848 to isolate enantiomers of sodium tartrate^1.INTEREST in the alkali-intercalated A_ x C_60 fullerides (where A is an alkali metal and x = 2, 3, 4, 6)^1,2 has been greatly enhanced by the discovery of a family of superconducting phases for x = 3 with transition temperatures ( T _ c s ) that are exceeded only by the copper oxide materials^3–9. An early structure refinement^5 identified K_3C_60 as a face-centred-cubic (f.c.c.) intercalation phase with two tetra-hedral (T) and one octahedral (O) potassium ion per C_60. The other superconducting A_3C_60 systems are isostructural^7. Here we report ^87Rb NMR studies of Rb_3C_60 which show the expected T: O ratio of 2:1 at 440 K. Below 370 K, however, an additional resonance appears; spin-echo double-resonance NMR experiments^11,12 show that this arises from a second type of tetrahedral Rb^+ site (T′). Thus the bulk of this material has a local symmetry lower than that of the f.c.c. structure derived from X-ray refinements. Models that could account for this include a rotational orientation of C_60 that places a C_5 ring adjacent to the T′ Rb^+ ions. Alternatively, the symmetry lowering might be due to a Jahn-Teller distortion on C^3−_60, carrier-density modulation or Rb^+ clustering. Each of these models could lead to a degree of charge localization and consequent reduction in the density of states and hence in T _ c .THE magnitudes of galactic magnetic fields are usually estimated from measurements of the radio synchroton emission arising from acceleration of cosmic-ray electrons in the magnetic field. To interpret the emission spectrum, it is usually assumed that the energy density in the magnetic field is equal to that in the cosmic-ray protons (which are assumed to outnumber the electrons by 100:1, as they do in our Galaxy). There is, however, no compelling justification for this assumption of energy equipartition. Here we use measurements by the Compton Gamma Ray Observatory^1,2 of the γ-ray flux from the Magellanic clouds together with radio continuum data to estimate the strength of the magnetic fields in these galaxies without having to invoke energy equipartition. We find that the assumption of energy equipartition is not valid in these irregular galaxies, and that the validity cannot be restored by changing the electron/proton ratio. Supporting evidence for our conclusion comes from radio and X-ray observations (M. G. Watson, personal communication) of the starburst galaxy M82. Our results imply that these galactic fields are too large to have been generated by dynamo action alone, and we suggest that recent star formation might instead provide the generating mechanism.Astronomy, as opportunistic a discipline as can be imagined, has been electrified by the lucky appearance of a supernova in a nearby galaxy. The spirit of 1987 is reborn.How can governments ensure that wealth is created from the scientific enterprise? In an abbreviated version of his talk at Nature's recent meeting^1, Sir Mark Richmond assesses the probable British strategy.Eight Little Piggies: Reflections in Natural History. By Stephen Jay Gould. Norton/Jonathan Cape: 1993. Pp. 507. $22.95, £18.99.The variable domain of the trypanosome variant surface glycoprotein (VSG) ILTat 1.24 has been shown by X-ray crystallography to resemble closely the structures of VSG MITat 1.2, despite their low sequence similarity. Specific structural features of these VSGs, including substitution of carbohydrate for an α-helix, can be found in other VSG sequences. Thus antigenic variation in trypanosomes is accomplished by sequence variation, not gross structural alteration; the extensive sequence differences among VSGs may be required for another reason, such as the avoidance of recognition by helper T cells. Additionally, VSG sequences are found to define families, within a VSG superfamily, which have evolved in the trypanosome genome.La Science au Présent. Edited by Y. Gautier, D. Lavergne, M. Delplanque, F. Gil and J.-L. Verley. Encyclopaedia Universalis: 1992. Two-volume set. Pp. 600. FF630.The money about to be wasted on a clinical trial for AIDS vaccines could be better spent on basic science.The difficulty and delay in ratifying the Maastricht Treaty cast doubts on the soundness of the project and demand a greater sense of vision from those who would make Europe a reality.The Myth of the Explorer: The Press, Sensationalism and Geographical Discovery. By Beau Riffenburgh. Belhaven: 1993. Pp. 226. £37.50.Visions of Caliban: On Chimpanzees and People. By Dale Peterson and Jane Goodall. Houghton Miff I in: 1993. Pp. 367. $22.75.The Scent of Orchids: Olfactory and Chemical Investigations. By Roman Kaiser. Elsevier: 1993. Pp. 264. $75, DFL280.The Development of American Pharmacology: John J. Abel and the Shaping of a Discipline. By John Parascandola. John Hopkins University Press: 1992. Pp. 224. $32.50, £27.The Cambridge World History of Human Disease. Edited by Kenneth F. Kiple. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 1,176. £75, $150.Common Sense, Science and Scepticism: A Historical Introduction to the Theory of Knowledge. By Alan Mus-grave. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 310. £35, $54.95 (hbk); £12.95, $17.95 (pbk). Reading the Book of Nature: An Introduction to the Philosophy of Science. By Peter Kosso. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 198. £22.95, $34.95 (hbk); £7.95, $10.95 (pbk). The Disorder of Things: Metaphysical Foundations of the Disunity of Science. By John Dupre. Harvard University Press: 1993. Pp. 308. $35, £27.95.Making Silent Stones Speak: Human Evolution and the Dawn of Technology. By Kathy D. Schick and Nicholas Toth. Simon and Schuster: 1993. Pp. 351. $25.The Cognitive Neuropsychology of Schizophrenia. By Christopher D. Frith. Lawrence Erlbaum: 1993. Pp. 169. £14.95, $28.50.Symmetry in Chaos: A Search for Pattern in Mathematics, Art and Nature. By Michael Field and Martin Golubitsky. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 218. £19.95, $35. Reflections on Symmetry in Chemistry... and Elsewhere. By Edgar Heilbronner and Jack D. Dunitz. VCH: 1993. Pp. 154. DM58, £22. The Dynamics of Ambiguity. By Giuseppe Caglioti. Springer: 1992. Pp. 170. DM98, £40.Reality Rules: Picturing the World in Mathematics. Volume 1: The Fundamentals. Volume 2: The Frontier. By John L. Casti. Wiley: 1992. Pp. 388/ 424. $80, £42.50 (two-volume set).John von Neumann. By Norman Macrae. Pantheon: 1992. Pp. 405. $25.Universal Ice: Science and Ideology in the Nazi State. By Robert Bowen. Belhaven: 1993. Pp. 189. £39.50. (US dist, St Martin's Press.)Touched With Fire: Manic-Depressive Illness and the Artistic Temperament. By Kay Redfield Jamison. Free Press (Macmillan Inc., New York): 1993. Pp. 370. $24.95.Arktos: The Polar Myth in Science, Symbolism and Nazi Survival. By Joscelyn Godwin. Thames and Hudson/Phanes: 1993. Pp. 260. £10.95, $16.95 (pbk).Roman Aqueducts and Water Supply. By A. Trevor Hodge. Duckworth: 1992. Pp. 504. £55, $78.The Rise and Fall of Nuclearism: Fear and Faith as Determinants of the Arms Race. By Sheldon Ungar. Penn State Press: 1992. Pp. 214. $32.50 (hbk), $14.95 (pbk). Containing the Atom: Nuclear Regulation in a Changing Environment, 1963-1971. By J. Samuel Walker. University of California Press: 1992. Pp. 533. $50, £34.50.Banning Chemical Weapons : By Hugh D. Crone. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 122. £27.95, $39.95 (hbk); £8.95, $12.95 (pbk).Genius in the Shadows: A Biography of Leo Szilard — The Man Behind the Bomb. ByWilliam Lanouette with Bela Silard. Scribner's: 1993. Pp. 587. $35.The Lyman Hawaiian Earthquake Diary, 1833-1917. By M. Wyss, R. Y. Koyanagi and D. C. Cox. US Geological Survey Bulletin 2027, USGS: 1992. Pp. 34. $2. 75 (pbk). Hawai I Volcano Watch: A Pictorial History, 1779-1991. By T. L. Wright, T. J. Takahashi and J. D. Griggs. University of Hawaii Press: 1992. Pp. 162. $42 (hbk), $24.95 (pbk).Vincent van Gogh: Chemicals, Crisis, and Creativity. By Wilfred Niels Arnold. Birkhauser: 1992. Pp. 332. DM98, £37.20, $49.50.Predicting the Future. Edited by Leo Howe and Alan Wain. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 195. £18.95, $29.95.Nicholas Copernicus: Complete Works in Two Volumes*. Johns Hopkins University Press: 1993. Pp. 452/373. Each volume $48, £30 (pbk). Johannes Kepler: New Astronomy*. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 665. £85, $140.Catching the Light: The Entwined History of Light and Mind. By Arthur Zajonc. Bantam: 1993. Pp. 388. $24.95, £16.99.The Psychology of Interrogations, Confessions and Testimony. By Gisli Gudjonsson. Wiley: 1992. Pp. 362. £24.95, $48.95.ACQUIRED resistance to alkylating agents such as N -methyl- N -nitrosourea or N -methyl- N ′ -nitro- N -nitrosoguanidine results from the ability to tolerate the potentially cytotoxic methylated base O ^6-methylguanine (m^6-G) in DNA. In the absence of repair by demethylation in situ , m^6-G is probably lethal through its inappropriate processing by the cell^1. DNA mismatch correction is an attractive candidate for the processing function because although it is replicated, m6-G has no perfect complementary base. Thus, m^6-G in DNA might provoke abortive mismatch repair and tolerance could subsequently arise through loss of a mismatch repair pathway^2,3. Mismatch correction helps maintain genomic fidelity by removing misincorporated bases and deaminated 5-methylcytosine from DNA, and its loss by mutation confers a mutator phenotype on Escherichia coli ^4,5. Here we describe human and hamster cell lines that are tolerant to N -methyl- N -nitrosourea and are defective in a DNA mismatch binding activity. The loss of this activity, which acts on G-T mispairs, confers a mutator phenotype.TRANSCRIPTION of messenger RNA-encoding genes in vitro requires many protein factors^1,2. Transcription factor IID, possibly with the cooperation of TFIIA, binds to the TATA element of the promoter^3–5, forming a complex that can bind TFIIB (refs 6,7) followed by RNA polymerase II (refs 6,8) and other factors^9. One or more of these steps is thought to be facilitated by gene-specific transcriptional activation proteins^10–12; this seems to require TFI ID-associated auxiliary factors^13–15 and may involve direct contact between the activator and TFIID^16,17 and/or TFIIB^18,19. If such contact is necessary in vivo , activation might conceivably be blocked by a TFIIB derivative containing the sequences necessary for this interaction, but lacking those necessary for binding to the rest of the transcriptional apparatus, an effect similar to that referred to as squelching^20 or transcriptional interference^21. Here we show that the activity of the glutamine-rich fushi tarazu activation domain is indeed blocked by truncated TFIIB derivatives in Drosophila Schneider L2 cells, suggesting that it is mediated by interactions with TFIIB.THE Wnt genes are members of a family of vertebrate genes related to the Drosophila gene wingless ( wg )^1,2. They encode secreted molecules^3,4 that are thought to be important in patterning and growth control during ontogenesis^5–7. Several such genes are transcribed in localized domains during limb budding and morphogenesis^2,8. We report here a congenital limb malformation in a mouse transgenic line that ectopically expresses Wnt-1 in the developing limbs. The hemizygote phenotype, which is inherited as an autosomal dominant trait, presents extensive distal truncations of skeletal elements, skeletal fusions and interdigital webbing. The data shown here demonstrate that abnormal Wnt-1 expression is correlated with retarded mesenchymal condensations replaced by highly proliferative cells in the limb bud. This seems to lead to an inability of the affected cells to participate in normal skeletal development leading to the adult defects.THE cellular prion protein (PrP^c) is a sialoglycoprotein of M _ r 33–35K that is expressed predominantly in neurons^1–3. In transmissible and genetic neurodegenerative disorders such as scrapie of sheep, spongiform encephalopathy of cattle and Creutzfeldt–Jakob or Gerstmann–Sträussler–Scheinker diseases of humans^4,5, PrP^c is converted into an altered form (termed PrP^Sc) which is distinguishable from its normal homologue by its relative resistance to protease digestion^6–8. PrP^Sc accumulates in the central nervous system of affected individuals^8,9, and its protease-resistant core aggregates extracellularly into amyloid fibrils^10–12. The process is accompanied by nerve cell loss, whose pathogenesis and molecular basis are not understood. We report here that neuronal death results from chronic exposure of primary rat hippocampal cultures to micromolar concentrations of a peptide corresponding to residues 106–126 of the amino-acid sequence deduced from human PrP complementary DNA. DNA fragmentation of degenerating neurons indicates that cell death occurred by apoptosis. The PrP peptide 106–126 has a high intrinsic ability to polymerize into amyloid-like fibrils in vitro . These findings indicate that cerebral accumulation of PrP^Sc and its degradation products may play a role in the nerve cell degeneration that occurs in prion-related encephalopathies.SINCE the earliest descriptions^1 of the compound eye, the popular impression has prevailed that insects and mammals view the world differently. Recent work, however, underscores marked evolutionary convergence between the visual systems of vertebrates and insects at both optical^2,3 and early processing levels^4,5. Here I describe several classes of cells from the third optic ganglion of dragonflies that respond selectively to different target classes. Several physiological properties of these cells are remarkably similar to those of cells from areas 17,18 and 19 of the mammalian visual cortex. One class of bar-sensitive, orientation-biased cells could mediate discrimination of the orientation of low spatial frequency components of patterns. The existence of neurons functionally similar in many respects to those in the mammalian cortex suggests that evolutionary convergence in visual processing is not limited to early pathways. Insects, like mammals, seem to possess mechanisms for extracting spatial features from visual scenes.IT has been long known that hydrogen can substantially reduce the mechanical stability of transition metals under tensile stress^1–3. This phenomenon of 'hydrogen embrittlement' has important consequences for the safety of fusion reactors and for space technology; but there remains considerable uncertainty about its microscopic origin^2, 3. Here we report the results of a study of fracture of hydrogen-loaded palladium under tensile stress which uses Parrinello–Rahman molecular dynamics based on a many-body alloy hamiltonian. A rather unexpected result is that the apparent hydrogen embrittlement results from a local enhancement of ductility in hydrogen-saturated regions of the metal which causes a reduction of the critical tensile stress at which failure occurs.Tokyo University has done well to embark on external assessment of its physics departmentA WIDE variety of alkali-metal fullerides (A_xC_60) have been prepared, with stoichiometries varying between 1⩽=x⩽=11 (refs 1,2). Most of the compounds with x = 3 are superconductors with unusually high transition temperatures (T_c) which increase with the size of the face-centred cubic unit cell^3. The increase in T_c on lattice expansion is attributed to a decrease in the conduction band width, and therefore one ultimately expects a saturation or downturn of T_c followed by a metal–insulator transition. We have sought to explore this regime by expanding the A_3C_60 structure through intercalation of neutral molecules capable of solvating the A^+ ions. Here we report that the reaction of ammonia with Na_2CsC_60 (T_c = 10.5K; lattice constant α = 14.132 Å) produces the compound (NH_3)_4Na_2CsC_60, which has an expanded unit cell (a = 14.473 Å) and an increased T_c of 29.6 K. The structure contains the Na(NH_3)^+_4 cation on the octahedral site.THE application of seismology to the study of the solar interior^1, 2(helioseismology) has advanced almost solely by the prediction and measurement of the Sun's frequencies of free oscillation, or normal modes. Direct measurement of the travel times and distances of individual acoustic waves—the predominant approach in terrestrial seismology^3—would appear to be more difficult in view of the number and stochastic nature of solar seismic sources. Here, however, we show that it is possible to extract time-distance information from temporal cross-correlations of the intensity fluctuations on the solar surface. This approach opens the way for seismic studies of local solar phenomena, such as subsurface in homogeneities near sunspots, and should help to refine global models of the internal velocity stratification in the Sun.ON 8 February 1992, the Ulysses spacecraft flew by Jupiter at a distance of 5.4 AU from the Sun. During the encounter, the spacecraft was deflected into a new orbit, inclined at about 80^° to the ecliptic plane, which will ultimately lead Ulysses over the polar regions of the Sun^1. Within 1 AU from Jupiter, the onboard dust detector^2 recorded periodic bursts of submicrometre dust particles, with durations ranging from several hours to two days, and occurring at approximately monthly intervals (28 ± 3 days). These particles arrived at Ulysses in collimated streams radiating from close to the line-of-sight direction to Jupiter, suggesting a jovian origin for the periodic bursts. Ulysses also detected a flux of micrometre-sized dust particles moving in high-velocity (⩾ =26 km s^-1) retrograde orbits (opposite to the motion of the planets); we identify these grains as being of interstellar origin.The mossy fibre pathway in the hippocampus uses glutamate as a neurotransmitter, but also contains the opioid peptide dynorphin. Synaptic release of dynorphin causes a presynaptic inhibition of neighbouring mossy fibres and inhibits the induction and expression of mossy fibre long-term potentiation. These findings demonstrate a physiological role for a neuropeptide in the central nervous system, provide a functional basis for the coexistence of a neuropeptide with classic neurotransmitters and demonstrate the very different roles played by these two classes of signalling molecules.The Bohr-Einstein Transcripts. Edited by T. J. Gschäftlhuber.Midgley–Cider-yard: 1993. Pp. 137. $14.95 (pbk).Life Before Birth: The Moral and Legal Status of Embryos and Fetuses. by Bonnle Steinbeck. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 256. £22.50, $29.95.Glaxo: A History to 1962. by R. P. T. Davenport-HJnes Judy Slinn. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 406. £55, $110.California, at the forefront in science and technology, now has to cope wit the consequences of its success in lean times.Vision and Visual Dysfunction. General editor: John Cronly-Dillon. Macmillan: 1991. 17 volumes. Approximately 5,000 pages. £1,250, $2,295.The University of Cambridge should have thought harder before accepting a donation joining science and theology.Mirror Worlds. by D. Gelernter.Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 237. $24.95, £19.95 (hbk); $12.95, £9.95 (pbk). Glimpses of Heaven, Visions of Hell. by B. Sherman P. Judkins. Hodder and Stoughton: 1992. Pp. 224. £12.99 (Pbk). Virtual Worlds. by B. Woolley. Black-well: 1992. Pp. 274. £16.95, $19.95.The general expectation that the structure of the dense substance of a neutron star would be surprising has been more than outdone by speculations, but the nuclear data are not yet good enough to tell just what happens.Sooner or later, governments whose populations are still growing quickly will find themselves exposed to external pressures, on the principle that the world's growth is of general concern.HUNTINGTON'S disease (HD) is a late-onset autosomal dominant neuropsychiatric disorder presenting in mid-adult life with personality disturbance and involuntary movements, cognitive and affective disturbance, and inexorable progression to death^1. The underlying genetic defect has been mapped to chromosomal band 4pl6.3 (refs 2, 3). Analysis of specific recombination events in some families with HD has further refined the location of the HD defect to a 2.2 megabase DNA interval^4,5. Using a direct complementary DNA selection strategy we have identified at least seven transcriptional units within the minimal region believed to contain the HD gene. Screening with one of the cDNA clones identified an Alu insertion in genomic DNA from two persons with HD which showed complete cosegregation with the disease in these families but was not found in 1,000 control chromosomes. Two genes including the previously identified α-adducin gene and another that encodes for a 12-kilobase transcript, map in close proximity to the Alu insertion site. The 12-kilobase transcript should be regarded as a strong candidate for the HD gene.A MAJOR challenge in protein design is to create stable scaffolds into which tailored functions can be introduced. Here we present the design, synthesis and characterization of a 61-residue all- β protein: the minibody. We used a portion of the heavy chain variable domain of an immunoglobulin as a template, obtaining a molecule with a novel β -sheet scaffold and two regions corresponding to the hypervariable loops HI and H2. To exploit the potential for creating functional centres in the minibody, we engineered a metal-binding site into it. This site is formed by one histidine in HI and two in H2. The protein is folded, compact and able to bind metal, thus representing the first designed β -protein with a novel fold and a tailored function. By randomizing the sequence of the hypervariable loops, we are using the minibody scaffold to construct a conformationally constrained peptide library displayed on phage.CONTROL of the metaphase to anaphase transition is a central component of cell-cycle regulation. Arrest at either metaphase I or II before fertilization is a common component of oogenesis in many organisms^1. In Drosophila melanogaster females, this arrest occurs at meiosis I with the chiasmate bivalents tightly massed at the metaphase plate and the nonexchange chromosomes positioned between the plate and the poles on long tapered spindles^2. Meiosis resumes only after passage through the oviduct^3,4. Thus, metaphase arrest defines an important checkpoint in the meiotic cell cycle1. We report here that this arrest results from the balancing of chiasmate bivalents at the metaphase plate. Two meiotic mutations, mei-9 ^ b and mei-218 ^ a4 , both of which greatly reduce the frequency of chiasma formation, bypass the metaphase block and allow stage 14 oocytes to finish both meiotic divisions without arrest. We conclude that metaphase arrest results from the balancing of kinetochore forces due to chiasmata.A CIRCADIAN clock, which continues to oscillate in constant conditions, is almost ubiquitous in eukaryotes as well as some prokaryotes^1. This class of biological oscillators drives daily rhythms as diverse as photosynthesis in plants^2 and the sleep-wake cycle in man^3 and enables organisms to anticipate environmental changes or segregate in time-incompatible processes^4. Circadian oscillators share many properties, suggesting that the clock is a single mechanism, preserved throughout evolution, which is capable of controlling all the different circadian functions. Here we show that two rhythms in a unicellular organism can, under certain experimental conditions, run independently, and thus each rhythm must be controlled by its own distinct oscillator.ANIMAL and human lentiviruses elude host defences by establishing covert infections and eventually cause disease through cumulative losses of cells that die with activation of viral gene expression^1–5. We used polymerase chain reaction in situ double-label methods^6,7 to determine how many CD4^+ lymphocytes are latently infected by human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) in patient lymph nodes and whether the pool of infected cells is large enough to account for immune depletion through continual activation of viral gene expression and attrition of cells responding to antigens. We discovered an extraordinarily large number of latently infected CD4^+ lymphocytes and macrophages throughout the lymphoid system from early to late stages of infection, and confirmed^8–14 the extracellular association of HIV with follicular dendritic cells. Follicular dendritic cells may transmit infection to cells as they migrate through lymphoid follicles. Latently infected lymphocytes and macrophages constitute an intracellular reservoir large enough ultimately to contribute to much of the immune depletion in AIDS, and represent a difficult problem that must be resolved in developing effective treatments and protective vaccine.PRIMARY infection with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) is generally followed by a burst of viraemia with or without clinical symptoms^1–3. This in turn is followed by a prolonged period of clinical latency. During this period there is little, if any, detectable viraemia, the numbers of infected cells in the blood are very low, and it is extremely difficult to demonstrate virus expression in these cells^4. We have analysed viral burden and levels of virus replication simultaneously in the blood and lymphoid organs of the same individuals at various stages of HIV disease. Here we report that in early-stage disease there is a dichotomy between the levels of viral burden and virus replication in peripheral blood versus lymphoid organs. HIV disease is active in the lymphoid tissue throughout the period of clinical latency, even at times when minimal viral activity is demonstrated in blood.THE soluble NSF attachment proteins (SNAPs) enable N -ethyl-maleimide-sensitive fusion protein (NSF) to bind to target mem-branes^1–4. Here we report the cloning and sequencing of com-plementary DNAs encoding α -, β - and γ -SNAPs. Two of these proteins, α and γ , are found in a wide range of tissues, and act synergistically in intra-Golgi transport. The third, β , is a brain-specific isoform of α -SNAP. Thus, NSF and SNAPs appear to be general components of the intracellular membrane fusion apparatus, and their action at specific sites of fusion must be controlled by SNAP receptors particular to the membranes being fused, as described in the accompanying article^4.SUBSTANCE P is a peptide neurotransmitter that binds to the neurokinin-1 receptor and is involved in pain transmission and neurogenic inflammation^1–4. Recently, a non-peptide substance P antagonist (CP 96345) has been shown to be effective in animal models of pain and inflammation^5,6. An understanding of the molecular interactions responsible for ligand binding will be critical for the development of more specific and selective antagon-ists for the neurokinin-1 receptor and for the discovery of new antagonists for related G-protein-coupled receptors. Here we report that histidine at position 197 in the fifth transmembrane helix of the human neurokinin-1 receptor binds specifically to CP 96345 but not to peptide agonists. Substitution of His 197 by different amino acids and analysis of structural analogues of antagonists suggest that His 197 is involved in an amino–aromatic interaction with the benzhydryl moiety of CP 96345.THE brain cholecystokinin-B/gastrin receptor (CCK-B/gastrin) has been implicated in mediating anxiety, panic attacks, satiety, and the perception of pain^1–5. The canine and human CCK-B/gastrin receptors share 90% amino-acid identity^6,7 and have similar agonist affinities. These receptors can be selectively blocked by the non-peptide benzodiazepine-based antagonists L365260 (ref. 8) and L364718 (ref . 9) ; however, the binding of these antagon-ists to the human and canine receptors differs by up to 20-fold, resulting in a reversal of affinity rank order. Here we report the identification of a single amino acid in the sixth transmembrane domain of the CCK-B/gastrin receptor that corresponds to valine 319 in the human homologue and which is critical in determining the binding affinity for these non-peptide antagonists. We show that it is the variability in the aliphatic side chain of the amino acid in position 319 that confers antagonist specificity. Substitution of valine 319 with a leucine residue decreases the affinity for L365260 20-fold while concomitantly increasing the affinity for L364718. An isoleucine in the same position of the human receptor selectively increases affinity for L364718. Interspecies differences in the aliphatic amino acid occupying this single position selectively affect antagonist affinities without altering the agonist binding profile^6,7,10. We therefore conclude that the residues underlying non-peptide antagonist affinity must differ from those that confer agonist specificity. To our knowledge, these findings are the first example in which a critical antagonist binding determinant for a seven-transmembrane-domain peptide hormone receptor has been identified.NON-PEPTIDE ligands for peptide receptors have been discovered in several systems through file screening programs^1–6, but the mechanism of action for these candidate drugs is obscure as they do not chemically resemble the native peptides. The compound CP 96345 is a high-affinity, non-peptide antagonist of the substance P (NK_1) receptor^4,5,7, which is important in pain perception and neurogenic inflammation^8–11. Here we identify epitopes on the NK_1, receptor responsible for the specific binding of CP 96345 by systematic exchange of corresponding segments between the NK_1, receptor and the homologous NK_3 (neurokinin B) receptor, which does not bind the non-peptide ligand. Non-conserved residues, in two epitopes around the top of transmembrane segment V and in one epitope at the top of transmembrane segment VI, are essential for the specific action of CP 96345 on the NK_1, receptor, but are surprisingly not important for the binding of the natural peptide ligand, substance P. Susceptibility to the non-peptide antagonists can be conveyed to the previously unresponsive NK_3 receptor by mutational transfer of this discontinuous epitope from the NK_1, receptor.BY repeating words 'in our head', verbal material (such as telephone numbers) can be kept in working memory^1 almost indefinitely. This 'articulatory loop' includes a subvocal rehearsal system^2–6 and a phonological store^3,6–10. Little is known about neural correlates of this model of verbal short-term memory. We therefore measured regional cerebral blood flow, an index of neuronal activity, in volunteers performing a task engaging both components of the articulatory loop (short-term memory for letters) ^5–10 and a task which engages only the subvocal rehearsal system (rhyming judgement for letters) ^4,11. Stimuli were presented visually and the subjects did not speak. We report here that comparisons of distribution of cerebral blood flow in these conditions localized the phonological store to the left supramarginal gyrus whereas the subvocal rehearsal system was associated with Broca's area. This is, to our knowledge, the first demonstration of the normal anatomy of the components of the 'articulatory loop'.THE Lyme disease spirochaete, Borrelia burgdorferi s.l. , is the only Borrelia known to infect both mammals and birds^1. The main vertebrate reservoirs of B. burgdorferi are thought to be various small and intermediate size mammals^2, but the importance of birds as a reservoir has not been thoroughly explored. In the Northern and Southern Hemispheres the seabird tick, Ixodes uriae , is prevalent and closely associated with many species of colony-nesting marine birds^3. Here we report the presence of spirochaetes, demonstrated by immunofluorescent assay, by polymerase chain reaction and in culture, in I. uriae infesting razorbills on an island in the Baltic Sea. This island is free from mammals. The protein profile of the spirochaetes and the sequences of their flagellin and ospA genes are identical to those of the Lyme disease spirochaete, Borrelia burgdorferi s.l. , previously isolated from I. ricinus on a nearby island. In biopsies from the foot web of razorbills, B. burgdorferi -specific DNA was detected after amplification by polymerase chain reaction. Our results suggest that birds play an important part in the maintenance of B. burgdorferi and that mammals may not be a prerequisite for its life cycle.River Mechanics. By M. S. Yalin Pergamon: 1992. Pp. 219. £35, $70.THE cause of extinction of the woolly mammoth, Mammuthus primigenius (Blumenbach), is still debated. A major environmental change at the Pleistocene–Holocene boundary, hunting by early man, or both together are among the main explanations that have been suggested. But hardly anyone has doubted that mammoths had become extinct everywhere by around 9,500 years before present (BP). We report here new discoveries on Wrangel Island in the Arctic Ocean that force this view to be revised. Along with normal-sized mammoth fossils dating to the end of the Pleistocene, numerous teeth of dwarf mammoth dated 7,000–4,000 yr BP have been found there. The island is thought to have become separated from the mainland by 12,000 yr BP. Survival of a mammoth population may be explained by local topography and climatic features, which permitted relictual preservation of communities of steppe plants. We interpret the dwarfing of the Wrangel mammoths as a result of the insularity effect, combined with a response to the general trend towards unfavourable environment in the Holocene.THE existence of temporal changes in the chemical composition of the oceans, which could provide constraints on the potential variability of the ocean–atmosphere; system, remains an open question. Assessments of the chemistry of ancient oceans have relied largely on analysis of marine precipitates, generally carbonate and evaporite minerals^1. These studies suggest that, whereas marine salinity has remained relatively stable over Phanerozoic time^1, magnesium, calcium and sulphate concentrations of ancient oceans and CO_2 partial pressure of ancient atmospheres may have changed^2–4. The ratios of isotopes of carbon, oxygen, sulphur and strontium also appear to have varied^3,5,6. Here we present analyses of primary, one-phase fluid inclusions in Cambrian and Ordovician marine cements, which appear to represent aliquots of early Palaeozoic oceans. The cements have trace element, stable isotope and strontium isotope contents that are consistent with their having been precipitated in a Cambrian–Ordovician marine environment, and the fluids have marine salinities. As these (apparently primary) cements are low-magnesium calcite, unlike the predominantly high-magnesium calcite and aragonite of today's carbonate precipitates, the chemistry of the Cambrian ocean–atmosphere system seems to have been different from that of today.IN 1969, Murozumi et al. ^1 demonstrated that the concentration of lead in Greenland snow had increased by a factor of 200 since ancient times, and concluded that most of this increase was a result of the use of alkyl-leaded petrol. Partly because of these findings, the United States and other western countries limited the use of lead additives in petrol from about 1970. Recently, Boutron et al. ^2 showed that the lead concentration in Greenland snow had decreased by a factor of ∼7.5 over the past 20 years, and suggested that this was a result of the decline in use of leaded petrol. We present here measurements of the ^206Pb/^207Pb ratio of the lead contained in the samples studied by Boutron et al. Because aerosols from the atmosphere above the United States are more radiogenic than those from Eurasia, we can trace the relative contributions of these two sources in the Greenland lead over the period analysed by Boutron et al. We find that the United States was a significant source of lead in the 1970s, but it has since declined considerably in relative importance. This decline mirrors the decrease in use of leaded petrol in the United States, confirming the earlier hypothesis.RECENT observations suggest that the eruption of Mount Pinatubo in June 1991 has had a considerable effect on ozone concentrations in the tropical stratosphere (refs 1, 2, and J. W. Waters, personal communication). Although stratospheric ozone losses following volcanic eruptions are generally attributed to the presence of sulphate aerosol^3–7, we present model calculations which demonstrate that gas-phase sulphur chemistry may have played a part in the tropical ozone perturbations that followed the Pinatubo eruption. We find that in the first month or so after the eruption, the large amount of SO_2 injected into the tropical atmosphere catalyses mid-stratospheric ozone production. On the other hand, the SO_2 cloud absorbs solar radiation, thereby reducing the rate of O_2 photolysis (and hence of ozone production) below it. These two effects cancel each other out at an altitude of about 25 kilometres. After one or two months, most of the SO_2 has been oxidized to sulphate; the efficiency of these two mechanisms then becomes negligible (although ozone remains perturbed in the lower stratosphere because of its long photochemical lifetime in this region). The model features show good agreement with initial ozone measurements following the eruption, including both the mid-altitude switch from ozone loss to ozone gain^1, and the increase and subsequent decrease in the total ozone column^2,7.The British government seems to be hankering after direct control of the universities whose costs it meets.THE study of fracture is an old topic^1, but only recently has an understanding begun to emerge of crack formation, propagation and morphology (which is often fractal) ^2–8. When a brittle material such as glass is broken under tensile stress^9, the cracks have a complicated morphology^10. Fineberg et al .^11 showed that this process may be caused by a dynamic instability, whereby the speed of crack propagation increases until it approaches the speed of sound: at this point, complex structures appear. But crack morphology in quasistatic fracture, where the speed of the crack tip is much smaller than the speed of sound, can also exhibit marked changes^12. Here we present studies of crack propagation in glass plates caused by sudden but carefully controlled cooling. We observe a transition from straight to regular, wavy cracks as the tip speed increases. The scaling behaviour of an appropriately defined relaxation time suggests that this transition is a Hopf bifurcation^13, like those seen in a variety of other nonlinear systems. At still higher speeds, the oscillatory cracks split into first two and then four or more branches.UNIFIED models^1–3 of radio-loud quasars and powerful radio galaxies suggest that they are intrinsically similar objects observed from different angles. This can be tested by comparing the isotropically emitted radiation from the spatially extended nebulae surrounding the nuclei; the unified models predict that the intensities of these emissions should be comparable for the two classes of object. But when this prediction was examined^4 for the [O _III] 5,007-Å emission line, it was found that quasar [O _III] luminosities significantly exceed those of otherwise similar radio galaxies. We have measured the spatially integrated [O_II] 3,727-Å emission-line luminosities for a number of quasars and radio galaxies taken from the 3C catalogue. Supplementing our data with values from the literature, we find no systematic difference in the [O _II] luminosities. We argue that this emission is indeed isotropic, and that our results are consistent with the unification hypothesis; the [O _III] line, on the other hand, may still have a significant component from the nuclear region, and thus be subject to pronounced anisotropic obscuration.DISTANT radio galaxies provide valuable insights into the properties of the young Universe—they are the only known extended optical sources at high redshift and might represent an early stage in the formation and evolution of galaxies in general. This extended optical emission often has very complex morphologies, but the origin of the light is still unclear. Here we report spectroscopic observations for several distant radio galaxies (0.75≤ z ≤ 1.1) in which the rest-frame spectra exhibit featureless continua between 2,500 Å and 5,000 Å. We see no evidence for the break in the spectrum at 4,000 Å expected for an old stellar population^1–3, and suggest that young stars or scattered emissions from the active nuclei are responsible for most of the observed light. In either case, this implies that the source of the optical emission is com-parable in age to the associated radio source, namely 10^7 years or less.Myogenin is a muscle-specific transcription factor that can induce myogenesis in a variety of cell types in tissue culture. To test myogenin's role in vivo , mice homozygous for a targeted mutation in the myogenin gene were generated. These mice survive fetal development but die immediately after birth and show a severe reduction of all skeletal muscle. Myogenin-mutant mice differ from mice carrying mutations in genes for the related myogenic factors Myf5 and MyoD, which have no muscle defects. Myogenin is therefore essential for the development of functional skeletal muscle.A Vision of the Brain. By Semir Zeki. Blackwell Scientific: ±993. Pp. 366. £18.95, $36.95.From the structure of sodium chloride to that of a human rhinovirus complexed with its receptor — X-ray crystal analysis has taken an extraordinarily fruitful path since its inception 80 years ago.An article on AIDS therapy published earlier this year turns out not to sustain its hopeful conclusion.The money crisis has (or should have) given the managers of the European Communities a nasty fright. The best hope now is that they will embark on a more balanced development of European institutions.Featured this week — a new transfection reagent, a quantitative PCR system, new vector systems, fluorescent ion indicators, ionophores and probes for cell signalling, and two new fluorescence-based imaging instruments.High density peptide and oligonucleotide chips are fabricated using semiconductor-based technologies. These chips have a variety of biological applications.Thousands of human genes are being characterized by analysing complementary DNA sequences. But the job of making full use of this wealth of information is just beginning.Volcanoes: A Planetary Perspective. By Peter Francis. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 443. £50, $98 (hbk); £25, $49.95 (pbk).RNAs that contain specific high-affinity binding sites for small molecule ligands immobilized on a solid support are present at a frequency of roughly one in 10^10-10^11 in pools of random sequence RNA molecules^1,2. Here we describe a new in vitro selection procedure designed to ensure the isolation of RNAs that bind the ligand of interest in solution as well as on a solid support. We have used this method to isolate a remarkably small RNA motif that binds ATP, a substrate in numerous biological reactions and the universal biological high-energy intermediate. The selected ATP-binding RNAs contain a consensus sequence, embedded in a common secondary structure. The binding properties of ATP analogues and modified RNAs show that the binding interaction is characterized by a large number of close contacts between the ATP and RNA, and by a change in the conformation of the RNA.PROTEIN-PROTEIN interactions between transcription activator proteins and RNA polymerase or basal transcription factors have been suggested to be important for transcription activation^1–8. Interactions between catabolite gene activator protein (CAP)^9,10 and RNA polymerase have been proposed based on face-of-helix-dependent transcription activation by CAP^11–13 and based on face-of-helix-dependent cooperative binding of CAP and RNA polymerase to promoter DNA^14,15. Mutants of CAP specifically defective in transcription activation have been isolated (mutants defective in transcription activation, but not defective in DNA binding and DNA bending^16–19). All such mutants contain amino-acid substitutions within a surface loop consisting of amino acids 152 to 166 of CAP^16–19. Here we use the thermodynamically rigorous technique of fluorescence polarization^20–23 to show that CAP interacts with RNA polymerase in solution in the absence of promoter DNA ( K _D.app = 2.8 x 10^-7 M), whereas [Alal58]CAP, a mutant of CAP specifically defective in transcription activation, does not.ONE of the members of the bZIP family of transcriptional activators^1–5 is NF-IL6/LAP (IL-6 DBF, C/EBPβ CRP2). NF-IL6/LAP protein is highly expressed in liver nuclei^2, where it has been implicated as a master regulator of the acute-phase response^1,3,6,7, induced by interleukin-6 (IL-6) and other inflammatory mediators^3,8. Also, NF-IL6/LAP is involved in the activation of the IL-6 promoter in response to IL-1 and bacterial lipopolysaccharide^1–6. The control of NF-IL6/LAP expression and activity is complex and poorly understood. Under some conditions the NF-IL6/LAP gene is transcriptionally activated by IL-1 and lipopolysaccharide1, whereas in other instances, its binding to cognate DNA sequences is enhanced by cytokines^1,3. Additionally, the ability of constitutively expressed NF-IL6/LAP to activate transcription is strongly augmented by IL-6, through an unknown signalling pathway. We now show that stimulation of the protein kinase C pathway increases the phosphorylation of Ser 105 within the activation domain of NF-IL6/LAP, and enhances its transcriptional efficacy.LOW-MOLECULAR-WEIGHT GTP-binding proteins (small G proteins) of the Rab family have been proposed to act as central regulators of vesicular traffic^1,2, and proteins of the Rab3 subfamily (Rab3A, B, C and D)^3–6 are thought to be associated with membrane vesicles or granules undergoing exocytotic fusion with the plasma membrane^7–10. Rab3A is highly expressed in brain^11, whereas Rab3B is the major form found in rat anterior pituitary gland. We report here that antisense oligonucleotides against Rab3B, introduced into pituitary cells using the whole-cell patch clamp technique, specifically and reversibly block expression of Rab3B. We find that calcium-dependent exocytosis is inhibited without affecting endocytosis. Antisense oligonucleotides directed against Rab3A have no effect. Our results indicate that Rab3B is likely to be a key intracellular signalling molecule which can control exocytosis downstream of other calcium-dependent processes in anterior pituitary cells.THE emergent view of Quaternary cold stage European landscapes dominated by open vegetation communities has led to the concept that tree populations occurred only in restricted sites (refugia) in southern Europe^1–5, although there is still considerable uncertainty over the precise location and extent of such populations. Trees respond to Quaternary climatic change by spreading from refugia during interglacials, but at the end of an interglacial period there is no reverse migratory movement in the direction of refugia, as most northern populations degrade in situ . It has thus been proposed that survival of European trees through Quaternary climatic cycles is dependent on populations persisting continuously in southern Europe^6. According to this model, it is these southern populations that furnish European interglacial forests with essentially the same components during the Quaternary and, moreover, it is failure to survive in these 'long-term refugia' that brings about a tree species' ultimate disappearance from Europe^6. I present here a 430,000-year record of vegetational and climatic change from northwest Greece comparable to that of other long sequences, but exceptional in documenting the continuous presence of temperate tree pollen throughout the sequence. The levels and consistency of representation suggest the local occurrence of tree populations at fluctuating densities and distributions according to prevailing climatic regimes.RIFTED continental margins commonly include sections of igneous rock more than twice as thick as normal oceanic crust. Explanations for this voluminous magmatic accretion during rifting include plume models^1–3, which require a deep-seated thermal or chemical anomaly in upwelling mantle, and non-plume models^4–7, which call on broad, shallow thermal anomalies and/or rapid upwelling of mantle through the melting zone. New seismic models from two transects across the continent-ocean transition on the US Atlantic margin^8–10 confirm the presence of a 20–25-km-thick igneous section. Here we argue that the similarity of the crustal structure on these and two previous transects, spanning 1,000 km of the margin, and the association of thick igneous crust with the East Coast magnetic anomaly^11 imply that the thick igneous section extends along the entire margin and may have a volume of as much as 3.2 × 10^6 km^3. The distribution of volcanic and plutonic rocks, details of the seismic structure, and lack of independent evidence for a hotspot are difficult to reconcile with plume models and suggest that non-plume processes created the thick igneous crust.THE high-fidelity replication and functional specificity of biomaterials and biopolymers is inspiring a renewal in the development of biomimetic strategies for materials synthesis^1,2. Approaches involving the templating or nucleation of inorganic materials by compressed monolayers of amphiphiles^3–5, the use of supramolecular lipid or protein cages in the preparation of nanoscale inorganic structures^6–8 and the mineralization of bacterial fibres^9 indicate the potential of controlled crystallization at inorganic–organic interfaces. Here we report the controlled formation of tubular inorganic–organic composites by using self-assembled lipid tubules as templates for the crystallization of inorganic oxides. We use microstructures formed by a sugar-based lipid galactocerebroside, doped with small amounts of an anionic sulphated derivative, to induce nucleation of magnetic and non-magnetic iron oxides. By varying the reaction conditions, we can create either tube-like or lamellar disk-like composites. Our results suggest that the variety of microstructures formed by chemically modified sugar-based lipids may provide a route to the production of mineral-containing fibres and other ceramic–organic composites.FOR chemical reactions in solution, the solvent exerts an important influence on the elementary processes of bond making and breaking. The solvent may, for example, enhance bond formation by trapping reactive species in a 'solvent cage' on the reaction timescale^1, or it may act as a 'chaperone' that stabilizes energetic species^2. Ultrafast reaction dynamics in solvent shells can be probed using laser spectroscopic techniques developed to resolve atomic motion on the femtosecond (fs) timescale^3. Here we report on a study of the femtosecond dynamics of the dissociation of neutral iodine molecules encaged in clusters of around 40–150 argon atoms, which form a solvent shell^4–6. We find that, when dissociation occurs from the A-type excited electronic state of I_2, the iodine atoms exhibit coherent motion on a sub-picosecond (<10^−12_s) timescale, rebounding from the 'frozen' solvent cage and recombining. The 'hot' I_2 molecule is then cooled over by collisions with the argon atoms. We provide support for these interpretations using molecular-dynamics simulations. Dissociation from the B state, meanwhile, involves slower bond-breaking and slower recombination of the fragments—there is no coherent 'rebound' from the solvent cage. The dissociation pathway therefore depends critically on the timescale of bond breaking relative to that of solvent rearrangement.THE superconducting transition temperatures ( T _ c s) in the alkali-metal-doped C_60 superconductors (A_3C_60) seem to be determined by the size of the face-centred cubic (f.c.c.) unit cell, which in turn is dependent largely on the size of the metal cations occupying the interstitial sites^1. We have shown previously^2 that intercalation of ammonia into Na_2CsC_60 expands the unit cell and thereby increases T _c by ∼20 K. This has prompted us to explore the generality of this effect by attempting to expand the lattice of A_3C_60 superconductors containing larger cations. Here we show that intercalation of ammonia into K_3C_60 (which has a T _ c of ∼19 K) yields (NH_3)K_3C_60, which has a structure that can be described as an orthorhombic distortion of the f.c.c. structure with one K and one NH_3 per octahedral site. Despite strong evidence that the extent of charge transfer from K to C_60 is unchanged by ammonia intercalation, the compound is not superconducting. We believe that the absence of superconductivity is a consequence of electron localization resulting from the structural distortion. Thus the change in symmetry of the unit cell, as well as the cell size, may be an important factor in attempts to create C_60-based superconductors with high T _ c s.IT HAS recently been recognized^1 that significant numbers of medium-mass black holes (of order 10 solar masses) should form in globular clusters during the early stages of their evolution. Here we explore the dynamical and observational consequences of the presence of such a primordial black-hole population in a globular cluster. The holes initially segregate to the cluster cores, where they form binary and multiple black-hole systems. The subsequent dynamical evolution of the black-hole population ejects most of the holes on a relatively short timescale: a typical cluster will retain between zero and four black holes in its core, and possibly a few black holes in its halo. The presence of binary, triple and quadruple black-hole systems in cluster cores will disrupt main-sequence and giant stellar binaries; this may account for the observed^2 anomalies in the distribution of binaries in globular clusters. Furthermore, tidal interactions between a multiple black-hole system and a red-giant star can remove much of the red giant's stellar envelope, which may explain the puzzling absence^3 of larger red giants in the cores of some very dense clusters.FOLLOWING the discovery of X-ray sources in globular clusters, the accretion of matter onto a central massive black hole was suggested^1–3 as a possible explanation. Subsequently, it was found^4,5 that these sources could be readily explained by thermonuclear instabilities on neutron-star surfaces and the black-hole models were abandoned. We show here, however, that the recent discovery^6 of large populations of millisecond pulsars—and hence neutron stars—in globular clusters implies that several hundred stellar black holes (of about ten solar masses) should form within a typical cluster. In clusters of high central density, we find that the rapid dynamical evolution of the black-hole population will cause ejection of nearly all of the holes on a relatively short time-scale. But in systems of intermediate density, some of the surviving holes may capture a normal star to form a low-mass X-ray binary. We suggest that there may be one or more such binaries in the globular clusters surrounding our Galaxy. These systems will be quiescent most of the time—with only occasional X-ray outbursts—but future observations of the hard X-ray spectrum may indirectly establish their existence.The Hot-Blooded Insects. By Bernd Heinrich. Harvard University Press/Springer (UK): 1993. Pp. 601. $75, £78.The Quantum Theory of Motion: An Account of the de Broglie–Bohm Causal Interpretation of Quantum Mechanics. By Peter R. Holland. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 598. $120, £70.Radar at Sea: The Royal Navy in World War 2. By Derek Howse. Macmillan, UK: 1993. Pp. 383. £25.The three-dimensional structure of an HNF-3/ fork head DNA-recognition motif complexed with DNA has been determined by X-ray crystallography at 2.5 Å resolution. This α/β protein binds B-DNA as a monomer, through interactions with the DNA backbone and through both direct and water-mediated major and minor groove base contacts, inducing a 13° bend. The transcription factor fold is very similar to the structure of histone H5. In its amino-terminal half, three α-helices adopt a compact structure that presents the third helix to the major groove. The remainder of the protein includes a twisted, antiparallel β-structure and random coil that interacts with the minor groove.The formation of ripple patterns on sandy beaches is more than an inconvenience for those who walk on them barefoot, but a challenge in physical analysis that should occupy people for seasons to come.The ice-core record of local temperature, dust accumulation and air composition at Vostok station, Antarctica, now extends back to the penultimate glacial period (∼140–200 kyr ago) and the end of the preceding interglacial. This yields a new glaciological timescale for the whole record, which is consistent with ocean records. Temperatures at Vostok appear to have been more uniformly cold in the penultimate glacial period than in the most recent one. Concentrations of CO_2 and CH_4 correlate well with temperature throughout the record.Antiterminator proteins control gene expression by recognizing control signals near the promoter and preventing transcriptional termination which would otherwise occur at sites that may be a long way downstream. The N protein of bacteriophage λ recognizes a sequence in the nascent RNA, and modifies RNA polymerase by catalysing the formation of a stable ribonucleo-protein complex on its surface, whereas the λ Q protein recognizes a sequence in the DNA. These mechanisms of antitermination in λ provide models for analysing antitermination in viruses such as HIV-1 and in eukaryotic genes.Solar System Evolution: A New Perspective. By Stuart Ross Taylor. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 307. £35, $49.95.South Korea's rise to the ranks of industrialized nations, symbolized by next week's opening of a science and technology exposition in Taejon, has been meteoric. But the road ahead is fraught with difficult choices. Many policy makers want the country to continue to focus on short-term development of technology to sell on the world market, but there is also a clear need to build a broader base for more basic long-term research.The British government should give a better explanation of its decision to manage a public laboratory directly.Hopes outside Japan that last month's general election will weaken Japan's technological competitiveness are misplaced; there is much that the new government can do to sustain the momentum.TAXOL^1–6 is a product isolated from the Pacific yew tree ( Taxus brevifolia ) and is a potent microtubule-stabilizing agent which has recently been approved for treatment of otherwise intractable ovarian cancer. Despite taxol's therapeutic promise, its aqueous insolubility (<0.004 mg ml ^−1) hampers its clinical application. Here we report the design, synthesis and biological activity of a series of taxol-releasing compounds (protaxols) with improved pharmacological properties. These prodrugs were designed to increase their aqueous solubility and allow for taxol release under basic or physiological conditions. We demonstrate the stability of these prodrugs at pH⩽7 and their ability to release taxol in a basic medium. Taxol-like microtubule-stabilizing activity^7–9 appears after the release of taxol. In vitro these prodrugs have cytotoxic properties against tumour cell lines comparable to those of taxol; moreover, human plasma catalyses the release of active taxol. These protaxols have greater potential as anticancer agents than the parent compounds taxol and taxotere (Fig. 1a).SEVERAL lines of evidence suggest that the paternal and maternal genomes may have different expression patterns in the developing organism^1 and this has been confirmed by the identification of endogenous genes that are parentally imprinted in the mouse^2–5. Little is known about the precise mechanisms involved in the process, but structural differences between the two alleles must somehow provide cis -acting signals for directing parental-specific transcription. Cell-cycle replication time is one parameter that has been shown to be associated with both tissue-specific gene expression^6,7 and the allele-specific transcription patterns of the X chromosomes in female cells^8. For this reason we have examined the replication timing patterns for the chromosomal regions containing the imprinted genes Igf2 , Igf2r , H19 and Snrpn in the mouse. At all of these sites, and their corresponding positions in the human genome, the two homologous alleles replicate asynchronously and it is always the paternal allele that is early-replicating. Thus imprinted genes appear to be embedded in large DNA domains with differential replication patterns, which may provide a structural imprint for parental identity.KINESIN is a microtubule-based motor protein that uses energy released from Mg–ATP hydrolysis to generate force for the movement of intracellular membranes towards the fast-growing (plus) ends of microtubule tracks in cells^1. Kinesin-driven microtubule movement can be visualized and quantified using light microscope motility assays^2–5 but our understanding of how kinesin generates force and motion is incomplete^6. Here we report the use of a centrifuge microscope^7,8 to obtain force–velocity curves for kinesin-driven motility and to estimate that the maximal isometric force generated per kinesin is 0.12 ± 0.03 pN per molecule.KRUPPEL (KR), a Drosophila zinc finger-type^1 transcription factor^2–4, can both activate and repress gene expression through interaction with a single DNA-binding site^4. The opposite regulatory effects of KR are concentration-dependent, and they require distinct portions of KR such as the N-terminal region for activation and the C-terminal region for repression^4. Here we show that KR is able to form homodimers through sequences located within the C terminus. When these sequences were fused to separated functional parts of the yeast transcription factor GAL4^5, they reconstituted a functional transcriptional activator on dimerization in vivo . Our results suggest that the KR monomer is a transcriptional activator. At higher concentration KR forms a homodimer and becomes a represser that functions through the same target sequences as the activator.Through Our Eyes Only? The Search for Animal Consciousness. By Marian Stamp Dawkins. W. H. Freeman: 1993. Pp. 192. £14.95, $19.95.NITRIC oxide (NO) is a short-lived, highly reactive gas, which has been identified as a mediator in vasodilation, an active agent in macrophage cytotoxicity and neurotoxicity, and a neurotransmitter in the central and peripheral nervous systems^1–5. Production of NO by neurons is critical for facilitated synaptic transmission in models of synaptic plasticity such as long-term potentiation and long-term depression, suggesting a role for NO as a retrograde messenger that could complete a hypothetical feedback loop by strengthening the connection between postsynaptic and presynaptic cells^6–10. We report here that although alone NO has no evident effect on transcription, it can act as an amplifier of calcium signals in neuronal cells. NO and Ca^2+ action have to coincide in time for amplification to occur. Experiments with a series of simplified reporter genes in combination with specific recombinant protein kinase inhibitors suggest that induction of gene activity following NO-amplified calcium action involves protein kinase A-dependent activation of the transcription factor CREB.THE mouse pink-eyed cleft-palate ( p ^ cp ) mutation is characterized by hypopigmentation associated with cleft palate, neurological disorders and runting^1,2. Most p ^ cp homozygotes are born with cleft palate and die shortly after birth, presumably as a result of feeding problems^3. A few exceptional p ^ cp mutants live beyond this stage but display tremor and jerky gait^2. We report here that the genes encoding the γ-aminobutyric acid type A (GABA_A) receptor sub-units α5 (originally described as α4; ref. 4), β3 and γ3 are disrupted by a deletion in p ^ cp mice. We also show that the α5 and γ3 genes are located between the p and β3 genes on mouse chromosome 7. The p ^ cp deletion leads to alterations of binding properties of the GABA_A receptors in the brain, providing an in vivo model system for studying GABA_A receptor function. The human homologue of the region deleted in p ^ cp mice is associated with Angelman syndrome^5–9. Thus, p ^ cp mice may be useful in defining the region containing the gene(s) for this syndrome.AXONAL elongation and the transformation of growth cones to synaptic terminals are major steps of brain development and the molecular mechanisms involved form the basis of the correct wiring of the nervous system. The same mechanisms may also contribute to the remodelling of nerve terminals that occurs in the adult brain, as a morphological substrate to memory and learning^1. We have investigated the function of the nerve terminal protein SNAP-25 (ref. 2) during development. We report here that SNAP-25 is expressed in axonal growth cones during late stages of elongation and that selective inhibition of SNAP-25 expression prevents neurite elongation by rat cortical neurons and PC-12 cells in vitro and by amacrine cells of the developing chick retina in vivo . These results demonstrate that SNAP-25 plays a key role in axonal growth. They also suggest that high levels of SNAP-25 expression in specific areas of the adult brain^2 may contribute to nerve terminal plasticity.PHOTORECEPTORS are the first in the chain of neurons that process visual information. In lateral eyes of vertebrates, light hyperpolarizes rod and cone photoreceptors that synapse onto bipolar and horizontal cells in the first synaptic layer of the retina. The sign of the photoreceptor signal is either conserved or inverted in bipolar cells, resulting in chromatically dependent depolarizing and hyperpolarizing responses to visual stimuli. Visual information is then conveyed to the second synaptic layer for encoding and transmission to the brain by ganglion cells. The parietal (third) eye of lizards does not contain bipolar cells or other interneurons. Photoreceptors synapse directly onto ganglion cells^1–4 and yet, even in the absence of interneurons, antagonistic chromatic mechanisms modulate the ganglion cell responses^5,6. We report here that chromatic antagonism in the third eye originates in the chromatically dependent hyperpolarizing and depolarizing response of the photoreceptors to light. We also suggest that the antagonistic nature of these photoresponses may provide lizards with a mechanism for the enhanced detection of dawn and dusk.THE reliable construction of evolutionary trees from nucleotide sequences often depends on randomization tests such as the bootstrap^1 and FTP (cladistic permutation tail probability) tests^2–6. The genomes of bacteria^7, viruses^8, animals^7,9,10 and plants^11, however, vary widely in their nucleotide frequencies. Where genomes have independently acquired similar G+C base compositions, signals in the data arise that cause methods of evolutionary tree reconstruction to estimate the wrong tree by grouping together sequences with similar G+C content^12–14. Under these conditions randomization tests can lead to both the rejection of the correct evolutionary hypothesis and acceptance of an incorrect hypothesis (such as with the contradictory inferences from the photosynthetic rbcS and rbcL sequences^14). We have proposed one approach to testing for the G+C content problem^15. Here we present a formalization of this method, a frequency-dependent significance test, which has general application.γ-AMINOBUTYRIC acid (GABA) is the most abundant inhibitory neurotransmitter in vertebrates and invertebrates^1. GABA receptors are the target of anxiolytic, antiepileptic and antispasmodic drugs^2, as well as of commonly used insecticides^3. How does a specific neurotransmitter such as GABA control animal behaviour? To answer this question, we identified all neurons that react with antisera raised against the neurotransmitter GABA in the nervous system of the nematode Caenorhabditis elegans . We determined the in vivo functions of 25 of the 26 GABAergic neurons by killing these cells with a laser microbeam in living animals and by characterizing a mutant defective in GABA expression. On the basis of the ultrastructurally defined connectivity of the C. elegans nervous system, we deduced how these GABAergic neurons act to control the body and enteric muscles necessary for different behaviours. Our findings provide evidence that GABA functions as an excitatory as well as an inhibitory neurotransmitter.γ-AMINOBITYRIC acid (GABA) neurotransmission is widespread in vertebrate and invertebrate nervous systems^1. Here we use a genetic approach to identify molecules specific to GABA function. On the basis of the known in vivo roles of GABAergic neurons in controlling behaviour of the nematode Caenorhabditis elegans ^2, we identified mutants defective in GABA-mediated behaviours. Five genes are necessary either for GABAergic neuronal differentiation or for pre- or postsynaptic GABAergic function. The gene unc-30 is required for the differentiation of a specific type of GABAergic neuron, the type-D inhibitory motor neuron. The gene unc-25 is necessary for GABA expression and probably encodes the GABA biosynthetic enzyme glutamic acid decarboxylase. The genes unc-46 and unc-47 seem to be required for normal GABA release. Finally, the gene unc-49 is apparently necessary postsynaptically for the inhibitory effect of GABA on the body muscles and might encode a protein needed for the function of a GABA_A-like receptor. Some of these genes are likely to encode previously unidentified proteins required for GABA function.THE scanning tunnelling microscope (STM) has yielded great insight into the structure of surfaces and into the dynamics of surface reconstruction and adsorption^1. We show here that it can also provide direct information about the microscopic mechanisms of catalytic reactions on surfaces. We have studied the oxidation of carbon monoxide on an oxygen-precovered rhodium (110) surface, a process related to the catalytic removal of CO in exhaust gases^2,3. The STM images show that the reactivity is strongly influenced by the oxygen-induced reconstructions of the surface. The reaction is initiated at high-energy adsorption sites, mainly at steps and domain boundaries of the adsorbed oxygen layer. The CO strips away one-dimensional islands of oxygen atoms on the reconstructed surface, proceeding in the [011] direction. More generally, these results show how the STM can provide insights into the microkinetics of surface reactions.IN January 1991, the 0.9-m Spacewatch telescope made the first observation^1 of an asteroid outside Earth's atmosphere but in the neighbourhood of the Earth–Moon system. Since then, more than 40 Earth-approaching asteroids (defined as objects with perihelia of less than 1.3 AU) have been discovered, including 13 smaller than 50 m. Using these data, one of us (D.L.R.) has shown^2 that there is an excess of Earth-approaching asteroids with diameters less than 50 m, relative to the population inferred from the distribution of larger objects. Here we argue that these smaller objects — characterized by low eccentricities, widely ranging inclinations and unusual spectral properties — form a previously undetected asteroid belt concentrated near Earth. The recent discovery of additional small Earth-approaching asteroids supports this conclusion.RECENT observations with the Spacewatch telescope indicate that the flux of Earth-crossing objects with diameters below about 50 m is some 10–100 times higher than predicted by simple extrapolation from the known main-belt asteroid population^1,2. This might seem to imply^3 a significantly greater terrestrial hazard from atmospheric explosions such as those that occurred over Revelstoke or Tunguska^4,5. Here I show that explosions due to Spacewatch objects with diameters less than 50 m (having kinetic energies below about 10 megatonnes high-explosive equivalent) typically occur too high in the atmosphere to cause substantial surface damage. Exclusive of relatively rare iron objects, no comet or asteroid with an energy below ∼2 megatonnes threatens the Earth's surface. The high flux of small Earth-crossing objects identified by Spacewatch therefore does not imply a greater terrestrial hazard.It is natural that research should be competitive, but there is now ample evidence that competition is too fierce for many people's peace of mind and for the health of the scientific enterprise as a whole.Britain is not alone in its struggle to reorganize its research, but is again heading in the wrong direction.A year after the Rio summit, there are growing reasons to suspect that the generalization of environmental causes may place excessive burdens on very poor countries.New products in the field of immunology include an interleukin-1 drug screening assay system, microplate washers and readers, radiolabelled interleukin-4, and a selection of monoclonal and polyclonal antibodies.The End of Physics: The Myth of a Unified Theory. By David Lindley. Basic Books: 1993. Pp. 275. $25.The Cold War and American Science: The Military—Industrial—Academic Complex at MIT and Stanford. By Stuart W. Leslie. Columbia University Press: 1993. Pp. 332. $48.50, £28.TRANSCRIPTIONAL activating sequences have been described^1 that are encoded by parts of the genome of Escherichia coli . These acidic peptides, fused to a DNA-binding fragment of the yeast transcriptional activator GAL4, activate transcription of a gene in a wide array of eukaryotes, provided that gene bears GAL4-binding sites nearby^2–4. Here we describe an E. coil -encoded sequence that, when attached to the same DNA-binding fragment (GAL4( 1–147)), converts that fragment into a repressor. Thus, as assayed in yeast or in vitro in yeast extracts, this molecule represses transcription when bound upstream of a variety of different activators. Two additional repressing regions that work when tethered upstream, a multiple mutant derivative of the original isolate and a synthetic peptide are, like the original isolate, highly basic. At least one activator can be inhibited by the mutant but not by the parental repressing region. These and other findings suggest that these repressing regions interact with and inhibit the activity of activating regions bound nearby on DNA.FOLDING of the major cytoskeletal components in the cytosol of mammalian cells is mediated by interactions with t-complex polypeptide-1 (TCP1) molecular chaperones^1–6, a situation analogous to the chaperonin 60-aided folding of polypeptides in bacteria^7,8, chloroplasts^9,10 and mitochondria^11,13. We have purified a TCP1-related molecular chaperone from etiolated oat seedlings that has a unique structure. Although immunologically related to TCP1, and having amino-acid sequence similarity, its quaternary structure is different from animal TCP1 proteins^5,6–14. Electron microscopy and image analysis reveals that the chaperone has two stacked rings of six subunits each, and is distinct in size and configuration. The chaperone copurifies with the soluble cytosolic photoreceptor phytochrome^15, and can stimulate refolding of denatured phytochrome to a photoactive form in the presence of Mg–ATP. We propose that this protein is the cytosolic chaperone involved in phytochrome biogenesis in plant cells.HUMAN myxoid liposarcomas contain a characteristic chromosomal translocation, t(12;16)(ql3;pll)^1,2, that is associated with a structural rearrangement of the gene encoding CHOP 3, a growth arrest and DNA-damage inducible member of the C/EBP family of transcription factors^4,5 residing on 12ql3.1^6. Using a CHOP-specifie complementary probe and antiserum we report here the presence of an abnormal CHOP transcript and protein in these tumours. Cloning of the translocation-associated CHOP gene product revealed a fusion between CHOP and a gene provisionally named TLS (translocated in liposarcoma). TLS is a novel nuclear RNA-binding protein with extensive sequence similarity to EWS^7, the product of a gene commonly translocated in Ewing's sarcoma. In TLS-CHOP the RNA-binding domain of TLS is replaced by the DNA-binding and leucine zipper dimerization domain of CHOP. Targeting of a conserved effector domain of RNA-binding proteins to DNA may play a role in tumour formation.MUTATIONS in the Drosophila gene polo cause abnormal mitotic and meiotic divisions^1,2. This gene encodes a 577-amino-acid protein that has an N-terminal putative kinase domain and a 300-residue C-terminal domain2. In budding yeast, a homolo-gous kinase is encoded by CDC5 (ref. 3), a gene required for nuclear division late in the mitotic cycle^4 and during meiosis^5. Murine homologues have also been described^6,7. Here we show that the polo gene product immunoprecipitated from extracts of single Drosophila embryos can phosphorylate casein in vitro , and that the kinase activity peaks cyclically at late anaphase/telophase. This contrasts with the cyclical activity of cyclin B-associated p34^ cdc2 kinase, which is maximal upon entry into mitosis during the rapid cycles of mitosis in the syncytium.PROTEIN kinase C (PKC) is a key enzyme for many cellular processes^1,2 but its physiological roles are poorly understood. An excellent opportunity to investigate the function of PKC has been provided by the identification of an eye-specific PKC in Drosophila ^3–5 and a null PKC mutant, inaC ^ P 209 (refs 5,6). Bright conditioning lights delivered to inaC photoreceptors lead to an abnormal loss of sensitivity in whole cell recordings from dissociated ommatidia; this has been interpreted as 'hyper-adaptation' and PKC's role has been suggested to be distinct from light adaptation^5. A presumably related finding is that during intense light, the response of inaC declines to baseline^6. Invertebrate photoreceptors use the phosphoinositide signalling cascade^7–12, responding to single photons with so-called quantum bumps^13 which sum to form the macroscopic response to light^14–16. Light adaptation allows photoreceptors to adjust their sensitivity over the enormous range of ambient intensities^14,17. Although the molecular mechanism of light adaptation remains obscure, it is a negative-feedback process^12 mediated by a rise in cytosolic calcium^12,18 and a decrease in bump size^12,14–16. We now show that under physiological conditions light adaptation is severely reduced in inaC , suggesting that eye-specific PKC, itself activated by a rise in cytosolic calcium^4,5 and diacylglycerol, is required for adaptation. Furthermore, we show that in the absence of PKC individual bumps fail to terminate normally, an effect that can account for the pleiotropic manifestations of the inaC phenotype.THE diencephalon is a complex integration centre and intricate relay station of the vertebrate brain^1–3. Its development involves the generation of great cellular diversity and neuronal specificity. We report here that it becomes organized in steps, through a stereotyped sequence of neuromeric subdivisions. Diencephalic neuromeres define four cellular domains (D1–D4) that can be followed throughout development, each unit contributing to a well defined part of the adult structural pattern. We propose that the segmental identity of each diencephalic unit is specified by a unique combination of genes^4–13, maintained by polyclonal cell lineage restrictions. A comparison of vertebrate and arthropod development suggests that the basic principles that control anterior axial patterning and set up neuronal specificity in the embryonic central nervous system are highly conserved in evolution.THE hinge region links the two Fab arms to the Fc portion of the IgG molecule. It mediates flexibility to the molecule and serves as a connecting structure between the two heavy chains. In addition it provides space between the Fab and Fc parts. All three properties have been proposed to be important for the ability of IgG to initiate complement activation leading to complement-mediated cell lysis (CML)^1. Here we report the construction of a hinge-deleted mouse–human chimaeric IgG3 molecule with specificity for the hapten NIP (3-iodo-4-hydroxy-5-nitrophenacetyl), HM-1. HM-1 lacks the genetic hinge, but has an introduced cysteine between Ala 231 (EU numbering) and Pro 232 in the lower hinge encoded by the C_H2 exon. The introduced cysteine forms a disulphide bond between the two heavy chains of the molecule. In CML, HM-1 shows a greater activity than IgG3 wild type. This is the first time an IgG molecule without a genetic hinge has been found to be active in CML. We conclude that the hinge functioning as a spacer is not a prerequisite for complement activation. Rather, its major role seems to be to connect the heavy chains to each other in the amino-terminal part of C_H2. Because HM-1 is expected to have low Fab–Fc flexibility, this molecular feature is probably of no importance for complement activation.AMONG site-directed DNA recombination systems, V(D)J recombination is noteworthy in that identical reactants yield different recombination products at the junction of joined segments. This variation is the basis for diversity at the base of antigen receptor binding pockets and corresponds to V-(D)-J DNA junctions. An abundance of certain junctions has been noted^1–5. It has been proposed that these junctions are favoured because they occur where short regions of homology in participating coding ends might align preferentially^1. Here we use a system that is entirely free from cellular selection to show that the diversity of coding joints can be severely restricted when the coding ends participating in the reaction have short regions of homology. This constraint on diversity is diminished but not eliminated by terminal deoxynucleotidyl transferase, a mechanistic feature that has implications for the establishment of the immune repertoire.THE concept of working memory is central to theories of human cognition because working memory is essential to such human skills as language comprehension and deductive reasoning^1–4. Working memory is thought to be composed of two parts, a set of buffers that temporarily store information in either a phonological or visuospatial form, and a central executive responsible for various computations such as mental arithmetic^5,6. Although most data on working memory come from behavioural studies of normal and brain-injured humans^7, there is evidence about its physiological basis from invasive studies of monkeys^8–10. Here we report positron emission tomography (PET) studies of regional cerebral blood flow in normal humans that reveal activation in right-hemisphere prefrontal, occipital, parietal and premotor cortices accompanying spatial working memory processes. These results begin to uncover the circuitry of a working memory system in humans.Safeguards are needed if students are to pay a greater share of the costs of their education.CONCERNS about genetically engineered crop plants centre on three conjectural risks: that transgenic crop plants will become weeds of agriculture or invasive of natural habitats; that their engineered genes will be transferred by pollen to wild relatives whose hybrid offspring will then become more weedy or more invasive; or that the engineered plants will be a direct hazard to humans, domestic animals or beneficial wild organisms (toxic or allergenic, for example). Here we describe an experimental protocol for assessing the invasiveness of plants. The object is to determine whether genetic engineering for herbicide tolerance affects the likelihood of oilseed rape becoming invasive of natural habitats. By estimating the demographic parameters of transgenic and conventional oilseed rape growing in a variety of habitats and under a range of climatic conditions, we obtain a direct comparison of the ecological performance of three different genetic lines (control, kanamycin-tolerant transgenics and herbicide-tolerant transgenic lines). Despite substantial variation in seed survival, plant growth and seed production between sites and across experimental treatments, there was no indication that genetic engineering for kanamycin tolerance or herbicide tolerance increased the invasive potential of oilseed rape. In those cases in which there were significant differences (such as seed survival on burial), transgenic lines were less invasive and less persistent than their conventional counterparts.Cyclin-dependent kinase 2 (CDK2) is a member of a highly conserved family of protein klnases that regulate the eukaryotic cell cycle. The crystal structures of the human CDK2 apoenzyme and its Mg^2+ATP complex have been determined to 2.4Å resolution. The structure is bi-lobate, like that of the cyclic AMP-dependent protein kinase, but contains a unique helix—loop segment that interferes with ATP and protein substrate binding and probably plays a key part in the regulation of all cyclin-dependent kinases.Molecules and Mental Illness. By Samuel H. Barondes. W. H. Freeman/ Scientific American Books: 1993. Pp. 216. $32.95, £18.95.The Neandertals: Changing the Image of Mankind. By Erik Trinkaus and Pat Shipman. Knopf/Jonathan Cape: 1993. Pp. 452. $30, £20. In Search of the Neanderthals: Solving the Puzzle of Human Origins. By Christopher Stringer and Clive Gamble. Thames and Hudson: 1993. Pp. 247. £18.95, $29.95.MECHANISMS producing and maintaining discrete polymorphisms have long fascinated evolutionary biologists^1,2. Despite the ubiquity of non-sex-limited polymorphisms in vertebrates, the evolutionary factors maintaining them are well understood in only a few instances^3. The African finch Pyrenestes is unique among birds in exhibiting a non-sex-determined polymorphism in bill size^4,5. Morphs breed randomly with respect to bill size and differ in diet and feeding performance on soft and hard seeds^4,6. I present here: (1) new data showing that the polymorphism appears to result from a single genetic factor; (2) support from long-term field studies for earlier suggestions that disruptive selection is acting on bill size; and (3) data revealing the presence of a possible third, much larger morph. Results suggest that the polymorphism may have arisen through single mutations, where morphs occupy distinct adaptive peaks through differences in feeding performance on seeds differing in hardness.THE chemical, mineralogical and isotopic characteristics of deposits at the Cretaceous/Tertiary (K/T) boundary are suggestive of a large impact event, the prime candidate^1 being the Chicxulub crater in Yucatan, Mexico. Spinel-bearing spherules, which may be associated with such impacts, have been reported^2 at several K/T boundary sites worldwide, but their origin is still uncertain. We have examined the spinel-bearing material recovered from K/T boundary deposits at site 577 in the Pacific Ocean^3 and find two distinct populations of particles: spherules with dendritic spinel textures dispersed throughout the grains and irregularly shaped fragments with spinels essentially confined to the rim. The morphology and composition of the particles are characteristic of melted and partially melted meteoritic ablation debris, but their location is difficult to reconcile with an impact on the Yucatan peninsula, some 10,000 km away. We suggest instead that the spinel-bearing particles at site 577 are derived from the impact of a 2-km asteroid in the Pacific Ocean, and that several accretionary events of this type are required to explain the global distribution of spinel-bearing spherules at the K/T boundary.APPARENTLY benign silicic domes or lava flows can travel for several kilometres and then suddenly collapse to generate pyroclastic phenomena capable of causing widespread destruction, as happened recently at Mount Unzen in Japan^1. Two sources have been proposed for the energy that propels such 'Peléan' or 'Merapi'-type^2 pyroclastic flows: gravitational col-lapse (supplemented by heating and expansion of air) and sudden expansion of pressurized gases from inside the lava flow. If gravity controls the energy transfer, then areas likely to be affected can be predicted on the basis of topography^3, and the resulting deposits will bear a simple relationship to the part of the lava flow from which they issued. But if gas pressure adds a significant contribution, hazard assessment becomes more difficult because gas decompression adds velocities beyond those acquired by gravitational forces, putting much larger areas at risk and forming pyroclastic deposits that are much more difficult to relate to their source. Here we estimate the initial velocities of pyroclastic flows generated by dome disintegration for a range of lava compositions and volatile contents, and offer a conceptual framework for correlating the dynamics of dome-front collapse with the resulting sediment record. Our results indicate that explosive decompression at distal portions of domes can cause velocities comparable to gravitational collapse, especially in cases where volatiles become locally concentrated above equilibrium values.THE explosive eruption of Santorini volcano in the Aegean Sea about 3,300 years ago is of considerable archaeological and volcanological significance^1–5. Here we report the discovery of tephra from this Minoan event in laminated sediments of the Black Sea. This finding provides constraints on the distribution of debris from the eruption. We estimate a minimum fallout area of 2×l0^6 km^2 extending from the Black Sea in the north to the southeastern Mediterranean Sea. The main dispersal axis trends through southern Turkey, in agreement with other studies of Minoan tephra^6,7. The tephra deposits should provide a useful reference horizon for assessing the chronology of Black Sea sediments, which has been much debated^8–15.THE ^87Sr/^86Sr ratio of sea water has increased gradually over the past 40 Myr, suggesting a concomitant increase in global chemical weathering rates^1–6. Recently, Dia et al .^7 analysed a 250-kyr ^87Sr/^86Sr record, and found superimposed on this gradual increase higher-frequency ^87Sr/^86Sr variations which appeared to follow a 100-kyr cycle; this periodicity corresponds to one of the prominent cycles in the Earth's orbital parameters, which are known to modulate the patterns of solar insolation and hence climate^8–10. The resolution of this record was, however, insufficient to establish the phase relationship between the ^87Sr/^86Sr variations and global climate cycles. Here we present a high-resolution seawater ^87Sr/^86Sr record spanning the past 450 kyr. We find that maxima and minima in ^87Sr/^86Sr coincide with minima and maxima, respectively, in continental ice volume (from the SPECMAP oxygen isotope record^20), apparently suggesting that there was less chemical weathering in arid glacial periods than in the more humid interglacials. During glacial–interglacial transitions, however, seawater ^87Sr/^86Sr changes at a rate of ∼ 1 p.p.m. kyr^−1, approximately three times that evaluated by Dia et al .^7. Mass-balance calculations illustrate that simple changes in modern chemical weathering regimes cannot fully account for such rapid changes, suggesting that we need to revise current ideas about strontium reservoirs and the mechanisms for exchange between them.CARBON exhibits a unique ability to form a wide range of structures. In an inert atmosphere it condenses to form hollow, spheroidal fullerenes^1–4. Carbon deposited on the hot tip of the cathode of the arc-discharge apparatus used for bulk fullerene synthesis will form nested graphitic tubes and polyhedral particles^5–8. Electron irradiation of these nanotubes and polyhedra transforms them into nearly spherical carbon 'onions'^9. We now report that covaporizing carbon and cobalt in an arc generator leads to the formation of carbon nanotubes which all have very small diameters (about 1.2 nm) and walls only a single atomic layer thick. The tubes form a web-like deposit woven through the fullerene-containing soot, giving it a rubbery texture. The uniformity and single-layer structure of these nanotubes should make it possible to test their properties against theoretical predictions^10–13.CARBON nanotubes^1 are expected to have a wide variety of interesting properties. Capillarity in open tubes has already been demonstrated^2–5, while predictions regarding their electronic structure^6–8 and mechanical strength^9 remain to be tested. To examine the properties of these structures, one needs tubes with well defined morphologies, length, thickness and a number of concentric shells; but the normal carbon-arc synthesis^10,11 yields a range of tube types. In particular, most calculations have been concerned with single-shell tubes, whereas the carbon-arc synthesis produces almost entirely multi-shell tubes. Here we report the synthesis of abundant single-shell tubes with diameters of about one nanometre. Whereas the multi-shell nanotubes are formed on the carbon cathode, these single-shell tubes grow in the gas phase. Electron diffraction from a single tube allows us to confirm the helical arrangement of carbon hexagons deduced previously for multi-shell tubes^1.Hunger-striking is not an honourable way of influencing events, but an expression of frustration. Walter Stewart has given up his fast. His employers (the NIH) might better now be able to be conciliatory.President Clinton is heading for a fudge on his planned tax on fuels, likely to finish as a tax on gasoline only.The US project to build a space station is once again in trouble. The best solution is none of the alternatives presented last week to President Clinton, but a mechanism for true international participation.Government ministers everywhere need a crash course in understanding what science is all about.In situ measurements of stratospheric sulphate aerosol, reactive nitrogen and chlorine concentrations at middle latitudes confirm the importance of aerosol surface reactions that convert active nitrogen to a less active, reservoir form. This makes mid-latitude stratospheric ozone less vulnerable to active nitrogen and more vulnerable to chlorine species. The effect of aerosol reactions on active nitrogen depends on gas phase reaction rates, so that increases in aerosol concentration following volcanic eruptions will have only a limited effect on ozone depletion at these latitudes.World Inventory of Plutonium and Highly Enriched Uranium 1992. By David Albright, Frans Berkhout and William Walker.Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 246. £25, $39.95.Faith in a Seed: The Dispersion of Seeds and Other Late Natural History Writings by Henry Thoreau. Edited byB. P. Dean. Island: 1993. Pp. 283. $25.Möbius and his Band: Mathematics and Astronomy in Nineteenth-Century Germany. Edited by J. Fauvel, R. Flood and R. Wilson. Oxford University Press: 1993, Pp. 172. £19.50, $29.95.The Sexual Brain. BySimon LeVay.MIT Press: 1993. Pp. 168. $22.50, £14.95. UK publication date, 1 July.THE biological productivity of the oceans is sensitive to changes in climate, which can affect essential factors such as nutrient and light availability. In turn, ocean productivity may influence climate by regulating the partitioning of carbon dioxide, a greenhouse gas, between the ocean and the atmosphere. Investigators have attempted to link variations in atmospheric CO_2 content, recorded in ice cores^1,2, to the productivity of the Southern Ocean^3–6, but an unambiguous means of assessing past changes in ocean productivity has been lacking. Here we exploit established relationships between ^231Pa/^230Th ratios and particle flux^7–12 to infer, from the analysis of dated sediment cores, variability through time of fluxes of particulate biogenic material exported from surface waters. Records from two cores in the Atlantic sector of the Southern Ocean indicate that ocean productivity during glacial periods was lower than at present south of the Antarctic polar front, and support earlier conclusions^13–16 that the zone of maximum productivity migrated northwards during glacial conditions. Although further work at other sites is needed for an assessment of changes in total Antarctic productivity, our technique has the potential to provide this information while avoiding some of the limitations of other productivity proxies.A COMMON strategy for storage of solar energy involves the photoexcitation of a donor molecule D followed by electron transfer to an acceptor A. To exploit this strategy in a practical context, a way must be found to impede the back-reaction in which the electron is transferred from A to D (ref. 1). Previous attempts to achieve long-lived charge separation have involved the use of D–A combinations held in well defined geometries by spacer groups^2,3 or immobilized on supports such as porous media^4–12. Immobilization of the redox species poses problems, however, for their subsequent separation in order to reclaim the stored energy. Here we report a system that achieves efficient D–A electron transfer, a slow back-reaction and easy separation of the products. We trap the photosensitizer donor, trisbipyridine ruthenium(II), in the supercages of zeolite Y, and use as the acceptor a neutral, zwitter-ionic viologen in the surrounding solution. Electron transfer from the ruthenium centre to the viologen is mediated by N,N′ -tetramethylene-2,2′-bipyridinium ions loaded into the zeolite by ion exchange. Isolation of the donor within the zeolite from the acceptor in the solution outside makes the photochemically generated products easily accessible. Practical utilization of this trimolecular redox assembly will, however, require improvement of the quantum yield.LITTLE is known about the excited-state structures of most inorganic compounds. Time-resolved resonance Raman and time-resolved infrared spectroscopies can provide only indirect structural information for short-lived excited species in solution at room temperature. Time-resolved X-ray diffraction^1 has the potential to give more direct information, but no excited-state structures have yet been reported; picosecond gas-phase electron diffraction has been proposed recently^2, but not yet demonstrated. Here we report a technique that combines the X-ray absorption fine-structure (XAFS) method^3 with rapid-flow laser spectroscopy^4 to measure structural changes in a solution-phase excited-state transition-metal complex with microsecond resolution. We find that the triplet excited state of Pt_2(P_2O_5H_2)^4–_4, with a lifetime of about 4 µs undergoes a contraction in the Pt–Pt distance of 0.52 ±0.13 Å relative to the ground state. We anticipate that time-resolved XAFS will have broad applications in chemistry and biology.The Mitterrand government seems to be nearing its end, but the president himself may soldier on.THE compact non-thermal radio source at the Galactic Centre, known as Sgr A^*, may mark the location of a massive black hole^1,2. Here we present images of Sgr A^* with milliarcsecond resolution obtained by using five telescopes of the partially completed Very Long Baseline Array (VLBA) in conjunction with a few additional telescopes. The image of Sgr A^* at a wavelength of 3.6 cm confirms almost exactly the elliptical gaussian model that has been proposed on the basis of previous, more sparse data^3,4. The source size at 1.35 cm wavelength is 2.4±0.2 mas, similar to previous results^3,5. At both wavelengths, the radio source is smooth, without detectable fine structure. These observations, along with other recent results^6, support the suggestion^7 that the radio emission from Sgr A^* is strongly scattered by electron-density fluctuations along the line of sight. On the assumption^8 that the emission is due to a black hole accreting stellar winds from massive stars in the central 0.5 pc, the observations are consistent with a black-hole mass of ≁2x10^6 M _⊙A complementary DNA encoding an ATP-regulated potassium channel has been isolated by expression cloning from rat kidney. The predicted 45K protein, which features two potential membrane-spanning helices and a proposed ATP-binding domain, represents a major departure from the basic structural design characteristic of voltage-gated and second messenger-gated ion channels. But the presence of an H5 region, which is likely to form the ion conduction pathway, indicates that the protein may share a common origin with voltage-gated potassium channel proteins.Global Biodiversity: Status of the Earth's Living Resources. Edited by B. Groombridge. Chapman and Hall: 1992. Pp. 585. £30, $59.95. Conserving Biodiversity: A Research Agenda for Development Agencies. By The Board on Science and Technology for International Development, US National Research Council. National Academy Press: 1992. Pp. 127. $19.00 (pbk). Systematics, Ecology, and the Biodiversity Crisis. Edited by N. Eldredge. Columbia University Press: 1992. Pp. 220. $61.50.Humphry Davy: Science and Power. By David Knight. Blackwell: 1992. Pp. 218. £30. $29.95.Einstein's Dreams. By Alan Lightman. Pantheon/Bloomsbury: 1993. Pp. 179. $17, á£13.99.World Medicine: Plants, Patients and People. By David Bellamy Andrea Pfister. Blackwell: 1992. Pp. 456. £16.99, $24.95. Murder, Magic and Medicine. By John Mann. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 232. £16.95, $29.95.A surprising variety of phenotypes are associated with mutations in the retinal protein, peripherin, including the possible human equivalent of the murine rds (retinal degeneration slow) strain.Nature 360, 732-735 (1992) THE cat specimen featured on the cover of the issue of 24/31 December 1992, originally referred to Homotherium as detailed in the cover caption, was changed to Dinofelis sp. aff. piveteaui while the paper was in press. The cover shows the cranium listed as Dinofelis in Table 2 of this letter.Hopes that research would quickly yield a prophylaxis for AIDS, or possibly a cure, appear to be evaporating, together with the belief that infectious disease is historical only.The discovery of a Neolithic corpse in an alpine glacier in 1991 attracted widespread attention. What has happened in the eighteen months since then reflects badly on European science.Dreams of a Final Theory. By Steven Weinberg. Pantheon/Hutchinson: 1993. Pp. 260. $25, £16.99.The Scientific Traveler: A Guide to the People, Places and Institutions of Europe. By Charles Tanford and Jacqueline Reynolds. Wiley: 1992. Pp. 335. £10.95, $17.95 (pbk).Lorenzo's Oil. A film directed by George Miller. Written by Nick Enright and George Miller. Released by Universal: 1993.THE retinal fovea, which corresponds to the central degree or so of vision, is spatially over-represented in the visual cortex. It is about 0.01% of retina area, but at least 8% of the striate cortex^1–3. Does this simply reflect an equivalently uneven distribution of ganglion cells in the retina^4–7, or is the cortical representation of the fovea preferentially expanded^8–13? The answer hinges on the resolution of long-standing discrepancies between the retinal and cortical magnification factors. We approached the problem in a different way, using a retrograde transneuronal tracer from cortex to retina to relate directly the number of ganglion cells projecting to marked areas of striate cortex. We report here that ganglion cells near the fovea were allocated 3.3 to 5.9 times more cortical tissue than more peripheral ones, and conclude that the cortical representation of the most central retina is much greater than expected from the density of its ganglion cells.THERE is evidence that the potentially harmful solar ultraviolet-B (UV-B, 280–320 mm) radiation penetrates much deeper into the ocean's water column than previously thought^1,2. UV-B radiation is also responsible for photochemical degradation of refractory macromolecules into biologically labile organic compounds^3,4. It thus seems reasonable to assume that UV-B radiation might influence the cycling of organic matter in the sea, which is believed to be largely mediated by bacterioplankton^5. Here we report that bacterioplankton activity in the surface layers of the oceans is suppressed by solar radiation by about 40% in the top 5 m of the water column in nearshore waters, whereas in oligotrophic open oceans suppression might be detectable to a depth of >10 m. Bacterioplankton from near-surface (0.5 m depth) waters of a highly stratified water column were as sensitive to surface UV-B radiation as subpycnocline bacteria, indicating no adaptative mechanisms against surface solar radiation in near-surface bacterioplankton consortia. Surface solar radiation levels also photochemically degrade bacterial extracellular enzymes. Thus elevated UV-B radiation due to the destruction of the stratospheric ozone layer might lead to reduced bacterial activity and accompanying increased concentration of labile dissolved organic matter in the surface layers of the ocean as bacterial uptake of this is retarded.THE 1992 Nicaragua earthquake was a ‘tsunami earthquake‘; that is, it generated tsunamis^1 disproportionately large for its surface-wave magnitude, M _s. The moment magnitude, M _w, determined from long-period (∼250-s) surface waves^2, was 7.6, significantly larger than the 20-s M _s of 7; this M _s– M _w disparity is also characteristic of tsunami earthquakes^3,4. The Nicaragua earthquake is the first tsunami earthquake to be captured by modern broadband seismic networks, allowing us to present here seismograms of sufficiently high quality to make inferences about the rupture mechanisms. We conclude that the Nicaragua earthquake was a slow thrust earthquake which occurred on the subduction interface between the Cocos and North American plates, and because of the absence of sediments on the trench floor offshore of Nicaragua, the slip propagated up-dip all the way to the ocean bottom, exciting large tsunamis. The occurrence of slip on a plate interface filled with soft subducted sediments caused the rupture process to be slower than in ordinary subduction-zone thrust earthquakes. Our results reinforce the idea that tsunami warning systems using long-period (≥100-s) waves^5–7 are necessary to reduce the hazard from this type of earthquake.THE oxygen isotope composition of pre-Carboniferous (>360 Myr old) marine carbonates, cherts and phosphates has been reported^1–8 to be lower than that of later (post-Devonian) samples. According to one explanation^1,3, this is a reflection of warmer (generally ≥40°C) pre-Carboniferous oceans relative to modern oceans. Alternatively, it has been proposed^5,7 that the pre-Carboniferous oceans were depleted in ^18O (by 2‰ SMOW) relative to modern oceans. Here I report high δ^18O values (−1.9 to −2.9‰ PDB) in normal, shallow-marine limestones (and three brachiopod shells) from the Lower Devonian Haragan and Bois d'Arc formations in south-central Oklahoma. I interpret these values as near-primary, and therefore constraining the temperature and oxygen isotope composition of early Devonian sea water to 25±7 °C and 0±1‰ SMOW respectively. In conjunction with similarly high δ^18O values obtained from older (Ordovician and Silurian) samples^8, these results imply that the temperature and oxygen isotope composition of pre-Carboniferous oceans may, at least during some time intervals, have been similar to those of modern oceans.DURING periods of time when the Earth supports ice caps, sea level fluctuates periodically at intervals of 10^4–10^5 yr, with amplitudes of tens to more than 100 metres. These fluctuations result from expansions and contractions of continental ice sheets that occur in phase with the Milankovitch periodicities of the Earth's orbit^1,2. Smaller-amplitude sea-level fluctuations associated with Milankovitch periodicities are also evident during warm periods, such as the Late Triassic^3–5, which lack strong evidence for continental glaciation^6. We argue here that, in times of limited ice volume, periodic climate-induced changes in lake and groundwater storage have the potential to produce small fluctuations in sea level. This mechanism could contribute a small component of the sea-level change observed in the Quaternary period, and may dominate the Milankovitch eustatic sea-level signal during earlier periods with limited ice volume^6. We present evidence of contemporaneous Milankovitch periodicities in Late Triassic lake sediments^7 and sea-level fluctuation^3–5 which support the causal link between lake water storage and eustasy.A brief report of last week's meeting on the future of British science administration reveals differences of opinion that will not be easily bridged.OPTIMIZATION problems are common to many diverse disciplines. The classic example is the travelling-salesman problem^1,2, in which the objective is to find the shortest path connecting a number of cities. Spin glasses^3, meanwhile, exemplify a general class of systems subject to conflicting constraints: in this case, the impossibility of each spin in a lattice aligning favourably with all of its neighbours leads to 'frustration' and to a large number of local energy minima. The optimization problem then becomes the attempt to find the global minimum, or ground state. Predicting the conformational ground state of proteins^4 is closely allied to the spin-glass problem. The chief difficulty in searching for global minima is that straightforward search algorithms^1 tend to become trapped in local minima. Only a few promising approaches, such as simulated annealing^2 or genetic algorithms^5, exist. Here I present a general purpose Monte Carlo procedure in which local redirections of the search path are effected at all relevant length scales while enforcing a one-dimensional random walk in the function being minimized. This method yields a series of extrema, from which the global minimum can be extracted with high probability in the limit of large statistics.THE Solar System resides at the edge of a cavity of hot (10^6 K), low-density (5×10^−3 cm^−3), X-ray emitting gas embedded in the interstellar medium^1–4. This void, sometimes called the Local Bubble, is thought to be less than 10^7 years old, but its origin is unknown. Here we propose that the void was caused by the supernova that produced the Geminga pulsar. The initial identification^5 of Geminga as a pulsar, and the subsequent detection^6–8 of pulsations in high-energy γ-rays, give an age of 3×10^5 years and a pulsar distance in the range 40 to 400 pc (refs 6,7). Using this information, and the recently discovered^9,10 proper motion of a likely optical counterpart, we find that the supernova was well positioned to produce the local void, provided that the explosion occurred within about 60 pc of the Solar System. Larger distances are not excluded by our analysis, but they would put the supernova at a position for which there is no evidence for such an energy input.THE strong γ-ray source Geminga was first observed by the satellite SAS-2^1,2 and later seen by the COS-B satellite^3,4. An association with the peculiar X-ray source 1E0630 + 178 was proposed^5, suggesting that Geminga is a nearby neutron star (∼100 pc from Earth) which is not visible as a radio pulsar. Searches for its optical counterpart yielded as the best candidate a very faint ( m _v=25.5) object, G″, which was proposed on the basis of its colours^6–8. The association of Geminga with 1E0630+178 was confirmed recently by the discovery of a 237-ms periodicity in the soft X-ray emission^9 from the latter; such oscillations were recognized immediately afterwards in data^10 from the Gamma Ray Observatory, and in reanalysis of the COS-B^11 and SAS-2 data^12. As its timing and energy parameters indicated that Geminga is closer than 400 pc, Bignami and Caraveo suggested^11 that the proper motion of the optical counterpart G″ might be measurable. Here we compare a 1992 optical image of G″ with previous data from 1984 and 1987, and find that the proper motion is 0.17 arcsec per year. This motion is consistent with the identification of G″ as a neutron star at a distance of about 100 pc, thus confirming it as the optical counterpart of Geminga.The UK government finds itself in a tangle over energy policy. That reflects the Conservative party's own agenda in dealing with the coal and nuclear industries since it came to power in 1979.The London Zoo, in the nick of time, has found a recipe that may help it to survive. Let us hope it works.Britain's prime minister, Mr John Major, has much to learn from President Bill Clinton's State of the Union message last week, the differences between the two economies notwithstanding.Featured this week — an immunoglobulin binding protein, a chromosome enumeration system, a capillary electrophoresis system and columns, software, CD-ROMs and new product catalogues.All About Arthritis: Past, Present, Future. By Derrick Brewerton. Harvard University Press: 1992. Pp. 317. $29.95, £15.95.Magnetic bead capture utilizes biotin–streptavidin magnetic bead technology to isolate cDNAs rapidly from large genomic intervals, giving several thousand-fold enrichment of the selected cDNAs. The technique can allow parallel analysis of several large genomic segments of varying complexities and can be applied to the isolation of expressed sequences from various tissue sources.LIGAND-INDUCED allosteric changes in proteins are important in their cellular functions and regulation^1,2, and both concerted and sequential examples are known^3–5. The distinction has entailed elaborate analysis, however, and only a few systems have been unequivocally analysed. We have investigated the coupling between ATP usage and DNA transport by type II DNA topoisomerases^6,7, and one key question concerning allostery in these dyadic enzymes is whether ATP binding to one protomer can induce a concerted conformational change in the entire enzyme. Here we use an enzyme with one immunotagged subunit defective in ATP binding and one wild-type subunit to show that it can. Our approach should be generally applicable in the study of allostery and communication between members of a macromolecular assembly.EXPERIMENTS correlating template topology with transcriptional activity suggest that DNA topology plays a role in eukaryotic gene expression^1–4. Linear templates transfected into cultured cells produce far fewer transcripts than do circular transcription templates^3, and no transcripts can be detected from linear templates injected into Xenopus oocytes^1,2. Further, when transcriptionally active circular templates in Xenopus oocytes are linearized by injection of a restriction enzyme, transcription dramatically decreases. Here we show that transcription by phage T7 RNA polymerase from a divergent promoter can partially replace the requirement for circular Xenopus ribosomal RNA transcription templates in Xenopus oocytes. Supercoiled domains can apparently be generated on short pieces of DNA having no known sequences that result in association with the nuclear architecture, suggesting that localized, transient domains of supercoiling fulfil the minimum topological needs for Xenopus rRNA transcriptionTHE hepatitis B virus (HBV) transactivator protein HBx is enigmatic in that it stimulates a striking variety of promoters which do not share a common cis -regulatory element^1–5. As it does not bind to DNA^6,7, it has been speculated that HBx acts indirectly through cellular pathways^4,6–8. Under certain conditions HBx can have an oncogenic potential, which may be relevant for HBV-associated liver carcinogenesis^9–11, but until now the mechanism for transactivation and cell transformation by HBx was unclear. We report here that HBx uses a complex signal transduction pathway for transactivation. An increase in the endogenous protein kinase C (PKC) activator sn -l,2-diacylglycerol and the subsequent activation of PKC give rise to activation of the transcription factor AP-1 (Jun–Fos). As a result, HBx transactivates through binding sites for AP-1 and other PKC-dependent transcription factors (AP-2, NF-κB), thereby explaining the as-yet incomprehensible variety of HBx-inducible genes. As the PKC signal cascade also mediates cell transformation by tumour-promoting agents, the mechanism presented here might account for the oncogenic potential of HBx.LITTLE is known about virus–host cell interactions that regulate the lytic potential of viruses during productive replication. Sindbis virus (SV), a single-stranded positive-sense RNA virus in the alphavirus genus (family Togaviridae), results in lytic infection in most vertebrate cell lines, but persistent productive infection in post-mitotic neurons^1. The cellular oncogene bcl-2 , which encodes an inner mitochondrial membrane protein of M _r 26,000 (ref. 2), blocks programmed cell death (apoptosis) in neurons^3. We therefore investigated whether SV infection induces programmed cell death in non-neuronal cells, and if so, whether virus-induced programmed cell death can be blocked by transfection with bcl-2 . We demonstrate that SV infection of baby hamster kidney (BHK-2), mouse neuroblastoma (N18), and rat prostatic adenocarcinoma (AT-3) cells results in programmed cell death, whereas SV infection of bcl-2 -transfected AT-3 cells results in long-term persistent productive infection. Thus cellular bcl-2 oncogene expression plays a role in the establishment of persistent viral infection by blocking virus-induced programmed cell death.MEMBERS of the Ras superfamily of GTP-binding proteins are involved in a variety of cellular processes, including signal transduction, cytoskeletal organization and protein transport^1,2. GTP-binding proteins of the Ypt/Rab family direct vesicular protein transport in the secretory and endocytic pathways in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae (Ypt proteins) and in mammalian systems (Rab proteins)^3,4. The cellular activity of monomeric GTP-binding proteins is influenced by proteins that regulate GDP/GTP exchange and GTP hydrolysis^5. GTPase-activating proteins (GAPs) can increase the slow intrinsic GTPase activity of GTP-binding proteins by several orders of magnitude^6,7. As GAPs modulate the activity of GTP-binding proteins, they are thought to give a biochemical handle on the functioning of Ypt/Rab proteins in transport vesicle budding and docking or fusion at donor and acceptor membranes^1,2. We report here the first cloned GTPase-activating protein for the Ypt/Rab protein family. The gene, GYP6 (GAP of Ypt6 protein), encodes a protein of 458 amino acids which is highly specific for the Ypt6 protein and shows little or no cross-reactivity with other Ypt/Rab family members or with H-Ras p21.THE fate of the R7 photoreceptor cell in the Drosophila compound eye is established by a specific inductive interaction between the R8 photoreceptor neuron and the R7 precursor cell^1. This induction is mediated by two cell-surface proteins: the ligand, bride of sevenless^2 (boss), and sevenless (sev), a tyrosine-kinase receptor^3–5. The structure of boss is unique for a ligand of a tyrosine-kinase receptor. It contains a large extracellular domain, seven transmembrane segments, and a carboxy-terminal cytoplasmic tail^6,7. Here we report that: (1) boss activates tyrosine phosphorylation of the sev receptor; (2) the seven transmembrane domain of boss is necessary for its function; and (3) a soluble form of boss acts as an antagonist of the sev receptor both in vivo and in vitro .PHOSPHORYLATION of proteins catalysed by protein kinases is associated with central functions in growth and proliferation of the eukaryotic cell, and kinases are particularly important in the signal transduction pathways^1,2. Enterobacterial protein kinases are structurally and functionally different from eukaryotic protein kinases^3,4, and no prokaryotic kinase has so far been described implicating a direct role for this activity in virulence. Virulent Yersinia possess a common virulence plasmid that encodes a number of secreted proteins (Yops)^5–7, of which YopH has protein-tyrosine phosphatase activity with a key function in the block of phagocytosis by the pathogen^8–10. Here we report that the virulence plasmid of Yersinia pseudotuberculosis encodes a secreted protein kinase (YpkA) with extensive homology to eukaryotic Ser/Thr protein kinases^3,11. Specific mutants of ypkA resulted in avirulent strains. Thus, YpkA is, to our knowledge, the first reported prokaryotic secreted protein kinase involved in pathogenicity, presumably by interfering with the signal transduction pathways of the target cell.An unpromising argument that apes should forthwith be regarded as equal members with people of a single community deserves a wide hearing, not because it is likely to happen but because it is constructively provoking.The molecular basis for the little (lit) mouse phenotype, characterized by a hypoplastic anterior pituitary gland, is the mutation of a single nucleotide that alters Asp 60 to Gly in the growth hormone releasing factor receptor. Detailed analysis of the lit mouse anterior pituitary reveals spatially distinct proliferative zones of growth hormone-producing stem cells and mature somatotrophs, each regulated by a different trophic factor. This sequential growth factor requirement for a specific cell type may exemplify a common strategy for regulating cellular proliferation in other mammalian organs.Isotope and chemical analyses of the GRIP ice core from Summit, central Greenland, reveal that climate in Greenland during the last interglacial period was characterized by a series of severe cold periods, which began extremely rapidly and lasted from decades to centuries. As the last interglacial seems to have been slightly warmer than the present one, its unstable climate raises questions about the effects of future global warming.Chavin and the Origins of Andean Civilization. By Richard Burger. Thames and Hudson: 1992. Pp. 248. £38, $49.95.A Dancing Matrix: Voyages Along the Viral Frontier. ByRobin Marantz Henig R. Knopf: 1993. Pp. 269. $23.Proterozoic Crustal Evolution. Edited byK. C. Condie Elsevier: 1993. Pp. 537. DFL280, $175.The Tokyo summit may have put social science on the map, but its problems and their remedies still lie ahead.Britain's first Royal Commission in a decade is not destined to blunt criticism of British justice, but the importance it attaches to forensic evidence may point to a more effective remedy.Technical calculators, an automated colony picking robot, a new thermostable DNA polymerase, a cell culture system for smooth muscle cells and a software program for drawing family trees are included in this week's line-up.DURING the production process the top and bottom panels of Fig. 3 in this letter were accidentally switched. The correct figure is shown below; the legend remains the same.MUTATIONS in the period gene product (PER) can shorten or lengthen the circadian rhythms of Drosophila melanogaster ^1, but its biochemical activity has not been established. PER contains a motif of ∼2070 amino acids whose function is unknown (termed PAS2) and which is also present in three transcription factors of the basic–helix–loop–helix (bHLH) type, in the D. melanogaster single-minded gene product (SIM)^2, and in both subunits of the mammalian dioxin receptor complex^3,4,28. We show here that the PER PAS functions in vitro as a novel protein dimerization motif and that it can mediate associations between different members of the PAS protein family. The dimerization efficiency is decreased by several missense mutations in the PAS domain, including the original per ^L mutation, which lengthens circadian periods from 24 h to 29 h (ref. 1). The results indicate that the PAS domain may function as a dimerization domain in both SIM and the dioxin receptor complex, and that PER may regulate circadian gene transcription partly by interacting with the PAS domain of bHLH–PAS-containing transcription factors.ALTHOUGH genetic^1 and biochemical^2,3 evidence has established that GroES is required for the full function of the molecular chaperone, GroEL, little is known about the molecular details of their interaction. GroES enhances the cooperativity of ATP binding and hydrolysis by GroEL (refs 4, 5) and is necessary for release and folding of several GroEL substrates^6. Here we report that native GroES has a highly mobile and accessible polypeptide loop whose mobility and accessibility are lost upon formation of the GroES/GroEL complex. In addition, lesions present in eight independently isolated mutant groES alleles map in the mobile loop. Studies with synthetic peptides suggest that the loop binds in a hairpin conformation at a site on GroEL that is distinct from the substrate-binding site. Flexibility may be required in the mobile loops on the GroES seven-mer to allow them to bind simultaneously to sites on seven GroEL subunits, which may themselves be able to adopt different arrangements, and thus to modulate allosterically GroEL/substrate affinity.HEAT shock factor (HSF)^1,2, the transcriptional activator of eukaryotic heat shock genes, is induced to bind DNA by a monomer to trimer transition involving leucine zipper interactions^3,4. Although this mode of regulation is shared among many eukaryotic species, there is variation in the temperature at which HSF binding activity is induced. We investigated the basis of this variation by analysing the response of a human HSF expressed in Drosophila cells and Drosophila HSF expressed in human cells. We report here that the temperature that induces DNA binding and trimerization of human HSF in Drosophila was decreased by ∼10 °C to the induction temperature for the host cell, whereas Drosophila HSF expressed in human cells was constitutively active. The results indicate that the activity of HSF in vivo is not a simple function of the absolute environmental temperature.THE kinase Raf-1 can be activated by treatment of cells with mitogens and by the protein kinase C (PKC) activator 12- 0 -tetradecanoyl-phorbol-13-acetate (TPA) (reviewed in refs 1,2). Activated Raf-1 triggers a protein kinase cascade by direct phosphorylation of MAP kinase kinase^3–5, resulting in phosphorylation of ternary complex factor^6 and Jim^7,8 by MAP kinase. Here we investigate the molecular mechanism and biological consequences of PKCα-mediated Raf-1 activation in NIH3T^3 fibroblasts. PKCα directly phosphorylates and activates Raf-1 both in vitro and in vivo . PKCα induces Raf-1 phosphorylation at several sites, including a serine residue at position 499. Mutation of serine at this position or at residue 259 does not abrogate Raf-1 stimulation by a combination of Ras plus the src tyrosine kinase Lck, but severely impedes Raf-1 activation by PKCα. Consistent with such a direct interaction is the observation that Raf-1 and PKCα cooperate in the transformation of NIH3T3 cells. The Ser499 phosphorylation site is necessary for this synergism.PLANTS are exposed to many potentially phytotoxic foreign compounds, such as microbial toxins and agrochemicals (xenobiotics). Detoxification and elimination of these compounds within or from the cell is a prerequisite for their survival. Metabolism and detoxification of xenobiotics are remarkably similar in plants and animals and can generally be divided into three phases^1,2. In the first phase, a foreign compound may be oxidized, reduced or hydrolysed to introduce or reveal a functional group. In a second step, the activated xenobiotic is conjugated to either glutathione, glucuronate (animals), or malonyl or glucosyl moieties (plants) by the respective transferases. In animals the third step, excretion of conjugated xenobiotics to the extracellular medium, is mediated by a specific ATPase^1,3–5. In plants, instead of excretion, conjugates of xenobiotics appear to be stored in the large central vacuole^6, but it is not known how they are transported into this organelle. We show here that glutathione S -conjugate uptake into the vacuole is mediated by a specific ATPase which is remarkably similar to the glutathione S -conjugate export pumps in the canalicular membrane of mammalian liver.ALTHOUGH the cause of multiple sclerosis (MS) is unknown, it is thought to involve a T cell-mediated autoimmune mechanism. Susceptibility to the disease is influenced by genetic factors such as genes of the HLA and T-cell receptor (TCR) complex^1–6. Other evidence for a genetic influence includes the low incidence in certain ethnic groups^7, the increased risk if there are affected family members^8 and the increased concordance rate for disease in monozygotic twin pairs (26%)^9, compared to dizygotic twins. Epidemiological studies indicate that there may be an additional role for environmental factors. Although the target antigen(s) are not yet identified, several myelin or myelin-associated proteins have been suspected^10–12, among them myelin basic protein. A lack of genetically comparable controls has impaired the analysis of the T-cell response in MS patients and caused disagreement on TCR usage in the disease^13–15. Here we analyse the role of TCR genes in MS by comparing TCR usage in discordant versus concordant monozygotic twins in response to self and foreign antigens. We find that after stimulation with myelin basic protein or tetanus toxoid, control twin sets as well as concordant twin sets select similar Vα chains. Only the discordant twin sets select different TCRs after stimulation with antigens. Thus exogenous factors or the disease shape the TCR repertoire in MS patients, as seen by comparison with unaffected genetically identical individuals. This skewing of the TCR repertoire could contribute to the pathogenesis of MS and other T-cell-mediated diseases.THE force of contraction of motor units in skeletal muscle is graded by changing the discharge rate of motor neurons^1, and cytosolic calcium transients are similarly increased^2. During single twitches, contraction is not dependent on extracellular calcium^3, and L-type Ca^2+ channels may only function as voltage sensors for initiating Ca^2+ release from the sarcoplasmic reticulum^4–6. In contrast, forceful tetanic contractions triggered by action potentials at high frequency (20 to 200 Hz) are dependent on extracellular Ca^2+ concentration and sensitive to L-type Ca^2+ channel antagonists^7–9, but the mechanism of regulation of contractile force is unknown. Here we report a large, voltage- and frequency-dependent potentiation of skeletal muscle L-type Ca^2+ currents by trains of high-frequency depolarizing prepulses, which is caused by a shift in the voltage-dependence of channel activation to more negative membrane potentials and requires phosphorylation by cyclic AMP-dependent protein kinase in a voltage-dependent manner. This potentiation would substantially increase Ca^2+ influx and contractile force in skeletal muscle fibres in response to tetanic stimuli.A FUNDAMENTAL attribute of the vertebrate visual system is the segregation of ON and OFF pathways signalling increments and decrements of light^1–4. In the mature retina, dendrites of ON- and OFF-centre retinal ganglion cells (RGCs) stratify in different sublaminae of the inner plexiform layer (IPL), and are differentially innervated by two types of bipolar cells which depolarize and hyperpolarize on exposure to light^5–10. This stratification of ON and OFF RGCs is achieved by the gradual restriction of their dendrites which ramify throughout the IPL early in development^11–14. The factors underlying this regressive event are unknown. Dendritic stratification occurs around the time that bipolar cells form synapses in the IPL^15,16, which raises the possibility that synaptic activity is involved in this process. Here we test this hypothesis by treating the developing cat retina with the glutamate analogue 2-amino-4-phosphonobutyric acid (APR), which hyper-polarizes ON cone bipolar and rod bipolar cells, thereby preventing their release of glutamate^17–19. We report that intraocular injection of APB during the period when dendritic stratification normally occurs prevents the formation of structurally segregated ON and OFF retinal pathways. These results provide evidence that glutamate-mediated afferent activity regulates the remodelling of RGC dendrites during development.SPATIAL and temporal variations in biological diversity can be shaped by a variety of dynamical interactions between origination and extinction^1–3. For this reason, the evolutionary basis of the latitudinal diversity gradient—with the tropics extraordinarily rich in species, higher taxa and evolutionary novelties—has been much debated^4–8. High origination rates with the tropics operating as a diversity pump^8–11, low extinction rates with the tropics operating as a diversity accumulator^12–15, or some combination of the two^16–18, have all been proposed to explain the wealth of higher taxa and morphological variety in low latitudes. Few historical data have been available, however, to test directly whether the tropics are 'a cradle or a museum'^15,19. A new palaeontological analysis of post-Palaeozoic marine orders shows significantly more first appearances in tropical waters, whether defined latitudinally or biogeographically, than expected from sampling alone. This provides direct evidence that tropical regions have been a major source of evolutionary novelty, and not simply a refuge that accumulated diversity owing to low extinction rates.GEODETIC data, obtained by ground- or space-based techniques, can be used to infer the distribution of slip on a fault that has ruptured in an earthquake. Although most geodetic techniques require a surveyed network to be in place before the earthquake^1–3, satellite images, when collected at regular intervals, can capture co-seismic displacements without advance knowledge of the earthquake's location. Synthetic aperture radar (SAR) interferometry, first introduced^4 in 1974 for topographic mapping^5–8 can also be used to detect changes in the ground surface, by removing the signal from the topography^9,10. Here we use SAR interferometry to capture the movements produced by the 1992 earthquake in Landers, California^11. We construct an interferogram by combining topographic information with SAR images obtained by the ERS-1 satellite before and after the earthquake. The observed changes in range from the ground surface to the satellite agree well with the slip measured in the field, with the displacements measured by surveying, and with the results of an elastic dislocation model. As a geodetic tool, the SAR interferogram provides a denser spatial sampling (100 m per pixel) than surveying methods^1–3 and a better precision (∼3 cm) than previous space imaging techniques^12,13.TURBIDITY currents transport massive amounts of sediment from continental margins to the deep sea. Individual flows can catastrophically remove and redeposit (as turbidites) many hundreds of cubic kilometres of material^1,2, with the larger events reaching the bottom of the continental slope to form the abyssal plains^3. Here we show that the age range of sediments in individual turbidites can be used directly to estimate both the thickness of failed sediment in the source region (even when its exact location is unknown) and the extent to which the turbidity current caused erosion of the sea bed. Our method involves the comparison of the abundance ratios of microfossil (coccolith) species in turbidites with those in the ocean margin sediments of the source region. Analysis of a recently emplaced turbidite on the Madeira Abyssal Plain shows that it contains a mixture of sediments with an age range of about 200,000 years, equivalent to the failure of a block of sediment about 15 m deep. Radiocarbon dating and coccolith ratios show that the turbidite contains only about 12% of recent, near-surface sediment, indicating that this turbidity current caused surprisingly little erosion en route.PORPHYRINS, which are present in most sediments and crude oils, represent the 'molecular fossils' of compounds such as chlorophylls, bacteriochlorophylls and haems in the organisms from which the organic material is derived^1–4. They have the potential to provide information about palaeoenvironmental conditions at the time of deposition^5–9. Porphyrins derived from degradation of chlorophylls are of particular interest because of the possibility of relating palaeoproductivity estimates from sediments to chlorophyll-based measurements of present-day productivity determined by remote sensing. But standard analytical methods do not detect all of the porphyrins present in a geological sample — a substantial fraction of the porphyrins may be bound to kerogen^10,11 or to solvent-extractable macromolecules, or may be degraded by the oxidative extraction procedures. It has been shown recently^12–16 that sulphur may play a crucial part in binding 'biomarker' molecules at an early stage of sediment diagenesis, and that desulphurization using Raney nickel may liberate small molecules bound to sulphur-containing species. Here we show that this approach releases large amounts of porphyrins from the total organic extract of a sulphur-rich marl. Liberating bound porphyrins in this way may greatly enhance the amount of information on palaeoenvironments that can be extracted from geochemical analysis of sediments.RAISED-FIELD agriculture was widespread throughout Central and South America in prehispanic times^1,2. In this system of agriculture, crops are cultivated on a series of raised beds, which are separated from one another by deep, water-filled channels. In some regions, rehabilitation of the raised fields is now underway, largely because this practice leads to fertile soils, adequate water supply and protection from frost and therefore to substantially higher yields than more conventional methods^3,4. Here we report analyses of water quality in the channels alongside rehabilitated raised fields in the vicinity of Tiwanaku, on the Bolivian side of the Lake Titicaca basin (Fig. 1). We find that high concentrations of nitrate, available phosphate and turbidity decline significantly as the water flows through the raised-field channels. Water flowing through control sites shows no significant change.Retention of nutrients and suspended sediments in the channels helps to maintain soil fertility and reduces pollution of downstream waters. Thus it seems there are environmental benefits in rehabilitating raised fields, which complement and help sustain the economic benefits demonstrated previously^3,4.THE recent discoveries of superconductivity at 94 K in the single-CuO_2-layer compound HgBa_2CuO_4+ x (Hg-1201)^1 and at 133 K in its two- and three-copper-layer analogues^2 (Hg-1212 and Hg-1223) have renewed interest in the search for new high-transition-temperature (high- T _c) superconductors. But whatever the T _c, high values of intergrain critical current density are required for large-scale applications; thus, the material must have good electromagnetic connectivity between grains (it must not be electromagnetically granular) and it should be able to maintain its current-carrying capacity in high magnetic fields (it should have a high irreversibility field, H ^*( T )). Putilin et al .^1 surmised that the small CuO_2 layer spacing of Hg-1201 might yield a high H ^*( T ). We report here that H ^*( T ) is indeed significantly higher than for the two- and three-copper-layer Bi–Sr–Ca–Cu–O compounds (Bi-2212 and Bi-2223), but lower than for YBa_2Cu_3O_7 (Y-123). The low-temperature flux pinning is also strong. Like Y-123, however, Hg-1201 is electromagnetically granular. A high degree of grain alignment will probably be necessary to remove this granularity; by analogy with the bismuth compounds, this is likely to be easier if the two-mercury-layer counterparts of Bi-22XY (Hg-2201, -2212 or -2223) can be synthesized.PULSARS—rapidly spinning, highly magnetized neutron stars—are thought to lose their rotational energy through the emission of relativistic particles^1,2. As the typical lifetime of a pulsar greatly exceeds that of the remnant of the supernova explosion in which it was born, the relativistic wind from older pulsars should interact directly with the interstellar medium; this can give rise to observable pulsar-wind nebulae^3. Here we report the detection by the X-ray satellite Rosat of a different type of nebula, associated with the nearby pulsar PSR1929 + 10. The nebula appears as a linear diffuse X-ray feature in the direction opposite to the pulsar's proper motion. In this case, the pulsar wind appears to be confined by the ram-pressure arising from the high velocity of the pulsar through the interstellar medium, resulting in a trail of relativistic electrons with enhanced emissions of synchrotron radiation. Many such nebulae may exist in the solar neighbourhood, but they will be difficult to detect except in those relatively rare cases where the trails point nearly towards us.A novel genetic selection in yeast has been used to isolate a complementary DNA for the transcriptional activator, Olf-1, which binds to the regulatory sequences of several olfactory-specific genes. The Olf-1 protein, expressed exclusively in the olfactory receptor neurons and their precursors, contains a new helix–loop–helix motif and functions as an apparent homodimer. Olf-1 may be the first member of a family of related proteins that may direct cellular differentiation in a variety of neuronal tissues.The opinion that genome sequencing will create novel ethical problems is mistaken; the techniques are hardly novel, and are unlikely to be more troublesome than those of the genetic manipulation of bacteria twenty years ago.Britain's scheme for caring for as many as possible of its indigent population has made a poor start.A detailed seismological study of the mantle beneath the Bowie hotspot, west of Canada, reveals a zone of low seismic velocities. The anomaly, probed at a depth of ∼700 km, adds a delay of 0.15 s to the travel times of seismic waves traversing a region ∼150 km in diameter, located ∼150 km away from the vertical projection of the Bowie seamount. This observation suggests that a mantle plume is present in the lower mantle beneath Bowie, with the amplitude of the anomaly implying a temperature contrast of about ∼300 K.Operation Epsilon: The Farm Hall Transcripts. Institute of Physics Publishing: 1993. Pp. 313. £14.95. US distributor, University of California Press.The Language of the Genes: Biology, History and the Evolutionary Future. By Steve Jones. HarperCollins: 1993. Pp. 251. £16.99. To be published in the United States later this year by Doubleday.Schools for Thought: A Science of Learning in the Classroom. By John T. Bruer. MIT Press: 1993. Pp. 324. $29.95, £26.95.A View to a Death in the Morning: Hunting and Nature Through History. By Matt Cartmill. Harvard University Press: 1993. Pp. 331. $29.95, £23.95.President Bill Clinton is with the angels in extending the suspension of nuclear tests. The hope now is that a test-ban will follow. But the model of 1979 is not a good model.ELUCIDATION of the molecular contacts between actin and myosin is central to understanding the force-generating process in muscle and other cells. Actin, a highly conserved globular protein found in all eukaryotes, polymerizes into filaments (F-actin) for most of its biological functions. Myosins, which are more diverse in sequence, share a conserved globular head of about 900 amino acids in length (subfragment-1 or S1) at the N-terminal end of the molecule. S1 contains all the elements necessary for mechano-chemical force transduction in vitro ^1,2. Here we report an atomic model for the actomyosin complex produced by combining the atomic X-ray structure of F-actin^3,4 and chicken myosin S1^5 with a three-dimensional reconstruction from electron micrographs of frozen-hydrated F-actin decorated with recombinant Dictyostelium myosin S1. The accuracy of the reconstruction shows the position of actin and myosin molecules unambiguously.THE cold-shock domain (CSD) is found in many eukaryotic transcriptional factors and is responsible for the specific binding to DNA of a cis -element called the Y-box^1–3. The same domain exists in the sequence of the Xenopus RNA-binding proteins FRG Y_1, and FRG Y_2 (refs 1, 3). The major cold-shock proteins of Escherichia coli (CS7.4)^4–7 and B. subtilis (CspB)^8 have sequences that are more than 40 per cent identical to the cold-shock domain. We present here the three-dimensional structure of CspB determined by nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy. The 67-residue protein consists of an antiparallel five-stranded β -barrel with strands connected by turns and loops. The structure resembles that of staphylococcal nuclease and the gene-5 single-stranded-DNA-binding protein^9–11. A three-stranded β -sheet, which contains the conserved RNA-binding motif RNP1 as well as a motif similar to RNP2 in two neighbouring antiparallel β -strands^12–14, has basic and aromatic residues at its surface which could serve as a binding site for single-stranded DNA. CspB binds to single-stranded DNA in gel retardation experiments.THE cold-shock response in both Escherichia coli and Bacillus subtilis is induced by an abrupt downshift in growth temperature. It leads to the increased production of the major cold-shock proteins, CS7.4 and CspB, respectively^1–3. CS7.4 is a transcriptional activator of two genes^4,5. CS7.4 and CspB share 43 per cent sequence identity with the nucleic acid-binding domain of the eukaryotic gene-regulatory Y-box factors^6. This cold-shock domain is conserved from bacteria to man^7 and contains the RNA-binding RNP1 sequence motif^8. As a prototype of the cold-shock domain, the structure of CspB has been determined here from two crystal forms. In both, CspB is present as an antiparallel five-stranded β -barrel. Three consecutive β -strands, the central one containing the RNP1 motif, create a surface rich in aromatic and basic residues that are presumably involved in nucleic acid binding. Preferential binding of CspB to single-stranded DNA is observed in gel retardation experiments.THE plant hormone auxin has a central role in many aspects of plant growth and development^1,2. By screening for mutants of Arabidopsis that are resistant to exogenous auxin, we have identified several genes that are required for normal auxin response^3. One of these genes, AXR1 , is defined by recessive mutations that confer auxin resistance to the roots, rosettes and inflorescences of mutant plants^4–6. In addition, axr1 mutants display a variety of morphological defects that are consistent with a reduction in auxin sensitivity^5. Here we isolate the AXR1 gene using a map-based approach and report that AXR1 encodes a new protein with significant sequence similarity to the ubiquitin-activating enzyme E1. The AXR1 protein is highly diverged from previously characterized E1 enzymes, however, and lacks a key cysteine residue that is essential for E1 activity^7. AXR1 may therefore define a new class of enzymes in the ubiquitin pathway or it may have a novel function in cellular regulation which is unrelated to ubiquitin conjugation.CDS^+ cytolytic T lymphocytes (CTL) identify virally infected cells by recognizing processed viral antigen in association with class I major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules on infected cells^1–4. Processing begins in the cytosol^5–7 with the generation of peptides, possibly by a protease complex with MHC-encoded subunits, known as the proteasome^8–11. Transport of the resulting cytosolic peptides into the endoplasmic reticulum for association with class I molecules is essential and probably involves a heterodimer of the MHC-encoded proteins, Tap-1 and Tap-2^12–17. The site of processing of viral envelope proteins is uncertain. These proteins are not present in the cytosol because of cotranslational translocation into the endoplasmic reticulum. We show here that the HIV-1 envelope (env) protein is processed in infected cells by a novel Tap-l/Tap-2-independent pathway that seems to be localized to the endoplasmic reticulum.ENDOGENOUS superantigens are encoded by the open reading frame contained within the mouse mammary tumour virus long terminal repeat (MMTV LTR). Superantigen expression results in T-cell proliferation and, during early ontogeny, T-cell deletion^1,2. Here we identify a novel promoter located upstream of the previously described MMTV promoter. Transcripts from this promoter initiate within the U3 region of the MMTV LTR and splice to the acceptor for endogenous superantigen coding region. The novel U3 promoter is active in B lymphocytes, which are cognate antigen-presenting cells for endogenous superantigen, and is able to direct expression of superantigen in the absence of the previously described MMTV promoter.STAPHYLOCOCCAL enterotoxin A (SEA), one of the most potent T-cell mitogens known, has been classified as a bacterial superantigen on the basis of ability to stimulate Vβ-specific T-cell subsets^1. SEA interacts with class II major histocompatibility complex (MHC) antigens on antigen-presenting cells and the T-cell antigen receptor (TCR) on T cells^2–4, resulting in a ternary complex of MHC–SEA–TCR. Mis antigens are known to be products of mouse mammary tumour virus (MMTV)^5,6, and it has been reported that two exogenous strains of MMTV encode retroviral superantigens in the open reading frames of the 3′ long terminal repeat of the viral genome^7,8; however, no binding of the putative MMTV superantigen to either MHC antigens or TCR has been demonstrated. Here we use synthetic peptides to identify a site on the MMTV-1 superantigen that binds to class II MHC antigens. The site is encompassed by amino-acid residues 76–119 of the MMTV-1 superantigen. Direct binding and competition experiments show that the MMTV superantigen and SEA bind to at least one common region on class II MHC antigens.The well-known inconvenience that a measurement on a quantum system will not leave it unchanged can be circumvented by turning a photon stream into an electrical current and then back again.Still in shock from sepsis, biotechnology now has to face healthcare Clinton-style. But research in biotechnology is on the increase as its products surge towards the markets.Product launches for the autumn season include a culture system for human bronchial/trachial epithelial cells and a new peristaltic pumping system.A comparison has been made between manual and automated DNA sequencing procedures to evaluate the ability to distinguish mixtures of wild-type and mutant sequences. Quantitative detection of such mixtures of HIV-1 drug resistance mutations was best achieved using an automated system that uses fluorescent-labelled sequencing primers. This procedure has a wide range of applications in clinical research, including heterozygote analysis. Software that automatically reports mixed-base positions is presented.PERMISSIVENESS of the host cell to productive infection by onco-retroviruses is cell-cycle dependent^1, and nuclear localization of viral nucleoprotein preintegration complexes will occur only after cells have passed through mitosis^2. In contrast, establishment of an integrated provirus after infection by the lentivirus HIV-1 is independent of host cell proliferation^3–5. The ability of HIV-1 to replicate in non-dividing cells is partly accounted for by the kary-ophilic properties of the viral preintegration complex which, after virus infection, is actively transported to the host cell nucleus. Here we report that the gag matrix protein of HIV-1 contains a nuclear localization sequence which, when conjugated to a heterologous protein, directs its nuclear import. In addition, HIV-1 mutants containing amino-acid substitutions in this nuclear localization signal integrate and replicate within dividing but not growth-arrested cells, and thus display a phenotype more representative of an onco-retrovirus.THE molecular chaperone proteins, particularly Hsp60 and Hsp70, have been implicated in essential cell functions under both normal and stress conditions (reviewed in refs 1–5). Members of the family of heat-shock proteins of M _r70K, Hsp70, bind to unfolded proteins and short peptides^6–13. Addition of Mg–ATP results in the dissociation of the substrate polypeptides from the chaperone^7–11, but as ATP-γS (an ATP analogue that is only slowly hydrolysable) cannot substitute for ATP in this reaction^7,9,11, it has been concluded that ATP hydrolysis is necessary to dissociate Hsp70–substrate protein complexes. By independently measuring the rates of ATP hydrolysis and substrate protein dissociation, we show here that Mg–ATP binding but not Mg–ATP hydrolysis is essential for substrate dissociation. We also show that there is an absolute requirement for K^+for the effect of Mg–ATP: only the combination of K^+ and Mg–ATP will cause the conformational change in HspTO that is necessary for substrate dissociation. Moreover, in the absence of K^+, Mg–ATP favours complex formation. We consider these results in terms of a G-protein-like model.TWO cytosolic fractions (A and B) from Xenopus oocytes are sufficient to support protein import into the nuclei of digitonin-permeabilized cells^1. Fraction A recognizes the nuclear localization sequence (NLS) and binds the import substrate to the nuclear envelope, whereas fraction B mediates the subsequent passage of the bound substrate into the nucleus. Here we report that two interacting components are required for full fraction-B activity, purify one of these components to homogeneity, and show that it is the highly abundant GTP-binding protein Ran (Ras-related nuclear protein)/TC4.THE Na ^+ /Ca^2 + exchanger, driven by a transmembrane Na^+ gradient, plays a key role in regulating Ca^2+concentration in many cells1'2. Although the exchanger influences Ca^2+concentration, its activity in smooth muscle appears to be closely coupled to Ca^2+ availability from intracellular stores^3. This linkage might result if the exchanger were positioned close to Ca^2+storage sites within the sarcoplasmic reticulum. To test this hypothesis we have developed methods to assess the relative three-dimensional distribution of proteins involved in Na^+/K^+ pumping, Na^+/Ca^2+exchange, Ca^2+ storage within the sarcoplasmic reticulum, and attachment of contractile filaments to the membrane in smooth muscle. Here we report that the Na^+ /Ca^2 + exchanger is largely co-distributed with the Na^+/K^+ pump on unique regions of the plasma membrane in register with, and close to, calsequestrin-containing regions of the sarcoplasmic reticulum in sites distinct from the sites where contractile filaments attach to the membrane. This molecular organization suggests that the plasma membrane is divided into at least two functional domains, and appear to provide a mechanism for the strong linkage seen in smooth muscle between Na^+/K^+ pumping and Na^+/Ca^2+exchange, and between Na^+/Ca^2+ exchange and Ca^2 + release from the sarcoplasmic reticulum^4–7.RE-ESTABLISHING blood flow to ischaemic tissues causes greater injury than that induced during the ischaemic period^1,2. This type of tissue injury, reperfusion injury, is involved in frostbite, multiple organ failure after hypovolaemia and in myocardial infarction^1. Depletion of neutrophils alleviates reperfusion injury, implying a causal role of neutrophil infiltration^3,4. Among members of the recently discovered family of chemotactic cytokines (chemo-kines)^5–8, interleukin-8 (IL-8)^5,9–13 is a major neutrophil chemotactic and activating factor produced by various types of human cells. We investigated its pathophysiological role in a rabbit model of a lung reperfusion injury. Reperfusion of ischaemic lung caused neutrophil infiltration and destruction of pulmonary structure, as well as local production of IL-8. Furthermore, the administration of a neutralizing monoclonal antibody against IL-8 prevented neutrophil infiltration and tissue injury, proving a causal role of locally produced IL-8 in this model.FAMILIAL male precocious puberty (FMPP) is a gonadotropin-independent disorder that is inherited in an autosomal dominant, male-limited pattern^1–5. Affected males generally exhibit signs of puberty by age 4. Testosterone production and Ley dig cell hyper-plasia occur in the context of prepubertal levels of luteinizing hormone (LH)^3–5. The LH receptor is a member of the family of G-protein-coupled receptors^6,7, and we hypothesized that FMPP might be due to a mutant receptor that is activated in the presence of little or no agonist^8–12. A single A → G base change that results in substitution of glycine for aspartate at position 578 in the sixth transmembrane helix of the LH receptor was found in affected individuals from eight different families. Linkage of the mutation to FMPP was supported by restriction-digest analysis. COS-7 cells expressing the mutant LH receptor exhibited markedly increased cyclic AMP production in the absence of agonist, suggesting that autonomous Leydig cell activity in FMPP is caused by a constitutively activated LH receptor.The British government's plans for law and order are potentially calamitous.UNDERSTANDING genetic evolution within species requires an accurate description of variation within and between populations and the ability to distinguish between the potential causes of an observed distribution of variation. In the cosmopolitan species Drosophila melanogaster , previous studies suggested that gene flow within and between continents is extensive^1 and that most of the nuclear gene variation is found within, rather than among, populations2,3. Here we present evidence that a population from Zimbabwe is more than twice as variable as those from the United States of America at the DNA sequence level, that most variants are not shared between the two geographic regions, and that there are nearly fixed differences between the Zimbabwe and USA samples in genomic regions experiencing low recombination rates. It appears that there is an unappreciated degree of population structure in D. melanogaster and that equilibrium models of molecular evolution are inappropriate for this species.MONOGAMOUS social organization is characterized by selective affiliation with a partner, high levels of paternal behaviour and, in many species, intense aggression towards strangers for defence of territory, nest and mate^1,2. Although much has been written about the evolutionary causes of monogamy, little is known about the proximate mechanisms for pair bonding in monogamous mammals^2,3. The prairie vole, Microtus ochrogaster , is a monogamous, biparental rodent which exhibits long-term pair bonds characterized by selective affiliation (partner preference) and aggression^4,5. Here we describe the rapid development of both selective aggression and partner preferences following mating in the male of this species. We hypothesized that either argininevasopressin (AVP) or oxytocin (OT), two nine-amino-acid neuropeptides with diverse forebrain projections, could mediate the development of selective aggression and affiliation. This hypothesis was based on the following observations: (1) monogamous and polygamous voles differ specifically in the distribution of forebrain AVP and OT receptors^6,7; (2) AVP innervation in the prairie vole brain is sexually dimorphic and important for paternal behaviour^8; (3) central AVP pathways have been previously implicated in territorial displays and social memory^9,10; and (4) central OT pathways have been previously implicated in affiliative behaviours^11. We now demonstrate that central AVP is both necessary and sufficient for selective aggression and partner preference formation, two critical features of pair bonding in the monogamous prairie vole.THE origin and early evolution of the great ape/human clade (Hominidae) is currently a subject of debate^1–3. The controversy is fuelled by the fragmentary nature of the fossils which renders it difficult to determine clearly derived features that permit the recognition of fossil members of this clade. We report here the recent discovery of a facial skeleton and a temporal fragment with the petrosal bone of Dryopithecus laietanus , which provides a way out of an impasse. The lack of the fossa subarcuata is a great ape and human clade synapomorphy, and proves unequivocally that Dryopithecus belongs to this clade. The zygomatic possesses derived characters which reveal that Dryopithecus is related to the Ponginae and not to the African apes/humans, as recently suggested^1. The remaining morphological features are plesiomorphic and thus provide a good model of a common ancestor of all Hominidae.IN view of its relatively small size (one-third the radius of the outer core), many geodynamo models neglect the inner core entirely^1, or otherwise treat it as a non-conducting insulator^2,3. In a previous steady-state model^4, we considered some effects of a finitely conducting inner core, in particular the resulting electromagnetic coupling between inner and outer core. Here we include a prescribed buoyancy force, which is geophysically more realistic, and also yields time-dependent rather than time-independent solutions. The field in the finitely conducting inner core does not then adjust instantaneously to the field in the outer core, but has a diffusive timescale of its own of a few thousand years. Rather large, rapid fluctuations in the outer core are then effectively averaged out by the inner core, producing a relatively stable external dipole field. We speculate that a geomagnetic reversal could only occur as a result of a particularly large fluctuation, large enough and lasting long enough to reverse the field throughout the inner core as well.Probe. Editor David Zimmerman. David Zimmerman Inc., 121 East 26th Street, New York, New York 10010, USA. 12/yr. USA $53, Canada $63, Europe $70.Environmental Values. Editor Alan Holland. White Horse, 10 High Street, Knapwell, Cambridge CBS 8NR, UK. 4/yr. £64, $110 (institutional); £32, $60 (personal).Ecological Engineering: Journal of Ecotechnology. Editor-in-chief William J. Mitsch. Elsevier. 4/yr. DFL 361, $195.International Journal of Nonlinear Optical Physics. Editor-in-chief Iam-Choon Khoo. World Scientific. 4/yr. $348 (institutional); $170 (personal, and institutions from developing countries).Applied Intelligence: The International Journal of Artificial Intelligence, Neural Networks, and Complex Problem-Solving Technologies. Editor-in-chief Moonis Ali. Kluwer. 4/yr. DFL384. The International Journal on Artificial Intelligence Tools. Editor N. G. Bourbakis. World Scientific. 4/yr. $195 (institutional); $100 (personal, and institutions from developing countries).Acta Polymerica. Editors M. Ballauff, G. Hinrichsen, B. Philipp, A.-D. Schlüter, H.-W. Spiess and H. G. Zachmann. VCH. 6/yr. DM498, £183, $360 (institutional); DM150, £57, $125 (personal).BioMetals. Editor-in-chief G. Winkelmann. Rapid Communications of Oxford. 4/yr. £175, $295 (institutional); £65, $110 (personal).Solid State Nuclear Magnetic Resonance: An International Journal. Editor-in-chief J. Klinowski. Elsevier. 6/yr. DFL446, USA and Canada $241.Microbial Releases. Editor-in-chief Walter Klingmüller. Springer. 4/yr. DM390, $244.RECENT studies^1–8 have documented significant short-term vertical fluctuations in the position of the oxic–anoxic interface (chemocline) in the waters of the Black Sea, the world's largest anoxic basin. Natural^5,9 and anthropogenic^3,4,8,10 influences have been invoked as possible causes of the observed fluctuations, but it has been difficult to establish the relative importance of these two forcings. One reason is that observations of the magnitude of chemocline displacement have not extended sufficiently far in the past to eliminate the possibility of anthropogenic changes in fresh-water input. Here we present chemical analyses of shelf sediments, collected from the Bosporus region of the Black Sea, which contain a record of past water column chemistry. We find that the chemocline in this region rose by at least 40–50 m ≥250–300 years ago, precluding anthropogenic forcing as a viable cause. Although our results do not rule out an anthropogenic cause for the recent variations, they do show that natural perturbations more than twice as large as the more recent changes have occurred in the past.RANDEL et al .^1 have observed tongues of stratospheric air stretching from the tropics into middle latitudes, and conclude that such events may be responsible for transporting significant amounts of stratospheric air across the tropical–mid-latitude barrier^2. Here I examine the movements of air parcels during these events using high-resolution contour-trajectory calculations. My calculations suggest that the tongues of tropical air are associated with disturbances of the stratospheric polar vortices. The edge of the disturbed polar vortex reaches low latitudes, and draws a long tongue of tropical air around the vortex into middle latitudes. This process occurs in the winter of both hemispheres, although the edge of the larger Antarctic polar vortex reaches farther toward the Equator, and draws up material from lower latitudes, than its Arctic counterpart.TRANSPORT of air from the troposphere to the stratosphere takes place mainly in the tropics^1. By studying satellite records of the dispersal of volcanic aerosols from tropical eruptions, Trepte and Hitchman^2 concluded that there is a barrier inhibiting the transport of stratospheric air from the tropics to middle latitude, raising the question of how stratospheric material that has been transported from the troposphere is subsequently conveyed to higher latitudes. Here we present global maps of nitrous oxide and water mixing ratios obtained by the Upper Atmosphere Research Satellite. We see strong latitudinal gradients in these trace species, confirming the existence of a barrier to transport. But superimposed on this background structure we also see planetary-scale ‘tongues’ of tropical stratospheric air extending out into middle latitudes, and time sequences show irreversible mixing from the tropics into middle latitudes. Such episodes could be responsible for transporting significant quantities of stratospheric air across the tropical barrier.BIOLOGICAL macromolecules with catalytic activity can be created artificially using two approaches. The first exploits a system that selects a few catalytically active biomolecules from a large pool of randomly generated (and largely inactive) molecules. Catalytic antibodies^1 and many catalytic RNA molecules^2 are obtained in this way. The second involves rational design of a biomolecule that folds in solution to present to the substrate an array of catalytic functional groups^3–8. Here we report the synthesis of rationally designed polypeptides that catalyse the decarboxylation of oxaloacetate via an imine intermediate. We determine the secondary structures of the polypeptides by two-dimensional NMR spectroscopy. We are able to trap and identify intermediates in the catalytic cycle, and to explore the kinetics in detail. The formation of the imine by our artificial oxaloacetate decarboxylases is three to four orders of magnitude faster than can be achieved with simple amine catalysts: this performance rivals that of typical catalytic antibodies.International Journal of Osteoarchaeology. Editors Ann Stirland and Tony Waldron. Wiley. 4/yr. $195 (institutional); $145 (personal). Vegetation History and Archaeobotany. Editors Karl-Ernst Behre and G. L. Jacobson Jr. Springer. 4/yr. DM248, $155.Stem Cells. Editor-in-chief M. J. Murphy Jr. AlphaMed. 6/yr. USA and Canada $150, elsewhere $162 (institutional); USA and Canada $85, elsewhere $97 (personal). Journal of Hematotherapy. Editors-in-chief Adrian P. Gee and Nancy H. Collins. Liebert. 4/yr. USA and Canada $114, elsewhere $154.Cell Transplantation. Editor-in-chief Paul R. Sanberg. Pergamon. 6/yr. £210, $325 (institutional); £57, $88 (personal).Fisheries Oceanography. Editor-in-chief T. R. Parsons. Blackwell Scientific. 4/yr. USA and Canada $157, Europe £95, elsewhere £105 (institutional); USA and Canada $89, Europe £55, elsewhere £60 (personal).Journal of Sleep Research. Editor Jim Home. Blackwell Scientific. 4/yr. USA and Canada $151, Europe £92, elsewhere $101.Mediators of Inflammation. Editor-in-chief I. L. Bonta. Rapid Communications of Oxford. 6/yr. £240, $409 (institutional); £90, $150 (personal).Journal of Fluorescence Editor-in-chief Joseph R. Lakowicz. Plenum. 4/yr. USA and Canada $175, elsewhere $205 (institutional); USA and Canada $40, elsewhere $47 (personal).Advances in Neuroimmunology. Editors G. B. Stefano and E. M. Smith. Pergamon. 4/yr. £189, $290 (institutional); £76, $117 (personal).Immunology and Infectious Diseases. Editor R. K. Chandra. Rapid Communications of Oxford. 4/yr. £235, $395 (institutional); £82, $140 (personal). Vaccine Research. Editor Michael G. Hanna Jr. Liebert. 4/yr. USA and Canada $149, elsewhere $189. Infectious Agents and Disease. Editor-in-chief Bernard Roizman. Raven. 6/yr. USA and Canada $138, elsewhere $171 (institutional); USA and Canada $98, elsewhere $119 (personal).THE X-ray properties of pulsars (highly magnetized rotating neutron stars) depend mainly on the age of the star^1. For young (≤ 10^4 yr) pulsars, virtually all of the X-ray emission is pulsed, appearing as sharp bursts with a power-law spectrum; these emissions are thought to arise from the acceleration of electrons and positrons in the pulsar's magnetosphere^2–5. Older pulsars, on the other hand, exhibit broad X-ray pulses, a lower pulsed fraction and black-body spectra; this is ascribed to thermal emission from the surface of the cooling neutron star, the modulation of the X-rays reflecting temperature inhomogeneities induced by the strong magnetic fields^6,7. No thermal emission is expected for neutron stars older than ∼10^6 yr (refs 8–10) in the absence of surface heating processes^11–15. Here we report the discovery of pulsed X-ray emission from a ∼2 × 10^9-yr-old neutron star: the binary milli-second pulsar J0437 – 4715. The spectral properties of the pulsed emission suggest a thermal origin, requiring substantial heating of the neutron-star surface either by internal friction^11–13 or by energetic particles streaming onto the polar cap from the pulsar's magnetosphere^14,15.The three-dimensional structure of a TATA-box binding polypeptide complexed with the TATA element of the adenovirus major late promoter has been determined by X-ray crystallography at 2.25 Å resolution. Binding of the saddle-shaped protein induces a conformational change in the DNA, inducing sharp kinks at either end of the sequence TATAAAAG. Between the kinks, the right-handed double helix is smoothly curved and partially unwound, presenting a widened minor groove to TBP's concave, antiparallel β -sheet. Side-chain/base interactions are restricted to the minor groove, and include hydrogen bonds, van der Waals contacts and phenylalanine–base stacking interactions.The systematic fabrication of advanced materials will require the construction of architectures over scales ranging from the molecular to the macroscopic. The basic constructional processes of biomineralization—supramolecular pre-organization, interfacial molecular recognition (templating) and cellular processing—can provide useful archetypes for molecular-scale building, or ‘molecular tectonics’, in inorganic materials chemistry.Nature Genetics. Editor Kevin Davies. Nature Publishing, New York. 12/yr. USA and Canada $495, UK £350 (institutional); USA and Canada $195, UK £175 (personal). Human Molecular Genetics. Editors Kay E. Davies and Huntington F. Willard. IRL/Oxford University Press. 12/yr. Europe £250, elsewhere $435 (institutional); Europe £80, elsewhere $140 (personal). Human Mutation. Editors R. G. H. Cotton and Haig H. Kazazian Jr. Wiley. 8/yr. USA $250, Canada and Mexico $330, elsewhere $360 (institutional); USA, Canada and Mexico $125, elsewhere $165 (personal).Characterization of genetic defects involving myelin continues with the identification of the gene for Canavan's disease, a condition that results in the destruction of the brain's white matter.The 2.5 Å crystal structure of a TATA-box complex with yeast TBP shows that the eight base pairs of the TATA box bind to the concave surface of TBP by bending towards the major groove with unprecedented severity. This produces a wide open, underwound, shallow minor groove which forms a primarily hydrophobic interface with the entire under-surface of the TBP saddle. The severe bend and a positive writhe radically alter the trajectory of the flanking B-form DNA.Most models come into being as aids in the solution of real problems, but there is no reason why the process should not be inverted by the creation of models for which there are no problems — yet.Public Understanding of Science. Editor John Durant. IOP Publishing. 4/yr. £115, $236 (institutional); USA and Canada $81, Europe £31.50, elsewhere £37.75 (personal).Down to Earth: Science and Environment Fortnightly. Editor Sunita Narain. Society for Environmental Communications, F-6 Kailash Colony, New Delhi 110 048, India. 26/yr. India Rs 1,000 (institutional), Rs 500 (schools), Rs 240 (personal); Bhutan, Nepal and Bangladesh $80, $45, $40; Pakistan $85, $55, $50; Sri Lanka and the Maldives $90, $55, $50; elsewhere $125, $80, $65 (airmail rates).Earth: The Science of Our Planet. Editor Tom Yulsman. Kalmbach Publishing Co., Box 1612, Waukesha, Wisconsin 53187, USA. 6/yr. USA $19.95, elsewhere $26.Exploration and Mining Geology. Editors J. F. Davies, H. L. Gibson and R. E. S. Whitehead. Pergamon. 4/yr. $170, £110 (institutional); $56, £36 (personal). (Membership rates on application to publisher.)Journal of Logic and Computation. Editor-in-chief D. M. Gabbay. Oxford University Press. 6/yr. Europe £115, elsewhere $215 (Institutional); Europe £55, elsewhere $99 (personal). Applicable Algebra in Engineering, Communication and Computing. Managing Editor Jacques Calmet. Springer. 4/yr. DM258, $161. Parallel Processing Letters. Editor M. Cosnard. World Scientific. 4/yr. $180 (Institutional); $90 (personal, and institutions from developing countries).Journal of Mathematical Imaging and Vision. Editor-in-chief Gerhard X. Ritter. Kluwer. 4/yr. DFL439.Nature 358, 162-164 (1992). FIGURE 3 of this letter contains an error in the numbering of the amino-acid residues of the HCMV UL97 protein. The 4-amino-acid deletion in UL97 should comprise residues 590-593, and not residues 638-641 as indicated in the figure.R IBONUCLEASE inhibitor is a cytoplasmic protein that tightly binds and inhibits ribonucleases of the pancreatic ribonuclease super-family^1. The primary sequence of this inhibitor contains leucine-rich repeats^2 (LRRs); these motifs are present in many proteins that participate in protein–protein interactions and have different functions and cellular locations. In vivo , ribonuclease inhibitor may have a role in the regulation of RNA turnover in mammalian cells^3 and in angiogenesis^4. To define the structural features of LRR proteins and to understand better the nature of the tight interaction of ribonuclease inhibitor with ribonucleases, we have determined the crystal structure of the porcine inhibitor. To our knowledge, this is the first three-dimensional structure of a protein containing LRRs and represents a new class of α/β protein fold. Individual repeats constitute β–α structural units that probably also occur in other proteins containing LRRs. The non-globular shape of the structure and the exposed face of the parallel β -sheet may explain why LRRs are used to achieve strong protein–protein interactions. A possible ribonuclease-binding region incorporates the surface formed by the parallel β -sheet and the βα loops.S MALLPOX eradication culminated the most successful antimicrobial campaign in medical history^1. To characterize further the linear double-stranded DNA genome of the aetiological agent of smallpox, we have determined the entire nucleotide sequence of the highly virulent variola major virus, strain Bangladesh-1975 (VAR-BSH; 186,102 base pairs, 33.7% G + C; Genbank accession number, L22579). Here we highlight features of the molecule and focus on a few of the 187 putative proteins that probably contribute to pathogenicity and virus host-range properties. One hundred and fifty proteins were markedly similar to those of vaccinia virus (smallpox vaccine), for which a complete sequence has been reported^2,3 for strain Copenhagen (VAC-CPN; 191,636 base pairs, 33.3% G + C). The remaining 37 proteins reflected variola-specific sequences or open reading frame divergences for variant proteins, which are often truncated or elongated compared with their vaccinia counterparts.E ACH neuron in the mammalian brain carries many postsynaptic membrane specializations containing high densities of receptors that mediate signal transduction upon neurotransmitter release from the apposed nerve terminal^1. Little is known about the mechanisms by which receptors are transported to and anchored at postsynaptic sites, but extracellular^2 as well as intracellular^3 components may be involved. Ultrastructural studies have shown that the peripheral membrane protein gephyrin^4, which co-purifies with the postsynaptic inhibitory glycine receptor (GlyR) upon affinity chromatography^5,6, is situated on the cytoplasmic face of glycinergic postsynaptic membranes^7–9. Moreover, gephyrin binds with high affinity to polymerized tubulin and has been postulated to link the GlyR to the subsynaptic cytoskeleton^10. Here we report that treatment of rat spinal neurons in culture with gephyrin antisense oligonucleotides prevents the formation of GlyR clusters in the dendritic plasma membrane. Thus, gephyrin is essential for localizing the GlyR to presumptive postsynaptic plasma membrane specializations.N ON-RECEPTOR-TYPE tyrosine kinases of the Src family, such as Src, Yes and Fyn, are strongly expressed in the brain and have been suggested to have an important function in the central nervous system^1–5. We generated Fyn-deficient mice by inserting the β -galactosidase gene ( lacZ ) into the fyn gene. The homozygous Fyn-mutant neonates from homozygous Fyn-deficient parents died because of a suckling problem. Neonates were, however, able to suckle milk normally when the homozygous mother's mammary glands had been activated by suckling of a heterozygous or wild-type pup. In these homozygous pups, the modified glomerular complex of the olfactory bulb, which had been suggested to play a role in perceiving pheromones, was abnormal in shape and reduced in size, and the hippocampal cell-layer was undulated. These results suggest that Fyn may be involved in the initial step of instinctive suckling behaviour in neonates.B ROWN adipose tissue, because of its capacity for uncoupled mitochondria! respiration^1,2, has been implicated as an important site of facultative energy expenditure^3–5. This has led to speculation that this tissue normally functions to prevent obesity^3–5. Attempts to ablate or denervate brown adipose tissue surgically have been uninformative because it exists in diffuse depots and has substantial capacity for regeneration and hypertrophy^6. Here we have used a transgenic toxigene approach^7,8 to create two lines of transgenic mice with primary deficiency of brown adipose tissue. At 16 days, both lines have decreased brown fat and obesity. In one line, brown fat subsequently regenerates and obesity resolves. In the other line, the deficiency persists and obesity, with its morbid complications, advances. Obesity develops in the absence of hyperphagia, indicating that brown fat deficient mice have increased metabolic efficiency. As obesity progresses, transgenic animals develop hyperphagia. This study supports a critical role for brown adipose tissue in the nutritional homeostasis of mice.W E propose here a mechanism for territorial pattern formation in wolves ( Canis lupus ) and analyse it using a spatially explicit mathematical model incorporating wolf movement and scent marking. Model results reflect field observations from northeastern Minnesota: buffer zones where wolves are scarce arise between adjacent packs, and near these buffer zones there are increased levels of scent marking^1,2. Territories are arranged in a spatial mosaic (Fig. 1) which covers the wolf range. In the model formulation no assumptions are made about actual existence or extent of wolf territory and buffer zones; these arise naturally as stable steady-state solutions to the equations. We show mathematically how reduced predation by wolves in the buffer zones provides a refuge for prey species. Field studies support this; distribution of a primary prey species, white-tailed deer ( Odocoileus virginianus ), correlates negatively with that of wolves. Deer are found primarily in buffer zones^3,4 (Fig. 2).A TTEMPTS to understand melt transport in the Earth's mantle have focused on the two mechanisms of porous flow along grain boundaries^1–4 and channel flow in fractures^5–10. To elucidate the contributions of these segregation processes to the chemical evolution of melt and solid, I have developed a disequilibrium melting model for a one-dimensional upwelling mantle in which melt is produced, transported by porous flow and sucked into chemically isolated channels. The model is based on recent disequilibrium melting models^11,12, in which the residual melt in the porous flow system need not equilibrate with the residual solid. By changing the parameter values such as the rates of chemical equilibration and melt removal into channels, this model predicts trace element concentrations for various melting conditions, including disequilibrium effects which cannot be assessed quantitatively using previous models for dynamic mantle melting^1,6,13–15. Comparison between the model results and compositions of abyssal peridot!tes^16 supports the idea that, if equilibrium melting is achieved, imperfect fractional melting (corresponding to 80% melt removal) occurs beneath mid-ocean ridges^17,18. If disequilibrium melting is important, however, more efficient melt removal (in other words, chemical isolation from the residue) is required to explain the peridotite data.M ANY lines of evidence now support the identification of the Chicxulub structure, in Mexico, as a buried impact crater and the probable source of ejecta found in Cretaceous/Tertiary (K/T) boundary sections worldwide^1–8. The question remains, however, of whether there might be additional craters of K/T age, which also contributed ejecta. Shocked zircons from a K/T ejecta layer in Colorado^9 preserve a primary source age of 545 ± 5 Myr, with variable degrees of isotopic resetting consistent with partial lead loss at the time of impact (65 Myr ago)^10. Here we report that the impact breccia from Chicxulub contains zircons that are identical in age, texture and lead loss pattern to the Colorado zircons, and to some from the Beloc section in Haiti. U–Pb data for 18 of the 36 grains studied (from all three sites) fall on a single line as well as if they had come from a single sample. An additional source age of 418 ±6 Myr is found only in Chicxulub and Haiti, suggesting that the Haiti and Colorado ejecta might have sampled different parts of the target stratigraphy. As all the ejecta ages found so far are also found at Chicxulub, our results are consistent with this being the only significant continental K/T impact crater.T HE formation of bulk quantities of C_60 by arc discharge between carbon electrodes in an atmosphere of helium^1 or argon^2,3 has led to an explosion in fullerene research. Methods for improving the rate of fullerene production have included increasing the reactor size and the diameter of the carbon rods, and varying the rate of rod consumption and helium pressure^4. Systems using several rods have also been employed^5,6. The ideal method, however, would involve a continuous process that does not require rod replacement. Approaches using carbon granules^6 and powders^7 have been reported, as well as combustion methods using hydrocarbons^8,9. Here we report the formation of C_60 and C_70 by pyrolysis of naphthalene at ∼1,000 °C. C_60 and C_70 are formed by the 'patching together' of six and seven naphthalene molecules respectively, as demonstrated by mass-spectrometric analysis of intermediate products. These results point to a continuous method of fullerene formation, and also show that closed fullerene cages can be built from well defined aromatic fragments.I MAGING with the scanning transmission electron microscope (STEM) has recently gained in resolution from the use of the annular dark-field (ADF) method^1,2, which produces a signal that is highly sensitive to atomic number. There is a possibility that electrons from the probe beam that are scattered inelastically might be collected to provide a spectroscopic signal containing information about atomic bonding and electronic structure—this is the basis of the standard electron energy-loss spectroscopy (EELS) technique. Browning et al .^3,4 have shown recently that an EELS signal from absorption of atomic core levels can be used, in con-junction with ADF imaging, to obtain information about chemical composition at atomic resolution. Here I report the use of a similar approach to resolve the different bonding states of silicon atoms (Si^0, Si^2 ^+ , Si^4 ^+) across a Si–SiO_2interface. The oxidation state of individual columns of unit cells, containing pairs of silicon atoms, can be resolved with this method, allowing the structure of the interface to be characterized in great detail.T HE potential for diverse applications of diamond^1 has been enhanced by the discovery of the chemical vapour deposition process^2,3 for film formation. The growth of hetero-epitaxial diamond films on silicon is a particularly attractive goal, but only polycrystalline films have so far been prepared in this way^4. Because of the large lattice mismatch, thin intermediate layers (interlayers^5) are formed between the diamond and silicon phases, which may contain crystalline SiC (refs 6, 7) or amorphous compounds (SiC, carbon^8 and SiO_2). An understanding of how diamond nucleates^5,9–11, and the role of these interlayers, requires a detailed knowledge of the nature of carbon bonding ( sp ^2 or sp ^3) at the interface. Here we report the use of transmission electron energy-loss spectroscopy (EELS) to obtain a map of sp ^2 and sp ^3 carbon at a spatial resolution of less than a nanometre across the silicon–diamond interface. We find that diamond nucleates on an amorphous carbon layer, with the transition from sp ^2to sp ^3 carbon occurring over less than one nanometre.What Makes Nature Tick ? By Roger G. Newton. Harvard University Press: 1993. Pp. 257. $27.95, £22.25.The debacle of the US space programme is the consequence of the insecure, publicity-seeking policies of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration.A Japanese laboratory illustrates the benefits of autonomy (and the responsibility that goes with it) and budgetary predictability in creating a framework for productive research.An article on page 748 of this issue raises the question whether remaining stocks of smallpox virus should be physically destroyed. That option, chiefly symbolic, should not be followed — just yet.American Ground Zero: The Secret Nuclear War. ByCarole Gallagher. MIT Press: 1993. Pp. 422. & dollar;50, & pound;32.25.Nuclear Energy and the Public. ByJoop van der Pligt. Blackwell: 1993. Pp. 193. & pound;35.Life Under A Cloud: American Anxiety About the Bomb. ByAllan M. Winkler. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 282. & dollar;27.50.Nature 365, 179-181 (1993) FIGURE 2 of this letter compares the morphological appearance of c-jun–/– and c-jun+/+ embryos at 12.5 days of gestation, and not of c-jun–/- and c-jun–/- embryos as stated in the opening sentence of the figure legend.IN eukaryotes nucleotide excision repair of DNA damaged by ultraviolet radiation requires several gene products; defects in this process result in the cancer-prone syndrome xeroderma pigmento-sum (XP) in humans^1,2. The RAD2 gene is one of at least seven genes indispensable for excision repair in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae ^2, and its encoded protein shares remarkable homology with the XP group-G gene product^3. Here we overproduce the RAD2 -encoded protein in S. cerevisiae , purify it to near homogeneity, and show that RAD2 protein in the presence of magnesium degrades circular single-stranded DNA. The RAD2 endonuclease is specific for single-stranded DNA as it does not act on doublestranded DNA. Given the absolute requirement for RAD2 in the incision step of excision repair, our findings directly implicate RAD2 protein and its human homologue XPG protein as a catalytic component that incises the damaged DNA strand during excision repair. Furthermore, our results indicate that eukaryotes probably employ two distinct endonuclease activities to mediate the dual incision at the damage site.THE paternal and maternal genomes are not equivalent and both are required for mammalian development^1,2. The difference between the parental genomes is believed to be due to gamete-specific differential modification, a process known as genomic imprinting. The study of transgene methylation has shown that methylation patterns can be inherited in a parent-of-origin-specific manner^3–7, suggesting that DNA methylation may play a role in genomic imprinting. The functional significance of DNA methylation in genomic imprinting was strengthened by the recent finding that CpG islands (or sites) in three imprinted genes, H19 , insulin-like growth factor 2 (Igf-2) , and lgf-2 receptor (Igf-2r) , are differentially methylated depending on their parental origin^8–12. We have examined the expression of these three imprinted genes in mutant mice that are deficient in DNA methyltransferase activity^13. We report here that expression of all three genes was affected in mutant embryos: the normally silent paternal allele of the HI9 gene was activated, whereas the normally active paternal allele of the Igf-2 gene and the active maternal allele of the Igf-2r gene were repressed. Our results demonstrate that a normal level of DNA methylation is required for controlling differential expression of the paternal and maternal alleles of imprinted genes.WE isolated two mutants from the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae , cim3-1 and cim5-1 , that arrest cell division in G2/metaphase at 37 °C. CIM3 (identical to SUG1; ref. 1) and CIM5 are similar to each other and are members of a family of putative ATPases that have been proposed to be 26S protease subunits^2. We show here that CIM5 is the functional yeast homologue of the human MSS1 protein^3 and that homologues of CIM3 and CIM5 are present in a highly purified preparation of the Drosophila 26S protease^4. The short-lived ubiquitin-proline-β-galactosidase fusion protein is stabilized in cim mutants, but Leu-β-galactosidase is not. The CLB2 and CLB3 cyclins also accumulate in the cim mutants. Thus the 26S protease is required in vivo for the degradation of ubiquitinated substrates and for anaphase chromosome separation.WE have isolated a mutant, mts2 , in the fission yeast Schizosaccharomyces pombe which is defective in chromosome segregation. The predicted amino-acid sequence of the cloned mts2 ^+ gene product is 75% identical to the S4 subunit of the human 26S ATP/ubiquitin-dependent protease^1. The human S4 subunit complementary DNA expressed from an S. pombe expression plasmid can rescue an S. pombe mts2 gene disruption. Both observations demonstrate that the mts2 ^+ gene is the S. pombe homologue of the human S4 subunit. In addition, we provide genetic evidence for a physical interaction between the S4 and the related S7 subunit in the 26S multiprotein protease. We show that polyubiquitin-conjugated proteins accumulate in the mts2 mutant at the restrictive temperature, demonstrating that the mutant has an in vivo defect in the ubiquitin-dependent proteolysis pathway. Finally, the phenotype for the mts2 mutant indicates that protein degradation by the 26S protease is essential not for entry into but for the completion of mitosis.THE signal recognition particle (SRP) consists of one RNA and six protein subunits^1,2. The N-terminal domain of the 54K subunit contains a putative GTP-binding site, whereas the C-terminal domain binds signal sequences and SRP RNA^3–7. Binding of SRP to the signal sequence as it emerges from the ribosome creates a cytosolic targeting complex containing the nascent polypeptide chain, the translating ribosome, and SRP^8. This complex is directed to the endoplasmic reticulum membrane as a result of its interaction with the SRP receptor^9–11, a membrane protein composed of two subunits, SRα and SRβ, each of which also contains a GTP-binding domain^12,13. In the presence of GTP, SRP receptor binding to SRP causes the latter to dissociate from both the signal sequence and the ribosome^13,14. GTP is then hydrolysed so that SRP can be released from the SRP receptor and returned to the cytosol^15. Here we show that the 54K subunit ( M _r 54,000) of SRP (SRP54) is a GTP-binding protein stabilized in a nucleotide-free state by signal sequences, and that the SRP receptor both increases the affinity of SRP54 for GTP and activates its GTPase. We propose that nucleotide-mediated conformational changes in SRP54 regulate the release of signal sequences and the docking of ribosomes at the endoplasmic reticulum.THREE synaptic proteins, syntaxin, SNAP-25 and synaptobrevin, were recently identified as targets of clostridial neurotoxins that irreversibly inhibit synaptic vesicle fusion^1–4. Experiments searching for membrane receptors for N -ethylmaleimide-sensitive fusion protein (NSF), which has an important role in membrane fusion, revealed an ATP-dependent interaction of the same three synaptic proteins with NSF and its soluble attachment proteins^5. Thus, two independent approaches identify syntaxin, synaptobrevin and SNAP-25 as components of the synaptic vesicle fusion machinery, but their mode of action is unclear^6. We have now discovered a brain protein of relative molecular mass 67,000 (67K) which binds stably to syntaxin. Amino-acid sequencing and complementary DNA cloning revealed that the 67K protein is encoded by the mammalian homologue of the Caenorhabditis elegans gene unc-18 . In C. elegans , unc-18 belongs to a group of genes defined by mutations with a paralytic phenotype and accumulations of acetylcholine, suggesting a defect in neurotransmitter release^7,8. The binding of the mammalian homologue of unc-18 (Munc-18) to syntaxin requires the N terminus of syntaxin whereas that of SNAP-25 involves a more C-terminal sequence. Our data suggest that Munc-18 is a previously unidentified essential component of the synaptic vesicle fusion protein complex.A PHYSIOLOGICAL role for the dopamine D1 receptor has been difficult to define, particularly because of its complex pre- and postsynaptic localization in brain areas such as the striatum^1. In the midbrain, however, D1 receptors are selectively localized to the terminals of GABA (γ-aminobutyric acid)-containing afferents^2–4. We have studied the actions of these D1 receptors on evoked GABA synaptic potentials recorded intracellularly from dopamine neurons in the ventral tegmental area (VTA). We report here that dopamine augmented GABA_B inhibitory postsynaptic potentials (i.p.s.ps) in the presence of D2 receptor antagonists. This effect was mimicked by the D1 agonists SKF38393 and SKF82958 and blocked by the D1 antagonists SCH23390 and cis -flupenthixol. No modulation of the GABA_A synaptic potential was observed. The postsynaptic actions of the GABA_Bagonist, baclofen, were unaffected by SKF38393, SCH23390 or cis -flupenthixol, confirming a presynaptic locus of D1 action. Additionally, D1 antagonists reduced the amplitude of the GABA_B i.p.s.p. in the absence of D1 agonists. We conclude that dopamine acts tonically at presynaptic D1 receptors on the terminals of afferent GABA neurons to facilitate selectively GABA_B-mediated neurotransmission in the midbrain.Industrialized countries still in recession would be helped by their own version of NAFTA for Europe.RETINOIDS (vitamin A and its metabolites) are suspected of regulating diverse aspects of growth, differentiation, and patterning during embryogenesis^1, but many questions remain about the identities and functions of the endogenous active retinoids involved. The pleiotropic effects of retinoids may be explained by the existence of complex signal transduction pathways involving diverse nuclear receptors of the retinoic acid receptor (RAR) and retinoid X receptor (RXR) families, and at least two types of cellular retinoic acid binding proteins (CRABP-I and -II)^2. The different RARs, RXRs, and CRABPs have different expression patterns during vertebrate embryogenesis^2,3, suggesting that they each have particular functions. Another level at which fine tuning of retinoid action could occur is the metabolism of vitamin A to active metabolites, which may include all- trans -retinoic acid^4–7, all- trans -3,4-didehydroretinoic acid^8, 9- cis -retinoic acid^9,10, and 14-hydroxy-4,14-retroretinol^11. Formation of the metabolite all- trans -4-oxo-retinoie acid from retinoic acid was considered to be an inactivation pathway during growth and differentiation^12–14. We report here that, in contrast, 4-oxo-retinoic acid is a highly active metabolite which can modulate positional specification in early embryos. We also show that this retinoid binds avidly to and activates RAR& beta;, and that it is available in early embryos. The different activities of 4-oxo-retinoic acid and retinoic acid in modulating positional specification on the one hand, and growth and differentiation on the other, interest us in the possibility that specific retinoid ligands regulate different physiological processes in vivo .Digital Woes: Why We Should Not Depend on Software. By Lauren Ruth Wiener. Addison-Wesley: 1993. Pp. 245. & dollar;22.95, & pound;19.95.THE vestimentiferan tubeworm Riftia pachyptila is found around hydrothermal vent areas in the deep sea. Intracellular bacterial chemoautotrophic symbionts use the oxidation of sulphide from the effluent of the vents as an energy source for CO_2 fixation. They apparently provide most or all of the nutritional requirements for their gutless hosts^1–5. This kind of symbiosis has since been found in many other species from various other phyla from other habitats^6–9. Here we present results that the bacteria of R. pachyptila may cover a significant fraction of their respiratory needs by the use of nitrate in addition to oxygen. Nitrate is reduced to nitrite, which may be the end product (nitrate respiration)^10 or it may be further reduced to nitrogen gas (denitrification)^11. This metabolic trait may have an important role in the colonization of hypoxic habitats in general by animals with this kind of symbiosis.GLOBAL climatic change may alter species' ranges as well as restructuring ecosystems^1–3. Models simulating forest growth predict that the area covered by different forest types may be affected^2, which may in turn further affect climate^3. In the mixed forests of southern Ontario, pollen analyses have demonstrated that after AD 1400, Fagus (beech), the formerly dominant warmth-loving species, was replaced first by oak (Quercus) and subsequently by pine (Pinus strobus) . Although these changes had been attributed to aboriginal forest clearance^4–6, they have also been seen in areas unaffected by aboriginal farming, and are now thought to reflect Little Ice Age cooling^7. Although modelling suggests that some forests may take several centuries to reach equilibrium after a climatic change^8,9, a real forest showing this behaviour has not previously been identified. Here we model the Little Ice Age by a 2 °C decrease in mean annual temperature from AD 1200 to 1850, and show that the changes predicted by a forest simulator derived from FORET^10match those seen in southern Ontario. These forests thus appear to have remained in disequilibrium with the prevailing climate for more than 650 years.SPACE geodesy provides a new tool for measuring neotectonic deformation which, when combined with geological and geophysical observations and models, can be used to infer rates and styles of deformation. In the Ventnra basin region of southern California, the geodetically measured convergence rates of ∼7–10 mm yr^−1 (ref. 1) are significantly lower than the 20–25 mm yr^−1 estimated from geological data^2,3. Here we investigate the possible implications of this discrepancy. It might be, for example, that temporal variations cause the short- and long-term convergence rates to differ. But if this were the case we would expect to observe the long-term rate by extending the geodetic measurements over a broader region, yet only 11 ± 3 mm yr^−1 of regional convergence is observed^4. Our preferred explanation of the discrepancy is that the geological models require revision, and to this end we present two deformation models that satisfy both the geological and geodetic constraints. Our modelling suggests that the faults bounding the basin are locked at the surface, but are slipping at depths below ∼2–5 km.OVER the past several decades, the examination of volcanic rocks recovered from mid-ocean ridges and ocean islands worldwide has led to the identification of large-scale geochemical provinces reflecting compositionally distinct domains in the Earth's mantle^1,2. The spatial distribution of these domains may reveal global patterns of upper-mantle convection and mixing. Previous studies have shown, for example, that the distinct Indian Ocean isotope province^1 has a relatively sharp eastern boundary within the Australian–Antarctic Discordance (AAD) south of Australia^3,4 (Fig. 1). The juxtaposition of Indian Ocean basalt compositions west of this boundary and Pacific compositions to the east suggests that the AAD may overlie a zone of convergence between ocean-basin-scale upper-mantle convection regimes: if this is so, Pacific isotope compositions should occur continuously along the length of the Pacific–Antarctic Ridge (PAR). Fresh basaltic glasses have now been recovered from the southernmost portion of this previously unsampled ridge axis, and we report their major element, trace element and isotopic compositions. The chemical systematics of these rocks suggest that the Pacific Ocean geochemical province includes the PAR, extends to the AAD south of Australia, and thus is one of the largest chemically coherent mantle domains on the Earth.The Creative Loop: How the Brain Makes a Mind. ByErich Harth. Addison-Wesley: 1993. Pp. 196. & dollar;21.Wrinkles in Time. By George Smoot and Keay Davidson. Little, Brown: 1993. Pp. 321. & pound;18.99.Ripples in the Cosmos. By Michael Rowan-Robinson. Freeman: 1993. Pp. 224. & pound;16.99, & dollar;22.45.Afterglow of Creation. By Marcus Chown. Arrow: 1993. Pp. 171. & pound;5.99.SULPHUR dioxide from volcanic eruptions may have a significant effect on the Earth's climate and atmospheric chemistry, and it is therefore important to quantify outgassing rates for all types of volcanic activity. Non-explosive volcanoes (for example, Mount Etna) outgas at relatively constant rates, providing an annual flux of about 9 million tons (Mt) SO_2 (ref. 1). By contrast, the outgassing from volcanoes prone to explosive eruptions (such as Mount Pinatubo) is sporadic and much more difficult to quantify. The total annual volcanic SO_2 flux is therefore poorly constrained, with ground-based estimates^1–8 ranging from 1.5 to 50 Mt–up to onequarter of the estimated current anthropogenic contribution. The Total Ozone Mapping Spectrometer aboard the NASA satellite Nimbus 7 recorded SO_2emissions from explosive eruptions from November 1978 to May 1993. We use these data to show that the annual flux from explosive volcanism is of the order of 4 Mt SO_2, less than half of the non-explosive output. Thus it seems that the total volcanic emission of SO_2 to the Earth's atmosphere is about 13 Mt yr^−1, which is only 5–10% of the current anthropogenic flux.HOLLOW tubular structures of molecular dimensions may offer a variety of applications in chemistry, biochemistry and materials science. Concentric carbon nanotubes^1,2 have attracted a great deal of attention, while the three-dimensional tubular pore structures of molecular sieves have long been exploited industrially^3–8. Nanoscale tubes based on organic materials have also been reported previously^9–13. Here we report the design, synthesis and characterization of a new class of organic nanotubes based on rationally designed cyclic polypeptides. When protonated, these compounds crystallize into tubular structures hundreds of nanometres long, with internal diameters of 7–8 Å. Support for the proposed tubular structures is provided by electron microscopy, electron diffraction, Fourier-transform infrared spectroscopy and molecular modelling. These tubes are open-ended, with uniform shape and internal diameter. We anticipate that they may have possible applications in inclusion chemistry, catalysis, molecular electronics and molecular separation technology.EXCITABLE media exhibit a wide variety of geometrically complex spatio-temporal patterns, perhaps the most striking of which are rotating spiral waves. Spiral waves have now been observed in many excitable systems, including heart muscle^1, aggregating slime-mould cells^2, retinae^3, CO oxidation on platinum^4 and oscillatory chemical systems such as the Belousov–Zhabotinsky (BZ) reaction^5,6. In the last case, the spiral cores trace out circular or hypocycloidal trajectories, depending on the specific reaction conditions^7–9. In addition, if the excitability of the BZ reaction is light-sensitive^10–13, constant illumination has been shown to influence the dynamics of spiral waves^14,15. Here we investigate the effect of illumination that is periodically modulated in time. We find that, for a single set of reaction conditions, the motion of the spiral cores can be forced to describe a wide range of open and closed hypocycloidal trajectories, in phase with the applied modulation frequency. Numerical simulations using a modified version of the Oregonator model^16,17 of the BZ reaction reproduce this behaviour. We suggest that the modulation of excitability with weak external forces might be used as a means for controlling the dynamics of other excitable media.LARGE fluctuations in the radio emissions from the quasar 0954 + 658 (ref. 1) attest to the existence of large-scale inhomogeneities in the ionized interstellar medium. These fluctuations, termed extreme scattering events, are caused by the refractive focusing of the radio waves by discrete plasma structures. In principle, the radio emissions of pulsars should also be a sensitive probe of such phenomena^2–5, which should be manifest as fluctuations in the flux density and increased delays in the timing measurements. Here we report the detection of an extreme scattering event, lasting about 15 days, in timing observations of the millisecond pulsar 1937 + 21. This event provides independent evidence for the existence of large-scale structure in the interstellar medium, and allows us to constrain the properties of the lensing structure (distance, velocity, linear dimension and electron density) more tightly than has been possible from detections of lensed extragalactic radio sources. Of more practical importance, such events could be the dominant source of timing noise in millisecond pulsars at ∼1 GHz, and will need to be considered when searching for the subtle signature of gravitational waves in pulsar timing measurements.The idea that physics has almost been worked out as a field for interesting investigations is widely current but mistaken. There is as much left to do as has been done.Nature 365, 267-269 (1993) THE penultimate sentence of the first paragraph of this letter should start "Anti-Lewis-B and anti-A exhibited the highest binding..." and not "Anti-Lewis-B and anti-lewis-A..." as published.Modification of specific intracellular proteins by ubiquitin targets them for degradation. We describe a yeast enzyme, Doa4, that is integral to the degradation of ubiquitinated proteins and is required in diverse physiological processes. Doa4 appears to function late in the proteolytic pathway by cleaving ubiquitin from substrate remnants still bound to protease. The human tre-2 oncogene encodes a deubiquitinating enzyme similar to Doa4, indicating a role for the ubiquitin system in mammalian growth control.There is calculated perversity in the British government's latest policy on school examinations.The US Congress, largely because of bipartisan support, has voted to ratify the North American Free Trade Agreement and thereby enhanced the status of US President Bill Clinton in the international arena.Men among the Mammoths: Victorian Science and the Discovery of Human Prehistory. By A. Bowdoin Van Riper. University of Chicago Press: 1993. Pp. 267. & dollar;51.75, & pound;35.95 (hbk); & dollar;19.50, & pound;13.50 (pbk).Nature's Body: Gender in the Making of Modern Science. By Londa Schiebinger. Beacon: 1993. Pp. 289. & dollar;25.Although astronomers can reliably measure the relative distances of distant galaxies, attempts to calibrate the absolute cosmic distance scale remain controversial. Nevertheless, the sources of possible error are now clearly defined and a convincing result seems to be within reach.Global Accord: Environmental Challenges and International Responses. Edited by Nazli Choucri. MIT Press: 1993. Pp. 562. & dollar;50, & pound;44.95.Ultimate Security: The Environmental Basis of Political Stability. By Norman Myers. W. W. Norton: 1993. Pp. 308. & dollar;25.Threats Without Enemies: Facing Environmental Insecurity. Edited by Gwyn Prins. Earthscan: 1993. Pp. 197. & pound;12.95.Global Political Ecology: The Crisis in Economy and Government. By Adam Swift. Pluto: 1993. Pp. 345. & pound;35 (hbk); & pound;14.95 (pbk).Defining Science: William Whewell, Natural Knowledge and Public Debate in Early Victorian Britain. By Richard R. Yeo. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 272. & pound;35, & dollar;54.95.Paradise Dreamed: How Utopian Thinkers Have Changed the Modern World. By Pamela Neville-Sington and David Sington. Bloomsbury: 1993. Pp. 322. & pound;18.99.Parapsychology: A Concise History. By John Beloff. Athlone: 1993. Pp. 330. & pound;32 (hbk); & pound;12.95 (pbk).Gender on Ice: American Ideologies of Polar Expeditions. By Lisa Bloom. University of Minnesota: 1993. Pp. 163. & dollar;34.95 (hbk); & dollar;14.94 (pbk).Reading National Geographic. By Catherine Lutz and Jane Collins. University of Chicago Press: 1993. Pp. 309. & dollar;59.95 (hbk); & dollar;19.95 (pbk).The Literary Companion to Medicine. By Richard Gordon. Sinclair-Stevenson: 1993. Pp. 431. & pound;18.THE seven botulinum neurotoxin (NT) serotypes produced by strains of Clostridium botulinum inhibit neurotransmitter release from synaptic vesicles. Neurotoxin is synthesized as a roughly 150K single-chain protein. Proteolysis produces two fragments, the 50K L-chain and 100K H-chain, that remain linked by a disulphide bond. Intoxication involves membrane attachment by the C-terminal half of the H-chain, endocytotic/lysosomal internalization, vesicle channel formation mediated by the 50K N-terminal half of the H-chain at low pH, and finally blockade of synaptic vesicle fusion after the L-chain reaches the cytosol^1–4. We report here the visualization of the neurotoxin–membrane complex by electron cryomicroscopy and image processing. Three-dimensional reconstructions show the neurotoxin bound to the exterior of ganglioside/PC lipid vesicles and show channels entirely perforating the vesicle wall. Each channel appears to arise from the interaction of four neurotoxin molecules.CHECKPOINTS maintain the dependency relationships between discrete events in the cell cycle (for example, ensuring mitosis does not occur before DNA replication is complete)^1,2. In Schizosaccharomyces pombe , mitotic checkpoints monitor DNA synthesis^3 and the presence of DNA damage^4,5. The replication-dependent mitotic checkpoint prevents mitosis by inactivating p34^ cdc2 kinase^3. The mechanism by which the DNA damage checkpoint interacts with the mitotic machinery is distinct from that used by the replication checkpoint^4,5. The activity of p34^ cdc2 is controlled, in part, by the wee1 protein kinase^6, which inactivates cdc2 through phosphorylation at tyrosine-15 (ref. 7). Here we report normal mitotic arrest after DNA damage in S. pombe cells in which the wee1 gene is defective or missing. We suggest why these findings contradict a recent report^8 which suggested that the wee1 gene product was required for DNA damage-dependent mitotic arrest.A Continent Revealed: The European Geotraverse. Edited by Derek Blundell, Roy Freeman and Stephan Mueller. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 275. £35, $79.95 (boxed set); £15.95, $34.95 (paperback book only).HORMONALLY induced increases in cyclic AMP levels induce phosphorylation of the transcription factor CREB at a serine residue at position 133 by protein kinase A (ref. 1), enhancing its ability to activate transcription without affecting its intracellular location or DNA-binding activity. This effect is dependent on a 60-amino-acid region of CREB that contains Serl33 and is termed the kinase-inducible domain (KID)^2, which also occurs in the CREB-related CREM- α and - β proteins, although these are transcriptional repressers^3. Here we show that the KID domain confers a cAMP-inducible increase on the activity of the Q2 activation domain from CREB and the acidic activation domains from the yeast proteins GAL4 and GCN4. Remarkably, it retains this ability even when attached to a separate polypeptide bound to an adjacent site in the promoter. KID may therefore be the first of a new class of conditional activators that work through other promoter-bound factors to stimulate gene expression in response to hormonal stimuli.TUMOUR necrosis factor (TNF), jointly referring to TNF α and TNF β , is a central mediator of immune and inflammatory responses; its activities are mediated by two distinct receptors, TNFR1 (p55) and TNFR2 (p75) (reviewed in refs 1–3). The cyto-plasmic domains of the TNFRs are unrelated, suggesting that they link to different intracellular signalling pathways^4. Although most TNF responses have been assigned to one or the other of the TNF receptors (mostly TNFR1), there is no generally accepted model for the physiological role of the two receptor types. To investigate the role of TNFR1 in beneficial and detrimental activities of TNF, we generated TNFR1-deficient mice by gene targeting. We report here that mice homozygous for a disrupted Tnfr l allele ( Tnfr1 ^0) are resistant to the lethal effect of low doses of lipopolysaccharide after sensitization with D -galactosamine, but remain sensitive to high doses of lipopolysaccharide. The increased susceptibility of Tnfr1 ^0 Tnfr1 ^0 mutant mice to infection with the facultative intracellular bacterium Listeria monocytogenes indicates an essential role of TNF in nonspecific immunity.WE experience the visual world as being three-dimensional. A major source of depth information derives from the slightly different views of each eye, leading to small variations in the retinal images ('disparities')' Neurons sensitive to visual disparities are thought to form the neural basis of stereo vision^1–10. Barn owls^2,3 as well as several mammalian species^1,4–10 have neurons that are sensitive to visual disparities. But how visual disparities are represented in the brain has been a matter of discussion ever since the first disparity-sensitive neurons were found some 25 years ago. Here we adopt a new approach to this problem and study the neural computation of visual disparities with a paradigm borrowed from auditory research. The measurement of interaural time difference (ITD) has many similarities with the measurement of visual disparity on the formal, algorithmic level. We speculate that the similarities might extend to the level of neural computation. The neural representation of ITD is well understood^11–18, and we have studied the representation of disparities with visual stimuli analogous to those successfully used in acoustic experiments. For example, ITD is converted in the brain to a pathlength on an axon that, owing to the finite conduction velocity in neurons, exactly matches the external ITD. This pathlength is called 'characteristic delay'^12. Our results suggest that there is an analogue of the characteristic delay in stereo vision which we propose to call 'characteristic disparity'.WETLANDS, both natural and agricultural, contribute an estimated 40 to 50% of the total methane emitted to the atmosphere each year. Recent efforts in atmospheric modelling^1 and attempts to constrain CH_4 source strengths^2 have indicated the need to delineate the processes responsible for the large variations in emission rates found within and across wetland types. Numerous biogeochemical factors are known to affect the activity of methanogenic bacteria^3,4 and although there has been some success in relating water level^5–7 and temperature^8,9 to CH_4 emissions within particular systems, these variables are insufficient for predicting emissions across a variety of wetlands^2,10. From simultaneous measurements of CO_2 and CH_4 exchange in wetlands extending from subarctic peatlands to subtropical marshes, we report here a positive correlation between CH_4 emission and net ecosystem production and suggest that net ecosystem production is a master variable, integrating many factors which control CH_4 emission in vegetated wetlands. We find that about 3 per cent of the daily net ecosystem production is emitted back to the atmosphere as CH_4. With projected stimulation of primary production and soil microbial activity in wetlands associated with elevated atmospheric CO_2 concentrations^11, we envisage the potential for increasing CH_4 emissions from inundated wetlands, further enhancing the greenhouse effect.DOUBLE seismic zones, planes or earthquakes parallel to the dip of a subducting slab and separated by 20–40 km, provide important clues about the earthquake generating mechanisms and strain distribution inside subducting slabs. Double seismic zones have been found at intermediate depths (70–200 km) in many subduction zones^1–6 but have not been previously reported in deep slabs. Here, by relocating earthquakes with a hypocentroidal decomposition technique^7 and visualizing the earthquake positions and uncertainties in three dimensions, we identify a double seismic zone at depths of 350–460 km in the Tonga subduction zone. Source parameters of the earthquakes determined by waveform analysis suggest different stress orientations for the two zones, with in-plane compression in the lower zone and in-plane tension in the upper zone. The double zone may be due to transformational faulting, as olivine along the edges of a metastable olivine wedge becomes warmer and transforms to spinel^8–11.THE formation of constitutive transport vesicles involves the association of non-clathrin coat proteins to transport organelles^1,2. Here we report that IgE receptors and protein kinase C (PKC) regulate the GTP-dependent binding of the two coat proteins ADP-ribosylation factor (ARF) and β -COP^3–5 to Golgi membranes in rat basophilic leukaemia cells. Activation of IgE receptors and PKC prevented the ARF and β -COP dissociation from Golgi membranes that occurs in permeabilized cells in the absence of GTP and potentiated the association-promoting effects of GTP and the G protein activator fluoroluminate. In contrast, PKC downregulation and PKC inhibition abolished the activity of GTP and fluoroluminate in promoting ARF binding to the Golgi complex. Studies of ARF binding to isolated Golgi membranes gave similar results. These findings suggest that coat assembly on Golgi membranes, and thus possibly constitutive secretory traffic, is modulated by membrane receptors and second messengers.IN non-excitable cells, release of Ca^2+ from the inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate (InsP_3)-sensitive store can activate Ca^2+ entry^1–3. Very little is known about the signal mechanism relating store emptying to plasma membrane Ca^2+ influx. It has been suggested that the signal may be either a diffusible messenger like an inositol phosphate^4, or the InsP_3 receptor itself, which, by physically coupling to some component of Ca^2+ entry in the plasma membrane, may link store release to Ca^2+ entry^5. The nature of the Ca^2+ entry pathway is also unclear. Only in mast cells has a very selective Ca^2+ current been observed after store emptying^6. Activation of exogenous 5-hydroxytryptamine (5-HT) receptors expressed in Xenopus oocytes or direct injection of InsP_3 evokes Ca^2+ entry activated by InsP^3 pool depletion^7. Here we investigate the nature of this influx pathway and find a current activated by pool depletion. This has an unusual selectivity in that it is more permeable to Ca^2+ ions than to other divalent cations (Ba^2+, Sr^2+ or Mn^2+ ). Moreover, a ^K+ permeability is also stimulated after pool depletion. The activation of this store depletion current involves both a phosphatase and an unidentified diffusible messenger. Both the Ca^2+ entry pathway and the activating factors found here may be relevant to pool-depleted Ca^2+ entry in a variety of non-excitable cells.THE dating of the history of reversals of the Earth's magnetic field since the Jurassic period has been based primarily on radiometric dating of a small number of reversals, with most ages of individual reversals interpolated or extrapolated on the basis of the widths of marine magnetic anomalies. Recently, however, Pliocene and Pleistocene reversals have been dated by an entirely independent method, which relies on correlating climate proxies (such as oxygen isotope ratios) in sediments with calculated variations of the Earth's orbit and inclination^1–4. The dates obtained from this astronomical calibration are ∼3–8% older than radiometrically calibrated ages published between 1979 and 1989 (see, for example, refs 5 and 6), although recent dating by the ^40Ar/^39Ar method tends to confirm the astronomical calibration^7–10, at least for the past 3.3 Myr. Here I use sea-floor spreading rates determined from high-precision plate-rotation solutions for five plate pairs to test the astronomically calibrated timescale over the past 5.32 Myr. The results suggest that the errors in the astronomical calibration are no greater than 0.02 Myr, and also show that spreading rate can remain constant for several million years, even for fast-moving plates.CHANGES in bottom-water oxygen concentration are commonly invoked to account for past changes in sedimentary organic carbon accumulation, as organic matter is more readily preserved in anoxic conditions^1–5. On the other hand, upper-water productivity has been shown to be the main controlling factor for accumulation of organic matter in modern sediments^6,7. It is therefore important to understand whether productivity significantly influenced accumulation patterns in the past, for example during the formation of petroleum source rocks. Here we present a study of a 150-Myr-old sequence containing short-term cycles in organic carbon content from the Kimmeridge Clay formation in Northern England. The lack of bioturbation and the fine-scale laminations throughout this section demonstrate that the sequence was deposited under continuously anoxic bottom-water conditions, so that oxic excursions cannot account for the cyclic accumulation pattern. We show that in this cycle, increased planktonic productivity appears to have caused both increased sedimentary accumulation of refractory organic material, and increased anaerobic degradation of metobolizable organic material. Thus, upper-water productivity should be considered as an important factor in controlling past as well as present accumulation patterns.BOND et al .^1 recently presented evidence for the frequent occurrence, in the Pleistocene epoch, of periods of massive iceberg discharge into the North Atlantic ocean ('Heinrich events'), each lasting a few thousand years. The cause of these events is uncertain, but one possibility^1 is repeated advances of the Laurentide ice sheet during episodes of cooler climate. Here I examine this idea, using a model of the Laurentide ice sheet driven by orbitally forced variations in insolation, with and without three additional 3,000-yr-long cooling episodes, imposed just before the occurrence of the three most recent Heinrich events (HI, H2 and H3). In the model, the cooling event preceding HI (when the climate was relatively warm and deglaciation was about to begin) led to increased calving, but those preceding H2 and H3 (which occurred during the last ice age, when the climate was very cold) led to reduced iceberg calving. It thus seems unlikely that the Heinrich events generally reflect a direct response of the Laurentide ice sheet to climate cooling.THE discovery of the Antarctic ozone hole^1 in 1985 led to international efforts to reduce emissions of ozone-destroying chlorofluorocarbons^2. These efforts culminated in the Montreal Protocol^3 and its subsequent amendments, which called for the elimination of CFC production by 1996. Here we focus on CFC-11 (CC1_3F) and CFC-12 (CC1_2F_2), which are used for refrigeration, air conditioning and the production of aerosols and foams^4, and which together make up about half of the total abundance of stratospheric organic chlorine^5. We report a significant recent decrease in the atmospheric growth rates of these two species, based on measurements spanning the past 15 years and latitudes ranging from 83° N to 90° S. This is consistent with CFC-producers' own estimates of reduced emissions^6,7. If the atmospheric growth rates of these two species continue to slow in line with predicted changes in industrial emissions, global atmospheric mixing ratios will reach a maximum before the turn of the century, and then begin to decline.INTRACELLULAR Ca^2+ signals that last more than a few minutes after the onset of stimulation depend critically on influx of extracellular Ca^2+. Such Ca^2+ influx can be triggered in many cell types by depletion of intracellular Ca^2+ stores without detectable elevations of known messengers. The mechanism by which store depletion can control plasma membrane Ca^2 + permeability remains controversial^1–7. Here we present evidence for a novel soluble mediator. Calcium depletion of a lymphocyte cell line caused the messenger to be released from intracellular organelles into the cytoplasm and to a much lesser extent into the extracellular medium. The messenger caused Ca^2+ influx when applied to macrophages, astrocytoma cells, and flbroblasts and was therefore named CIF (for Ca^2+-influx factor). CIF appears to have hydroxyls (or hydroxyl and amino groups) on adjacent carbons, a phosphate, and a M _r under 500.DURING mammalian development, many cells are programmed to die^1,2 most mediated by apoptosis^3. The Fas antigen^4 coded by the structural gene for mouse lymphoproliferation mutation ( lpr )^5,6, is a cell surface protein belonging to the tumour necrosis factor/nerve growth factor receptor family^7,8, and mediates apoptosis^7. The Fas antigen messenger RNA is expressed in the thymus, liver, heart, lung and ovary^8. We prepared a monoclonal antibody against mouse Fas antigen, which immunoprecipitated the antigen ( M _r 45K) and had cytolytic activity against cell lines expressing mouse Fas antigen. We report here that staining of mouse thymocytes with the antibody indicated that thymocytes from the wild-type and lpr ^ cg mice expressed the Fas antigen, whereas little expression of the Fas antigen was found in lpr mice. Intraperitoneal administration of the anti-Fas antibody into mice rapidly killed the wild-type mice but neither lpr nor lpr ^ cg mice. Biochemical, histological and electron microscope analyses indicated severe damage of the liver by apoptosis. These findings suggest that the Fas antigen is important in programmed cell death in the liver, and may be involved in fulminant hepatitis in some cases.THE CD4 and CD8 glycoproteins are expressed on helper and cytoxic T lymphocytes, respectively, and have important functions in the differentiation and activation of these cells^1–8. These molecules are thought to participate in signal transduction by binding to the same class II or class I major histocompatibility complex molecules that are engaged by the T-cell antigen receptor^9–13. The cytoplasmic domains of both CD4 and CDS interact with the protein tyrosine kinase p56^ lck (refs 14–17), an essential participant in thymocyte maturation^18 and T-cell activation^19. This interaction is required for effective in vitro responses to antigen^5–8, suggesting that signalling through p56^ lck is a major function of CD4 and CD8. Here we investigate the role of the CD4-p56^ lck interaction during T-lymphocyte development by expressing wild-type and truncated products of CD4 transgenes in mice that lack endogenous CD4 and hence have defective helper-cell development^3,4. We find that transgenic CD4, which cannot associate with p^ lck , can nevertheless rescue the helper-cell lineage when overexpressed. This result indicates that the contribution of CD4 to lineage development need not involve signalling through p56^ lck , and provides insight into the general function of CD4 and CD8.DUCHENNE and Becker muscular dystrophy (DMD and BMD) are X-linked recessive diseases caused by defective expression of dystrophin^1,2. The mdx mouse, an animal model for DMD, has a mutation that eliminates expression of the 427K muscle and brain isoforms of dystrophin^1,3,4. Although these animals do not display overt muscle weakness or impaired movement, the diaphragm muscle of the mdx mouse is severely affected and shows progressive myofibre degeneration and fibrosis which closely resembles the human disease^5,6. Here we explore the feasibility of gene therapy for DMD by examining the potential of a full-length dystrophin transgene to correct dystrophic symptoms in mdx mice. We find that expression of dystrophin in muscles of transgenic mdx mice eliminates the morphological and immunohistological symptoms of muscular dystrophy. In addition, overexpression of dystrophin prevents the development of the abnormal mechanical properties associated with dystrophic muscle without causing deleterious side effects. Our results provide functional evidence for the feasibility of gene therapy for DMD.Since the appearance of my article commenting on a paper by J. L. Martin et al. in the same issue of Nature (363, 297 & 320-325; 1993), it has come to light that Dr Douglas C. Youvan was solely responsible for the genetic engineering of the bacteria used in the study. This would have been more evident from the original article if more explicit reference and acknowledgement had been made.BRAIN cholinergic neurons are critical for memory function^1,2 and their loss may contribute to memory impairment in Alzheimer's disease^3. One role of cholinergic neurons is to elicit an oscillatory activity called theta rhythm^4 in the hippocampus, a brain region involved in memory processing^5. Theta rhythm occurs during periods of learning^6,7, but its effect on the synaptic plasticity that underlies learning remains unclear. We have studied synaptic plasticity in hippocampal slices during theta-frequency oscillations induced by a cholinergic agonist^8–10. Here we report that during these oscillations, synapses are in a state of heightened plasticity and can be modified by what would otherwise be ineffective stimulation. This heightened plasticity is sensitive to the timing of incoming stimuli with respect to the oscillatory activity. The results suggest that cholinergic systems may affect memory formation through the induction of an oscillatory state in which the requirements for synaptic plasticity are dramatically altered.DISTORTIONS of perception following prolonged exposure to an unvarying sensory stimulus have been observed since at least the third century BC ^1. The motion after-effect is a familiar experience^2 in which, after a few minutes of viewing objects moving in a single direction, a stationary object appears to move in the opposite direction. Similar after-effects have been observed for many visual stimuli, including tilted lines, colours, stereoscopic depth, curvature, spatial frequency, contrast, rotation and motion in depth^3–9. In contrast to the rich variety of visual after-effects reported since the 1960s, reports of analogous auditory adaptation effects only appeared in the 1970s^10–12, but have continued since then^13,14. Some effects of sound source spatial movement perception after adaptation to a spatially moving sound source have been reported^15. Here we report an auditory perceptual after-effect analogous to the visual motion after-effect, which is caused by adaptation to auditory spectral (frequency) motion. After a few minutes of listening to a simple spectral pattern moving upwards or downwards in frequency space, the same pattern sounds as though it is drifting in the opposite direction when it is stationary. The effect shows binaural transfer, implying that it is generated at the level after binaural interaction. After-effects produced by the motion of spectral peaks are independent of those produced by spectral notches, suggesting separate processing channels for spectral peaks and notches.CLEAVAGE of carbon–carbon bonds by transition-metal-containing heterogeneous catalysts forms the basis of one of the most important industrial processes, the refining of petroleum to chemicals and fuels^1. But the generally low product selectivity observed with heterogeneous systems is a significant drawback. For this reason, much effort has been devoted to developing transition-metal complexes that can be inserted into C–C bonds in homogeneous media, as such catalysts can operate under mild, easily controlled conditions and might offer high selectivity and reactivity. Metal insertion into C–H bonds is well known^2,3–5, but, except in a few special cases^2,6–12, C–C bonds are generally unreactive towards insertion of transition metals in solution. Here we report the selective activation of a simple C–C bond by a mononuclear rhodium complex in a neutral homogeneous medium (tetrahydrofuran solution). We are able to effect Rh insertion into a C–C bond in a diphosphinoxylene, in which this bond is favourably oriented towards the transition-metal centre. The competing reaction of insertion into C–H is suppressed by the use of an overpressure of H_2. We suggest that this approach might lead to a general strategy for C–C activation in homogeneous systems.ONE of the most intriguing discoveries of the Ulysses mission so far has been the detection of periodic, collimated streams of high-velocity, submicrometre-sized dust particles emanating from Jupiter^1,2. To explain the Ulysses data, Horanyi et al . showed^3 that electromagnetic forces within Jupiter's magnetosphere can accelerate and eject small dust particles; they proposed a model in which Io is the source of the dust, and the observed periodicity arises from a resonance between the orbital and rotational periods of Io and Jupiter respectively. Here we argue that the masses and velocities of the detected particles are better explained by an origin in Jupiter's gossamer ring. Following their ejection from the magnetosphere, the dust particles are accelerated by the interplanetary magnetic field (IMF). We find that it is the temporal evolution of the IMF which primarily determines the particle trajectories, and hence which particles reach the spacecraft. Our model explains three main features observed in the Ulysses data: fewer streams are detected before closest approach than after, the observed periodicity is closely related to the solar rotation period, and an extremely intense dust stream is detected immediately after closest approach.THE origin of the cosmic X-ray background remains a mystery after thirty years of study. The three properties of the background radiation commonly used for tackling this problem—its spectrum, isotropy and resolved component—are well defined by observations, but do not lead to a simple interpretation. A different approach to the problem^1,2, in which fluctuations in the unresolved component are cross-correlated with galaxy catalogues, has led to the suggestion^2 that as much as 60% of the background emission can be explained by a population of X-ray sources similar to present-day optically bright galaxies. Here we point out that such analyses must allow for contributions from X-ray sources which cluster with the galaxies, but do not necessarily have a counterpart in galaxy catalogues. For realistic assumptions about clustering, we obtain a revised limit on the local X-ray emissivity due to sources correlated with nearby galaxies. Extrapolating these results up to a redshift of ∼5, we find that a smaller, but still significant, fraction of the X-ray background (30 ±15%) can be accounted for by these sources. To explain the residual background emissions, evolution of the source properties and/or a new population of sources at high redshift is required.Nature 362, 462-465 (1993) THE amino-acid numbering of Ect2 and CDC24 in Fig. 2b of this letter is incorrect. The numbers for Ect2 should be 279, 330, 382, 429 and 482 (from top to bottom). Amino acids of CDC24 are numbered according to the initial publication18 and not according to the revised sequence as indicated in the figure legend.LISSENCEPHALY (agyria-pachygyria) is a human brain malformation manifested by a smooth cerebral surface and abnormal neuronal migration^1,2. Identification of the gene(s) involved in this disorder would facilitate molecular dissection of normal events in brain development^3. Type 1 lissencephaly occurs either as an isolated abnormality or in association with dysmorphic facial appearance in patients with Miller–Dieker syndrome^4,5. About 15% of patients with isolated lissencephaly and more than 90% of patients with Miller–Dieker syndrome have microdeletions in a critical 350-kilobase region in chromosome 17p13.3 (ref. 6). These deletions are hemizygous, so haplo-insufficiency for a gene in this interval is implicated. Here we report the cloning of a gene ( LIS -1, lissencephaly-1) in 17p13.3 that is deleted in Miller–Dieker patients. Non-overlapping deletions involving either the 5' or 3' end of the gene were found in two patients, identifying LIS -l as the disease gene. The deduced amino-acid sequence shows significant homology to β-subunits of heterotrimeric G proteins, suggesting that it could possibly be involved in a signal transduction pathway crucial for cerebral development.THE Y chromosome-linked sex determining locus ( Sry ) responsible for testis determination in mammals^1–5 contains a DNA-binding motif (HMG box) that is conserved across species of marsupial and placental mammals (infraclasses Metatheria and Eutheria, respectively)^1,4,6,7. But little to no sequence similarity is observed in flanking sequences between these two infraclasses, or among orders within each infraclass. We investigated the rate and pattern of evolution for the coding sequence of Sry in Old World mice and rats (subfamily Murinae). We found typical rates of synonymous substitution throughout the gene, but high rates of non-synonymous substitution, especially in the C-terminal (non-HMG box) region, when compared to other genes^8. This region is also characterized by a frame-shift mutation and variation in a trinucleotide repeat motif. These data suggest that the non-box region is either functionally unconstrained or has undergone species-specific adaptive divergence.IN mammals, induction of male sex determination requires the Y-chromosome gene SRY ^1. SRY encodes a protein with a central 'high mobility group' domain (HMG box) of about 78 amino acids^1–3. HMG boxes are found in a wide variety of proteins that bind to DNA with high affinity but differing degrees of sequence specificity^4. The human SRY protein binds to linear DNA with sequence specificity^5 and to cruciform DNA structures without sequence specificity^6. The DNA-binding activity of the SRY protein resides in the HMG box and mutations in this region are associated with sex reversal in XY females^6–8. No function has been ascribed to the portions of the SRY protein outside the HMG box. SRY belongs to a family of genes that are related by sequence homology within the DNA-binding domain: the genes most similar to SRY (>60%) have been named SOX genes (SRY box genes). None of the known SOX genes is homologous to SRY outside the HMG-box region. Although SRY is an important developmental regulator, its sequence is poorly conserved between species apart from the HMG-box domain. Here we investigate the coding sequence of SRY in primates and find that evolution has been rapid in the regions flanking the conserved domain. The high degree of sequence divergence and the frequency of non-synonymous mutations suggest either that the majority of the coding sequence has no functional significance or that directional selection has occurred.Ireland needs a champion in the government who will look to the future of the science base.THE intrauterine position relative to members of the same or opposite sex that a rodent fetus occupies affects both its morphology and behaviour when adult^1–14. Female fetuses that mature between males are androgenized by testosterone crossing fetal membranes^15,16, and their phenotypes as adults differ significantly from those of sisters that received less intrauterine exposure to exogenous testosterone^17–20. We report here that adult female Mongolian gerbils that gestated between male fetuses produce litters containing a significantly greater proportion of sons than the litters produced by those that gestated between female fetuses. Consequently, daughters delivered by dams that gestated between male fetuses are more likely to have gestated between male fetuses and be androgenized in utero than are daughters of dams that gestated between female fetuses. Female gerbils thus tend to inherit the phenotype (either androgenized or not androgenized) of their respective mothers.The structure of the segment 1 domain of gelsolin, a protein that fragments actin filaments in cells, is reported in complex with actin. Segment 1 binds monomer using an apolar patch rimmed by hydrogen bonds in a cleft between actin domains. On the actin filament model it binds tangentially, disrupting only those contacts between adjacent subunits in one helical strand. The segment 1 fold is general for all segments of the gelsolin family because the conserved residues form the core of the structure. It also provides a basis for understanding the origin of an amyloidosis caused by a gelsolin variant.Light and Electron Microscopy. By Elizabeth M. Slayter and Henry S. Slayter. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 256. £35, $64.95 (hbk); £14.95, $27.95 (pbk).The Evening Star: Venus Observed. By Henry S. F. Cooper Jr. Farrar, Straus & Giroux: 1993. Pp. 273. $22.All Was Light: An Introduction to Newton's Opticks. By A. Rupert Hall. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 252. £35, $58. Fits, Passions and Paroxysms. By Alan E. Shapiro. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 400. £45, $69.95. Equivalence and Priority: Newton Versus Leibniz. By Domenico Bertoloni Meli. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 318. £55, $72. Newton for Beginners. By William Rankin. Icon Books, 45 Princess Road, London NW1 8JS, UK: 1993. Pp. 176. £7.99 (pbk). The Life of Isaac Newton. By Richard S. Westfall. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 328. £16.95, $24.95.THE discovery of several 'Burgess Shale'-like faunas in the Cambrian has added significant new data to the debate about the nature of the 'Cambrian explosion'. Lobopod animals have emerged as a much more important component of the Cambrian fauna than of the Recent^1,2. A new lobopod-like animal, Kerygmachela kierkegaardi gen. et sp. nov., is now reported from the Lower Cambrian Sirius Passet fauna, north Greenland^3. Although it shares features with other recently described lobopods, it differs in possessing lateral lobes along the body with dorsal gill-like structures attached to them, a feature that may indicate a relationship with the enigmatic Opabinia ^4. The presence of such a gilled lobopod suggests an evolutionary link between lobopods and the clade consisting of biramous-limbed arthropods^5,6. The Cambrian lobopods thus represent a paraphyletic clade from which fully arthropodized taxa were derived. The data from Kerygmachela , when considered with recently published molecular data, may suggest a biphyletic origin for the arthropod grade of organization.WHY do some mid-ocean-ridge axes have as their topographic expression a median valley 1–2 km deep and 15–30 km wide, whereas others have an axial high 100–200 m high and 1–2 km wide? In general, median valleys exist at the axes of ridges spreading at half-rates less than ∼ 20-25 mm yr^−1, whereas axial highs are found at faster-spreading ridges^1,2. A recent crustal genesis model^3, incorporating hydrothermal cooling and crustal accretion by means of a magma lens, agrees well with observations of the spreading-rate dependence of axial morphology^1,2, the depth of the axial magma chamber^3,4 and the thickness of the ridge-axis lithosphere^5,6. But there are several notable exceptions to the correlation between spreading rate and axial morphology, such as the Reykjanes Ridge, which spreads at l0mm yr^−1 but has an axial high. Here we show that by extending the model of ref. 3 to include variations in crustal thickness, we can explain the observed dependence of axial morphology on crustal thickness and spreading rate. Our results suggest that the ultimate control on axial morphology is the thermal structure at the ridge axis, which is a function of both spreading rate and magma supply.STABLE-ISOTOPE ratios of carbon in soils or lake sediments^1–3 and of oxygen and hydrogen in peats^4,5 have been found to reflect past moisture variations and hence to provide valuable palaeoclimate records. Previous applications of the technique to peat have been restricted to temperate regions, largely because tropical climate variations are less pronounced, making them harder to resolve. Here we present a δ^13C record spanning the past 20 kyr from peats in the Nilgiri hills, southern India. Because the site is at high altitude (>2,000 m above sea level), it is possible to resolve a clear climate signal. We observe the key climate shifts that are already known to have occurred during the last glacial maximum (18 kyr ago) and the subsequent deglaciation. In addition, we observe an arid phase from 6 to 3.5 kyr ago, and a short, wet phase about 600 years ago. The latter appears to correspond to the Mediaeval Warm Period, which previously was believed to be confined to Europe and North America^6,7. Our results therefore suggest that this event may have extended over the entire Northern Hemisphere.THE distributions of heat, salt and trace substances in the ocean thermocline depend on mixing along and across surfaces of equal density (isopycnal and diapycnal mixing, respectively). Measurements of the invasion of anthropogenic tracers, such as bomb tritium and ^3He (see, for example, refs 1 and 2), have indicated that isopycnal processes dominate diapycnal mixing, and turbulence measurements have suggested that diapycnal mixing is small^3,4, but it has not been possible to measure accurately the diapycnal diffusivity. Here we report such a measurement, obtained from the vertical dispersal of a patch of the inert compound SF_6 released in the open ocean. The diapycnal diffusivity, averaged over hundreds of kilometres and five months, was 0.11 ± 0.02 cm^2 s^−1, confirming previous estimates^1–4. Such a low diffusivity can support only a rather small diapycnal flux of nitrate into the euphotic zone; it justifies the neglect of diapycnal mixing in dynamic models of the thermocline^25–27, and implies that heat, salt and tracers must penetrate the thermocline mostly by transport along, rather than across, density surfaces.Complaints that molecular biology is indifferent to quantitative considerations are belied by brave efforts to understand the hydration of glucose.Why is the UK's biotechnology industry still nascent? Academic institutions must exploit the commercial opportunities of the research they support if Britain is to remain internationally competitive.Nature 361, 650-654 (1993) SOME of the data reported in the above letter are incorrect. See Scientific Correspondence (this issue-364, 679; 1993) for details.Italy should avoid going to extremes in its attempts to reform the system of drug registration and pricing.There is a danger that Britain will be frightened by the violence of some psychiatric patients into undoing an enlightened policy on care. More resources are a better answer.Nature 363, 603-605 (1993) FIGURE \b in this letter was reproduced with insufficient quality for some labelled features to be visible. The improved version on the right shows the features 4 and 5 (arrowed) that were indistinguishable previously. Also, in the sixth paragraph of the paper, "(arrow 4 in Fig.Differences in culture, industrial practices and government support mean that the role of philanthropic foundations and charities in supporting research differs in the US, Europe and Japan.Quaternary Environments. By M. A. J. Williams D. L. Dunkerley P. de Deckker A. P. Kershaw and T. Stokes. Edward Arnold: 1993. Pp. 329. £16.95 (pbk).Making Science: Between Nature and Society. By Stephen Cole. Harvard University Press: 1992. Pp. 290. $39.95, £31.95.Nearly 240 exhibitors are expected to gather in Chicago next week for the 206th National Meeting of the American Chemical Society, some of whom are featured below.Nature 353, 576-578 (1991) OUR study demonstrated the mobility of the reactive centre loop of antithrombin by its induced insertion into the A-sheet of the same molecule to give the latent L-form. We have since observed that a related process simultaneously occurs owing to the insertion of the reactive centre loop of one molecule into the A-sheet of another.THE DNA topoisomerases are ubiquitous enzymes that fulfil vital roles in the replication, transcription and recombination of DNA by carrying out DNA-strand passage reactions^1–7. Here we characterize a prokaryotic counterpart to the eukaryotic topoisomerase I in the hyperthermophilic methanogen Methanopyrus handleri ^8–10. The new enzyme, called topoisomerase V, has the following properties in common with eukaryotic topoisomerase I, which distinguish it from all other known prokaryotic topoisomerases: (1) its activity is Mg^2+-independent; (2) it relaxes both negatively and positively supercoiled DNA; (3) it makes a covalent complex with the 3' end of the broken DNA strand; and (4) it is recognized by antibody raised against human topoisomerase I. Eukaryotic-like enzymes have been discovered in some hyperthermophilic prokaryotes, namely the eocytes^11 and the extremely thermophilic archaebacteria^12, and hyperthermophilic homologues of eukaryotic DNA polymerase-α, transcription factor IIB and DNA ligase^13–15 have all been reported. Thus our findings support the idea that some essential parts of the eukaryotic transcription–translation and replication machineries were in place before the emergence of eukaryotes, and that the closest living relatives of eukaryotes may be hyperthermophiles.TRANSPORT vesicles derived from the Golgi apparatus are thought to mediate biosynthetic transport across the Golgi stack^1–3. These vesicles are surrounded by a protein coat^4 whose principal constituents are coatomer (a complex of seven distinct subunits or COPs)^5 and ADP-ribosylation factor (ARF, an N -myristylated small GTP-binding protein). The coat proteins of the COP-coated vesicles were originally defined by ultrastructural criteria^4–9, however, and it is possible that important but minor coat proteins or cytoplasmic proteins needed for coat assembly may have been overlooked. Here we show that coatomer and ARF are the only cytoplasmic proteins needed for the assembly and budding of COP-coated vesicles. COP-coated buds may therefore form essentially by self-assembly from Golgi cisternae after an initial step in which GTP is used to allow ARF binding.THE homologous proteins GLP-1 and LIN-12 are required for cell interactions during nematode development^1–5. glp-1 and lin-12 are members of a gene family that includes Drosophila Notch and several vertebrate homologues^6. The members of this family have a single transmembrane domain and a similar arrangement of repeated amino-acid motifs (see Fig. 1). The mechanism by which proteins in this family function is not understood. One hypothesis is that these proteins are receptors, each with an extracellular domain that binds a ligand and an intracellular domain that influences the activity of downstream cell fate regulators. Here we report that a region of the GLP-1 intracellular domain, consisting primarily of six ankyrin repeats, is sufficient to direct cell fate. The cell fate transformations seen are similar to transformations caused by gain-of-function mutations in either glp-1 or lin-12 and do not rely on endogenous lin-12 or glp-1 activity. We propose that the ankyrin repeat region of GLP-1 is responsible for controlling downstream regulators of cell fate.The death two weeks ago of Lord Zuckerman will leave a sad gap in public life in Britain and elsewhere.Evolutionary Developmental Biology. By Brian K. Hall. Chapman and Hall: 1992. Pp. 275. £29.95, £47.50.IT is known that bees, like humans, can learn the orientation of a striped pattern, and recognize this orientation in other simple patterns that they have never previously encountered^1,2. How is orientation analysed by the insect visual system? In the light of what is known about animal vision, there are two obvious possibilities. First, orientation could be determined purely in terms of the directional movement signals that the pattern generates as the bee approaches it or flies past it^3,4. Such a scheme would fit in well with the common supposition that much of insect vision relies solely on motion cues^4,5. An alternative view, not considered for insect vision so far, would be that specific features of the pattern, such as bars or edges, are extracted and their orientation analysed as in the mammalian cortex. Our findings argue strongly against the first and for the second possibility. They suggest that similar principles underlie the analysis of pattern orientation in insects and higher vertebrates.THE idea that female birds choose mates on the basis of genetic quality is a contentious issue in sexual selection^1,2 because empirical evidence is lacking^3,4. Females mating with attractive males may obtain direct benefits such as high quality parental^4–6 or breeding resources^7, or indirect benefits such as offspring of high genotypic quality^8–11. This debate could be resolved if the traits associated with attractiveness in males have a high heritability, and correlate with the viability of their offspring. Here I report the results of a cross-fostering experiment in great tits in which parents raised unrelated young. This showed that the plumage trait associated with attractiveness in males was heritable, and that the viability of male offspring was correlated with the plumage traits of their putative father. These results show that females mating with attractive male great tits realize an indirect fitness advantage.THREE important fossil hominids were found in July 1992 in the Middle Pleistocene cave site called Sima de los Huesos (Sierra de Atapuerca, Burgos, Northern Spain). One is a complete calvaria (cranium 4), the second a virtually complete cranium (cranium 5), the third represents a more fragmentary cranium of an immature individual (cranium 6). There is a large difference in size between the two adult specimens (for example endocranial volume 1,125 cm^3 versus 1,390 cm^3). The Atapuerca human remains are dated to > 300,000 years. The Atapuerca cranial sample fits within the 'archaic Homo sapiens ' group, but is well differentiated from the Asian Homo erectus group. The extensive Atapuerca human collection is the most complete sample of Middle Pleistocene humans yet discovered from one site, and appears to document an early stage in Neanderthal evolution.AT convergent margins, tectonic processes juxtapose subducted slab, mantle wedge and the crust of the upper plate in a column beneath the overlying arc volcano. As each of these components is expected to be chemically heterogeneous, and as all may contribute to magma chemistry, identifying the different sources of arc magmas has been difficult. A working hypothesis has emerged, in which tholeiitic and calc-alkaline lavas in island arcs are partial melts of the mantle produced by fluxing of the wedge by hydrous fluids from the subducted slab^1,2. Trace-element and radiogenic isotope ratios have been used to define the chemical characteristics of these sources but cannot be unequivocally identified with one source; by contrast, high B/Be and ^10Be/^9Be ratios in arc lavas uniquely identify the subduction component^3,4, and thus separate chemical variability owing to recent subduction from that reflecting other causes. Here we combine B/Be with Sr, Nd and Pb isotope systematics of alkaline, calc-alkaline and tholeiitic lavas from Java and Flores, Indonesia, to constrain the isotopic composition of their mantle and subduction sources. The alkaline lavas always have low B/Be, from which we conclude that they are derived from mantle that has not been modified by recent subduction (in agreement with refs 5 and 6). We also show that the isotopic composition of the subducted component is relatively homogeneous along the length of the arc, suggesting that the subduction of Australian continental lithosphere in the east started too recently to have changed the nature of the subducted material at present beneath Flores.THE warming at the end of the last glaciation was characterized by a series of abrupt returns to glacial climate, the best-known of which is the Younger Dryas event^1. Despite much study of the causes of this event and the mechanisms by which it ended, many questions remain unresolved^1. Oxygen isotope data from Greenland ice cores^2–4 suggest that the Younger Dryas ended abruptly, over a period of about 50 years; dust concentrations^2,4 in these cores show an even more rapid transition (≲20 years). This extremely short timescale places severe constraints on the mechanisms underlying the transition. But dust concentrations can reflect subtle changes in atmospheric circulation, which need not be associated with a large change in climate. Here we present results from a new Greenland ice core (GISP2) showing that snow accumulation doubled rapidly from the Younger Dryas event to the subsequent Preboreal interval, possibly in one to three years. We also find that the accumulation-rate change from the Oldest Dryas to the Bø11ing/Allerød warm period was large and abrupt. The extreme rapidity of these changes in a variable that directly represents regional climate implies that the events at the end of the last glaciation may have been responses to some kind of threshold or trigger in the North Atlantic climate system.THE search for new ways of aligning liquid crystals^1 is motivated by their potential for optical and optoelectronic device applications. Rubbing of surfaces coated with an 'aligning agent' can induce an orientational preference in adjacent liquid-crystal films. Most of these surface preparations produce strong anchoring, in which the alignment remains pinned to the surface-induced orientation. But it is expected that for weak interactions with the surface, anchoring transitions may be possible in which the liquid-crystal orientation can be changed continuously, as a function of temperature for example^2. Here we show that an anchoring transition can be observed for liquid crystals in contact with fluoropolymers as aligning agents. We find that the phenomenon might be general, and suggest that it provides the possibility of controlling precisely the angle of liquid-crystal alignment, and a method of producing weak anchoring.CAPPED hollow carbon nanotubes^1,2 can be modified into nanocomposite fibres by simultaneous opening of the caps (by heating in the presence of air and lead metal) and filling of the interior with an inorganic phase^3. To generalize this approach, greater understanding is needed of the reaction mechanism between the tube caps and oxygen. Here we report that the oxidation of carbon nanotubes in air for short durations above about 700 ^°C results in the etching away of the tube caps and the thinning of tubes through layer-by-layer peeling of the outer layers, starting from the cap region. The oxidation reaction follows an Arrhenius-type relation with an activation energy barrier of about 225 kJ mol^−1 in air. Heating of closed nanotubes with an oxide (Pb_3O_4) in an inert atmosphere lowers the activation barrier for the reaction and opening of the tubes occurs at lower temperatures. Contrary to intuition, however, open tubes are much more difficult to fill with inorganic materials than in the one-step filling of tubes reported previously^3. But various other experiments might be possible in the inner nano-cavities of the open tubes such as studies of catalysis and of low-dimensional chemistry and physics.THE discovery^1 and bulk synthesis^2 of carbon nanotubes has stimulated great interest. It has been suggested that these structures may have useful electronic^3–5 and mechanical^6 properties, and these might be modified by introducing foreign materials into the nanotubes. But the tubes are invariably capped at the ends. Ajayan and lijima^7 have succeeded in drawing molten material (lead or one of its compounds) into the tubes by heating them in the presence of lead and oxygen; less than 1% of the tubes in the sample studied could be filled in this way. Here we report that heating in carbon dioxide gas can result in the partial or complete destruction of the tube caps and stripping of the outer layers to produce thinner tubes. In some cases, we have thinned the extremity of tubes to a single layer. The opened tubes can be regarded as nanoscale test-tubes for adsorption of other molecules, and this controlled method of thinning may allow studies of the properties of single tubes.The apparently well-founded discovery that AZT is not a useful drug for the treatment of people infected with HIV does not mean that it is useless in the treatment of those with AIDS.The effects of the inevitable discoveries emerging from the Human Genome Project will be catastrophic for some. Now is the time for preventative action to be taken.ACCRETION disks play an important role in many astrophysical environments, such as active galactic nuclei, protostellar systems, X-ray binaries and cataclysmic variables. The lack of spatially resolved information, however, has meant that theoretical models for accretion disks are in general poorly constrained by observations. Here we use the shape of the light curves from an eclipsing cataclysmic variable, UX Ursae Majoris, to reconstruct the spectral energy distribution (in the range 3,600–10,000 Å) across the face of an accretion disk. The spectral resolution is sufficient to reveal both the radial dependence of absorption and emission line features within the disk, and the spectral details of the bright spot formed at the point where the accretion stream from the secondary star collides with the disk. Such detailed reconstructions of accretion-disk spectra should help to bridge the gap between observations and theoretical models.The TFIID complex consists of the TATA-binding protein (TBP) and associated factors (TAFs) serving to mediate transcriptional activation by promoter-specific regulators. Here we report the cloning of Drosophila TAF_II250 and the assembly of a partial complex containing recombinant TBP, TAF_II110 and the C-terminal domain of TAF_II250. This triple complex supports Sp1 activation and reveals specific interactions between TAF_II250, TBP and TAF_II110.Time's Arrow: The Origins of Thermo-dynamic Behaviour. By Michael C. Mackey. Springer: 1992. Pp. 175. DM98, £40, $49.The British, once a proud nation, have now lost even the trick of organizing horse races, preferring hoaxes instead.The US Supreme Court may produce new criteria for the admissibility of scientific evidence in the courts on the basis of a suit now being heard.Information Theory and Molecular Biology. By Hubert P. Yockey. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 408. £55, $69.95.The Culture of Science in France, 1700–1900. By Robert Fox. Variorum*: 1992. No pagination. £47.50, $89.95.Supercomputing and the Transformation of Science. By William J. Kaufmann and Larry L. Smarr. W. H. Freeman (Scientific American Books): 1993. Pp. 238. £18.95, $32.95.Molecular research tools, gadgets and gismos featured this week include a new instrument for the real-time analysis of molecular interactions, an anitibody for cystic fibrosis research and a hand-held DNA sequence recorder.Novel biochemical processes using magnetic particles have been automated to provide a robotic system to perform processes for large-scale shotgun sequencing.ATTACHMENT of foot-and-mouth disease virus (FMDV) to its cellular receptor involves a long and highly antigenic loop containing the conserved sequence, Arg-Gly-Asp, a motif known to be a recognition element in many integrin-dependent cell adhesion processes^1–7. In our original crystal structure of FMDV the Arg-Gly-Asp-containing loop ('the loop'), located between β-strands G and H of capsid protein VP1, was disordered and hence essentially invisible. We previously surmised that its disorder is enhanced by a disulphide bond linking the base of the loop (Cys 134) to Cys 130 of VP2 (ref. 8). We report here the crystal structure of the virus in which this disulphide is reduced. Reduced virus retains infectivity and serological experiments suggest that some of the loop's internal structure is conserved^8. But here its structure has become sufficiently ordered to allow us to describe an unambiguous conformation, which we relate to some key biological properties of the virus.THE essential Ras-related GTPases^1–2 Ypt1 and Sec4 act at distinct stages of the secretion pathway in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae: Ypt1 is required for vesicular transport from the endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi apparatus, whereas Sec4 is required for fusion of secretory vesicles to the plasma membrane^3–6. Here we use chimaeras of the two proteins to identify a 9-residue segment of Ypt1 that, when substituted for the analogous segment of Sec4, allows the chimaera to perform the minimal functions of both proteins in vivo . This segment corresponds to loop L7 of the p21^ras crystal structure^7. Substitution of a 24-residue Ypt1 segment, including the residues just mentioned, together with 12 residues of Ypt1 corresponding to the 'effector region' of p21^ras (loop L2; refs 7, 8), transforms Sec4 into a fully functional Ypt1 protein without residual Sec4 function.THE genes SEC4 and YPT1 encode Ras-related GTP-binding proteins in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae . Ypt1 is necessary for vesicular transport from the endoplasmic reticulum to the Golgi^1–4 , whereas Sec4 is required for fusion of post-Golgi secretory vesicles to the plasma membrane^5. Recently, three structural domains have been proposed to specify the stage in cellular transport at which members of the Sec4/Ypt1/Rab family act: the effector domain^6, the C-terminal hypervariable region^7, and a region corresponding to loop 7 in the structure of p21^ ras (ref. 8). Here we use Sec4/Ypt1 chimaeras to show that these three regions cooperate to specify Ypt1 function and that the C-terminal hypervariable region is needed for Ypt1 localization to the Golgi. Unexpectedly, we found that a single chimaera can function as either Ypt1 or Sec4 without missorting carboxypeptidase Y or invertase.DURING neurogenesis in Drosophila , groups of equipotential, neurally competent cells choose between epidermal and neural fates^1–4. Notch , a phylogenetically conserved transmembrane protein^5–9, may act as a receptor^4,10 in a lateral signalling pathway in which a single neural precursor is chosen from each group and the neural fate of the other cells is inhibited, causing them to differentiate into epidermis^11–13. Possible intracellular transduction events mediating signals from Notch are, however, unknown, shaggy is also required for the lateral signal^4,14 and encodes serine/threonine protein kinases^15,16 with homology to the glycogen synthase kinase-3 (GSK-3) enzymes^17 that act in signal transduction pathways in vertebrates^17. We report here that, in transgenic flies, GSK-3/β can substitute for shaggy , and we also present a study of epistatic relationships between shaggy and gain and loss of function alleles of Notch . The results indicate that shaggy /GSK-3 is part of a signalling pathway downstream of NotchHEREDITARY non-neuropathic systemic amyloidosis (Ostertag-type)^1 is a rare autosomal dominant disease in which amyloid deposition in the viscera is usually fatal by the fifth decade. In some families it is caused by mutations in the apolipoprotein AI gene^2,3 but in two unrelated English families under our care the amyloid deposits did not contain apoAI, despite a report that this may have been the case in one of them^4. Lysozyme is a ubiquitous bacteriolytic enzyme present in external secretions^5 and in poly-morphs and macrophages, but its physiological role is not always clear^6. Here we report that in these two families, lysozyme is the amyloid fibril protein. Affected individuals are heterozygous for point mutations in the lysozyme gene that cause substitution of highly conserved residues, namely threonine for isoleucine at position 56 in one family, and histidine for aspartic acid at residue 67 in the other. Amyloid fibrils from one individual were composed of the full-length Thr-56 variant lysozyme molecule. To our knowledge, this is the first report of naturally occurring variants of human lysozyme and of lysozyme-associated disease. As the structures of human^7 and hen egg-white lysozyme^8 are known to atomic resolution and their folding and structure–function relationships have been exhaustively analysed, our observations should provide a powerful model for understanding amyloidogenesis.This week's crop of new products from manufacturers in California includes a data acquisition system for the personal computer, an assortment of monoclonal antibodies and a UV-visible spectroscopy systemThe association between insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus and HLA is fearsomely complicated. But powerful techniques are being brought to bear on the problem.THE U6 small nuclear (sn)RNA gene ( SN R6) from the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae is transcribed by RNA polymerase III in vivo ^1. This gene is unusual in having a TATA box at position –30, and an essential B-block element located downstream of the T-rich termination signal^2, 3. The B block is one of the two intragenic promoter elements of transfer RNA genes that are recognized by transcription factor (TF)IIIC (ref. 4). But accurate in vitro transcription of yeast U6 snRNA gene by PolIII in a purified system requires only TFIIIB components, including the TATA-box binding protein TBP^5. Here we report that, after nucleosome reconstitution or chromatin assembly, U6 snRNA synthesis becomes dependent on TFIIIC and on the integrity of the B-block element. This observation resolves an apparent paradox between in vitro and in vivo results concerning the necessity of the downstream B-block element^3, 5 and sheds light on a new role of TFIIIC in gene activation.ECDYSONE in Drosophila has been a paradigm for steroid hormones since its ability to induce gene activity directly was demonstrated by its effects on moulting and polytene chromosome puffing^1–3. The ecdysone receptor (EcR) was recently confirmed as a member of the nuclear receptor superfamily by cloning and characterization in a Drosophila cell line^4. Here we show that EcR needs to heterodimerize with either the retinoid X receptor (RXR)5 or its Drosophila homologue, ultraspiracle (USP)^6, for DNA binding and transactivation. These results place the ecdysone receptor in the heterodimerizing class of the nuclear receptor superfamily and demonstrate that the role of RXR/USP as a central and promiscuous partner in mediating the activity of these receptors^7–12 is highly conserved. Whereas EcR-USP DNA-binding activity is unaffected by hormone, EcR-RXR DNA-binding activity is stimulated by either ecdysteroid or 9- cis -retinoic acid, demonstrating that hormone can play a role in heterodimer stabilization.THE ATP-driven calcium pump (Ca^2+-ATPase) is an integral membrane protein ( M _r 11 OK) which relaxes striated muscle by pumping calcium out of the cytoplasm into the sarcoplasmic reticulum against a large concentration gradient^1. Recent efforts have attempted to relate the sequence of Ca^2+-ATPase to its structure and function. In particular, site-directed mutagenesis has identified critical amino-acid residues^2–6, and its predicted secondary structure, which includes ten transmembrane helices^7, has gained experimental support^8–10. But direct visualization of the molecule has so far been limited to the cytoplasmic domains at low resolution^11, 12. We present here the three-dimensional structure of Ca^2+-ATPase in the native sarcoplasmic reticulum membrane at 14 Å resolution, determined by cryo-electron microscopy and helical image analysis. The structure shows an unexpected transmembrane organization, consisting of three distinct segments, one of which is highly inclined. These features can be related to earlier predictions of secondary structure.THE transcription factor GATA-1 is a fundamental regulator of genes in haematopoietic cell lineages^1, 2 and belongs to a family of factors that bind to the consensus sequence WGATAR^3–5. The GAT A motif was originally identified in cis -regulatory regions of globin and other erythroid-specific genes^6, 7, but the range of genes controlled by the GATA factors has since expanded^1, 7–10. Members of the GATA transcription factor family share a conserved zinc-finger DNA-binding domain, but the expression profile of each GATA factor is distinct^11–13. Here we show that a testis form of murine (m)GATA-l messenger RNA is transcribed from a promoter located 5' to the erythroid first exon, and the remaining exons (which encode the mGATA-1 protein) are used in common by both testis and erythroid transcripts. We use an anti-mGATA-1 monoclonal antibody to show that the factor expressed in erythroid cells is the same as that found in the seminiferous tubules of murine testis. The GATA-1-expressing cells in 10-week-old testis were found only in contact with the basement membrane of seminiferous tubules, suggesting that GATA-1 regulates genes during the earliest stages of spermatogenesisWE have developed an efficient expression cloning system that allows rapid isolation of complementary DNAs able to induce the transformed phenotype^1, 2. We searched for molecules expressed in epithelial cells and possessing transforming potential to fibro-blasts, and cloned a cDNA for the normal receptor of a growth factor secreted by NIH/3T3 cells^3, 4. Here we report a second novel transforming gene, ect2. The isolated cDNA is activated by amino-terminal truncation of the normal product. The Ect 2 protein has sequence similarity within a central core of 255 amino acids with the products of the breakpoint cluster gene, bcr (ref. 5), the yeast cell cycle gene, CDC24 (ref. 6), and the dbl oncogene^7. Each of these genes encodes regulatory molecules or effectors for Rho-like small GTP-binding proteins^8–10. The baculovirus-expressed Ect2 protein could bind highly specifically to Rho and Rac proteins, whereas the dbl product showed broader binding specificity to Rho family proteins. Thus ect2 is a new member of an expanding family, whose products have transforming properties and interact with Rho-like proteins of the Ras superfamily.NATURAL killer (NK) cells are a functionally defined subset of non-T, non-B lymphocytes of bone marrow origin, which induce lysis of selected target cells, including neoplastic and virus-infected cells^1–3. The NK cell function provides an important mechanism of primary defence against viruses in vivo , as demonstrated by the occurrence of multiple herpesvirus infections in patients con-genitally lacking NK cells^4, 5. Here we show that functionally competent CD3^- NK clones can be productively infected by human herpesvirus 6 (HHV-6)^6, a T-lymphotropic DNA virus^7 that may play a role in the acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS)^8 and in the chronic fatigue syndrome^9, two disorders associated with a defective NK cell activity^10–15. The infection is cytopathic and induces de novo expression of CD4, an antigen not expressed within the NK lineage^16, 17, thereby predisposing NK cells to infection by human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1). These results provide evidence that a herpesvirus can directly target and kill NK cells, a potential strategy to suppress the natural anti-viral immunity of the host.THE role of heterotrimeric GTP-binding proteins in signal trans-duction is well established^1. They might also be involved in vesicular transport^2–6. Here we show that in the epithelial cell line Madin–Darby Canine Kidney, transport of influenza haemagglutinin protein to the apical surface is stimulated and that of vesicular stomatitis virus glycoprotein to the basolateral surface is retarded by A1F_(3–5) treatment. Treatment of cells with the reagents known to influence the G_j class of G proteins affected only the basolateral pathway whereas reagents acting on the G_s class of G proteins specifically affected the apical pathway. In permeabilized cells, antibodies raised against the N-terminal domain of the α-subunit of G_s inhibited the transport of haemagglutinin from the trans -Golgi network to apical surface but not between the endoplasmic reticulum and Golgi complex. These observations demonstrate involvement of a Gs class of heterotrimeric G proteins, besides that of the G_i, in vesicular transport2. Moreover, the apical and the basolateral pathways in epithelial cells seem to be regulated by Gs and Gt proteins, respectively, in the trans - Golgi network.THE transplantation of well defined populations of precursor cells offers a means of repairing damaged tissue and of delivering therapeutic compounds to sites of injury or degeneration. For example, a functional immune system can be reconstituted by transplantation of purified haematopoietic stem cells^1, and transplanted skeletal myoblasts and keratinocytes can participate in the formation of normal tissue in host animals^2–4. Cell transplantation in the central nervous system (CNS) has been proposed as a means of correcting neuronal dysfunction in diseases associated with neuronal loss^5–7; it might also rectify glial cell dysfunction, with transplanted oligodendrocyte precursor cells eventually allowing repair of demyelinating damage in the CNS. Here we use co-operating growth factors to expand purified populations of oligodendrocyte type-2 astrocyte (O-2A) progenitor cells for several weeks in vitro . When injected into demyelinating lesionsin spinal cords of adult rats, created in such a way as to preclude host-mediated remyelination, these expanded populations are capable of producing extensive remyelination. In addition, transplantation of O-2A progenitor cells genetically modified to express the bacterial β -galactosidase gene gives rise to β -galactosidase-positive oligodendrocytes which remyelinate demyelinated axons within the lesion. These results offer a viable strategy for the manipulation of neural precursor cells which is compatible with attempts to repair damaged CNS tissue by precursor transplantation.THE implantation of cells genetically modified to express tyrosine hydroxylase has been proposed for the treatment of Parkinson's disease^1. Tyrosine hydroxylase converts tyrosine to L-DOPA and endogenous decarboxylase activity then converts L-DOPA to the neurotransmitter dopamine, which alleviates the symptoms of Parkinson's disease. Immortalized cells have been successfully used as intracerebral vehicles for transgene expression of tyrosine hydroxylase, but the tumorigenic potential of these cells prevents their application in humans^1–4. Intracerebral expression of this enzyme has also been achieved using primary cells like skin fibroblasts^5–7, but the ameliorating effect on a rat model for Parkinson's disease lasted for only a few weeks. We have found that co-transplantation of cultured myoblasts and myotubes enabled reporter genes to be expressed intracerebrally at high and stable levels^8–10. Here we show that the intracerebral transplantation of plasmid-transfected primary muscle cells can substantially reduce for the long-term the asymmetric rotational behaviour in the rat model.CONJUGAL transfer of Ti plasmids from Agrobacterium donors to bacterial recipients is controlled by two types of diffusible signal molecules. Induction is mediated by novel compounds, called opines, that are secreted by crown gall tumours. These neoplasias result from infection of susceptible plants by virulent agrobacteria. The second diffusible signal, called conjugation factor, is synthesized by the donor bacteria themselves. Production of this factor is induced by the opine. Here we show that conjugation is regulated directly by a transcriptional activator, TraR, which requires conjugation factor as a coinducer to activate tra gene expression. TraR is a homologue of LuxR, the lux gene activator from Vibrio fischeri which also requires an endogenously synthesized diffusible coinducer. The two regulatory systems are related; the two activator proteins show amino-acid sequence similarities and the lux system cofactor, autoinducer, will substitute for conjugation factor in the TraR-dependent activation of Ti plasmid tra genes.CONJUGAL opines secreted by crown gall tumours induce strains of Agrobacterium tumefaciens that are donors of Ti plasmids to produce a diffusible conjugation factor^1. This enhances the conjugal transfer efficiency of the Ti plasmid in other strains of A. tumefaciens . This factor behaves as a secondary messenger, transmitting the environmental information to tra genes. Here we report the use of spectrometry to show that this factor is identical to synthetic N -( β -oxo-octan-l-oyl)-L-homoserine lactone and confirm that the synthetic compound is biologically active. N -(Hexan-l-oyl)-L-homoserine lactone has also been detected. A closely related molecule, N -( β -oxo-hexan-l-oyl)-L-homoserine lactone, autoinduces bioluminescence in the distantly related bacterium, Vibriofischeri ^2. N -Acyl-homoserine lactones thus seem to be conserved molecules in which the length and nature of the lipophilic acyl chain determines the biological function to be regulated. Mutants that do not produce the factor fail to conjugate unless supplied with it in the induction medium (our unpublished data). These data indicate that the conjugation factor is an autoinducer and a key signal molecule in the conjugation system of A. tumefaciens . It is, to our knowledge, the first example of a second messenger molecule in a bacterial conjugation system.BOTANISTS have long recognized introgressive hybridization as important in the evolution of plants^1, 2. Hybridization among animals is also common^3, yet few zoologists have considered it evolutionarily important^4–6. We report here that in the genus Gila , a morphologically diverse group of minnows from western North America^7, we have discovered a pervasive influence of hybridization throughout their evolutionary histories. Gene exchange among distinctive forms has contributed to existing diversity, supporting the hypothesis that introgressive hybridization can play a significant role in evolution of vertebrates.UNDERSTANDING the nature of the mantle underlying continents is important for balancing the inventory of the Earth's main chemical reservoirs^1, 2 and for constraining aspects of mantle convection, such as the extent to which continental lithosphere is coupled to the asthenosphere beneath^3–5. Strontium, neodymium and lead isotope studies of basaltic lavas from regions of continental extension, such as the southwestern United States, have identified at least two components of the sub-continental mantle^6: one composed of ancient lithosphere, enriched by the addition of metasomatic fluids or crustal material, and an asthenospheric component with Sr, Nd and Pb isotope compositions matching those of ocean-island basalts. The lutetium–hafnium isotope system^7–9 provides additional information not obtainable from the other systems; in particular, by betraying the presence of garnet during melting^10, 11 (hence constraining the depth of previous melting events of the source mantle). Here we report that basalts derived from upwelling asthenosphere in the region of the Rio Grande rift, southwestern United States, have Nd and Hf isotope ratios that lie significantly off the ocean-island Nd–Hf array^10. We interpret the low ^176Hf/^177Hf ratios in these basalts as reflecting derivation from ancient asthenospheric mantle that melted at shallow levels beneath the oceans. Hafnium isotopes in continental basalts may thus provide evidence for large-scale overriding by continents of sub-oceanic mantle.To assess the response of forests to a changing chemical environment, a means is needed for separating the total cation export from the watershed into a component derived from mineral weathering reactions and a component due to the removal of exchangeable (plant-available) cations in the soil^1–3. We show that this separation may be possible by using ^87Sr/^86Sr ratios as a tracer of cation sources in stream water. Our measurements from a high-elevation forest ecosystem in the Adirondack mountains, New York, indicate that mineral weathering reactions contribute about 70% and soil cation-exchange reactions about 30% of annual strontium exports. Based on these results and the ratios of major cations to strontium in the local glacial till, we estimate the release of Ca^2+, Mg^2+, K^+ and Na^+ owing to weathering. The present weathering rate seems adequate to replace annual losses of cations from the total soil exchangeable pool, suggesting that the watershed is not in immediate danger of acidification from atmospheric deposition. But as our strontium isotope data indicate that 50–60% of the strontium in the organic-soil-horizon exchangeable and vegetation cation pools has an atmospheric origin, reduction of atmospheric cation inputs^4 coupled with continued strong-acid anion inputs^5 may result in significant depletion of this cation reservoir.Britain's best broadcaster may be making a mess of its strategy to win a new charter on favourable terms.The peace agreement over Palestine has been widely taken as a sign that technical and financial assistance is needed urgently in Gaza; the Israelis have a bigger and special part to play.. Life History Invariants: Some Explorations of Symmetry in Evolutionary Ecology . By Eric L. Charnov. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 167. £25, $32.50 (hbk); £13.50, $16.95 (pbk)Veterans at Risk: The Health Effects of Mustard Gas and Lewisite. Edited by Constance M. Pechura and David P. Rall. National Academy Press: 1993. Pp. 448. $39.95Silicon Samurai: How Japan Conquered the World's IT Industry. By Tom Forester. Blackwell: 1993. Pp. 230. £19.99, $24.95Models of even the simplest biological systems madden bench biologists by what seems naivety and pretension, but some of them deserve attention for their more general attributes.Nature 357, 497-499 (1992) IN experiments that used the 2-deoxyglucose technique to label the band/interband pattern in the middle temporal visual area of the owl monkey, animals were injected with 50 fig kg"1 of methamphetamine ~10min before infusion of 2-deoxyglucose. This was not included inthe reference cited in our paper as a description of the method (ref.TRANSCRIPTIONAL elongation involves dynamic interactions among RNA polymerase and single-stranded and double-stranded nucleic acids in the ternary complex^1—4. In prokaryotes its regulation pro-vides an important mechanism of genetic control^1. Analogous eukaryotic mechanisms are not well understood^5, but may control expression of proto-oncogenes^6,7 and viruses, including the human immunodeficiency virus HIV-1 (ref. 8). The highly conserved euk-aryotic transcriptional elongation factor TFIIS^9 enables RNA polymerase II (RNAPII) to read though pause or termination sites, nucleosomes and sequence-specific DNA-binding proteins^10—14. Two distinct domains of human TFIIS, which bind RNAPII and nucleic acids, regulate read-through^10 and possibly nascent transcript cleavage^11—15. Here we describe the three-dimensional NMR^16 structure of a Cys4 nucleic-acid-binding domain from human TFIIS^9—10. Unlike previously characterized zinc modules^17—21, which contain an a-helix, this structure consists of a three-stranded β-sheet. Analogous Cys4 structural motifs may occur in other proteins involved in DNA or RNA trans-actions^22—24, including RNAPII itself^25. This new structure, desig-nated the Zn ribbon, extends the repertoire of Zn-mediated peptide architectures^26 and highlights the growing recognition of the β-sheet as a motif of nucleic-acid recognition^27—28.THE genomes of all eukaryotes contain tracts of DNA in which a single base or a small number of bases is repeated. Expansions of such tracts have been associated with several human disorders including the fragile X syndrome 1 . In addition, simple repeats are unstable in certain forms of colorectal cancer, suggesting a defect in DNA replication or repair^2—4. We show here that mutations in any three yeast genes involved in DNA mismatch repair ( PMS1, MLH1 and MSH2 ) lead to 100- to 700-fold increases in tract instability, whereas mutations that eliminate the proof-reading function of DNA polymerases have little effect. The meiotic stability of the tracts is similar to the mitotic stability. These results suggest that tract instability is associated with DNA poly-merases slipping during replication, and that some types of colo-rectal cancer may reflect mutations in genes involved in DNA mismatch repair.CELLS of the budding yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae bud at either axial or bipolar sites depending on their cell type^1. Bud-site selec-tion directs both cell polarity and the cytoskeletal orientation dur-ing budding and is determined by at least five genes: BUD1/RSR1, BUD2, BUD3, BUD4 and BUD5 ^ 2—4 . Mutants defective in BUD1, BUD2 or BUD5 choose bud sites randomly. Budl protein (Budlp) has sequence similarity to Ras^2, a small GTP-binding protein, and Bud5p is similar to Cdc25p (refs 4, 5), a GDP—GTP exchange factor^6. Here we report that Bud2p is a GTPase-activating protein (GAP) for Budlp with a sequence similar to the catalytic domain of rasGAPs, and that Bud2p purified from yeast stimulates GTP hydrolysis by Budlp. Chromosomal deletion of BUD2 causes a random budding pattern but no obvious growth defect. Overexpres-sion of BUD2 also causes a random budding pattern by wild-type cells^11.TO identify cell adhesion molecules required for angiogenesis, we used an in vitro model in which bovine capillary endothelial cells can be induced to form capillary-like tubes. Monoclonal antibodies directed against the carbohydrate epitopes sialyl Lewis-X and sialyl Lewis-A inhibited capillary formation. We postulated that a member of the selectin family of adhesion molecules may be involved in capillary formation because these proteins bind to sialyl Lewis-X/A-containing ligands. We isolated a 2.8-kilobase comple-mentary DNA from a bovine capillary endothelial cell cDNA lib-rary which encodes a polypeptide with 71% identity to human E-selectin. We report here that antibody directed against the bovine E-selectin inhibited capillary formation, suggesting that in addition to its role in leukocyte adhesion to endothelium, a form of E-selectin is involved in capillary morphogenesis.THE presentation of intracellular proteins to the immune system requires their degradation to small peptides^1,2 that then become associated with major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I molecules^3,4. The generation of these peptides may involve the 20S or 26S proteasome particles, which contain multiple proteolytic activities^5—14 including distinct sites that preferentially cleave small peptides on the carboxyl side of hydrophobic, basic or acidic residues^6,13,14. Degradation of most cell proteins requires their con-jugation to ubiquitin before hydrolysis by the 26S protea-some^6,13—16. This large complex contains the 20S proteasome as its proteolytic core^6,14,16—18. This ubiquitin-dependent proteolytic pathway is implicated in MHC class I presentation^11,12. γ-Inter-feron (γ-IFN), a stimulator of antigen presentation1, induces a subclass of proteasomes that contain two MHC-encoded subunits, LMP2 and 7 (refs 5—10). Here we show that γ-interferon alters the peptidase activities of the 20S and 268 proteasomes without affecting the rates of breakdown of proteins or of ubiquitinated proteins. By enhancing the expression of MHC genes, γ-IFN increases the proteasomes' capacity to cleave small peptides after hydrophobic and basic residues but reduces cleavage after acidic residues. Moreover, proteasomes of mutants lacking LMP sub-units show decreased rates of cleavage after hydrophobic and basic residues. Thus, γ-IFN and expression of these MHC genes should favour the production by proteasomes of the types of peptides found on MHC class I molecules, which terminate almost exclusively with hydrophobic or basic residues^19.PROTEASOMES are highly conserved macromolecular structures which function as endopeptidases^1–3. They are found in the cyto-plasm and nucleus of eukaryotic tissues and consist of at least 14 non-identical subunits with molecular masses ranging from ∼20 to 32K. Proteasomes are essential in the selective degradation of ubiquitinated and certain non-ubiquitinated proteins, acting as the proteolytic core of an energy-dependent 26S (1,500K) proteolytic complex. Two proteasome subunits, LMP2 and LMP7 (refs 4–7), are encoded within the major histocompatibility complex (MHC), implicating proteasomes in antigen processing^8,9. Here we deter-mine the function of these two MHC-linked subunits by comparing the proteolytic activities of purified proteasomes containing (LMP^+) or lacking (LMP^−) these components. We find that pro-teasomes of both types have endopeptidase activity against sub-strates bearing hydrophobic, basic or acidic residues immediately preceding the cleavage site (the PI position) and at sites following asparagine, glycine and proline residues. The activity of LMP^+ proteasomes is much higher than that of LMP^− proteasomes against substrates with hydrophobic, basic or asparagine residues at PI, whereas their activities are comparable when acidic and glycine residues are present at PI. The MHC-linked LMP2 and LMP7 subunits therefore function to amplify specific endopeptid-ase activities of the proteasome.Nature 361, 76-79 (1993) IN Fig. 3 of this letter, the x-axis label should read [Ca2+] (nM) and not [Ca2+] (mM) as published.TYROSINE protein phosphorylation is necessary for antigen receptor-mediated activation of T lymphocytes^1. This signal is generated at least in part by the Src-related tyrosine protein kinases p56^ lck and p59^ fynT (refs 2, 3). The activity of these two enzymes is repressed by phosphorylation of a conserved carboxy-terminal tyrosine residue^2,3. Recent studies suggest that this inhibitory phosphorylation may be caused by p50^ csk (for C-terminal Src kinase), a tyrosine protein kinase which accumulates most abundantly in thymus and spleen^4–8. To investigate the function of Csk in T lymphocytes and characterize the processes regulating T-cell receptor (TCR) signalling, we examined the effects of overexpression of Csk on the physiology of an antigen-specific mouse T-cell line. We report here that p50^ csk negatively regulates TCR-induced tyrosine protein phosphorylation and lymphokine production. This provides evidence for the involvement of Csk in the regulation of T-cell activation.PULMONARY neuroepithelial bodies, composed of innervated clus-ters of amine- and peptide-containing cells, are widely distributed throughout the airway mucosa of human and animal lungs^1–3. Structurally, neuroepithelial bodies resemble chemoreceptors (such as carotid body, taste buds) and are thought to function as hypoxia-sensitive airway sensors^4. Evidence for this is indirect, however, and the mechanism of oxygen sensing by these cells is unknown. Here we culture neuroepithelial bodies isolated from rabbit fetal lungs and identify voltage-activated potassium, calcium and sodium currents using the whole-cell patch clamp technique. Upon exposure to hypoxia there is a reversible reduction (25–30%) in the outward potassium current, with no change in inward currents. In addition, we demonstrate the expression of an oxygen-binding protein ( b -cytochrome, NADPH oxidase) on the plasma membrane of these cells. The identification of an oxygen-sensing mechanism (namely the presence of an O_2-sensitive potassium channel coupled to an O_2 sensor protein^5) in the cells of pulmonary neuroepithelial bodies indicates that they are transducers of the hypoxia stimulus and hence may function as airway chemoreceptors in the regulation of respiration.THE human brain has anatomically distinct areas in which processing is laid out in space at the millimetre level with substantial variation across individuals. Activity occurs along a cortical ribbon 1.5–3 mm thick^1 in response to specific stimuli^2,3. Here we report the first use of cortical ribbon analysis on humans using non-invasive functional magnetic resonance imaging techniques performed with a conventional 1.5 T MRI scanner. Changes in activation were detected using T2^*-weighted, gradient echo imaging sequences. Subjects observed partial field, flashing checkerboard patterns (left–right, top–bottom, half rings, and wedges). Stimuli produced magnetic resonance signal changes in the 1–8% range, varying at the millimetre scale, which showed contralateral vertically reflected patterns of activation in the visual cortex. To compare the spatial topographies across subjects, computer algorithms were used to control for the subject-unique folding of cortex, providing a flattened cortical ribbon identifying four topographically distinct areas.The United States government would do well to follow the advice of Gore's task force.Principles of Physical Cosmology. ByP. J. E. Peebles. Princeton University Press: 1993. Pp. 718. $59.50, á£55 (hbk); $29.95, £19.95 (pbk).AN understanding of the nature of seismic discontinuities in the Earth's upper mantle is important for understanding mantle processes: in particular, the amplitude and sharpness of these discontinuities are critical for assessing models of upper-mantle phase changes and chemical layering. So far, seismic studies aimed at determining the thickness and lateral variability of upper-mantle discontinuities have yielded equivocal results, particularly for the discontinuity at 410km depth^1,2. Here we present short-period (0.8–2.0 s) recordings of upper-mantle precursors to the seismic phase P′P′ (PKPPKP) from two South American earthquakes recorded by the ∼700-station short-period array in California. Our results show that the 410- and 660-km discontinuities beneath the Indian Ocean are locally simple and sharp, corresponding to transi-tion zones of 4 km or less. These observations pose problems for mineral physics models^3–5, which predict a transitional thickness greater than 6 km for the peridotite to β -spinel phase transition. In contrast to the results of long-period studies^6,7, we observe no short-period arrivals from near 520 km depth.OXYGEN isotope measurements in Greenland ice demonstrate that a series of rapid warm-cold oscillations—called Dansgaard–Oeschger events—punctuated the last glaciation^1. Here we present records of sea surface temperature from North Atlantic sediments spanning the past 90 kyr which contain a series of rapid temperature oscillations closely matching those in the ice-core record, confirming predictions that the ocean must bear the imprint of the Dansgaard–Oeschger events^2,3. Moreover, we show that between 20 and 80 kyr ago, the shifts in ocean-atmosphere temperature are bundled into cooling cycles, lasting on average 10 to 15 kyr, with asymmetrical saw-tooth shapes. Each cycle culminated in an enormous discharge of icebergs into the North Atlantic (a 'Hein-rich event'^4,5), followed by an abrupt shift to a warmer climate. These cycles document a previously unrecognized link between ice sheet behaviour and ocean–atmosphere temperature changes. An important question that remains to be resolved is whether the cycles are driven by external factors, such as orbital forcing, or by inter-nal ice-sheet dynamics.MAGNETIC materials of mesoscopic dimensions (a few to many thousands of atoms) may exhibit novel and useful properties such as giant magnetostriction, magnetoresistivity and magnetocaloric effects1–4. Such materials also allow one to study the transition from molecular to bulk-like magnetic behaviour. One approach for preparing mesoscopic magnetic materials is to fragment bulk ferromagnets; a more controllable method is to take a 'bottom-up' approach, using chemistry to grow well defined clusters of metal ions^5,6. Lis^7 has described a twelve-ion manganese cluster in which eight of the Mn ions are in the +3 oxidation state (spin S =2) and four are in the +4 state ( S =3/2). These ions are magnetically coupled to give an S =10 ground state^8, giving rise to unusual magnetic relaxation properties^8,9. Here we report that the magnetization of the Mn_12 cluster is highly anisotropic and that the magnetization relaxation time becomes very long below a temperature of 4 K, giving rise to pronounced hysteresis. This behaviour is not, however, strictly analogous to that of a bulk ferromagnet, in which magnetization hysteresis results from the motion of domain walls. In principle, a bistable magnetic unit of this sort could act as a data storage device.Nature 359, 615-616 (1992)IN Fig. 2 of this letter, the y-'dxis should be labelled as Photons (cm2 s MeV) ' and not Photons (cm2 s GeV) ' as published.THE notion of determinism in classical dynamics has been eroded since Poincaré's work^1 led to the recognition that dynamical systems can exhibit chaotic behaviour, in which small perturbations grow exponentially fast. For a chaotic system, ubiquitous measure-ment errors, noise and computer round-off severely limit the time over which, given a precisely defined initial state, one can predict the detailed subsequent evolution. Practically speaking, the behaviour of such systems is quantitatively non-deterministic. Nevertheless, as the state of the system tends to be confined to an 'attractor' in phase space, at least its qualitative behaviour is predictable. Another challenge to determinism arises, however, when a system has competing attractors towards which an initial state may be drawn. Perturbations make it difficult to determine the fate of the system near the boundary between sets of initial conditions (basins) drawn toward different attractors, particularly if the boundary is geometrically convoluted^2. Recently, mathematical mappings were found^3 for which the entire basin of a given attractor is riddled with 'holes' leading to a competing attractor. Here we present the first example of a physical system with this property. Perturbations in such a system render uncertain even the qualitative fate of a given initial state: experiments lose their reproducibility. We suggest that 'riddled' systems of this kind may be by no means uncommon.THE discovery^1 of the pulsar 1758 – 23 in the vicinity of the radio supernova remnant W28 has prompted speculation that the two might be physically associated. Although the brightening of the supernova remnant in the direction of the pulsar suggests such an association^2, the large column density of electrons in the interstellar medium towards PSR1758 – 23 (evident from the pronounced dispersion of the radio signal) and the anomalously large scattering observed in the pulses seem to indicate^1,3 a distance much greater than that to W28. Here we present new observations which indicate that the large dispersion and scattering of the pulses is instead caused by a dense screen of ionized material located along the line of sight, and thus the distances to the pulsar and W28 can be reconciled. Similar scattering screens have been reported previously^4,5 and appear to be associated with HII regions; the properties of these screens seem, however, to be inconsistent with current models^6 of turbulent structure in the interstellar medium.THE extragalactic radio source 3C273 was the first quasar to be identified^1, and remains one of the nearest and most luminous quasars known. In radio images^2–4, it appears as a bright, point-like nucleus from which emerges a single large jet; the jet is also apparent in optical images^5–8, but the relatively poor resolution of ground-based optical data has hampered detailed comparisons with the radio maps. Here we present high-resolution intensity and polarization maps of the optical jet of 3C273 obtained using the Faint Object Camera on the Hubble Space Telescope. The optical emission is tightly confined to the core of the radio jet, and is resolved into a number of highly polarized knot structures. Both the optical and radio emission can be explained by synchrotron radiation from a stream of energetic particles burrowing into the surrounding medium. Comparison with the radio maps also reveals asymmetry in the emission across the jet, indicating significant lateral motion of the jet relative to the ambient medium. The onset of optical emission from the jet some distance from the nucleus of 3C273 could arise from the interaction of the jet with a shell of gaseous material surrounding the host galaxy.The crystal structure of intact elongation factor Tu (EF-Tu) from Thermus thermophilus has been determined and refined at an effective resolution of 1.7 Å, with incorporation of data extending to 1.45 Å. The effector region, including interaction sites for the ribosome and for transfer RNA, is well defined. Molecular mechanisms are proposed for transductlon and amplification of the signal induced by GTP binding as well as for the intrinsic and effector-enhanced GTPase activity of EF-Tu. Comparison of the structure with that of EF-Tu–GDP reveals major mutual rearrange-ments of the three domains of the molecule.The Soros fund will need the help of an army of referees in the weeks ahead. It should be given what it needs.A rash of anxiety in Britain about prion diseases apparently caused by infectious proteins suggests it is time for the government to change its line on the risks to people of bovine spongiform encephalitis.The ocean is a significant sink for anthropogenic carbon dioxide, taking up about a third of the emissions arising from fossil-fuel use and tropical deforestation. Increases in the atmospheric carbon dioxide concentration account for most of the remaining emissions, but there still appears to be a 'missing sink' which may be located in the terrestrial biosphere.Fossil Horses: Systematics, Paleobiology and Evolution of the Family Equidae. By Bruce J. MacFadden. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 369. £45, $74.95.Why We Nap: Evolution, Chronobiology, and Functions of Polyphasic and Ultra-short Sleep. Edited by Claudio Stampi. Birkhauser: 1992. Pp. 280. DM188, SFrl68, £71, $99.Archaeology, History, and Ouster's Last Battle: The Little Big Horn Reexamined. By Richard Allan Fox Jr. University of Oklahoma Press: 1993. Pp. 411. $29.95.The New Catastrophism: The Importance of the Rare Event in Geological History. By Derek Ager. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 231. £22.95, $34.95.This week's sampler includes a new kit for the rapid purification of polymerase chain reaction (PCR) products, a new matrix for isolating PCR-quality DNA and a kit for PCR amplification of the 5' ends of cDNAs.PROTEIN disulphide isomerase (PDI)^1,2 is a highly abundant and ubiquitous eukaryotic protein that is essential for viability in yeast^3,4. Although PDI is thought to catalyse disulphide bond formation and isomerization during protein biosynthesis, PDI has been found previously to have only moderate effects (∼25-fold) on the rate of oxidative folding of proteins in vitro . In addition, PDI has been implicated in several apparently unrelated cellular functions^3. For example, PDI is the β-subunit of prolyl 4-hydroxylase^5 and is part of the trigylceride transfer complex^6. The oxidative folding of bovine pancreatic trypsin inhibitor (BPTI) is slow and inefficient in vitro ^7–11. Here we report that PDI increases by a factor of 3,000–6,000 the rates of folding of kinetically trapped BPTI folding intermediates, in which native structure impedes disulphide bond formation. By contrast, PDI has only small effects on the rate of disulphide bond formation in intermediates that are oxidized readily in the absence of PDI. These results suggest that an important function of PDI is to catalyse disulphide bond formation and rearrangements within kinetically trapped, structured folding intermediates.INDUCIBLE gene expression in eukaryotes is mainly controlled by the activity of transcriptional activator proteins, such as NF-κB (refs 1–3), a factor activated upon treatment of cells with phorbolesters, lipopolysaccharide^4, interleukin-1 and tumour necrosis factor-α^5. Activation of NF- κ B involves release of the inhibitory sub-unit I κ B from a cytoplasmic complex with the DNA-binding subunits Rel-A (formerly p65) and p50 (refs 6, 7). Cell-free experiments have suggested that protein kinase C and other kinases transfer phosphoryl groups onto I κ B causing release of I κ B and subsequent activation of NF- κ B^8–10. Here we report that I κ B-α (formerly MAD-3)^11 is degraded in cells after stimulation with phorbol ester, interleukin-1, lipopolysaccharide and tumour necrosis factor-α, an event coincident with the appearance of active NF- κ B. Treatment of cells with various protease inhibitors or an antioxidant completely prevented the inducible decay of I κ B-α as well as the activation of NF κ cB. Our findings suggest that the activation of NF- κ B relies on an inducible degradation of I κ B-α through a cytoplasmic, chymotrypsin-like protease. In intact cells, phosphorylation of I κ B-α is apparently not sufficient for activation of NF- κ B.Earlier speculations about the entropy of black holes has prompted an ingenious calculation suggesting that entropy may (in special circumstances) be the same inside and outside an arbitrary boundary.THE proto-oncogene c- jun is the cellular homologue of v- jun , the transforming oncogene of the avian sarcoma virus 17 (ref. 1). c-jun encodes one major component of the AP-1 transcription fac-tor complex and is expressed in many organs during mouse development and in the adult^2–4. Because of its rapid induction in cells following growth stimulation and the presence of AP-1 binding sites in the promoter regions of many genes, the c-Jun protein is thought to have important functions in cell proliferation and differentiation^2,5–10. But embryonic stem (ES) cells lacking c-Jun are viable and have a normal in vitro differentiation capacity, although c-Jun appears to be important for growth of teratocarcinomas in vivo ^11. To define the function of c- jun better, targeted ES cells were used to generate mice lacking c-Jun. Here we report that heterozygous mutant mice appear normal, but embryos lacking c-Jun die at mid- to late-gestation and exhibit impaired hepatogenesis, altered fetal liver erythropoiesis and generalized oedema. Interestingly, c- jun -/- ES cells canUBIQUITIN-conjugating enzymes function in selective proteolysis pathways and catalyse the covalent attachment of ubiquitin to proteolytic substrates^1–4. Here we report the identification of an integral membrane ubiquitin-conjugating enzyme. This enzyme, UBC6 , localizes to the endoplasmic reticulum (ER), with the cata-lytic domain facing the cytosol. ubc6 loss-of-function mutants sup-press the protein translocation defect caused by a mutation in SEC61 , which encodes a key component of a multisubunit protein translocation apparatus of the ER^5–11. The expression of the sec61 mutant phenotype requires both the activity of UBC6 and its localization at the ER membrane. This suggests that UBC6 may mediate selective degradation of ER membrane proteins and that the protein translocation defect of sec61 may be caused by proteolysis of components of a structurally distorted mutant translocation apparatus.THE two forms of pituitary adenylyl cyclase-activating polypeptide (PACAP-27 and -38) are neuropeptides of the secretin/glucagon/ vasoactive intestinal polypeptide/growth-hormone-releasing hor-mone family and regulate hormone release from the pituitary and adrenal gland^1–3. They may also be involved in spermatogenesis^4, and PACAP-38 potently stimulates neuritogenesis and survival of cultured rat sympathetic neuroblast^5,6 and promotes neurite out-growth of PC-12 cells^7. The PACAP type-I receptor (found in hypothalamus, brain stem, pituitary, adrenal gland and testes), specific for PACAP, is positively coupled to adenylyl cyclase and phospholipase C. The recently cloned type II receptor does not discriminate between PACAP and vasoactive intestinal polypeptide and is coupled to only adenylyl cyclase^8. Here we have used a new expression cloning strategy, based on the induction of a reporter gene by cyclic AMP, to isolate a complementary DNA encoding the type-I PACAP receptor. On transfection of this cDNA, both PACAP-27 and -38 stimulate adenylyl cyclase with similar EC50 values (50% effective concentration, 0.1–0.4 nM), whereas only PACAP-38 stimulates phospholipase C with high potency (EC50 = 15 nM). Four other splice variants were isolated with insertions at the C-terminal end of the third intracellular loop. Expression of these cDNAs revealed altered patterns of adenylyl cyclase and phospholipase C stimulation, suggesting a novel mechanism for fine tuning of signal transduction.PEPTIDE hormones, neurotransmitters, and autacoids activate a family of seven-transmembrane-domain receptors^1. Each of these receptors specifically couples to one of several G proteins, G_s, G_i, G_o and G_p, to activate a specific second messenger system^2. Cell surface receptors for prostanoids have been characterized pharmacologically^3 and the complementary DNAs for thrombox-ane A_2 receptor^4,5 and the EP3 subtype of the prostaglandin (PG)E receptor^6 reveal that they belong to the seven-transmembrane-domain receptor family. The EP3 receptor mediates the diverse physiological actions of PGE_2 (ref. 3). Although most of them occur through coupling of the EP3 receptor to G^i and inhibition of adenylyl cyclase, the EP3-mediated contraction of uterine muscle can only occur by activation of another second messenger pathway^7. In chromaffin cells, two different second messenger pathways are activated by PGE2 binding to an apparently single EP3 receptor class_8. Here we show that at least four isoforms of the EP3 receptor, which differ only at their C-terminal tails and are produced by alternative splicing, couple to different G proteins to activate different second messenger systems.DYNAMIN is a microtubule-binding protein with a microtubule-activated GTPase activity^1,3. The gene encoding dynamin is mut-ated in shibire ^4,5, a Drosophila mutant defective in endocytosis in nerve terminals and other cells^6–9. These observations place dyna-min into two distinct functional contexts, suggesting roles in microtubule-based motility or in endocytosis. We report here that dynamin is identical to the neuronal phosphoprotein dephosphin (P96), originally identified by its stimulus-dependent dephosphorylation in nerve terminals^10–13. Dynamin is a protein doublet of M_r 94 and 96K arising by alternative splicing of its primary transcript. In the nerve terminal, both forms of dynamin are phosphorylated by protein kinase C (PKC) and are quantitatively dephosphoryla-ted on excitation. In vitro , dynamin is also phosphorylated by casein kinase II which inhibits PKC phosphorylation. Phosphory-lation by PKC but not by casein kinase II enhances the GTPase activity of dynamin 12-fold. The dynamins are therefore a group of nerve terminal phosphoproteins whose GTPase is regulated by phosphorylation in parallel with synaptic vesicle recycling. The regulation of dynamin GTPase could serve as the trigger for the rapid endocytosis of synaptic vesicles after exocytosis.NEUROTRANSMITTER release is potently blocked by a group of structurally related toxin proteins produced by Clostridium botulinum ^1. Botulinum neurotoxin type B (BoNT/B) and tetanus toxin (TeTx) are zinc-dependent proteases that specifically cleave synaptobrevin (VAMP), a membrane protein of synaptic vesicles^2,3. Here we report that inhibition of transmitter release from synaptosomes caused by botulinum neurotoxin A (BoNT/A) is associated with the selective proteolysis of the synaptic protein SNAP-25. Furthermore, isolated or recombinant L chain of BoNT/A cleaves SNAP-25 in vitro . Cleavage occurred near the carboxyterminus and was sensitive to divalent cation chelators. In addition, a glutamate residue in the BoNT/A L chain, presumably required to stabilize a water molecule in the zinc-containing cata-lytic centre, was required for proteolytic activity. These findings demonstrate that BoNT/A acts as a zinc-dependent protease that selectively cleaves SNAP-25. Thus, a second component of the putative fusion complex mediating synaptic vesicle exocytosis is targeted by a clostridial neurotoxin.The Child's Path to Spoken Language. By John L. Locke Harvard University Press: 1993. Pp. 518. $39.95, £27.95.COPE'S rule―the generalization that animal taxa tend to evolve toward larger body size―suggests that there are widespread net selective advantages to being large^1–4. Size–abundance relationships within bird^4–7 and desert rodent^4 guilds show that larger species usually do control more energy locally, and thus maintain larger populations than expected for their body size, implying that larger individuals are relatively better at obtaining and using local resources. But we report here results that show that this is not generally the case among mammal species. Within dietary groups containing only small species, larger species usually do better, but within those that contain the largest mammals, small species tend to control more energy. This suggests that in mammals there is an optimum body size for energy acquisition at about 1 kg. Thus, net adaptive advantages of large individuals for resource control cannot be used as a general explanation for evolutionary size increase in mammals, although other proposed explanations for Cope's rule are unaffected^8–10. Instead, these results suggest a partial explanation for another widespread ecotypic pattern, the 'island rule': that on islands, small mammal species evolve to larger size and large species to smaller size^11–13. If on an island a species' usual competitors and predators are absent, it should often tend to evolve toward the optimum body size, and the adaptive advantages of doing so would be greatest for populations starting at body-size extremes.THE recent discovery in the Southern Hemisphere (15.5 °S) of a walrus-like skull of a toothed whale (odontocete) from the Pisco Formation of southern Peru presents a startling example of convergence and specialization unprecedented among cetaceans. In contrast to other toothed whales, Odobenocetops peruvianus has no elongated rostrum but has large, ventrally directed premaxillary alveolar processes housing asymmetrical tusks. The dorsally facing orbits indicate the possibility of dorsal binocular vision which could compensate for the absence of the melon, a rostral organ involved in echolocation. Strong muscle scars on the anterior edge of the premaxillae suggest the presence of a powerful upper lip. It is this feature, together with the morphology of the deep vaulted palate devoid of maxillary teeth, that enables us to hypothesize a convergent feeding adaptation with the walrus which feeds mainly on thin-shelled bivalve molluscs, sucking out the foot and/or siphon and ejecting the shell. The structure of the face and basicranium indicates it was a delphinoid cetacean, probably related to the living beluga and narwhal (Monodontidae).HOT springs and hydrothermal vents harbour hyperthermophilic archaea and bacteria with the highest growth temperatures known^1–6. Here we report the discovery of high concentrations of hyperthermophiles in the production fluids from four oil reservoirs about 3,000 metres below the bed of the North Sea and below the permafrost surface of the North Slope of Alaska. Enrichment cultures of sulphidogens grew at 85 °C and 102 °C, which are similar to in situ reservoir temperatures^7,8. Some species were identical to those from submarine hot vents and may have entered the reservoirs in injected sea water. Several enrichments grew anaerobically in sterilized artificial sea water with crude oil as the single carbon and energy source. These hyperthermophiles may be part of novel high-temperature communities and could be responsible for in situ bioconversions of crude oil fractions at temperatures previously considered too extreme for biochemical reactions^4,7,9,10.AEOLIAN ripples are distinguished by coarse-grained crests, finegrained troughs, and thin veneers of coarse grains on the upwind (stoss) slopes. Migration of these sorted bedforms during periods of net deposition results in a characteristic inversely graded stratigraphy that distinguishes aeolian sandstones from those of fluvial origin^1. Here we investigate the formation and evolution of aeolian ripples using a cellular automaton model of a sandbed which incorporates two grain sizes and is subject to the impacts of episodically hopping (saltating) grains. Using this model, we identify the physical processes responsible for both the spatial sorting and the stratigraphic signature of the ripples. High-energy saltating grains are found to eject small grains preferentially from the impact site, leading to a coarsening of the heavily bombarded stoss slopes. Coarse grains do not in general leap far enough to escape the shadow zones on the downwind (lee) slopes, and therefore tend to accumulate and cycle around the ripple crests. Small grains, on the other hand, are ejected at higher velocities, enabling them to hop further. Incorporating net deposition into the model results in a stratigraphy closely resembling thin planar laminae ('pinstriping') found in aeolian sandstones: the inverse grading of grain sizes is a direct consequence of their different hop lengths.This year's most celebrated political autobiography seems not to be recognizable as history of science.The Origins of Order: Self-Organization and Selection in Evolution. By Stuart A. Kauffman. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 709. $75, £55 (hbk); $29.95, £17.95 (pbk).VOLCANOES erupt when the pressure in a magma chamber several kilometres below the edifice overcomes the strength of the intervening rock. Seismic activity may accompany and precede eruptions, allowing (in favourable circumstances) the location and movement of magma to be traced. Ground deformation near volcanoes can provide more direct evidence for magma movement, but continuous monitoring is necessary to ensure that all the essential aspects of an eruption are recorded. Here we report dilatational strain data collected continuously during the January 1991 eruption of Hekla volcano by five borehole strainmeters located 15–45 km from the volcano. The data record the upward propagation of magma, as well as the deflation of a deep reservoir. In only 30 minutes the magma forced open a conduit to the surface from a depth of ∼4km. Although other volcanoes might behave differently, our results suggest the possibility of using continuous deformation measurements to monitor conduit formation at other sites, perhaps providing short-term warnings of impending eruptions.MOST materials shrink laterally and become less dense when stretched. Materials that both expand laterally (that is, have negative Poisson's ratio) and densify when stretched are of interest both from the fundamental and the practical points of view^1–5. A few monocrystalline phases with negative Poisson's ratio are known^3,4, but these do not densify when stretched. Here we present molecular-mechanics calculations for some hypothetical phases of carbon which exhibit both kinds of behaviour. The properties derive from the presence of bonds that act as hinges in extended helical chains. Other unusual properties of these phases include negative thermal expansion, dopant-controlled porosity and low-temperature polymorphism. Such structures can be envisaged for polyacetylene, polydiacetylene, polyphenylene and (BN)_ x phases, as well as for variants of some known, structurally related inorganic phases.THE spectacular 'string-of-pearls' appearance of periodic comet Shoemaker-Levy 9 (1993e) and its impending encounter with Jupiter's atmosphere have caused a flurry of speculation on the likely effects of the impact^1. The magnitudes of the predicted effects depend critically on the masses of the fragments composing the chain, although these are currently poorly constrained. However, some limits on the comet's total size, and hence mass, can be obtained by considering its dynamical history. On its previous swing past Jupiter, the comet apparently passed within the Roche limit of the planet^2,3, and it therefore seems likely that the present chain of about twenty nuclei was created when a single progenitor was split by tidal forces during closest approach. Here we describe a simple model of tidal splitting which is able to reproduce closely both the length of the observed chain and its position angle on the sky as a function of time. The length of the fragment chain is directly proportional to the size of the parent object, which we estimate to have been only about 2 km in diameter.WHEN the Voyager 1 spacecraft flew through the jovian system in January 1979, it returned images of several prominent chains of impact craters on the surface of the moon Callisto (Fig. 1). These impressively straight chains, or catenae, are composed of between 4 and 25 craters, and are up to 620 km long. They were initially thought to be secondary craters produced by debris from a larger primary impact^1, but detailed searches for source craters have been largely unsuccessful: a satisfactory explanation for the crater chains has yet to be found. Inspired by the recent observations of comet Shoemaker–Levy 9, which split into a line of about 20 fragments as it swept past Jupiter^2, we suggest that the impact of previous split comets might be responsible for at least some of the catenae on Callisto. In support of this hypothesis, we find that nearly all of Callisto's crater chains are on the Jupiter-facing hemisphere, as are an additional three catenae that we have found on Ganymede. We present a simple model of tidal breakup which both reproduces the range of observed chain lengths and indicates that the parent comets responsible for the Callisto catenae were typically no more than about 10 km in diameter.IN the standard model for type Ia supernovae^1, a massive white dwarf in a binary system accretes matter from the companion star until it reaches the Chandrasekhar mass (the stability limit for degenerate-electron stars, corresponding to ∼1.4 solar masses), and a runaway thermonuclear explosion ensues. In a popular variant of this model^2, the companion star is also a white dwarf. But regardless of the nature of the companion, the invariance of the Chandrasekhar mass implies that all type Ia supernovae will be similar in luminosity^3, making them ideal 'standard candles' for determining extragalactic distances, and hence the Hubble constant. In the context of the standard model, the recent type Ia supernova SN1991bg is hard to explain: it was underluminous at all observed epochs, leading to suggestions^4,5 that the mass of the progenitor was unusually low. Here we present model calculations, based on more recent spectra, which point to a mass of the white dwarf of ∼0.7 solar masses―well below the Chandrasekhar mass. Moreover, the late spectrum shows evidence of emission from low-velocity hydrogen gas, which might originate in material stripped from an extended, hydrogen-rich companion star. If our interpretation is correct, SN1991bg challenges both the double white-dwarf scenario, and the standard model for type Ia supernovae.Do biological motors move with regular steps? To address this question, we constructed instrumentation with the spatial and temporal sensitivity to resolve movement on a molecular scale. We deposited silica beads carrying single molecules of the motor protein kinesin on microtubules using optical tweezers and analysed their motion under controlled loads by interferometry. We find that kinesin moves with 8-nm steps.In its December 1990 fly-by of Earth, the Galileo spacecraft found evidence of abundant gaseous oxygen, a widely distributed surface pigment with a sharp absorption edge in the red part of the visible spectrum, and atmospheric methane in extreme thermodynamic disequilibrium; together, these are strongly suggestive of life on Earth. Moreover, the presence of narrow-band, pulsed, amplitude-modulated radio transmission seems uniquely attributable to intelligence. These observations constitute a control experiment for the search for extraterrestrial life by modern interplanetary spacecraft.This year's gathering of publishers at Frankfurt has made it plain that the electronic distribution of research data is no longer in the future, but in the here and now.Congress's conference on the budget for the US National Institutes of Health has agreed on a 6 per cent rise.The morphology of the sea floor at mid-ocean-ridge spreading centres provides a key to understanding how ocean crust is constructed. Images of the axial zone of the slow-spreading Mid-Atlantic Ridge, obtained at a range of spatial scales, show that crustal construction is complex and highly variable, reflecting an underlying three-dimensional variability in magmatic, tectonic and hydrothermal processes.Stardust to Planets: A Geological Tour of the Solar System. By Harry Y. McSween. St Martin's: 1993. Pp. 241. $22.95.In Focus, Out of Step: A Biography of Frederick William Twort FRS, 1877-1950. By Antony Twort. Alan Sutton: 1993. Pp. 340. £25, $50.British plans to plot a strategy for research by untested iterative consultation are jeopardized by haste and are potentially flawed by the appearance of consensus.THE NF-κB/Rel family is a growing class of transcriptional regulators^1–11 whose members share the conserved Rel-homology domain, involved in specific DNA binding and dimerization. They interact with the regulatory elements of many different genes and are involved in the regulation of lymphoid-specific and inducible transcription^12. We tested whether these factors could alone activate a gene in transgenic mice. We report here that a minimal promoter containing three copies of a binding site for these proteins allows tissue-specific and inducible transgene activation. In lymphoid tissues constitutive transgene expression correlates with the presence of a constitutively active p50/RelB heterodimer. Other organs that only contain the p50 homodimer do not express the transgene. In contrast to this constitutive activity mediated by p50/RelB, the p50/p65 heterodimer (which is NF-κB) could confer inducible transgene activation in embryo fibroblasts. Thus two different members of the NF-κB/Rel family of transcriptional activators are involved in tissue-specific and inducible gene activation in transgenic mice.LOSS of heterozygosity in certain human embryonal tumours implicates a tumour-suppressor gene at chromosome 11p15.5 and selective loss of maternal alleles suggests that this gene is paternally imprinted^1–4. The human HI9 gene maps to 11p1S.5, is expressed in differentiating fetal cells^5–11 and is paternally imprinted^12–16. We report here that two embryonal tumour cell lines, RD and G401, showed growth retardation and morphological changes when transfected with an H19 expression construct. More importantly, clonogenicity in soft agar and tumorigenicity in nude mice were abrogated in the G401-H19 transfectants. In addition to demonstrating its tumour-suppressor potential, this transfection system should help structural and functional studies of the enigmatic H19 gene.HIGH-DENSITY lipoprotein (HDL) contains two major proteins, apolipoprotein A-I (apoA-I) and apolipoprotein A-II (apoA-II), comprising about 70% and 20% of the total HDL protein mass, respectively. HDL exists in human plasma in two main forms, one containing apoA-I with apoA-II (AI/AII-HDL) and another containing apoA-I without apoA-II (AI-HDL). A strong inverse relationship exists between total plasma HDL concentration and atherosclerosis, but the results of studies examining the relationship between AI-HDL and AI/AII-HDL and atherosclerosis have been conflicting^1–9. To determine whether these two HDL populations have different effects on atherogenesis, human apoA-I (AI) and human apoA-I and apoA-II (AI/AII) transgenic mice were produced in an atherosclerosis-susceptible strain^10–12. Following an atherogenic diet, despite similar total cholesterol and HDL cholesterol concentrations, the area of atherogenic lesions in the AI/AII mice was 15-fold greater than in the AI animals. These studies show that the protein composition of HDL significantly affects its role in atherogenesis and that AI-HDL is more anti-atherogenic than AI/AII-HDL.S^INCE its discovery^1, endothelin-1 has attracted considerable scientific interest because of its extremely potent and long-lasting vasoconstrictor effect and its binding to G-protein-coupled receptors^2. Plasma concentrations of endothelin-1 are low^3 and its release by endothelial cells is polarized towards the basolateral side^4,5, suggesting that it is a paracrine factor and not a hormone. Consequently, the effect of injected endothelin-1 may not reflect the effect of endogenous endothelin-1. In contrast, blockade of the action of endogenous endothelin-1 using receptor antagonists should be a valuable means of investigating its physiological and pathological effects. We report here evidence for the pathophysiological role of endothelin-1 as brought by the first synthetic orally active non-peptide antagonist of endothelin receptors, Ro 46-2005.CYTOKINES are critical in the often fatal cascade of events that cause septic shock^1–3. One regulatory system that is likely to be important in controlling inflammatory responses is the neuroendocrine axis. The pituitary, for example, is ideally situated to integrate central and peripheral stimuli^4, and initiates the increase in systemic glucocorticoids that accompanies host stress responses^6–8. To assess further the contribution of the pituitary to systemic inflammatory processes, we examined the secretory profile of cultured pituitary cells and whole pituitaries in vivo after stimulation with bacterial lipopolysaccharide (LPS). Here we identify macrophage migration inhibitory factor (MIF)^9–11 as a major secreted protein released by anterior pituitary cells in response to LPS stimulation. Serum analysis of control, hypophysectomized and T-cell-deficient (nude) mice suggests that pituitary-derived MIF contributes to circulating MIF present in the post-acute phase of endotoxaemia. Recombinant murine MIF greatly enhances lethality when co-injected with LPS and anti-MIF antibody confers full protection against lethal endotoxaemia. We conclude that MIF plays a central role in the toxic response to endotoxaemia and possibly septic shock.PATIENTS with damage to the dorsolateral prefrontal cortex are impaired on cognitive tasks such as the Wisconsin Card Sort Test^1, the Stroop Test^2 and an anti-saccade paradigm^3, in which sensory-guided habitual responses must be suppressed in favour of conceptually or memory-guided responses. We report here recordings from prefrontal neurons in rhesus monkeys trained to perform a delayed anti-saccade task based on tests that have been used with humans^3. Activity in the same prefrontal neurons was recorded across conditions when saccades were made toward a remembered target, and also when this prepotent response was suppressed and a saccade in the opposite direction required. Our findings show that most prefrontal neurons code the location of the visual stimulus in working memory, and that this memory can be engaged to suppress as well as prescribe a response. These results establish, in a subset of prefrontal neurons, the iconic nature of the memory code, and suggest a role for visual memory in response suppression.HONEYBEES remember the shapes of flowers and are guided by visual landmarks on their foraging trips^1,2. How insects recognize visual patterns is poorly understood. Experiments suggest that they try to match retinotopically the incoming visual pattern with a previously stored memory image^2–7. But bees can be conditioned to individual pattern parameters such as orientation of contours, colour or size^2,8–11. These and other results are difficult to reconcile with simple template matching. In such investigations, freely moving animals are observed; their behaviour and visual input, therefore, are not well known. Mostly, processing strategies are inferred from stimulus design. We have studied visual pattern recognition with tethered flies ( Drosophila melanogaster ) in a flight simulator and report here that flies store visual images at, or together with, fixed retinal positions and can retrieve them from there only^5. Position invariance, an acknowledged property of human pattern recognition, may not exist as a primary mechanism in insects.The World of Physical Chemistry. By Keith J. Laidler. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 476. £55, $85.THE pituitary hormone thyrotropin stimulates the function, expression of differentiation and growth of thyrocytes by cyclic AMP-dependent mechanisms^1–3. Tissue hyperplasia and hyperthyroidism are therefore expected to result when activation of the adenylyl cyclase–cAMP cascade is unregulated. This is observed in several situations^4,5, including when somatic mutations impair the GTPase activity of the G protein G_sα (refs 6, 7). Such a mechanism is probably responsible for the development of a minority of monoclonal hyperfunctioning thyroid adenomas^6,8,9. Here we identify somatic mutations in the carboxv-terminal portion of the third cytoplasmic loop of the thyrotropin receptor in three out of eleven hyperfunctioning thyroid adenomas. These mutations are restricted to tumour tissue and involve two different residues (aspartic acid at position 619 to glycine in two cases, and alanine at position 623 to isoleucine in one case). The mutant receptors confer constitutive activation of adenylyl cyclase when tested by transfection in COS cells. This shows that G-protein-coupled receptors are susceptible to constitutive activation by spontaneous somatic mutations^10,11 and may thus behave as proto-oncogenes.THE bone morphogenetic protein (BMP) family is a conserved group of signalling molecules within the transforming growth fact-or-β (TGF-β) superfamily^1,2. This group, including the Drosophila decapentaplegic (dpp) protein and the mammalian BMPs, mediates cellular interactions and tissue differentiation during development^3,4. Here we show that a homologue of human BMPs controls a developmental switch in the life cycle of the free-living soil nematode Caenorhabditis elegans . Starvation and overcrowding induce C. elegans to form a developmentally arrested, third-stage dauer larva^5. The daf-4 gene, which acts to inhibit dauer larva formation and promote growth, encodes a receptor protein kinase similar to the daf-1 , activin and TGF-β receptor serine/ threonine kinases. When expressed in monkey COS cells, the daf-4 receptor binds human BMP-2 and BMP-4. The daf-4 receptor is the first to be identified for any growth factor in the BMP family.THE role of infection in the pathogenesis of clinical relapses that occur in most autoimmune diseases, including multiple sclerosis, remains to be established^1,2. Experimental autoimmune encephalomyelitis (EAE) serves as a model for multiple sclerosis, with episodes of relapsing paralysis^3–9. In certain strains of mice, T-lym-phocytes expressing the V/β8 T-cell receptor (TCR)^6–8 engage the amino-terminal epitope Ac 1–11 of myelin basic protein, leading to EAE. The bacterial superantigen staphylococcal enterotoxin B (SEB) activates V/β8-expressing T cells. Here we show that after immunization with Ac 1–11, or after transfer of encephalitogenic T-cell lines or clones reactive to Acl-11, SEB induces exacerbation or relapses of paralytic disease in mice that are in clinical remission following an initial episode of paralysis, and triggers paralysis in mice with subclinical disease. Tumour necrosis factor has a critical role in the mechanism underlying SEB-induced exacerbation of disease, because anti-tumour necrosis factor antibody given in vivo delays the onset of paralysis triggered by SEB. On reactivation of autoaggressive cells through their T-cell receptor, superantigens may induce clinical relapses of autoimmune disease.SOCIAL insect colonies are in many ways analogous to organisms^1, because kin-selected workers act selflessly and cohesively to promote the fitness of a few reproductive members^2,3. But workers can evolve selfish strategies which create reproductive conflict, reducing the functional integrity of colonies. For example, they can lay unfertilized (male) eggs^3–6, compete directly with the queen to lay fertilized (female) eggs^7, suppress the reproduction of other workers^8,9, choose among several queens^10 and generally favour closer over more distant kin^11. Conflicts over the sex ratio may be especially pervasive, even in highly eusocial insects. The unusually high relatedness ( r = 3/4) of female hymenopteran workers to their full sisters means that workers should prefer more female-biased sex ratios than do queens^4. The worker preference for females should be exerted most strongly on colonies where they are most likely to be full sisters, leaving male production to colonies where this advantage least applies^4,12–14; this prediction is supported by studies in ants and bees^12,15–17. Here we show that when colonies havezmultiple queens born in the same nest, the selfish worker sex-ratio strategy has a paradoxical side-effect which strongly promotes social cohesion. This strategy accounts for the peculiar colony cycle of epiponine wasps, and may be responsible for the maintenance of eusociality in this group.LATITUDINAL gradients of species diversity are ubiquitous features of terrestrial and coastal marine biotas, and they have inspired the development of theoretical ecology^1–3. Since the discovery of high species diversity in the deep-sea benthos4, much has been learned about local^5,6and regional^7–9patterns of diversity. Variation in diversity on larger scales remains poorly described. Latitudinal gradients of diversity were unexpected because it was assumed that the environmental gradients that cause large-scale patterns in surface environments could not affect communities living at great depths^10. Here we report that deep-sea bivalves, gastropods and isopods show clear latitudinal diversity gradients in the North Atlantic, and strong interregional variation in the South Atlantic. Many seemingly incompatible mechanisms have been proposed to explain deep-sea species diversity^11. The existence of regular global patterns suggests that these mechanisms operate at different spatial and temporal scales.IT has been suggested^1–6that in many cases the average strength of the continental crust is quite low (tens of megapascals), so that the crust has little effect on the large-scale deformation of the lithosphere. But laboratory friction studies^7,8, combined with simple faulting theory^9,10 (as well as extrapolation of in situ stress measurements from the upper 3 km of the crust^11), imply that if pore pressure is approximately hydrostatic at mid-crustal depth, crustal strength is appreciable (hundreds of megapascals) and would markedly constrain the nature of lithospheric deformation^12–15. Here we report estimates of the magnitude of in situ stresses to 6 km depth in the KTB borehole in southern Germany. Our results indicate a high-strength upper crust, in which the state of stress is in equilibrium with its frictional strength. We suggest that plate-driving forces in the continental lithosphere in this part of western Europe are transmitted principally through the upper crust, and that this may also be the case in other continental areas of moderate to elevated heat flow.THEORIES for the origin of life require the availability of reduced (or 'fixed') nitrogen-containing compounds, in particular ammonia. In reducing atmospheres, such compounds are readily formed by electrical discharges^1,2, but geochemical evidence suggests that the early Earth had a non-reducing atmosphere^1,3–6, in which discharges would have instead produced NO (refs 7–10). This would have been converted into nitric and nitrous acids and delivered to the early oceans as acid rain^11. It is known^12–15, however, that Fe(II) was present in the early oceans at much higher concentrations than are found today, and thus the oxidation of Fe(II) to Fe(III) provides a possible means for reducing nitrites and nitrates to ammonia. Here we explore this possibility in a series of experiments which mimic a broad range of prebiotic seawater conditions (the actual conditions on the early Earth remain poorly constrained). We find that the reduction by Fe(II) of nitrites and nitrates to ammonia could have been a significant source of reduced nitrogen on the early Earth, provided that the ocean pH exceeded 7.3 and is favoured for temperatures greater than about 25 °C.CONJUGATED polymers have been incorporated as active materials into several kinds of electronic device, such as diodes, transistors^1 and light-emitting diodes^2. The first polymer light-emitting diodes were based on poly( p -phenylene vinylene) (PPV), which is robust and has a readily processible precursor polymer. Electroluminescence in this material is achieved by injection of electrons into the conduction band and holes into the valence band, which capture one another with emission of visible radiation. Efficient injection of electrons has previously required the use of metal electrodes with low work functions, primarily calcium; but this reactive metal presents problems for device stability. Here we report the fabrication of electroluminescent devices using a new family of processible poly(cyanoterephthalylidene)s. As the lowest unoccupied orbitals of these polymers (from which the conduction band is formed) lie at lower energies than those of PPV, electrodes made from stable metals such as aluminium can be used for electron injection. For hole injection, we use indium tin oxide coated with a PPV layer; this helps to localize charge at the interface between the PPV and the new polymer, increasing the efficiency of recombination. In this way, we are able to achieve high internal efficiencies (photons emitted per electrons injected) of up to 4% in these devices.ACTIVE galaxies, of which Seyfert galaxies are a subgroup, are thought to be powered by the accretion of gas onto a massive black hole at the galaxy centre; the X-rays emitted by active galactic nuclei arise from the heated, Mailing gas. The observed rapid variability of this X-ray emission requires a compact source, providing additional support for the black-hole hypothesis. The Seyfert galaxy NGC6814 has been thought to be unique among active galaxies, in exhibiting not simply variability but a periodicity of ∼12,100 s in its X-ray luminosity^1–4. Many exotic theories have been proposed to explain this periodicity, including gravitational lensing of hotspots on the accretion disk by the central black hole^5–7 or the effects of a captured star orbiting the black hole^4,8–10. Here we show, using data from the Rosat X-ray telescope, that although the 12,100 s period is indeed real and stable, it is not associated with NGC6814. Instead, the periodic emission arises from another source, 37 arcmin away from NGC6814, which is probably an object in our Galaxy―for example, a white dwarf accreting gas (from a giant companion) onto its poles.THE flat rotation curves of spiral galaxies, including our own, indicate that they are surrounded by unseen haloes of ‘dark matter’^1,2. In the absence of a massive halo, stars and gas in the outer portions of a galaxy would orbit the centre more slowly, just as the outer planets in the Solar System circle the Sun more slowly than the inner ones. So far, however, there has been no direct observational evidence for the dark matter, or its characteristics. Paczyński^3suggested that dark bodies in the halo of our Galaxy can be detected when they act as gravitational ‘microlenses’, amplifying the light from stars in nearby galaxies. The duration of such an event depends on the mass, distance and velocity of the dark object. We have been monitoring the brightness of three million stars in the Large Magellanic Cloud for over three years, and here report the detection of two possible microlensing events. The brightening of the stars was symmetrical in time, achromatic and not repeated during the monitoring period. The timescales of the two events are about thirty days and imply that the masses of the lensing objects lie between a few hundredths and one solar mass. The number of events observed is consistent with the number expected if the halo is dominated by objects with masses in this range. In 1986, Bohdan Paczynski suggested that dark, compact objects in the halo of our Galaxy — the local cousins of similar objects conjectured to contribute dark matter to the haloes of other galaxies — could be detected on Earth, as their gravitation might occasionally amplify the light arriving from more distant stars. In 1993, in surveys of several million stars in the Large Magellanic Cloud, C. Alcock et al. and E. Aubourg et al. observed several candidate events. In total, the two groups detected three stars for which the brightness increased by two magnitudes over an interval of roughly one month.THERE is now abundant evidence for the presence of large quantities of unseen matter surrounding normal galaxies, including our own^1,2. The nature of this ’dark matter‘ is unknown, except that it cannot be made of normal stars, dust or gas, as they would be easily detected. Exotic particles such as axions, massive neutrinos or other weakly interacting massive particles (collectively known as WIMPs) have been proposed^3,4, but have yet to be detected. A less exotic alternative is normal matter in the form of bodies with masses ranging from that of a large planet to a few solar masses. Such objects, known collectively as massive compact halo objects^5 (MACHOs), might be brown dwarfs or ‘jupiters’ (bodies too small to produce their own energy by fusion), neutron stars, old white dwarfs or black holes. Paczynski^6 suggested that MACHOs might act as gravitational microlenses, temporarily amplifying the apparent brightness of background stars in nearby galaxies. We are conducting a microlensing experiment to determine whether the dark matter halo of our Galaxy is made up of MACHOs. Here we report a candidate for such a microlensing event, detected by monitoring the light curves of 1.8 million stars in the Large Magellanic Cloud for one year. The light curve shows no variation for most of the year of data taking, and an upward excursion lasting over 1 month, with a maximum increase of ∼2 mag. The most probable lens mass, inferred from the duration of the candidate lensing event, is ∼0.1 solar mass. In 1986, Bohdan Paczynski suggested that dark, compact objects in the halo of our Galaxy — the local cousins of similar objects conjectured to contribute dark matter to the haloes of other galaxies — could be detected on Earth, as their gravitation might occasionally amplify the light arriving from more distant stars. In 1993, in surveys of several million stars in the Large Magellanic Cloud, C. Alcock et al. and E. Aubourg et al. observed several candidate events. In total, the two groups detected three stars for which the brightness increased by two magnitudes over an interval of roughly one month.The path to European unity has been strewn with obstacles since the collapse of the European Exchange Rate Mechanism and will hardly be clarified at the summit meeting arranged for 29 October. But something can be done.The period-doubling route to chaos is a well known feature of a range of simple, nonlinear difference equations routinely used in modelling biological populations. It is not generally understood, however, that the process may easily break down and suddenly reverse, giving rise to distinctive period-halving bifurcations. These reversals may act to control, and possibly prevent, the onset of chaos.Hands of Primates. Edited byH. Preuschoft andD. J. Chivers. Springer: 1993. Pp. 421. DM198, $136, £78.50.Sir Francis Galton, FRS: The Legacy of his Ideas. ByMilo Keynes. Macmillan: 1993. Pp. 237. £40.The New Protectionism: Protecting the Future Against Free Trade. ByTim Lang andColin Hines. Earthscan: 1993. Pp. 184. £10.99 (pbk).A History of Warfare. ByJohn Keegan. Hutchinson/Knopf: 1993. Pp. 432. £20/$27.50.CLATHRIN is the structural protein of coated membranes involved in receptor-mediated endocytosis and aspects of Golgi sorting in eukaryotic cells. We have now detected a stoichiometric complex of clathrin with a novel protein of M _r ~100,000 (100K) in lysates of different mammalian cells. Formation of the complex, which also includes the 70K heat-shock protein HscTO, occurs within 15 min of synthesis. The 100K protein has been identified as valosin-containing protein (VCP; ref. 1), an early substrate for tyrosine phosphorylation on T-cell receptor activation^2. Further, VCP is the mammalian homologue of yeast Cdc48p (ref. 3) and is a member of a larger gene family that includes putative ATP-binding proteins involved in vesicle transport and fusion^4,5, 26S proteasome function^6, regulation of the expression of human immunodeficiency virus^7,8, and assembly of peroxisomes^9. The association with clathrin and the morphological and catalytic similarity to the chaperonin proteins indicate that VCP may modulate protein-protein interactions in membrane transport processes.MANY hormones or neurotransmitters act at cell surface receptors to increase the intracellular free calcium concentration, triggering a wide range of cellular responses^1. As the source of this Ca^2+ is often internal stores, additional messengers are required to convey the hormonal message from the plasma membrane. Cyclic ADP-ribose (cADPR) has been proposed as the endogenous activator of Ca^2+-induced Ca^2+ release by the ryanodine receptor in sea urchin eggs and in several mammalian cell types^2–8,22. A second messenger role for cADPR requires that its intracellular levels be under the control of extracellular stimuli. Here we demonstrate a novel action of 3',5'-cyclic guanosine monophosphate (cGMP) in stimulating the synthesis of cADPR from β-NAD^+ by activating its synthetic enzyme ADP-ribosyl cyclase^9–11 in sea urchin eggs and egg homogenates. We suggest that cADPR may transduce signals generated by cell surface receptors or gaseous transmitters linked to cGMP production.IN muscle each myosin head contains a regulatory light chain (LC2) that is wrapped around the head/rod junction, and an alkali light chain that is distal to LC2 (ref. 1). The role of these light chains in vertebrate skeletal muscle myosin has remained obscure^2,3. Here we prepare heavy chains that are free of both light chains in order to determine by a motility assay^4 whether the light chains are necessary for movement. We find that removal of light chains from myosin reduces the velocity of actin filaments from 8.8 µm s ^–1 to 0.8 µm s ^–1 without significantly decreasing the ATPase activity. Reconstitution of myosin with LC2 or alkali light chain increases filament velocity to intermediate rates, and readdition of both classes of light chains fully restores the original sliding velocity. We conclude that even though the light chains are not essential for enzymatic activity, light-chain/heavy-chain interactions play an important part in the conversion of chemical energy into movement.THE reverse transcriptase enzyme of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) is the target for many inhibitors^1. Amino-acid substitutions in functional regions of the enzyme that abolish reverse transcriptase activity also prevent HIV-1 replication^2,3. But selection pressure by drugs such as AZT (3'-azido-3'-deoxythymid-ine, zidovudine)^4–6, ddl (2',3'-dideoxyinosine)^7,8 and non-nucleoside reverse transcriptase inhibitors (NNRTIs)^9–14 causes outgrowth of resistant variants due to non-lethal mutations in the enzyme^7,9–16. Reports of synergy^17–19 and lack of cross-resistance between reverse transcriptase inhibitors (refs 7, 9, 10, 12–14, 17, 18, 20, 21), plus the reversal of AZT resistance by mutations induced by ddl7 and NNRTIs^14, have indicated that specific drug combinations directed at reverse transcriptase might curtail resistance. Chow et al .^22 extended this concept in a report that specific multiple combinations of resistance mutations in the reverse transcriptase can significantly impair HIV-1 replication. They concluded that evolutionary limitations may exist to prevent the emergence of multidrug resistance to inhibitors of reverse transcriptase^22. We report here that HIV-1 co-resistant to AZT, ddl and the NNRTI nevirapine^23 can be readily selected in cell culture starting with dual AZT- and ddl-resistant virus. We found no evidence for 'replication incompatible' combinations of resistance mutations, although a mutation (M184→V) conferring oxathiolane-cytosine nucleoside resistance in reverse transcriptase^24,25 completely sup-pressed AZT resistance in a triple-resistant background. These in vitro observations suggest that triple drug combination therapy might ultimately result in co-resistant HIV-1, although they do not preclude assessment of such combinations for treatment of HIV-1 disease.THE nuclear proto-oncoprotein Myc has been implicated in the control of cell proliferation and differentiation^1–3. Myc participates in transcription^4,5 and belongs to the basic–helix–loop–helix (bHLH) family of regulatory proteins^2,3. Here we show that Myc interacts with TFII-I, a transcription initiation factor that activates core promoters through an initiator element (Inr)^6. As previously observed for the bHLH activator USF^6, Myc was found to interact cooperatively with TFII-I at both Inr and upstream E-box promoter elements. However, in this case Myc interactions with TFII-I at the Inr lead to an inhibition of transcription initiation. This inhibition is selective for a TFII-I-dependent (as opposed to TFIIA-dependent) initiation pathway and correlates with the prevention of complex formation between the TATA-binding protein TBP (TFIIDτ), TFII-I and the promoter. TBP probably interacts with Myc, but only slowly. These observations indicate that Myc has the potential to interact physically and functionally with components of the general transcription machinery.THE minimal promoter elements required for initiation by RNA polymer ase II include the TAT A box and/or an initiator element (Inr) at or near the transcription start site^1–4. Studies of the adenovirus major late core promoter (containing both elements) have demonstrated an initiation pathway that involves binding of the transcription factor TFIID (or the derived subunit, the TATA-binding protein TBP (TFIIDτ)) to the TATA element, which is facilitated by transcription factor TFIIA, followed by sequential interactions of other general factors^4–8. Here we describe a novel pathway that requires an intact Inr and the Inr-binding factor TFII-I (ref. 3). Sequential addition of the general factors generated TFII-I-dependent preinitiation complexes different from those formed with TFIIA. Furthermore, TBP bound cooperatively (with only TFII-I) to an Inr-containing TATA-less promoter, suggesting a means for activation of TATA-less promoters, which nonetheless require TFIID (refs 9–11). These observations provide support for functionally distinct pathways which could be subject to differential regulation by specific activators or repressers.TRANSCRIPTION of lymphokine genes in activated T cells is inhibited by the immunosuppressive agents cyclosporin A and FK506, which act by blocking the phosphatase activity of calcineurin^1–3. NFAT, a DNA-binding protein required for interleukin-2 gene transcription, is a potential target for calcineurin, cyclosporin A and FK506^4–11. NFAT contains a subunit (NFAT_p) which is present in unstimulated T cells and which forms a complex with Fos and Jun proteins in the nucleus of activated T cells^9,11. Here we report that NFAT_p is a DNA-binding phosphoprotein of relative molecular mass ∼ 120,000 and is a substrate for calcineurin in vitro . Purified NFAT_p forms DNA–protein complexes with recombinant Jun homodimers or Jun–Fos heterodimers; the DNA-binding domains of Fos and Jun are essential for the formation of the NFAT_p–Fos–Jun–DNA complex. The interaction between the lymphoid-specific factor NFAT_p and the ubiquitous transcription factors Fos and Jun provides a novel mechanism for combinatorial regulation of interleukin-2 gene transcription, which integrates the calcium-dependent and the protein-kinase C-dependent pathways of T-cell activation.SEVERAL lines of evidence implicate the E2F transcription factor as an important component of cell proliferation control. First, E2F binding sites are found in the promoters of genes responsive to proliferation signals and the level of E2F binding activity increases at a time when many of these genes are activated^1–3. Second, the tumour suppressor protein Rb, as well as the related p107 protein, complexes with E2F^2–7, resulting in an inhibition of E2F transcriptional activity^3,8–12. Third, oncogenic products of the DNA tumour viruses can dissociate these E2F complexes^4,13. We provide here direct evidence that E2F is involved in cellular proliferation control. Specifically, we demonstrate that overexpression of the E2F1 complementary DNA^14,15 can activate DNA synthesis in cells that would otherwise growth-arrest, with an efficiency that is similar to that achieved by the expression of the adenovirus El A gene. Moreover, microinjection of the E2F1 cDNA into quiescent cells can induce S-phase entry, whereas two E2F1 mutants, which are unable to transactivate the DHFR and TK promoters, are unable to induce S phase. We conclude that the E2F transcription factor plays an important role in progression into S phase and that this probably coincides with its capacity to stimulate transcription.IN yeast a type II integral membrane glycoprotein that is essential for transport vesicle budding from the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) is encoded by SEC12 (refs 1–3). SAR1 was discovered as a multicopy suppressor of the sec12-l ^ts strain and encodes a GTPase of M _r 21,000 (21K) also essential for vesicle budding from the ER^4,5. Sari is a peripherally associated membrane protein which shows enhanced membrane binding in cells containing elevated levels of Secl2 protein (refs 6, 7). We show here that a purified fragment of Sec 12 promotes guanine-nucleotide dissociation from Sari whereas the purified mutant Secl2-l has only 15% of the wildtype activity. GTP hydrolysis by Sari is not enhanced by Secl2, but is stimulated more than 50-fold by a mixture of Sec 12 and Sec23, a GTPase-activating protein specific for Sari (ref. 8). We propose that Sec 12 catalyses Sari guanine-nucleotide exchange in a process that recruits Sari to a vesicle formation site on the ER membrane.WE have used surface plasmon resonance biosensor technology to monitor the assembly and dynamics of a signal transduction complex which controls chemotaxis in Escherichia coli A quaternary complex formed which consisted of the response regulator CheY, the histidine protein kinase CheA, a coupling protein CheW and a membrane-bound chemoreceptor Tar. Using various experimental conditions and mutant proteins, we have shown that the complex dissociates under conditions that favour phosphorylation of CheY. Direct physical analysis of interactions among proteins in this signal transduction pathway provides evidence for a previously unrecognized binding interaction between the kinase and its substrate. This interaction may be important for enhancing substrate specificity and preventing 'crosstalk' with other systems. The approach is generally applicable to furthering our understanding of how signalling complexes transduce intracellular messages.IMMUNOGLOBULIN E (IgE) is central to the induction of allergic diseases through its binding to the high-affinity receptor (FcɛRl) on mast cells and basophils. Crosslinking by allergens of the bound IgE leads to the release of various inflammatory mediators. IgE production by B cells requires a physical interaction with T cells^1, involving a number of surface adhesion molecules^1,2, as well as the soluble factors interleukin-4 (IL-4)^3,4 and IL-13 (ref. 5) produced by T cells^6,7, basophils^8 and mast cells^9. Here we report that, in the presence of IL-4, mast and basophilic cell lines can provide the cell contact signals that are required for IgE synthesis. The human cell lines HMC-1 (mast) and KU812 (basophilic) both express the ligand for CD40 (CD40L) which is shown to be responsible for the IgE production. Moreover, freshly isolated purified human lung mast cells and blood basophils are also shown to express CD40L and to induce IgE production. This evidence suggests that mast cells and basophils may therefore play a key role in allergy not only by producing inflammatory mediators, but also by directly regulating IgE production independently of T cells.Seismic Tomography. Edited by H. M. Iyer and K. Hirahara. Chapman and Hall: 1993. Pp. 842. £135, $249.95.In the Shadow of the Bomb: Physics and Arms Control. By Sidney D. Drell AIP: 1993. Pp. 358. $30, £25. (Distributed outside the United Kingdom by Oxford University Press.)IN linear information theory, electrical engineering and neurobiology, random noise has traditionally been viewed as a detriment to information transmission. Stochastic resonance (SR) is a nonlinear, statistical dynamics whereby information flow in a multistate system is enhanced by the presence of optimized, random noise^1–4. A major consequence of SR for signal reception is that it makes possible substantial improvements in the detection of weak periodic signals. Although SR has recently been demonstrated in several artificial physical systems^5,6, it may also occur naturally, and an intriguing possibility is that biological systems have evolved the capability to exploit SR by optimizing endogenous sources of noise. Sensory systems are an obvious place to look for SR, as they excel at detecting weak signals in a noisy environment. Here we demonstrate SR using external noise applied to crayfish mechanoreceptor cells. Our results show that individual neurons can provide a physiological substrate for SR in sensory systems.SPECIES conservation in situ requires networks of protected areas selected for high conservation interest^1–3. Throughout most of the world, however, there are neither the resources nor the time to carry out detailed inventories for most taxa^2,4 before designating protected areas. Site selection (on grounds other than availability) would be easier and more effective if two things were true: (1) habitats that are species-rich for one taxon are also species-rich for others^5; and (2) rare^1 species occur in, and therefore benefit from the conservation of, species-rich habitats. Diversity (usually, species richness) and the presence of rare species are the most frequently cited criteria for site selection by conservationists^6–8. Here, we use data on British plants and animals held by the Biological Records Centre (BRC)^9 and the British Trust for Ornithology (BTO), mapped on a grid of 10 km × 10 km ('10 km squares') to examine the extent to which species-rich areas for different taxa coincide, and whether species-rich areas contain substantial numbers of rare species. The fine scale and high intensity of recording in Britain produces distributional datasets at least as good as and, in most cases, better than those available elsewhere. For Britain at least, we do not find strong support for either proposition. Species-rich areas ('hotspots'^10) frequently do not coincide for different taxa, and many rare species do not occur in the most species-rich squares.THE presence of dissolved water can significantly change the sequence in which different minerals crystallize from a silicate magma^1–3. This will alter the compositional path followed by residual liquids (the liquid line of descent'), and modify the types and compositions of crystals that accumulate at the site of cooling. The sharp decrease in the solubility of water in silicate melts with decreasing pressure makes direct measurements of pre-eruptive concentrations in magmas difficult because much of the dissolved water boils off before eruption. Here we report experimental results on the crystallization of basalts that contain substantial dissolved water (up to 6 wt%), and show how the results can be used to infer the amount of dissolved H_2O involved in the petrogenesis of lavas that preserve a record of their liquid lines of descent, or the accumulated minerals left behind after solidification. The presence of abundant magmatic water is a signature of subduction-zone volcanism^4, and can be used to associate a suite of magmas or igneous cumulates with a convergent-margin, back-arc or interarc tectonic setting.ALTHOUGH the liquid–gas phase equilibria of simple fluids have been studied extensively since the seminal work of van der Waals, the properties of fluids with more complex molecular structures, such as polymers, present a less tractable problem both theoretically and experimentally. The phase behaviour of hydrocarbons is of particular importance for the petrochemical industry. But despite significant experimental and theoretical efforts, the phase diagrams of the straight-chain alkanes longer than decane (C_10) are known only partially, and even qualitative aspects such as the chain-length dependence of the critical properties are poorly understood. Until recently it was considered impossible to estimate the critical properties of such complex fluids using computer simulations. Here we report Monte Carlo simulations of the phase diagrams of alkanes with unbranched carbon chains as long as C_48, up to the vicinity of the liquid–vapour critical points. Our calculations show that, in contrast to the traditional view, the critical density of the long-chain alkanes decreases rather than increases with carbon number. This work indicates that simulations can be used as an 'engineering tool' to estimate properties that are not readily accessible experimentally.DESPITE its simplicity at the molecular level, water is a complex and poorly understood liquid^1. The reasons for this centre around the existence of a dynamic hydrogen-bonded network throughout the liquid. Attempts to describe the structure of liquid water have tended to invoke either continuum models such as the 'distortedbond' model^2, which assumes that the hydrogen-bonded structure relaxes on a timescale similar to that in other liquids, and mixture models, such as the 'flickering-cluster' model^3, which postulate the coexistence of two or more long-lived structures in the liquid. Here we analyse inelastic neutron-scattering spectra for the ice I solid phase of water, which provide evidence for the existence of two different kinds of hydrogen-bond, of different strengths, in the solid. A model in which strong and weak hydrogen-bonds in the ratio of about 2:1 are randomly distributed throughout the network is able to reproduce the neutron spectra. If we can assume that the same kind of bimodal hydrogen-bonding exists in the liquid state, our model may be able to explain several of the anomalous properties of liquid water, such as the large specific heat and the unusual behaviour of water in thin films and clusters.DIFFRACTION techniques have shown that the crystal structure of naphthalene has a unit cell with C_ i symmetry^1–7. These studies were unable, however, to resolve any departure of the molecular structure from the D_2 h , symmetry observed in the gaseous state. We found recently^8 that the solid-state ^13C-nuclear magnetic resonance (NMR) chemical shifts for naphthalene exhibit the C_ i symmetry of the unit cell. If these chemical-shift data reflect structural distortions of the molecule, rather than simply intermolecular effects on the shifts owing to the C_ i symmetry of the environment of each molecule, one could assert that the NMR data are able to reveal structural information beyond the limits of the diffraction methods. Here we show that this is the case by performing ab initio quantummechanical calculations of the ^13C chemical shifts for naphthalene, and their derivatives, with respect to structural parameters. We find that intermolecular shift terms (which of necessity exhibit C_ i symmetry) can account for only about 30% of the maximum deviations from D_2 h symmetry; the remainder must therefore result from structural distortions of the molecules below D_2 h symmetry. This sensitivity of NMR chemical shifts to very small changes in molecular structure opens up the possibility of using solid-state NMR along with quantum-chemical methods to refine structural parameters obtained from diffraction methods.RECENTLY, superconductivity at >130 K was reported^1,2 in multiphase samples of the compound system HgBa_2Ca_ n −1Cu_ n O_2 n +2+ δ (Hg-12( n −l) n ) with n = 1, 2, 3,.... Single-phase Hg-1223 was subsequently synthesized and found to be superconducting at a record temperature of 135 K (ref. 3). It remains to be seen if a much higher transition temperature ( T _c) than 135K can be achieved in this compound system. The application of pressure generally increases the T _c of underdoped layered cuprates, with a pressure derivative of T _c that decreases with increasing doping^4,5. Preliminary studies on Hg-1223^6 showed a pressure-induced increase in T _c without any sign of saturation up to 17 kbar. Here we report the observation of superconductivity at up to 153 K in Hg-1223 at 150 kbar, with a main transition at 147 K. This observation provides an indication that superconductivity at >150 K may be possible in this system at ambient pressure, if suitable forms of chemical substitution can be found.THE Sunyaev–Zel'dovich effect^1 is a distortion imposed on the 2.7-K cosmic microwave background radiation when the microwave photons are scattered by the hot gas in galaxy clusters. At radio wavelengths it appears as a decrement (of about 0.5 mK) in the brightness temperature of the background radiation. Measurements of this effect can provide information about the physics of galaxy clusters, and can also potentially be used to determine the Hubble constant, by constraining the size of the cluster along the line of sight. Successful detections have been made with singledish radio telescopes^2,3, from which one-dimensional profiles of the temperature decrement are constructed. But these observations are susceptible to several systematic errors, such as corruption of the measured signal by radio sources located close to the line of sight. To circumvent these problems, we have obtained a two-dimensional image, using an interferometric (rather than single-dish) approach, of structure in the microwave background in the vicinity of the galaxy cluster Abell 2218. Our measurements, combined with X-ray observations of the scattering gas in the same cluster, support a low value of the Hubble constant.The dodo may long since have been extinct, but one zoologist has reconstructed the creature in sufficient detail for there to be evolutionary puzzles to be solved.Nature 363, 439-443 (1993) SUBSCRIBERS to Nature in the United States and Canada will have received an incorrect version of this letter, in which colour Figs 2 and 3 have been transposed. In copies of Nature received by the rest of the world, the figures are correct as shown. Also, the symbol á£e used in the first sentence of the second new paragraph on page 442 should be á£r, the oxygen isotope composition of respired CO2.Transcription factor CREM appears to play a key physiological and developmental role within the hypothalamic-pituitary-gonadal axis. This axis is modulated by the pineal hormone melatonin, whose production is in turn driven by the endogenous clock. There is striking circadian fluctuation of a novel CREM isoform, ICER, which is expressed at high levels during the night. ICER is generated from an alternative, intronic promoter and functions as a powerful represser of cyclic AMP-induced transcription. Rhythmic adrenergic signals originated by the clock direct ICER expression by stimulation of the cAMP signal transduction pathway.It is not too soon to plan how the rest of Europe will respond to the slow ending of the Bosnian fighting.US President Bill Clinton has made a brave start on his campaign promise to extend health care to those not now insured, but his plans will cost more than he predicts.The quantum-mechanical properties of long-lived optical pulses known as solitons have recently been studied theoretically and observed experimentally. These experiments suggest effective ways of reducing quantum noise in signal transmission and of performing quantum-mechanical non-demolition measurements without destroying the signal.The Machinery of Life. By David S. Goodsell. Springer: 1993. Pp. 132. £25.50, $29.Zoos and Animal Rights: The Ethics of Keeping Animals. By S. St C. Bostock. Routledge: 1993. Pp. 227. £35, $59.95 (hbk); £10.99, $15.95 (pbk).Perilous Knowledge: The Human Genome Project and Its Implications. By Tom Wilkie. Faber and Faber: 1993. Pp. 195. £14.95.The Human Body Shop: The Engineering and Marketing of Life. By Andrew Kimbrell. Harper San Francisco: 1993. Pp. 348. $22, £8.99.For God, Country and Coca-Cola: The Unauthorised History of the World's Most Popular Drink and the Company That Makes It. By Mark Pendergrast. Weidenfeld and Nicolson: 1993. Pp. 556. £20, $27.50.This week's selection includes a plant photosynthesis meter, a genotoxicity testing system and a digital imaging spectrophotometer.>A system is described for accurately translating the positive signal, obtained after hybridization of high-density colony filters, into clone coordinates. Calibration marks are made on the filter at the same time and in register with the clones. A combination of digitizing tablet and software allows for the retrieval of clone coordinates directly from the autoradiograph.Nature 365, 126–132 (1993). COPIES of the 9 September issue printed in Europe contained an error in this article. On page 127, instead of Fig. la, the image for Fig. 3a was repeated. US and Japanese editions were correct. Figure 2a is shown below.EXCISION of introns from nuclear precursors to messenger RNAs (pre-mRNAs) by the spliceosome requires two distinct phosphodiester transfer (transesterification) reactions: exchange of a 3′–5′ for a 2′–5′ bond in the first step (lariat formation) and exchange of one 3′–5′ phosphodiester for another in the second step (exon ligation)^1–3. We report here determination of the stereochemical course of each step using splicing substrates that contained a chiral phosphorothioate. This has provided strong evidence that both steps occur as single ‘in-line’ SN2 nucleophilic displacement reactions, analogous to the mechanism of group I self-splicing introns^4,5. Additionally, because both steps are strongly inhibited by the R_P phosphorothioate diastereomer, but not by S_P, the spliceosome probably shifts between two active sites in catalysis of the two steps. Chemical and stereochemical similarities suggest that the catalytic site for the second step of spliceosomal processing is related to that of group I self-splicing introns.CELLULOSE is the major polysaccharide component of plant cell walls and is the most abundant organic compound on the planet. A number of bacterial^1 and fungal^2 organisms can use cellulose as a food source, possessing cellulases (cellobiohydrolases and endoglucanases) that can catalyse the hydrolysis of the β -(1,4) glycosidic bonds. They can be classified into seven distinct families^3. The three-dimensional structures of members of two of these families are known^4,5. Here we report the structure of a third cellulase, endoglucanase V, whose sequence is not represented in any of the above families. The enzyme is structurally distinct from the previously determined cellulases but is similar to a recently characterized plant defence protein^6. The active site region resembles that of lysozyme, despite the lack of structural similarity between these two enzymes.N-TYPE calcium channels in cell membranes are inhibited by neuro-transmitters such as noradrenaline^1—4, luteinizing hormone-releas-ing hormone (LHRH)^5—7, y-aminobutyric acid (GABA)^8,9 and glutamate^10,11. Although GTP-binding proteins (G proteins) are probably the common mediators of such inhibition^6, 11—14, it is unclear exactly how G proteins alter the operation of the channel. Various experiments have shown changes in channel gating^2—6,15,16. Here we show that inward current carried by Na^+ through N-type channels was far less inhibited by LHRH or by internal GTP-γS than was current carried by Ba^2+ . With external Ba^2+ and internal Cs^+, LHRH inhibited the Ba^2+-carried inward limb of the instan-taneous current-voltage curve much more than the Cs+-carried outward limb. Noise analysis showed that LHRH or GTP-γS decrease single-channel current carried by Ba^2+. These results suggest that alteration of the ion permeation pathway contributes significantly to G-protein inhibition of N-type Ca^2+ channels.ADENOSINE is a potent modulator of transmitter release at a variety of synapses. The adenosine Al receptor is assumed to reside in presynaptic terminals and to function as a negative autoreceptor^1. How adenosine reduces transmitter release is uncertain^2; it may reduce the calcium influx during nerve terminal depolarization by either activating K^+ currents^3,4 or inhibiting Ca^2+ currents^5,6, although other mechanisms have been proposed^7–9. We have directly measured intracellular Ca^2+ concentrations of giant presynaptic terminals in the chick ciliary ganglion. We report here that adenosine inhibited the nerve-evoked Ca^2+ influx in the termi-nal by activating Al receptors. Reduced Ca^2+ influx was due largely to inhibition of ω-conotoxin GVIA-sensitive Ca^2 + channels in the presynaptic terminal.CILIARY neurotrophic factor (CNTF) promotes the survival of several populations of neurons, including sensory and motor neurons^1—4. Although CNTF is abundant in adult sciatic nerve, the mature protein lacks a signal sequence and is not secreted; there-fore, it has been proposed to act as a lesion factor^3. The identifica-tion of a functional CNTF receptor revealed ligand-specific phosphorylation cascades and gene induction^5. However, it is not clear how these signal-transducing events are elicited in neuronal cell bodies that may be distant from the source of CNTF. We report here that CNTF can be retrogradely transported by adult sensory neurons. More importantly, sensory and motor neurons both show greatly increased transport of CNTF following periph-eral nerve lesion. Axotomy-induced increases in retrograde trans-port of neurotrophic factors may be an important response of neuronal cell bodies during regeneration.SEVERAL examples of experience-dependent perceptual improve-ment (perceptual learning) suggest that plasticity in specific neu-ronal loci could underlie the learning process^1–6. For a basic visual discrimination task (using an optimal stimulus for ‘automatic’ pre-attentive texture segregation^7–10), discrete retinal input-dependent changes within a very early stage in the stream of visual processing were indicated as the locus of a large and consistent learning effect^5. When do these changes occur? Here we report that except for a fast, rapidly saturating improvement early in the first practice session, performance was very stable within sessions. Indeed, observers showed little or no improvement until up to 8 hours after their last training session (latent phase). But large improvements occurred thereafter. Finally, there was almost no forgetting; what was gained was retained for at least 2–3 years. We conjecture that some types of perceptual experience trigger permanent neural changes in early processing stages of the adult visual system. These may take many hours to become functional.The governments of France and the United States have independently set out to develop a strategy for research.The Leucocyte Antigens FactsBook. By A. Neil Barclay, Marian L. Birkeland, Marion H. Brown, Albertus D. Beyers, Simon J. Davis, Chamorro Somoza and Alan F. Williams. Academic: 1993. Pp. 384. £19.50, $42 (pbk)CAECILIANS are elongate, limbless, mostly fossorial amphibians. Less well known than frogs and salamanders, they are represented today by about 34 genera and 162 species^1. Until recently, the fossil record of caecilians consisted of only two vertebrae, one from the Palaeocene of Brazil^2, the other from the Late Cretaceous of Bolivia^3. We report here the discovery of an extensive series of Early Jurassic caecilians which extends the fossil record of the group and reveals numerous features, including limbs, that are unknown among modern species. Although the new taxon possesses a tentacular fossa for a chemosensory organ and specializations of the jaw apparatus that are uniquely caecilian, other derived features are shared with salamanders and, among extinct Palaeozoic forms, with microsaurs. The configuration of the skull roof, which differs from the fenestrated condition typical of frogs, salamanders and putatively primitive living caecilians, is evidence of substantial evolutionary divergence between caecilians and other modern amphibian groups.MEASUREMENTS of the flux of nitrous oxide―an important green-house gas―from recently formed pasture in the Amazon basin have shown a threefold increase relative to the flux from the original forest soil1. Based on these measurements, Luizao et a1.^1 esti-mated that present rates of conversion from forest to pasture supply up to 1 Tg of N_2O—N to the atmosphere each year, corresponding to ≤25 % of the current imbalance between sources and sinks of this gas. But this estimate assumes that such conversion produces elevated fluxes that remain constant in time. To assess the validity of this assumption, we present measurements of tracegas fluxes from Costa Rican pastures of varying ages. Nitrogen oxide fluxes peak during the first ten years after conversion, but decline thereafter to values that are even lower than the original forest fluxes. We conclude that previous studies have overestimated the contribution of pastures to the global budget of nitrous oxide, and that accurate predictions of soil-atmosphere tracegas fluxes will require a detailed knowledge not only of current land use, but also of landuse history.ANTARCTICA is believed to be a relatively pristine continent, mainly because of its remote location and the atmospheric circulation patterns that limit the transport of industrial aerosols into the Antarctic polar cell^1–4. This perception is apparently supported by the extremely low concentrations of lead in Antarctic surface waters―an observation that has been interpreted as showing insig-nificant contamination by anthropogenic lead^5. The isotopic com-position of lead in other natural waters has been used as a tracer of the sources of lead, and in particular to identify anthropogenic inputs^6,7. Here we apply this approach to Antarctic surface waters, and show that despite the low concentrations of lead in these waters (which are confirmed by our measurements), their isotopic compo-sition reveals a significant contribution of lead from industrial sources. The extremely low concentrations of lead in these waters appear to be due to biological scavenging of the lead during periods of intense primary production.IN the rapidly developing area of advanced zeolite materials science, the development of novel optical, electronic and magnetic materials^1–5 requires the synthesis of large single crystals of a well defined habit. Crystals of a specified size and shape are needed to fabricate membranes and sensor devices^6,7. Large crystals of zeol-ites and molecular sieves are essential for refining structures and elucidating the intrinsic absorption and diffusion properties of these materials^8,9. Here we present a method for growing uniformly large and morphologically well defined single crystals of all-silica, aluminosilicate and aluminophosphate molecular sieves with dimensions in the size range 0.4—5.0 mm. Our synthetic method relies on the use of a non-aqueous solvent, a mineralizer, an optional organic templating species and reagent amounts of water. We have prepared both large-pore and small-pore materials of various framework composition and structure type.ZINTL alloys are compounds of an alkali metal A with a polyvalent metal M in which transfer of an electron from A to M leads to bonding behaviour in the M^− ions typical of elements one column to the right in the Periodic Table. For example, ASn and APb contain tetrahedral M^4−_4 polyanions in both the crystalline and liquid phases^1 whereas AA1 alloys crystallize in tetrahedrally bonded networks typical of Group IV elements^2. These bonding patterns also determine the character of the disorder in the solid at high temperature. We have recently identified a plastic crystal phase in CsPb just below the melting point, in which the Pb^4−_4 polyanions undergo jump reorientations^3; LiAl, in contrast, is metallic, with mobile Li^+ ions^4. Here we report unusual disordering behaviour in the Zintl alloy NaSn, in which both types of dynamic disorder appear: rapid reorientations of the Sn^4−_4 polyanions enhance jump migration of the Na^+ cations by means of a ‘paddle-wheel’ effect. The two types of disorder are strongly coupled, so that only one disordering transition takes place as the melting point is approached.ALTHOUGH the diffusion of polymer chains in the liquid state can be described over long distances by classical diffusion laws, chain entanglements make a description of the short-range behaviour more complex. In the standard 'reptation' model^1,2 the polymer chains are considered to move in a curvilinear manner along their own contours, exhibiting snake-like motion through the entangled sea of surrounding molecules. This model successfully explains many observations^3–13, yet no direct evidence for reptative motion has been reported. Here we describe the observation of reptation of molecules across the interface between two types of partially deuterated polystyrene polymers. The time evolution of the hyd-rogen and deuterium profiles, determined by dynamic secondary-ion mass spectrometry, can be explained only on the basis of a reptation model. Our results demonstrate that, despite being inevit-ably simplified, the description of polymer diffusion in terms of reptation is essentially correct.SUPERNOVA 1993 J in the nearby galaxy M81 is one of the closest― and hence brightest―supernovae to be witnessed this century. The early spectrum of SN1993J showed^1―3 the characteristic hydrogen signature of type II supernovae, but its subsequent evolution is atypical for this class of supernova. Here we present optical and infrared spectra of SN1993J up to 43 days after outburst, which reveal the onset of the helium absorption and emission features more commonly associated with hydrogen-free type Ib supernovae. Corresponding model spectra show that the progenitor star must have possessed an unusually thin (for type II supernovae) hydro-gen-rich envelope overlying a helium-rich mantle. Moreover, the supernova ejecta must have remained compositionally stratified, with little transport of the hydrogen-rich material down into the underlying helium layer, or mixing of heavier elements (such as radioactive ^56Ni) outwards. SN1993J therefore represents a transi-tion object between hydrogen-dominated type II supernovae, and hydrogen-free, helium-dominated type Ib supernovae.Nature 363, 166-169 (1993) IN Fig. \d of this letter, the structure marked EnK (enamel knot) was misidentified and should be the mesenchymal dental papilla. This does not alter the major conclusions of the paper.Reconstituted transcription reactions containing the seven general transcription factors, in addition to RNA polymerase II, respond poorly to transcriptional activators. Two factors, Dr_2 and ACF, necessary for high levels of transcription in response to an activator have been identified. ACF can enhance basal and activated transcription. Dr_2 represses basal transcrip-tion, but this can be overcome by transcriptional activators or TFIIA. Dr_2 is human DNA topoiso-merase I. The DNA relaxation activity of topoisomerase I is dispensable for transcriptional repression. The effect of Dr_2 is specific for TATA-box-containing promoters and is mediated by the TATA-binding protein.Four peridotite xenoliths from the islands of Savai'i (Western Samoa) and Tubuai (Austral Islands) contain primary olivine of lithospheric origin, and secondary assemblages of clinopyroxene + spinel ± apatite. The trace-element contents of the secondary minerals show that they formed in equilibrium with carbonate-rich melts. Moreover, isotopic results indicate that these melts were derived from recycled crustal components in the convecting mantle, and place constraints on the origins of these components.Phanerozoic Sea-Level Changes. By Anthony Hallam. Columbia University Press: 1992. Pp. 266. $57.50 (hbk); $28 (pbk).Participants at Nature 's conference on structural biology (11-12 November) found that mere description of structures has given way to an exciting exploration of the relationship between form and function.Reforms in the US system for financing health care have grave implications for academic medicine and for basic scientific research.THE chaperonin GroEL, a tetradecameric cylinder consisting of subunits of M_r∼60,000 (60K), and its cofactor GroES, a heptameric ring of 10K subunits, mediate protein folding in the cytosol of Escherichia coll ^1–3. In the presence of nucleotide, GroES forms a 1:1 complex with GroEL which binds unfolded protein in its central cavity and releases it to allow folding upon ATP hydrolysis^4–7. Using labelling with azido-ATP, we have identified a protease-stable nucleotide-binding domain of M_r 40K in the GroEL subunits (residues 153-531). Azido-ATP is crosslinked to the highly conserved Tyr 477, indicating that this residue is close to the purine ring of the bound nucleotide. Surprisingly, GroES also binds ATP cooperatively and with an affinity comparable to that of GroEL. Azido-nucleotide labelling of GroES subunits occurs at the conserved Tyr 71 in a protease-stable 6.5K domain (starting at residue 33). Proteinase K cleavage at residue 32 is prevented when GroES is bound to GroEL. ATP binding to GroES may be important in charging the seven subunits of the interacting GroEL ring with ATP to facilitate cooperative ATP binding and hydrolysis for substrate protein release.BLUE and violet flowers generally contain derivatives of delphinidin; red and pink flowers generally contain derivatives of cyanidin or pelargonidin^1.Differences in hydroxylation patterns of these three major classes of anthocyanidins are controlled by the cytochrome P450 enzymes flavonoid 3'-hydroxylase and flavonoid 3',5'-hydroxylase. Here we report on the isolation of complementary DNA clones of two different flavonoid 3',5'-hydroxylase genes that are expressed in petunia flowers. Restriction-fragment length polymorphism mapping and complementation of mutant petunia lines showed that the flavonoid 3',5'-hydroxylase genes correspond to the genetic loci Hfl and Hf2 .APOPTOSIS is an important but poorly understood mechanism of cell regulation. Growth factor deprivation can trigger apoptosis in a variety of cells^1–3, suggesting the existence of a signal transduction pathway responding to external signals and leading to apoptosis. Overexpression of the proto-oncogene bcl -2 can override these signals and block apoptosis^4–14, indicating that the bcl-2 protein (Bcl-2) is an important component of the apoptotic response. The identification of Bcl-2-binding proteins might help explain how Bcl-2 acts to regulate apoptosis. Here we use the yeast two-hybrid system^15 to show that the human ras -related protein R- ras p23 (refs 16-18) binds to Bcl-2. This association is also detected in immunoprecipitates from human cell extracts. The association requires full-length Bcl-2 but the C-terminal 60 amino acids of R- ras p23 are sufficient for the interaction. These results provide evidence of a putative component of a signal transduction pathway involved in the regulation of apoptosis.IN vertebrates, unfertilized eggs are arrested at second meiotic metaphase by a cytostatic factor (CSF)^1, an essential component of which is the product of the c- mos proto-oncogene^2. CSF prevents ubiquitin-dependent degradation of mitotic cyclins and thus inactivation of the M phase-promoting factor (MPF)^3,4.Fertilization or parthenogenetic activation triggers a transient increase in the cytoplasmic free Ca^2+ (reviewed in refs 5 and 6), inactivates both CSF and MPF, and releases eggs from meiotic metaphase arrest^7–10. A calmodulin-dependent process is required for cyclin degradation to occur in cell-free extracts prepared from metaphase II-arrested eggs (CSF extracts) when the free Ca^2+concentration is transiently raised in the physiological micromolar range^10. Here we show that when a constitutively active mutant of calmodulin-dependent protein kinase II (CaM K_II) is added to a CSF extract, cyclin degradation and Cdc2 kinase inactivation occur even in the absence of Ca^2+, and the extract loses its ability to cause metaphase arrest when transferred into embryos. Furthermore, specific inhibitors of CaM K_IIprevent cyclin degradation after calcium addition. Finally, the direct microinjection of constitutively active CaM KH into unfertilized eggs inactivates Cdc2 kinase and CSF, even in the absence of a Ca^2+ transient. The target for Ca^2+calmodulin is thus CaM K_II.A MONG mobile genetic elements, self-splicing introns are of particular interest. They belong to either group I or group II depending on their three-dimensional structure^1& ndash;3. Homing, the systematic intron invasion of an intronless gene when it encounters its homologous intron-bearing allele, is the only means for intron mobility so far demonstrated^4. It depends on the activity of the intron-encoded protein and is very specific for the acceptor site^4& ndash;7. Intron transposition, the transfer of an intron to a novel site, predicted on the basis of phylogenetic studies^8,9 and in vitro reverse-splicing experiments, has been proposed to be responsible for evolutionary intron spreading^2,10& ndash;14. Here we present results from polymerase chain reaction experiments consistent with transposition of a group II intron. This event is proposed to account for the site-specific deletion in the mitochondria! chromosome of the fungus Podospora anserina that is associated with the premature death syndrome^15 and might also be involved in the senescence process^16 affecting this species.I NTRON mobility at the RNA level^1& ndash;8 by splicing reversal at allelic (homing) and non-allelic locations (transposition) has been reported in vitro ^9& ndash;12. In the living cell, however, only intron homing by unidirectional gene conversion has been described^5,6,13,14. Supposing that intron insertions at non-allelic sites might occur in vivo , we speculated that group II splice-site-associated macro-deletions^15& ndash;18 in fungal mitochondrial DNA might result from group II intron transposition to new locations followed by recombination. We used polymerase chain reaction techniques to detect this critical, infrequent intermediate in mtDNA populations. Here we report on group II intron al1 transposition to non-allelic, splicing-compatible locations within the cox1 gene of yeast mtDNA. The identified integration sites are preceded by motifs similar to the upstream exon A1 . Sequences flanking intron al1 are not co-converted to the insertion sites and cis - and trans -acting mutations within al1 reduce intron mobility below detection levels. These findings suggest the involvement of an RNA intermediate in group II intron transposition.S EQUENCE-SPECIFIC DNA binding activators of gene transcription may be assisted by SWI2(SNF2) ^1,2, which contains a DNA-depen-dent ATPase domain^3. We have isolated a human complementary DNA encoding a 205K nuclear protein, BRG1, that contains extensive homology to SWI2 and Drosophila brahma ^4,5. We report here that a SWI2 / BRG1 chimaera with the DNA-dependent ATPase domain replaced by corresponding human sequence restored normal mitotic growth and capacity for transcriptional activation to swi2 & minus; yeast cells. Point mutation of the conserved ATP binding site lysine abolished this complementation. This mutation in SW12 exerted a dominant negative effect on transcription in yeast. A lysine to arginine substitution at the corresponding residue of BRG1 also generated a transcriptional dominant negative in human cells. BRG1 is exclusively nuclear and present in a high M _r complex of about 2 & times; 10^6. These results show that the SWI2 family DNA-dependent ATPase domain has functional con-servation between yeast and humans and suggest that a SWI/SNF protein complex is required for the activation of selective mammalian genes.I NTERFERONS (IFNs) & alpha;/& beta; (type I) and & gamma; (type II) bind to distinct cell surface receptors^1, inducing transcription of overlapping sets of genes by intracellular pathways that have recently attracted much attention^2,3. Previous studies using cell lines selected for their inability to respond to IFN-& alpha; (ref. 4) have shown that the protein kinase Tyk2 plays a central role in the IFN & alpha;/& beta; response^5. Here we report the isolation of the cell line & gamma;l A, selected for its inability to express IFN-& gamma;-inducible cell-surface markers, that is deficient in all aspects of the IFN-& gamma; response tested, but responds normally to IFNs & alpha; and & beta;. The mutant cells can be complemented by the expression of another member of the JAK family of protein tyro-sine kinases, JAK2 (refs 6& ndash;9). Unlike IFNs & alpha; and & beta;, IFN-& gamma; induces rapid tyrosine phosphorylation of JAK2 in wild-type cells, and JAK2 immunoprecipitates from these cells show tyrosine kinase activity. These responses are absent in & gamma;l A cells. JAK2 is therefore required for the response to IFN-& gamma; but not to IFNs & alpha; and & beta;.SPECIFIC responses to blue light are found throughout the biological kingdom. These responses& mdash;which in higher plants include photo-tropism, inhibition of hypocotyl elongation, and stomatal opening^1& mdash;are in many cases thought to be mediated by flavin-type photoreceptors^2. But no such blue-light photoreceptor has yet been identified or isolated, although blue-light responses in plants were reported by Darwin over a century ago^3, long before the discovery of the now relatively well characterized red/far-red light photoreceptor, phytochrome^4. Here we describe the isolation of a gene corresponding to the HY4 locus of Arabidopsis thaliana . The hy4 mutant^5 is one of several mutants^6 that are selectively insensitive to blue light during the blue-light-dependent inhibition of hypocotyl elongation response, which suggests that they lack an essential component of the cryptochrome-associated light-sensing pathway. The HY4 gene, isolated by gene tagging, was shown to encode a protein with significant homology to microbial DNA photolyases. As photolyases are a rare class of flavoprotein that catalyse blue-light-dependent reactions^7, the protein encoded by HY4 has a structure consistent with that of a flavin-type blue-light photoreceptor.V OLTAGE-GATED Ca^2+ channels link changes in membrane potential to the delivery of Ca^2+, a key second messenger for many cellular responses^1. Ca^2+ channels show selectivity for Ca^2+ over more plentiful ions such as Na^+ or K^+ by virtue of their high-affinity binding of Ca^2+ within the pore^2& ndash;6. It has been suggested that this binding involves four conserved glutamate residues^7& ndash;10 in equivalent positions in the putative pore-lining regions of repeats I& ndash;IV in the Ca^2+ channel & alpha;_1 subunit. We have carried out a systematic series of single amino-acid substitutions in each of these positions and find that all four glutamates participate in high-affinity binding of Ca^2+ or Cdd^2+. Each glutamate carboxylate makes a distinct contribution to ion binding, with the carboxylate in repeat III having the strongest effect. Some single glutamate-to-lysine mutations completely abolish micromolar Ca^2+ block, indicating that the pore does not possess any high-affinity binding site that acts independently of the four glutamate residues. The prevailing model of Ca^2+permeation^2,3 must thus be modified to allow binding of two Ca^2+ ions in close proximity^11,12, within the sphere of influence of the four glutamates. The functional inequality of the glutamates may be advantageous in allowing simultaneous interactions with multiple Ca^2+ ions moving single-file within the pore. Competition among Ca^2+ ions for individual glutamates^11,12, together with repulsive ion-ion electrostatic interaction^2,3, may help achieve rapid flux rates through the channel^2& ndash;5.S YNAPTIC transmission is mediated by calcium entry through voltage-dependent calcium channels in presynaptic nerve terminals^1,2. Various types of calcium channel have been characterized in neuronal somata^3& ndash;6, but it is not clear which subtypes induce transmitter release at central synapses. The N-type Ca^2+ channel blocker & omega;-conotoxin GVIA (& omega;-CgTx) suppresses the excitatory postsynaptic responses only partially^7,8, whereas potassium-induced release of glutamate from brain synaptosomes can be blocked by & omega;-Aga-VIA (ref. 9), a blocker of P-type calcium channels^5,10 and possibly of other types of calcium channels^11,12. Here we test type-specific calcium-channel blockers on postsynaptic currents recorded from neurons in thin slices of rat central nervous system^13. Inhibitory postsynaptic currents in cerebellar and spinal neurons and excitatory postsynaptic currents in hippo-campal neurons are markedly suppressed by & omega;-Aga-IVA and reduced to a lesser extent by & omega;-CgTx. The L-type calcium channel blocker nicardipine had no effect. Our results indicate that at least two types of calcium channel mediate synaptic transmission in the mammalian central nervous system.T HE way in which the brain integrates fragmentary neural events at multiple locations to produce unified perceptual experience and behaviour is called the binding problem^1,2. Binding has been proposed to involve correlated activity at different cortical sites during perceptuomotor behaviour^3–5, particularly by synchronization of narrow-band oscillations in the & gamma;-frequency range (30& ndash;80 Hz)^6,7. In the rabbit olfactory system, inhalation induces increased & gamma;-cor-relation between sites in olfactory bulb and cortex^8. In the cat visual system, coherent visual stimuli increase & gamma;-correlation between sites in both the same and different visual cortical areas^9–12. In monkeys, some groups have found that & gamma;-oscillations transiently synchronize within striate cortex^13, superior temporal sulcus^14 and somatosensorimotor cortex^15,16. Others have reported that visual stimuli produce increased broad-band power, but not & gamma;-oscillations, in several visual cortical areas^17,18. But the absence of narrow-band oscillations in itself does not disprove interregional synchronization, which may be a broad-band phenomenon. We now describe episodes of increased broad-band coherence among local field potentials from sensory, motor and higher-order cortical sites of macaque monkeys performing a visual discrimination task. Widely distributed sites become coherent without involving other intervening sites. Spatially selective multiregional cortical binding, in the form of broad-band synchronization, may thus play a role in primate perceptuomotor behaviour.T RADE-OFFS are of fundamental importance in population biology. They prevent the evolution of a darwinian demon (a species that breeds fast, lives long and is both a good competitor and disperser) and result in the wide range of life histories we observe in nature^1. Trade-offs are also thought to be important in ecology, driving successional change and maintaining species diversity^2,3. But the demonstration of trade-offs is difficult^4,5. Evolutionary theory predicts trade-offs between seed dormancy and (1) seed weight^6 and (2) seed spatial dispersal^6,7. Here we present simulation results predicting a third trade-off between seed dormancy and adult longevity. The existence of these trade-offs is tested, to our knowledge for the first time, using modern comparative methods^8,9 and data from long-term experiments^10& ndash;12. The analyses are consistent with the existence of all three trade-offs in nature.The responsibilities of the US Office of Research Integrity should be returned to the research community.G EOMORPHOLOGISTS have thought for some time that rates of sediment transfer might differ markedly in ephemeral and perennial rivers, and have used this idea to explain both the changing character of sedimentary successions and the morphology of rivers in sub-humid or semi-arid areas that have experienced significant shifts in climate during the Quaternary period^1−5. But until now there has been a lack of suitable field data to confirm this suggestion, mainly because floods in arid zones are infrequent and unpredictable. Here we present bedload sediment transport data for an ephemeral river in Israel, which show it to be, on average, as much as 400 times more efficient at transporting coarse material than its perennial counterparts in humid zones. This suggests that existing predictive sediment transport equations^24, developed and calibrated exclusively with data obtained in perennial rivers, are inadequate for application to rivers in arid environments. It also suggests that areas that are at risk of shifting from sub-humid to semi-arid conditions as a result of prospective global changes in climate may suffer severe sedimentation problems.T HE last deglaciation was interrupted by an abrupt cooling event, the Younger Dryas, at 11,000& ndash;10,000 yr BP (uncalibrated radiocarbon timescale)^1. Originally recognized in climate records from northwest Europe, the Younger Dryas has now been identified in marine and ice-core records worldwide^2–6. In the tropics, a broadly contemporaneous change in climate is recorded by decreases in water levels and increased salinity of lakes^7–9,14, indicating a period of arid climate caused by a reduction in ocean-to-land moisture flux. The exact timing of these changes in relation to the Younger Dryas event in high-latitude records has remained unclear, however. Here we present climate records based on analyses of diatom assemblages, geochemistry and magnetic mineralogy of radiocarbon-dated sequences of laminated lake sediments from Lake Magadi in the East African rift. These records provide a detailed record of climate change in lowland equatorial Africa throughout the last deglaciation (12,800& ndash;10,000 ^14C yr BP). We find that lake-level and humidity maxima coincide with the most rapid phases of ice melting in the Northern Hemisphere, and that the climate changes, including the Younger Dryas event, were synchronous at low and high latitudes. Thus, the effects of abrupt climate change appear to be felt at both high and low latitudes without a significant time lag.T HE high angle elastic scattering of electrons in scanning transmission electron microscopy depends strongly on the atomic number Z, of the sample atoms, through the Z ^2 dependence of the Rutherford scattering cross-section^1. The detection of scattered electrons at high angles and over a large angular range (75& ndash;150 milliradians) removes the coherent effects of diffraction, and the resulting incoherent image provides a compositional map of the sample with high atomic-number contrast^1. If a fine electron probe is used, and the sample is a crystalline material oriented along one of its principal axes, individual columns of atoms can be imaged in this way^2. Electrons scattered at low angles are not used in this detection scheme, and are thus available for simultaneous electron energy-loss spectroscopy^3; in principle, this combination of techniques should allow the direct chemical analysis of single atomic columns in crystalline materials. Here we present electron energy-loss spectra from expitaxial interfaces between cobalt silicide and silicon, which confirm that atomic resolution can be achieved by this approach. The ability to correlate structure and chemistry with atomic resolution holds great promise for the detailed study of defects and interfaces.T HE formation of nanometre-scale surface structures by atomic manipulation with the scanning tunnelling microscope has opened up opportunities for creating new metastable states of matter atom by atom^1. The technique allows the fabrication of arbitrary structures, but its application may be limited by considerations of speed, as only one nanostructure can be built at a time. Here we describe the simultaneous formation of many densely packed nanostructures of various morphologies using diffusion-controlled aggregation on surfaces. By exploiting the dependence of the mobility of adsorbed atoms on substrate crystal face and temperature, we are able to grow linear, two-dimensional or tenuous fractal aggregates of nanometre dimensions. The high number density (10^11& minus;10^14 cm^& minus;2) of these structures means that their physical and chemical properties can be easily measured with conventional surface spectroscopies.L ASER breakdown, in which a substance is transformed explosively to a plasma by a focused pulsed laser beam, has been much studied^1–8. Light emission from the plasma formed by breakdown of liquid media or suspended microparticles is generally observed lateral to the laser beam, and can be used for spectrochemical analysis^4,8,9. Here we report the observation of highly anisotropic emission of hydrogen Balmer-α (Hα) radiation from the laser breakdown of polystyrene particles in water. The emission was strong and spectrally narrow in the forward and backward directions (with respect to the beam), and weak and broad in others. The incorporation of a single-mirror cavity in the optical arrangement and the observed nonlinear dependence of intensity on the focal length of the focusing lens suggest that the plasma may induce gain in the emitted radiation. The exact mechanism of the anisotropic emission is not yet known.S UPERNOVA 1987A in the Large Magellanic Cloud, the closest known supernova for 400 years, offers unprecedented opportunities for the detailed study of the evolution of a supernova at all wavelengths. The radio remnant of SN1987A was detected in July 1990 (ref. 1), since when it has steadily brightened at all radio frequencies^2. Its present brightness and size are now sufficient for its structure to be resolved. Here, we present high-resolution images of the remnant at a frequency of 8.8 GHz, which reveal a spherical, shell-like structure with a radius of 0.6 arcsec (4 × 10^17 cm, assuming a distance of 50 kpc) and an additional component that is aligned with the optical ring (of somewhat larger radius) imaged by the Hubble Space Telescope^3. We suggest that this alignment arises from an interaction between the expanding shock wave and dense clouds sheared from the ring. The mean expansion velocity of the supernova shock front, as measured from its current radio size, is ∼30,000 km s^−1. Observations made over 600 days suggest, however, that either the remnant is rapidly changing shape or that the expansion velocity is decreasing more rapidly than expected.We have produced a cell line which lacks the protein tyrosine kinase JAK1 and is completely defective in interferon response. Complementation of this mutant with JAK1 restored the response, establishing the requirement for JAK1 in both the interferon-α/β and -γ signal transduction pathways. The reciprocal interdependence between JAK1 and Tyk2 activities in the interferon-α pathway, and between JAK1 and JAK2 in the interferon-γ pathway, may reflect a requirement for these kinases in the correct assembly of interferon receptor complexes.Encapsulating atoms or molecules inside fullerene cages could give rise to a myriad of novel molecules and materials. The existence of such species is now strongly supported by a growing body of experimental evidence. Fullerene& ndash;metal complexes generally thought to be endohedral are being produced and purified in milligram quantities, and their structure and properties are beginning to be exploredHannah's Heirs: The Quest for the Genetic Origins of Alzheimer's Disease. ByDaniel A. Pollen. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 296. $25, & pound;16.95.Topics in Primatology. Volume 1: Human Origins. Edited by Toshisada Nishida, William C. McGrew, Peter Marler, Martin Pickford and Frans B. M. de Waal. Pp. 475 Volume 2: Behavior, Ecology, and Conservation. Edited byNaosuke Itoigawa, Yukimaru Sugiyama, Gene P. Sackett and Roger K. R. Thompson. Pp. 412.Volume 3: Evolutionary Biology, Reproductive Endocrinology, and Virology. Edited byShozo Matano, Russell H. Tuttle, Hidemi Ishida and Morris Goodman. Pp. 489. Tokyo University Press: 1992. & yen;25,000Photodissociation Dynamics. By Reinhard Schinke. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 417. & pound;50, $89.95.Britain is getting good value for money from its overseas biodiversity programme.The origin of the blood and blood-products contaminated with HIV sold on the European market is more probably a mark of incompetence than of cupidity, but is none the less culpable on that account.Colonizing the Body: State Medicine and Epidemic Disease in Nineteenth Century India. By David Arnold. University of California Press: 1993. Pp. 354. $45, & pound;40 (hbk); $18, & pound;14.95 (pbk).Event-recording software, a molecular modelling package, graphics toolkits, image processing and analysis packages, and a collection of high-tech hardware options are featured.There is a danger that too zealous and uncritical advocacy of the importance of human genome studies to the exclusion of others may provoke disbelief, distrust and resentment.Rapidly expanding personal libraries benefit greatly from bibliographic software; new programs try to take into account each researcher's individual needs.How do we know the Sun will rise tomorrow? Hume's concern raises two questions: the problem of empirical inference was solved in this century by Popper; an approach to the stability of nature in time is outlined here.T HE crystal structure of trp represser tandemly bound in a 2:1 complex to a 16-base-pair palindromic DNA containing a central trp operator half-site has been determined and refined to 2.4 Å resolution. Despite dramatically different DNA sequence contexts and crystallization conditions, the protein/DNA interface is essentially identical to that seen in the original trp represser/operator complex structure^1. Water-mediated sequence recognition by trp represser is likely to be related to the unusual end-on approach of the recognition helix (E), which allows sharing of the major groove by tandem dimers. The tandem complex model accounts for the mutational sensitivity of all trp operator base pairs. The structure also provides the first detailed view of the tandem interaction, revealing a key role for the amino-terminal arms.CYSTIC fibrosis transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR) is a non-rectifying, low-conductance channel^1,2 regulated by ATP^3 and phosphorylation^4, which mediates apical chloride conductance in secretory epithelia^5,6 and malfunctions in cystic fibrosis (CF)^7,8. Mutations at Lys 335 and Arg 347 in the sixth predicted transmembrane helix of CFTR alter its halide selectivity in whole-cell studies^9 and its single channel conductance^10, but the physical basis of these alterations is unknown and permeation in CFTR is poorly understood. Here we present evidence that wild-type CFTR can contain more than one anion simultaneously. The conductance of CFTR passes through a minimum when channels are bathed in mixtures of two permeant anions. This anomalous mole fraction effect can be abolished by replacing Arg 347 with an aspartate and can be toggled on or off by varying the pH after the same residue is replaced with a histidine. Thus the CFTR channel should provide a convenient model in which to study multi-ion pore behaviour and conduction. The loss of multiple occupancy may explain how naturally occurring CF mutations at this site cause disease.THE membrane antigen B7/BB1 (refs 1, 2) is expressed on activated B cells, macrophages and dendritic cells, and binds to a counter-receptor, CD28, expressed on T lymphocytes and thymocytes^3. Interaction between CD28 and B7 results in potent costimulation of T-cell activation initiated through the CD3/T-cell receptor complex^4,5. Discrepancies between results with anti-CD28 and anti-B7 antibodies have suggested the existence of a second ligand for CD28 and CTLA-4 (refs 3, 6–8). We have generated a monoclonal antibody, IT2, that reacts with a 70K glycoprotein (B70). B70 complementary DNA was cloned from a B-lymphoblastoid cell line library and encodes a new protein of the immunoglobulin superfamily with limited homology to B7. B70 is expressed on resting monocytes and dendritic cells and on activated, but not resting, T, NK and B lymphocytes. IT2 substantially inhibited the binding of a CTLA4–immunoglobulin fusion protein to human B-lymphoblastoid cell lines and, together with anti-B7 antibody, completely blocked CTLA-4 binding. Further IT2 efficiently inhibited primary allogeneic mixed lymphocyte responses. These findings indicate that B70 is a second ligand for CD28 and CTLA-4 and may play an important role for costimulation of T cells in a primary immune response.KNOWING the autoantigen target(s) in an organ-specific autoimmune disease is essential to understanding its pathogenesis. Insulin-dependent diabetes mellitus (IDDM) is an autoimmune disease characterized by lymphocytic infiltration of the islets of Langerhans (insulitis) and destruction of insulin-secreting pancreatic β-cells^1. Several β-cell proteins have been identified as autoantigens, but their importance in the diabetogenic process is not known^2. The non-obese diabetic (NOD) mouse is a murine model for spontaneous IDDM^3. Here we determine the temporal sequence of T-cell and antibody responses in NOD mice to a panel of five murine β-cell antigens and find that antibody and T-cell responses specific for the two isoforms of glutamic acid decarboxylase (GAD) are first detected in 4-week-old NOD mice. This GAD-specific reactivity coincides with the earliest detectable response to an islet extract, and with the onset of insulitis. Furthermore, NOD mice receiving intrathymic injections of GAD65 exhibit markedly reduced T-cell proliferative responses to GAD and to the rest of the panel, in addition to remaining free of diabetes. These results indicate that the spontaneous response to β-cell antigens arises very early in life and that the anti-GAD immune response has a critical role in the disease process during this period.INSULIN-DEPENDENT diabetes mellitus (IDDM) in non-obese diabetic (NOD) mice results from the T-lymphocyte-mediated destruction of the insulin-producing pancreatic β-cells and serves as a model for human IDDM^1. Whereas a number of autoantibodies are associated with IDDM^2, it is unclear when and to what β-cell antigens pathogenic T cells become activated during the disease process. We report here that a T-helper-1 (Thl) response to glutamate decarboxylase develops in NOD mice at the same time as the onset of insulitis. This response is initially limited to a confined region of glutamate decarboxylase, but later spreads intramolecularly to additional determinants. Subsequently, T-cell reactivity arises to other β-cell antigens, consistent with intermolecular diversification of the response. Prevention of the spontaneous anti-glutamate decarboxylase response, by tolerization of glutamate decarboxylase-reactive T cells, blocks the development of T-cell autoimmunity to other β-cell antigens, as well as insulitis and diabetes. Our data suggest that (1) glutamate decarboxylase is a key target antigen in the induction of murine IDDM; (2) autoimmunity to glutamate decarboxylase triggers T-cell responses to other β-cell antigens, and (3) spontaneous autoimmune disease can be prevented by tolerization to the initiating target antigen.GROWTH cones are capable of advancing despite linkage to a stationary axonal cytoskeleton in chick and murine dorsal root ganglion neurites^1,2. Several lines of evidence point to the growth cone as the site of cytoskeletal elongation^3,4. Fast axonal transport is probably the means by which cytoskeletal elements^5 or cofactors are rapidly moved through the axon. We report that direct, but reversible, inhibition of fast axonal transport with laser optical tweezers inhibits growth cone motility if cytoskeletal attachment to the cell body is maintained. Advancement ceases after a distance-dependent lag period which correlates with the rate of fast axonal transport. But severing the axonal cytoskeleton with the laser tweezers allows growth cones to advance considerably further. We suggest that axon elongation requires fast axonal transport but growth cone motility does not.RETINAL photoreceptors are noisy. They generate discrete electrical events in the dark indistinguishable from those evoked by light^1,2 and thereby limit visual sensitivity at low levels of illumination^3,4. The random spontaneous events are strongly temperature-dependent and have been attributed to thermal isomerizations of the vitamin A chromophore of rhodopsin, the light-sensitive molecule in photoreceptors^1,5,6. But thermal generation of dark events in both vertebrate and invertebrate photoreceptors requires activation energies in the range of 23 to 27 kcal mol^−1, which are significantly less than the energy barrier of 45 kcal mol ^−1 for photoisomerization of the chromophore of native rhodopsin^7–9. We propose that photoreceptor noise results from the thermal isomeriz-ation of a relatively unstable form of rhodopsin, one in which the Schiff-base linkage between the chromophore and protein is unprotonated. This molecular mechanism is supported by both theoretical calculations of the properties of rhodopsin and experimental measurements of the properties of photoreceptor noise.Pauper and Prince: Ritchey, Hale, and Big American Telescopes. By Donald E. Osterbrock. University of Arizona Press: 1993. Pp. 359. $45.DURING classical conditioning, animals learn to associate a neutral stimulus with a meaningful, or unconditioned, stimulus. The unconditioned stimulus is essential for forming associations, and modifications in the processing of the unconditioned stimulus are thought to underlie more complex learning forms^1–4. Information on the neuronal representation of the unconditioned stimulus is therefore required for understanding both basic and higher-order features of conditioning. In honeybees, conditioning of the proboscis extension reflex occurs after a single pairing of an odour (conditioned stimulus) with food (unconditioned stimulus)^5,6 and shows several higher-order features of conditioning^6–8. I report here the identification of an interneuron that mediates the unconditioned stimulus in this associative learning. Its physiology is also compatible with a function in complex forms of associative learning. This neuron provides the first direct access to the cellular mechanisms underlying the reinforcing properties of the unconditioned stimulus pathway.THE amphisbaenians, lizards and snakes constitute a monophyletic group, the Squamata. Although amphisbaenians are known to have occurred in the Mesozoic^1,2, their remains are rare and fragmentary. The oldest and most primitive known skull of an amphisbaenian is from the Eocene of North America^3 and differs little from that of modern taxa^4–9. A substantial structural gap exists between this skull and that of the several possible sister groups^8,10. No derived features uniquely linking amphisbaenians to any other group of the Squamata have been recognized, so the relationship of amphisbaenians is uncertain^11,12. We report here on the late Cretaceous lizard-like amphisbaenian represented by well-preserved cranial and postcranial material from the Bayan Mandahu redbeds of the Gobi Desert, Inner Mongolia, China. This material documents the oldest and most primitive amphisbaenian yet known, and permits a re-evaluation of the relationship between the amphisbaenians and other squamates.ACCORDING to a recent compilation of sedimentary records from the past 12 Myr, the reversing geomagnetic field displays a marked long-term longitudinal organization which seems to be correlated with the thermal structure of the lower mantle^1. However, the crucial palaeomagnetic observation that intermediate virtual geomagnetic poles are preferentially confined to longitudes over the Americas or antipodal to this sector^2,3 might be an artefact caused by distortion and smoothing of the geomagnetic signal by sediments^4–6. Here we present a compilation of ∼400 intermediate poles from 121 volcanic records of excursions and reversals less than 16 Myr old, sampled at various longitudes and latitudes, which does not confirm previous inferences^1 and reinforces doubts^4–6 about the ability of sediments to properly record a rapidly varying field. In contrast to virtual poles from excursions, those from reversals are uniformly distributed in longitude, which indicates that the reversing field is statistically axisymmetrical. Thus, we conclude that there is no evidence for control of transitional fields by the temperature distribution in the lowermost mantle.NORTHERN peatlands contain 20–30% of the total organic nitrogen and carbon in the world's soils^1,2, and thus they apparently have the potential to exert a significant influence on the global atmospheric budget of the greenhouse gases carbon dioxide, methane and nitrous oxide (N_2O). In the drier, warmer summer conditions predicted at high latitudes by some climate models^3,4 as a result of greenhouse-gas forcing, northern peatlands would become drier, increasing the rate of mineralization of organic matter^1,5 and of the microbial processes that produce N_2O. These regions might therefore be expected to exert a strong feedback on climate. But whereas methane emissions have been well studied^6,7, little is known about the effect on N_2O fluxes of changes in the level of peatland water tables. Here we present a comparison of present-day N_2O fluxes from virgin peatlands in Finland with those from sites in the same regions that were drained by ditching 30 and 50 years ago. The lowered water table had no effect on N_2O emissions from nutrient-poor peat but enhanced those from nutrient-rich peat. We estimate that equivalent drying caused by climate change would increase the total emissions of N_2O from northern peatlands by 0.03–0.1 teragrams of nitrogen per year, which is just 0.3–1% of the present global annual emissions. Thus northern peatlands are unlikely to exert a significant climate feedback from N_2O emissions.TWO-DIMENSIONAL assemblies of membrane proteins (see ref. 1, for example) such as bacteriorhodopsin are of current interest because of their potential application in technological areas as diverse as molecular electronics and optical switching^2, molecular sieves^3,4 and the lithographic fabrication of nanometre-scale patterns^5,6. Here we report that bacteriorhodopsin^7–9 can retain its folded native structure to temperatures as high as 140 °C when incorporated in multilayer structures of self-assembled, ordered films. Synchrotron X-ray scattering reveals that, under hydrated conditions, the two-dimensional lattice in multilayer films exhibits a reversible solid–liquid transition at about 69 °C, followed by irreversible denaturing of the bacteriorhodopsin at about 90 °C. But in dry films the melting transition and denaturation are suppressed up to 140 °C. These results suggest that it may be feasible to use multilayer assemblies of functional proteins and enzymes^10,11 in high-temperature applications.THE use of fluorescence microscopy for investigating the three-dimensional structure of cells and tissue is of growing importance in cell biology, biophysics and biomedicine. Three-dimensional data are obtained by recording a series of images of the specimen as it is stepped through the focal plane of the microscope^1–3. Whether by direct imaging or by confocal scanning^4,5, diffraction effects and noise generally limit axial resolution to about 0.5 μm. Here we describe a fluorescence microscope in which axial resolution is increased to better than 0.05 μm by using the principle of standing-wave excitation of fluorescence. Standing waves formed by interference in laser illumination create an excitation field with closely spaced nodes and antinodes, allowing optical sectioning of the specimen at very high resolution. We use this technique to obtain images of actin fibres and filaments in fixed cells, actin single filaments in vitro and myosin II in a living cell.SMALL clusters of silicon, containing between 2 and 100 atoms, have been studied extensively both because of their intrinsic interest from the point of view of chemical structure and bonding and because of the potential technological applications of cluster-assembled materials^1–3. Ab initio quantum-chemical calculations predict that very small clusters should have structures markedly different from that of the crystalline phase^4–12. Experiments on two- (ref. 13), three- (ref. 14) and four-atom^15 clusters have allowed some comparison with theoretical predictions, but structural information on larger clusters has been only indirect^16. Here we report on structural studies of size-selected Si_4 , Si_6 and Si_7 clusters prepared and isolated by low-energy deposition into a solid nitrogen matrix. Surface plasmon-polariton enhanced Raman spectroscopy^17–20 yields well resolved vibrational spectra for each of these clusters in which the vibrational frequencies agree well with those predicted for optimized structures calculated by ab initio methods. We confirm that Si_4 is a planar rhombus, and find that Si_6 is a distorted octahedron and Si_7 a pentagonal bipyramid.THE Burst and Transient Source Experiment (BATSE) on the Compton Gamma-Ray Observatory has shown that, although γ-ray bursts are distributed isotropically on the sky, there is an apparent dearth of weak events compared to those expected from a homogeneous distribution of sources^1,2. This suggests that the bursts originate either in an extended galactic halo^3 (that is, locally) or at cosmological distances^4,5. The intensity distribution of the bursts can be used to constrain their source properties and spatial distribution, and here we address this question by considering the BATSE data with those from the Pioneer Venus Orbiter, correcting for the different reponse of the two instruments. We show that the composite intensity distribution can after all be fitted by a simple, homogeneous model of γ-ray burst sources with identical intrinsic luminosities where the faintest BATSE events are at a redshift of z ∼0.80±0.05. We obtain an upper limit of about −18 on the absolute magnitude of the host galaxies by assigning model-derived distances to the brightest extragalactic objects found^15 within the error boxes of eight well localized γ-ray bursts. All but the faintest active galaxies are excluded as the source of the bursts. The bursts may instead be associated with normal galaxies, but only if the host-galaxy magnitudes are close to our upper limit.The N -ethylmaleimide-sensitive fusion protein (NSF) and the soluble NSF attachment proteins (SNAPs) appear to be essential components of the intracellular membrane fusion apparatus. An affinity purification procedure based on the natural binding of these proteins to their targets was used to isolate SNAP receptors (SNAREs) from bovine brain. Remarkably, the four principal proteins isolated were all proteins associated with the synapse, with one type located in the synaptic vesicle and another in the plasma membrane, suggesting a simple mechanism for vesicle docking. The existence of numerous SNARE-related proteins, each apparently specific for a single kind of vesicle or target membrane, indicates that NSF and SNAPs may be universal components of a vesicle fusion apparatus common to both constitutive and regulated fusion (including neurotransmitter release), in which the SNAREs may help to ensure vesicle-to-target specificity.Glial growth factors, proteins that are mitogenic for Schwann cells, and several ligands for the p±85^ erbB2 receptor, are products of the same gene. Alternative splicing of the messenger RNA generates an array of putative membrane-attached, intracellular and secreted signalling proteins, at least some of which are expressed in the developing spinal cord and brain. These factors are probably important in the development and regeneration of the nervous system.Two research groups have independently shown that the long and variable latency period between HIV infection and overt AIDS is explained by replication of virus in the lymph nodes. Even Duesberg must pay attention.The British government is promising a national strategy for science and technology in its forthcoming White Paper on research. Will its bite live up to its bark? Or will it end up merely rearranging the deck-chairs on the Titanic?Evolutionary explanations of ageing fall into two classes. Organisms might have evolved the optimal life history, in which survival and fertility late in life are sacrificed for the sake of early reproduction and survival. Alternatively, the life history might be depressed below this optimal compromise by deleterious mutations: because selection against late-acting mutations is weaker, these will impose a greater load on late life. Evidence for the importance of both is emerging, and unravelling their relative importance presents experimentalists with a major challenge.In Pursuit of Excellence: A History of the Indian Institute of Science. By B. V. Subbarayappa. Tata McGraw-Hill New Delhi, India: 1992. Pp. 426. $11.50.Human and Machine Thinking. By Philip N. Johnson-Laird. Lawrence Erlbaum: 1993. Pp. 189. £19.95, $37.95.The God Particle. By Leon Lederman with Dick Teresi Houghton MiffIin: 1993. Pp. 352. $24.95. To be published in the UK by Bantam in June.Natural Enemies: The Population Biology of Predators, Parasites and Diseases. By M. Crawley Blackwell Scientific: 1992. Pp. 576. £32.50, $69.95 (pbk).Is computer hacking criminal or merely another endear-ing kind of mischief?The defection of North Korea from membership of the Non-Proliferation Treaty is a conundrum for the review conference two years from now. Built-in sanctions are now required, as are ways of enforcing membership.An image analysis software package for Windows, a microincubator, an imaging system for autorad analysis, image processing and analysis systems and scanning electron microscopes are featured this week.THE three-dimensional structures of proteins reveal that the distribution of amino acids within the major classes of secondary structure is not random but that each amino acid has its own preferred secondary structural arrangements^1–5. Propensity scales for residues in α-helices have been generated through the use of various host-guest systems^6–9. Here we measure the thermo-dynamic β -sheet propensities of each of the twenty commonly occurring amino acids. A previously studied zinc-finger peptide^10 was used as the host system in which amino acids were substituted into a guest site, a solvent-exposed position in an antiparallel β -sheet. As these peptides are unfolded in the absence of bound metal but are folded in their presence, it is assumed that the thermodynamics of metal binding fully reflect peptide-folding energy. A competitive cobalt(II)-binding assay was used to determine these energies with high precision. The relative free energies correlate well with previously derived potential values based on statistical analysis of protein structures. We are therefore able to present a thermodynamic β -sheet propensity scale for all the commonly occurring amino acids in aqueous solution.THE CREM (cyclic AMP-responsive element modulator) gene encodes multiple regulators of the cAMP-transcriptional response by alternative splicing^1. A developmental switch in CREM expression occurs during spermatogenesis, whereby CREM function is converted from an antagonist to an activator (CREMτ; ref. 2) which accumulates to extremely high levels from the premeiotic spermatocyte stage onwards. To define the physiological mechanisms controlling the CREM developmental switch, we have hypophysectomized rats and observed the extinction of CREMτ expression in testis, thereby demonstrating a central role of the pituitary-hypothalamic axis. We then used the seasonal-dependent modulation of spermatogenesis in hamsters to dissect the hormonal programme controlling this developmental process. By this approach, combined with direct administration of pituitary-derived hormones, we have established that follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH) is responsible for the CREM switch. FSH appears to regulate CREM expression by alternative polyadenylation, which results in a dramatic enhancement of transcript stability.PHEROMONE-STIMULATED haploid yeast cells undergo a differentiation process that allows them to mate^1. Transmission of the intracellular signal involves threonine and tyrosine phosphorylation of the redundant FUS3 and KSS1 kinases, which are members of the MAP kinase family^2–4. FUS3/KSS1 phosphorylation depends on two additional kinases, STE11 and STE7 (refs 2, 5,6). Genetic analyses predict an ordered pathway where STE11 acts before STE7 and FUS3/KSS1 (refs 2,7). Here we report that STE7 is a dual-specificity kinase that modifies FUS3 at the appropriate sites and stimulates its catalytic activity in vitro . From these data and previous genetic results, we argue that STE7 is the physiological activator of FUS3. Recent indications that MAP kinase activators are related to STE7 suggest that signal transduction pathways in many, if not all, eukaryotic organisms use homologous kinase cascades^8–10.EXPRESSION of transgenes in mice often fails to follow the normal temporal and spatial pattern and to reach the same level as the endogenous copies^1,2. Only in exceptional cases has position-independent and copy number-dependent expression been reproduced^3. The size constraint of standard constructs may prevent the inclusion of important remote regulatory elements. Yeast artificial chromosomes (YACs)^4 provide a means of cloning large DNA fragments and the transfer of YAC DNA into somatic cells has been reported^5–9. We have previously produced transgenic mice carrying a 35 kilobase YAC construct^10. Here we report the transfer of a 250 kilobase YAC covering the mouse tyrosinase gene into mice by pronuclear injection of gel-purified YAC DNA. The YAC was inserted into the mouse genome without major rearrangements and expression of the YAC-borne tyrosinase gene resulted in complete rescue of the albino phenotype of the recipient mice. Expression from the transgene reached levels comparable to that of the endogenous gene and showed copy number dependence and position independence.INTRODUCTION of DNA fragments, hundreds of kilobases in size, into mouse embryonic stem (ES) cells would greatly advance the ability to manipulate the mouse genome. Mice generated from such modified cells would permit investigation of the function and expression of very large or crudely mapped genes. Large DNA molecules cloned into yeast artificial chromosomes (YACs) are stable and genetically manipulable within yeast^1, suggesting yeast-cell fusion as an ideal method for transferring large DNA segments into mammalian cells. Introduction of YACs into different cell types by this technique has been reported^2–8; however, the incorporation of yeast DNA along with the YAC has raised doubts as to whether ES cells, modified in this way, would be able to recolonize the mouse germ line^5. Here we provide, to our knowledge, the first demonstration of germ-line transmission and expression of a large human DNA fragment, introduced into ES cells by fusion with yeast spheroplasts. Proper development was not impaired by the cointegration of a large portion of the yeast genome with the YAC.CYSTIC fibrosis (CF) is a lethal inherited disorder affecting about 1 in 2,000 Caucasians. The major cause of morbidity is permanent lung damage resulting from ion transport abnormalities in airway epithelia that lead to mucus accumulation and bacterial colonization. CF is caused by mutations in the cystic fibrosis transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR) gene^1 that encodes a cyclic-AMP-regulated chloride channel^2,3. Cyclic-AMP-regulated chloride conductances are altered in airway epithelia from CF patients^4–6, suggesting that the functional expression of CFTR in the airways of CF patients may be a strategy for treatment. Transgenic mice^7–9 with a disrupted cftr gene are appropriate for testing gene therapy protocols. Here we report the use of liposomes to deliver a CFTR expression plasmid to epithelia of the airway and to alveoli deep in the lung, leading to the correction of the ion conductance defects found in the trachea of transgenic ( cf/cf ) mice. These studies illustrate the feasibility of gene therapy for the pulmonary aspects of CF in humans.The impending reorganization of British research should be coloured by the causes of industrial decline.Classification, Evolution and the Nature of Biology. By Alec L. Panchen.Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 403. £45, $80 (hbk); £16.95, $34.95 (pbk).THE discovery of new cytokines normally relies on a prior knowledge of at least one of their biological effects, which is used as a criterion either for the purification of the protein or for the isolation of the complementary DNA by expression cloning. However, the redundancy of cytokine activities complicates the discovery of novel cytokines in this way, and the pleiotropic nature of many cytokines means that the principal activities of a new cytokine may bear little relation to that used for its isolation. We have adopted an alternative approach which relies on differential screening of an organized subtracted cDNA library from activated peripheral blood mononuclear cells, using the inducibility of lymphokine messenger RNAs by anti-CD28 as a primary screening criterion. The ligation of the CD28 antigen on the T lymphocyte by a surface antigen, B7/BB-1, expressed on activated B lymphocytes and monocytes^1,2 is a key step in the activation of T lymphocytes and the accumulation of lymphokine mRNAs^3. Here we report the discovery by molecular cloning of a new interleukin (interleukin-13 or IL-13) expressed in activated human T lymphocytes. Recombinant IL-13 protein inhibits inflammatory cytokine production induced by lipopolysaccharide in human peripheral blood monocytes. Moreover, it synergizes with IL-2 in regulating interferon-γ synthesis in large granular lymphocytes. Recent mapping of the IL-13 gene shows that it is closely linked to the IL-4 gene on chromosome 5q 23–31 (ref. 4). Interleukin-13 may be critical in regulating inflammatory and immune responses.MURINE T-helper clones are classified into two distinct subsets (Thl and Th2) on the basis of their patterns of lymphokine secretion. Thl clones secrete interleukin-2 (IL-2), tumour necrosis factor-β (TNF-β) and interferon-γ (IFN-γ), whereas Th2 clones secrete IL-4, IL-5 and IL-10 (ref. 1). These subsets are reciprocally regulated by IL-4, IL-10 and IFN-γ and differentially promote antibody or delayed-type hypersensitivity responses^2,3. To evaluate whether IL-4 is required for mounting Th2 responses, we generated IL-4-mutant mice (IL-4^–/ –)^4,5 and assessed the cytokine secretion pattern of T cells both from naive and Nippostrongylus brasiliensis infected mice. CD4^+ T cells from naive IL-4^–/ – mice failed to produce Th2-derived cytokines after in vitro stimulation. The levels of Th2 cytokines IL-5, IL-9 and IL-10 from CD4^+ T cells obtained after nematode infection were significantly reduced. The reduced IL-5 production in IL-4^–/ –mice correlated with reduced helminth-induced eosinophilia, which has been shown to be dependent on IL-5 in vivo ^6. We conclude that IL-4 is required for the generation of the Th2-derived cytokines and that immune responses dependent on these cytokines are impaired.THE mariner transposable element is a small member of the short inverted terminal repeat class thought to transpose through a DNA intermediate^1. Originally described in Drosophila mauritiana ^2, it is now known in several species of the family Drosophilidae^3,4, and in a moth Hyalophora cecropia ^5. Here I use primers designed to represent regions of amino-acid conservation between the putative transposase genes of the D. mauritiana and H. cecropia elements to amplify equivalent regions of presumed mariner elements from ten other insects representing six additional orders, including the malaria-vector mosquito, Anopheles gambiae . Sequences of multiple clones from each species reveal a diverse array of mariner elements, with multiple subfamilies in the genomes of some insects, indicating both vertical inheritance and horizontal transfers. An intact open reading frame in at least one clone from each species suggests each may carry functional transposable elements. Therefore the mariner element is an excellent candidate for development of genetic transformation systems for non-drosophilid insects, and possibly other arthropods.THE large, morphologically peculiar microorganism Epulopiscium fishelsoni ^1,2 inhabits the intestinal tract of Acanthurus nigrofuscus , a brown surgeon fish (family Acanthuridae) from the Red Sea. Similar microorganisms have been found in surgeonfish species from the Great Barrier Reef^3. As these microorganisms have only been seen in surgeonfish and no free-living forms have been found, they are considered to be specific symbionts of surgeonfish, although the nature of the symbiosis is unclear^1–4. Initial reports considered them to be eukaryotic protists, based primarily on their size^1–4, with individuals being larger than 600 μm by 80 μm. But their cellular morphology in the electron microscope is more like that of bacterial than eukaryotic cells^1,2,54. To resolve the nature of these symbionts, we have isolated the genes encoding the small subunit ribosomal RNA from two morphotypes and used them in a phylogenetic analysis. In situ hybridization with oligonucleotide probes based on the cloned rRNA sequences confirmed the source of the rRNA genes. Our results identify the symbionts as members of the low-(G + C) Gram-positive group of bacteria. They are therefore the largest bacteria to be described so far.DARWIN^1 believed that elaborate ornamental traits expressed in both sexes might be favoured by mutual sexual selection driven by both female and male mate choice. Experimental studies on birds^2–5 and fish^6–9 have shown that male ornaments can be favoured by female mating preferences. But the concept of mutual mate choice has remained untested experimentally, although it has been supported by recent modelling^10. Here we report the results of a study of mate preferences of the crested auklet Aethla cristatella , a monogamous seabird in which both sexes are ornamented. In two experiments we recorded the sexual response of male and female auklets to realistic opposite-sex models with crest ornaments experimentally shortened and lengthened within the range of natural variation. Males responded to accentuated female models with more frequent sexual displays, as did females to accentuated male models, confirming the idea that ornaments expressed in both sexes could be favoured by mutual mating preferences.MIGRATING non-transform offsets, which occur along mid-ocean ridges when a propagating segment gradually elongates and takes over spreading from a neighbouring 'doomed' rift segment^1–3, represent a significant modification of the plate tectonic paradigm^4. The migrating offset zone between the two spreading segments is clearly a locus of significant deformation, but the mechanism of this deformation has been controversial. Here we use the source parameters and locations of earthquakes at such offsets to discriminate between previously proposed models^2,4–7. Earthquakes at large non-transform offsets at medium and fast spreading rates show strike-slip mechanisms, with nodal planes rotated relative to the expected transform fault orientation. One set of nodal planes (presumably corresponding to the fault planes) is parallel to curved sea-floor lineaments which show increased rotation as a function of position in the deforming zone. A bookshelf faulting model in which initially ridge-parallel faults are rotated by simple shear is consistent with the observed lineament orientations, focal mechanisms and earthquake distributions.HIGH-TEMPERATURE continental geothermal systems are primarily associated with volcanic activity at plate margins^1. It has long been known that the activity of these geothermal systems is intermittent, and this is generally attributed to the effect of magmatic intrusions or fault motions. Recently, however, it has also been recognized^2–4 that surface-water hydrology and climate variations can influence the evolution of individual silicic caldera-hosted geothermal systems, although it is difficult to judge the general importance of such effects in controlling the long-term behaviour of continental geothermal systems. Here we report uranium-series ages for the hydrothermal deposits of past geothermal activity from several Quaternary volcanic centres in the northern Kenya rift valley. We find that the ages correspond well to periods of high lake level within the rift, suggesting that the elevated water table and increased availability of meteoric water associated with more humid climates can promote greater transfer of heat and mass from deep, long-lived heat sources to the surface.WHEN a horizontal layer of fluid is heated from below, it may undergo Rayleigh-Benard convection (RBC), leading to the spontaneous appearance of regular patterns of fluid flow^1. The shadow-graph technique^2, which allows visualization of the convection patterns, has assisted in developing an understanding of RBC. Related to RBC is convection in a fluid permeating a porous medium (called Horton-Rodgers-Lapwood convection or HRLC) when it is heated from below^3–7. HRLC is relevant to geothermal applications and to flow in soils. Pattern formation in HRLC is less easily visualized by shadowgraph techniques because of the difficulties of transmitting light through the porous medium. Here we show how these difficulties can be overcome by constructing porous media in which the interfaces between solid and liquid are either parallel or perpendicular to the confining boundaries of the experimental system. Convection in such a medium can be visualized using conventional shadowgraph methods, and we compare the stationary flow patterns observed against measurements of heat transport.SURFACTANT molecules in water form organized assemblies of various shapes, such as micelles and bilayer lamellae, which are of interest as analogues of biological structures, as model systems for studying complex phase behaviour and because of their technological importance, for example to the food and paint industries. The polar head groups are usually arranged randomly at the surface of these assemblies. We have studied the effect on the microstructure of these assemblies of imposing constraints on the head-group spacing. We investigate the structures formed by 'double-headed' surfactants in which two quaternary ammonium species (C_mH_2m+1N^+(CH_3)_2) are linked at the level of the head groups by a hydrocarbon spacer (C_sH_2s). Here we report the microstructures formed by these dimeric surfactants with m = 12 and s = 2,3 or 4 in aqueous solution, by rapidly cooling the micellar solutions and investigating the vitrified structures with transmission electron microscopy. The surfactants with a short spacer ( s = 2,3) form long, thread-like and entangled micelles even at low concentrations, whereas the corresponding monomeric ammonium surfactants can form only spherical micelles. The dimeric surfactants with s = 4 form spheroidal micelles. Thus short spacers (which impose reduced head-group separation) appear to promote lower spontaneous curvature in the assemblies. This approach may afford a new way to control amphiphile self-aggregation.FOLLOWING the discovery^1 of high-transition-temperature (high- T _c) superconductivity in doped La_2CuO_4, several families of related compounds have been discovered which have layers of CuO_2 as the essential requirement for superconductivity: the highest transition temperatures so far have been found for thallium-bearing compounds^2. Recently the mercury-bearing compound HgBa_2Rcu_2O_6+δ (Hg-1212) was synthesized^3 (where R is a rare-earth element), with a structure similar to the thallium-bearing superconductor TlBa_2CaCu_2O_7 (Tl-1212), which has one T1O layer and two CuO_2 layers per unit cell, and a T _c of 85 K (ref. 2). But in spite of its resemblance to Tl-1212, Hg-1212 was found not to be superconducting. Here we report the synthesis of the related compound HgBa_2CuO_4+δ (Hg-1201), with only one CuO_2 layer per unit cell, and show that it is superconducting below 94 K. Its structure is similar to that of Tl-1201 (which has a T _c of < 10 K)^4, but its transition temperature is considerably higher. The availability of a material with high T _c but only a single metal oxide (HgO) layer may be important for technological applications, as it seems that a smaller spacing between CuO_2 planes leads to better superconducting properties in a magnetic field^5.THE quasar absorption lines known as the Lyman-α forest reveal the presence of a population of extragalactic objects, thought to be clouds of gas or gas-rich protogalaxies. The gas seems to be highly ionized ( N _Hl/ N _H11 ≈ 10^–4), with column densities ( N _H1) ranging from 10^12 to 10^18 cm^–2 and Doppler parameters of 15–40 km s^–1 (refs 1–3). Different types of measurement have yielded strongly discrepant numbers for the typical diameter, from several tens of kiloparsecs^4,5 to only ∼5 parsecs^6,7. Nothing is known about the clouds' shape (spheres or sheets), which could provide another clue to their origin^8. The observation of huge, luminous Ly-α haloes around some high-redshift radio galaxies^9–11 provides a new way of obtaining information about Lyman cloud size and shape: the large sizes (many tens of kiloparsecs) and broad emission-line profiles of these haloes make them ideal light screens against which absorbing clouds at similar redshift might be seen as dark shadows. We report here the possible detection of such an absorbing cloud in front of the radio galaxy 4C41.17; in the simplest interpretation, the cloud has an elongated shape, and dimensions of ∼40 x 10 kiloparsecs.Britain is out of step with the rest of Europe even on matters such as summer time. But that may change.The case for providing financial assistance to the Russian government is still strong, even if President Boris Yeltsin is less secure now than he was a year ago.The structure of GH5, the globular domain of the linker histone H5, has been solved to 2.5 Å resolution by multiwavelength anomalous diffraction on crystals of the selenomethionyl protein. The structure shows a striking similarity to the DNA-binding domain of the catabolite gene activator protein CAP, thereby providing a possible model for the binding of GH5 to DNA.The Geographical Tradition. By David N. Livingstone. Blackwell: 1992. Pp. 434. £45, $55 (hbk); £13.95, $19.95 (pbk).The Vegetation of Egypt. By M. A. Zahran and A. J. Willis. Chapman and Hall: 1992. Pp. 424. £19.95, $47.50 (pbk).The Physics of Chance: From Blaise Pascal to Niels Bohr. By Charles Ruhla. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 222. £30, $55 (hbk); £14.95, $27.95 (pbk).The Universal Man: Theodore von Kármán's Life in Aeronautics. By Michael Gorn Smithsonian Institution Press: 1992. Pp. 202. $24.95, £19.50.A new model by two physicists of the assembly of microtubules from the monomer tubulin throws an interesting light on the regulation of this important and ubiquitous process.Nature 359, 623-627 (1992) WE have been unable to precisely reproduce some of the lead isotope data for Madeira lavas reported in the above paper. In the light of further analyses the correct compositions are as follows: Sample number MD4 MD10 MD32 MD40 MD64 206pb/204pb 19.159 19.182 19.097 19.143 19.A season of celebrations of the fortieth anniversary of DNA appropriately began last week at Watson's laboratory on Long Island. Rarely do people who have worked revolutions have the luck to see the consequences.CONGENERS of nitrogen monoxide (NO) are neuroprotective and neurodestructive^1– 7. To address this apparent paradox, we considered the effects on neurons of compounds characterized by alternative redox states of NO: nitric oxide (NO^.) and nitrosonium ion (NO^+)^8. Nitric oxide, generated from NO^. donors or synthesized endogenously after NMDA ( N -methyl-D-aspartate) receptor activation, can lead to neurotoxicity^3,4. Here, we report that NO^.-mediated neurotoxicity is engendered, at least in part, by reaction with superoxide anion (O^.-_2), apparently leading to formation of peroxynitrite (ONOO−), and not by NO^. alone. In contrast, the neuroprotective effects of NO result from downregulation of NMDA-receptor activity by reaction with thiol group(s) of the receptor's redox modulatory site^1. This reaction is not mediated by NO^. itself, but occurs under conditions supporting S -nitrosylation of NMDA receptor thiol (reaction or transfer of NO^+). Moreover, the redox versatility of NO allows for its interconversion from neuroprotective to neurotoxic species by a change in the ambient redox milieu. The details of this complex redox chemistry of NO may provide a mechanism for harnessing neuroprotective effects and avoiding neurotoxicity in the central nervous system.THE rearrangement of synaptic connections during normal and deprived development is thought to be controlled by correlations in afferent impulse activity^1. A favoured model is based on postsynaptic detection of synchronously active afferents; synapses are stabilized when pre- and postsynaptic activity is correlated and weakened or eliminated when their activity is uncorrelated^2,3. Most evidence for this model comes from demonstrations that correlated afferent input is necessary for the segregation of eye-dominant inputs in the developing vertebrate visual system^1,4,5 and that critical period plasticity of ocular dominance columns in cat visual cortex is disrupted by blockade of postsynaptic transmission^6–8. We tested whether the developmental plasticity of somatosensory columns, known as 'barrels', in rodent primary somatosensory cortex (S1)^9–13 is similar to that of ocular dominance columns. We report here that the selective disruption of postsynaptic activation in rat S1 by application of a glutamate receptor antagonist inhibits rearrangements in the somatotopic patterning of thalamocorticalafferents induced by manipulations of the sensory periphery during the critical period. These findings show that postsynaptic activation has a prominent role in critical period plasticity in S1 cortex.BEHAVIOURAL studies^1–4 and field observations^5–7 demonstrate that echolocating bats simultaneously perceive range, direction and shape of multiple objects in the environment as acoustic images derived from echoes. Cortical echo delay-tuned neurons contribute to the perception of object range, because focal inactivation of these neurons disrupts behavioural discrimination of range^8. We report here that response properties of delay-tuned neurons in the cortical tonotopic area of the bat, Eptesicus , transform the sequential arrival times of echoes with different delays into a concurrent, accumulating neural representation of multiple objects at different ranges. The sharpness of delay tuning systematically increases at each best delay in a subpopulation of these neurons while responses to echoes at different delays are accumulated. The resulting concurrent, multiresolution representation of echo delay corresponds to neural implementation of a common representation of images used in computational vision^9–11 and may provide the basis for representing acoustic images of multiple objects as acoustic 'scenes'.University reforms in Saxony may help to rehabilitate the concept of elite universities elsewhere in Germany.The crystal structure of T7 RNA polymerase reveals a molecule organized around a cleft that can accommodate a double-stranded DNA template. A portion (∼ 45%) of the molecule displays extensive structural homology to the polymerase domain of Klenow fragment and more limited homology to the human immunodeficiency virus HIV-1 reverse transcriptase. A comparison of the structures and sequences of these polymerases identifies structural elements that may be responsible for discriminating between ribonucleotide and deoxyribonucleotide substrates, and RNA and DNA templates. The relative locations of the catalytic site and a specific promoter recognition residue allow the orientation of the polymerase on the template to be defined.IN many animals that use rhythmic acoustic or bioluminescent sexual communication, neighbouring males precisely synchronize their signals^1–4. This event has previously been interpreted as a development whereby cooperative individuals benefit from maintenance of species-specific signalling rates^5,6, minimization of predation risks^7,8, or maximization of peak signal amplitude of a local population^2,9. Our recent findings on chorusing in the neotropical katydid Neoconocephalus spiza (Orthoptera: Tettigoniidae), however, refute for this species all three hypotheses that claim that synchrony is adaptive. Instead, we demonstrate that synchrony can be an epiphenomenon created by competitive interactions between males jamming each other's signals. The mechanism generating this interference is shown to be an evolutionarily stable strategy (ESS) maintained under sexual selection for exploiting a critical psychoacoustic feature: females orienting toward signalling males choose the leading call in a closely synchronized sequence.IN short-term experiments under productive laboratory conditions, native herbaceous plants differ widely in their potential to achieve higher yields at elevated concentrations of atmospheric carbon dioxide^1–8. The most responsive species appear to be large fast-growing perennials of recently disturbed fertile soils^7,8. These types of plants are currently increasing in abundance^9 but it is not known whether this is an effect of rising carbon dioxide or is due to other factors. Doubts concerning the potential of natural vegetation for sustained response to rising carbon dioxide have arisen from experiments on infertile soils, where the stimulus to growth was curtailed by mineral nutrient limitations^2,3,10. Here we present evidence that mineral nutrient constraints on the fertilizer effect of elevated carbon dioxide can also occur on fertile soil and in the earliest stages of secondary succession. Our data indicate that there may be a feedback mechanism in which elevated carbon dioxide causes an increase in substrate release into the rhizosphere by non-mycorrhizal plants, leading to mineral nutrient sequestration by the expanded microflora and a consequent nutritional limitation on plant growth.MAGNESIUM-rich silicate perovskite is thought to be the primary constituent of the Earth's lower mantle: experiments have shown^1 MgSiO_3 perovskite to be stable at lower-mantle pressures, and the elastic properties of perovskite-dominated assemblages agree well with seismological observations^2–4. It has also been suggested^5–8 that the observed orthorhombic structure will undergo displacive phase transitions to higher-symmetry structures at lower-mantle conditions. The presence of such transitions would have important consequences for mantle convection^9, and could provide an explanation for some of the weak seismic discontinuities observed^10–12 in the lower mantle. However, the determination of the phase behaviour of MgSiO_3 perovskite at lower-mantle conditions has so far eluded both experimental and theoretical efforts. Here we report the results of electronic-structure calculations of the energetics of displacive phase transitions in MgSiO_3 perovskite, and demonstrate that the lower-symmetry orthorhombic phase should be highly favoured throughout the lower mantle. Our results are consistent with recent experiments^13on MgSiO_3 perovskite encompassing the temperatures and pressures of the uppermost regions of the lower mantle.SHATSKY Rise, in the northwest Pacific Ocean, is probably the oldest extant oceanic plateau, and as with most such features, its origin is uncertain. Both oceanic plateaus and continental flood basalts are thought to be formed by rapid, voluminous eruptions that occur when the 'head' of a newly born mantle plume ascends to the base of the lithosphere^1–3. High eruption rates have been estimated for flood basalts (for example, 1.5km^3 yr^−1 for the Deccan Traps^2) from dating of lava flows, but the inaccessibility of oceanic plateaus makes it necessary to extrapolate dating information from a small number of samples and sites^4. Here we estimate the eruption rate of Shatsky Rise by a method that is indirect, but has the virtue of 'sampling' the entire volume of the plateau above the surrounding sea floor. The main, southern part of the plateau has a positive magnetic anomaly, corresponding to a reversed geomagnetic polarity at the time of eruption. Using age constraints to identify the longest period of reversed polarity during which the plateau could have formed, we estimate that 2 × 10^6 km^3 of material erupted at a minimum rate of 1.7km^3 yr^−1. This issomewhat less than the rate of 8–22 km^3 yr^−1 estimated for the Ontong–Java Plateau^4, but still represents a massive eruption, consistent with the plume-head hypothesis.A spherical model of mantle flow constrained by the locations of trenches can be used to predict the dynamic topography of the Earth's surface, and hence the marine inundation of continents. For past periods of high sea level, the predicted geographical pattern of flooding correlates well with the geological record. The high spatial correlation may result from increased plate velocities at these times, leading to increased rates of subduction, subsidence and inundation at convergent margins.The Merging of the Senses. By Barry E. Stein and M. Alex Meredith. MIT Press: 1993. Pp. 211. $42.5, £38.25.Calculated Risks: The Toxicity and Human Health Risks of Chemicals in Our Environment. By Joseph V. Rodricks. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 256. £17.95, $22.95.Hidden Attraction: The Mystery and History of Magnetism. By Gerrit L. Verschuur. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 256. $25, £20.The Lemurs' Legacy: Evolution of Power, Sex, and Love. By Robert Jay Russell. Tarcher/Putnam: 1993. Pp. 274. $21.95. Female Choices: Sexual Behaviour of Female Primates. By Meredith F. Small. Cornell University Press: 1993. Pp. 245. $26.95.HOW diamond films grow by chemical vapour deposition is now fairly well understood^1,2, but the mechanism by which the diamond phase first nucleates is still unclear. Evidence is accumulating that atomic hydrogen, known to be important in diamond growth^1,2, also plays an important role in nucleation^3,4. The nature of the carbon precursor to diamond has been much debated^2–9; although there is some evidence that graphite is formed before diamond nucleation^2,5,6 and that diamond grows epitaxially on the graphite edges^7, others have suggested^10,11 that graphite formation is detrimental to diamond nucleation. Here we present calculations that suggest that diamond films can nucleate by the initial condensation of graphite and subsequent hydrogenation of the {1¯100} prism planes along the edges of the graphite particles. If nucleation really does occur in this manner, the understanding that our model provides should assist in the development of methods for growing large diamond single crystals (now limited in part by secondary nucleation of independent crystals) and highly oriented epitaxial diamond films.THE magnetic field penetration depth λ is a basic parameter of superconductivity, related to n _ s /m* (superconducting carrier density/effective mass) as λ^-2 ∝ n _ s /m* in the limit where the coherence length ζ is much shorter than the mean free path l (the 'clean limit'). Muon spin relaxation ( µ SR) measurements^1,2 of λ in high-transition-temperature (high- T _ c ) copper oxide superconductors have revealed remarkable correlations between T _ c and n _ s /m* : T _ c increases linearly with n _ s /m* in the underdoped region, followed by a saturation with increasing carrier doping. Here we report µ SR measurements of λ in ceramic specimens of of the superconductor TI-_2Ba_2CuO_6+δ (TI-2201) in the 'overdoped' region where T _ c decreases with increasing hole doping. Recent measurements of upper critical field and resistivity^3confirm that overdoped TI-2201 lies well in the clean limit with a ζ<< l . We find that the muon spin relaxation rate σ( T → 0) ∝ λ ^−2 ∝ n _ s /m* in TI-2201 decreases with increasing hole doping, implying that either n _ s no longer scales with the normal-state carrier density n _ n , and/or m ^* for a superconducting pair becomes much larger than the value expected from the normal-state effective mass m ^*_ n . This behaviour of overdoped TI-2201 is in marked contrast to conventional metallic superconductors having a retarded interaction, in which the normal-state properties ( n _ n , m ^*_ n , l )directly represent the corresponding values in the superconducting state.OPTICAL observations of the companion stars in binary pulsar systems^1–3 offer a way to estimate pulsar ages independent of calculations based on timing measurements of the radio pulses, and can therefore provide important constraints for models of pulsar evolution. Here we report the optical detection of the companion star of the nearby binary millisecond pulsar J0437–4715. The companion seems to be a very cool, quiescent white dwarf. The temperature inferred from the observations is less than that obtained from a cooling model of a white dwarf of an age equivalent to the 'spin-down' age of the pulsar. These observations provide direct support for the hypothesis^1 that millisecond pulsars are long-lived objects, and that their magnetic fields do not decay.SUPERNOVA 1993J in the galaxy M81 is the second-brightest type II supernova observed this century, surpassed only by SN1987A in the Large Magellanic Cloud. Here we report the evolution of the photometric and spectral properties of SN1993J for the first 50 days following its discovery. The behaviour of this supernova is unusual, showing features typical of type II supernovae near the initial maximum, but with the strong helium lines characteristic of type Ib supernovae at later times. This implies that the progenitor star had an unusually thin hydrogen envelope (compared to normal type II progenitors), suggesting that significant mass loss had taken place before the explosion. Application of an expanding photosphere model^1 to our data provides an estimate of the distance to the supernova of 2.6 ± 0.4 Mpc, broadly consistent with the distance to M81 determined using Cepheid variable stars^2. Supernova models that more closely match the atypical spectral features of SN1993J may change the inferred distance, and should provide better constraints on the structure of the progenitor.The US National Academy of Sciences, which has proposed a new framework based on international status for making decisions about the support of research, should follow through with a real-life study.Contrary to the prevailing opinion that the Roman assault ramp at Masada in Israel was entirely man-made, geological observations reveal that it consists mostly of natural bedrock.Problems at an Italian pharmaceutical company leave Washington's Georgetown University in the lurch.A Nobel laureate with a passion for basic research is just what the US biomedical community wants — and will get in Harold Varmus as head of the National Institutes of Health.New modes of detection featured this week include a new crosslink immunoassay for bone research, a western blot kit for detecting autoantibodies to nuclear and cytoplasmic antigens, and an optical biosensor device.THE growth suppression function of the retinoblastoma protein (Rb) is thought to be mediated by Rb binding to cellular proteins^1. p48 is one of the major proteins that binds to a putative functional domain at the carboxy terminus of the Rb protein^2. Here we report the isolation of a full-length complementary DNA ( RbAp48 ) encoding p48. Complex formation between p48 and Rb occurs in vitro and in vivo , and apparently involves direct interaction between the proteins. Like RbAp48 is a ubiquitously expressed nuclear protein. Rb, p48 share sequence homology with MS11 , a negative regulator of the Ras-cyclic AMP pathway in the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae ^3. Furthermore, like MS11 , human RbAp48 suppresses the heat-shock sensitivity of the yeast ira1 strains and RAS2 ^ val19 strains. Interaction with p48 may be one of the mechanisms for suppression of growth mediated by Rb.IN mice transgenic for an autoantibody, self-reactive B cells have been shown to be eliminated upon interaction with membrane-bound self-antigens in the periphery^1,2as well as in the bone marrow^3–5, suggesting that both immature and mature B cells are eliminated by multimerization of surface immunoglobulins (sIg). Activation of mature B cells by antigens may thus require a second signal that inhibits sIg-mediated apoptosis. Such a second signal is likely to be provided by T helper cells, because B-cell tolerance is more easily induced in the absence of T helper cells^6–9. To assess the molecular nature of the signal that inhibits slg-mediated apoptosis, we used anti-IgM-induced apoptotic death of WEHI-231 B lymphoma cells^10,11 as a model system. Here we report that the signal for abrogating sIg-mediated apoptosis is generated by association of the CD40L molecule on T cells with the CD40 molecule on WEHI-231 cells. T-cell help through CD40 may thus determine whether B cells are eliminated or activated upon interaction with antigens.THYMOCYTES are selected for expression of αβ T-cell antigen receptors (TCR) which recognize antigen in conjunction with self-major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules^1,2. In the thymus the restriction element is imprinted on radioresistant stromal elements^3–7 and on cells of haematopoietic origin^8–10. In mice negative for β_2-microglobulin that are devoid of mature cytotoxic T lymphocytes^11, we find that intrathymic injection of different fibroblasts causes the maturation of CD4^−CD8^+TCR^high thymocytes with distinct patterns of TCR Vβ distribution. Here we show that in TCR-transgenic mice, intrathymic injection of L cells expressing the selecting (H–2K^b) molecule (H–2K^b cells) reconstitutes the maturation of thymocytes bearing the transgenic TCR, and that in normal B10.BR (H–2^k) mice, H–2K^b molecules expressed on L–K^b cells lead to the development of T lymphocytes with recognition restricted to H–2K^b. A class I MHC restriction element can thus be selected by interaction with fibroblasts, that is, cells of other than epithelial or haematopoietic origin^3–10.World Forests for the Future. Edited by Kiliparti Ramakrishna and George M. Woodwell. Yale University Press: 1993. Pp. 156. £14.95, $20.RUFFLES are specialized plasma membrane ultrastructures of mammalian cells thought to be integral to growth, development and locomotion^1–4. Induced by growth factors^5–8, mitogens^9 or oncogene expression ruffles are sites of filamentous actin rearrangement^7,8 and are temporally associated with enhanced pinocytosis^10,12. But the function of ruffles, their mechanism of induction and their role in pinocytosis are not understood. We have observed formation of structures resembling ruffles associated with the site of entry of invasive Salmonella typhimurium ^13. Here we report that ruffles elicited by invasive Salmonella directly mediate internalization of non-invasive bacteria in a macropinocytotic fashion, a phenomenon we term 'passive entry'. Furthermore, ruffles induced in the absence of Salmonella also facilitate passive entry. We present evidence that ruffles, common to many signalling events, comprise the macropinocytotic machinery mediating pinocytosis and are subverted by Salmonella so as to enter mammalian cells.CALCIUM influx through voltage-sensitive Ca^2+ channels is the normal physiological stimulus for the activity-dependent release of neurotransmitters at synaptic contacts. It has been postulated that presynaptic inhibition of transmitter release is due to a reduction in Ca^2+ influx at the nerve terminal, which could result from the direct inhibition of Ca^2+ channels. Neuropeptide Y and noradren-aline act as cotransmitters at many sympathetic synapses. Both of these substances produce presynaptic inhibition and can inhibit Ca^2+ currents in the soma of sympathetic neurons^1–5. Here we provide direct evidence that presynaptic inhibition produced by neuropeptide Y at sympathetic nerve terminals is associated with a reduction in Ca^2+ influx and that this is due to the selective inhibition of neuronal N-type Ca^2+ channels.NEURONAL filopodia are actin-rich cytoplasmic extensions that are involved in motility and recognition in growth cones and maturing axonal endings. A detailed understanding of neuronal growth will depend on clarification of the membrane fusion events occurring during filopodial extension. The synaptic vesicle protein synaptotagmin seems to be intimately involved in exocytotic membrane fusion^1–3. Here we show that fibroblast cell lines transfected with synaptotagmin form long, highly branched, actin-rich filopodial processes, with the expressed synaptotagmin being incorporated into the plasma membrane. In contrast, cell lines expressing either of two other synaptic vesicle proteins, SV2 or synaptophysin, generate only rudimentary processes, and, like neurons, sort SV2 and synaptophysin to small intracellular vesicles. As presynaptic calcium entry regulates synaptic vesicle fusion, our results indicate that synaptotagmin might link neuronal activity with synaptic growth.NEURONAL injury resulting from acute brain insults and some neurodegenerative diseases implicates N -methyl-D-aspartate (NMDA) glutamate receptors^1–4. The fact that antioxidants reduce some types of brain damage suggests that oxygen radicals may have a role^5–7. It has been shown that mutations in Cu/Zn-superoxide dismutase (SOD), an enzyme catalysing superoxide (O^·-_2) detoxification in the cell, are linked to a familial form of amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS)^4. Here we report that O^·-_2 is produced upon NMDA receptor stimulation in cultured cerebellar granule cells. Electron paramagnetic resonance was used to assess O^·-_2 production that was due in part to the release of arachidonic acid. Activation of kainic acid receptors, or voltage-sensitive Ca^2+ channels, did not produce detectable O^·-_2. We also find that the nitrone DMPO (5,5-dimethyl pyrroline 1-oxide), used as a spin trap, is more efficient than the nitric oxide synthase inhibitor, L - N ^ G -nitroarginine, in reducing NMDA-induced neuronal death in these cultures.MYOGENIN is a member of the basic helix-loop-helix (bHLH) gene family and converts multipotential mesodermal cells to myoblasts^1–4. The four members of the myoD family show unique spatio-temporal expression patterns^5 and therefore may have different functions during myogenesis. Here we inactivate the myogenin gene in order to understand its role in myogenesis. Homozygous mutations are lethal perinatally owing to the resulting major defects in skeletal muscle. The extent of disorganization of muscle tissue differs in three regions. In the latero-ventral body wall, most cells, including myogenic cells, disappear and there is rapid accretion of fluid. In the limbs, cells of the myogenic lineage exist, but they are severely disrupted, and some of them are mono-nucleate with properties of myoblasts. In contrast, there are many axial, intercostal and back muscle fibres to be seen, although fibres are mainly disorganized and Z-lines are not present in most myofibrils. These findings are evidence that myogenin is crucial for muscle development in utero and demonstrate that other members of the myogenic gene family cannot compensate for the defect.OESTROGEN, an essential physiological regulator of reproductive function^1, controls lactotroph proliferation and prolactin release^2. The neuropeptide galanin co-localizes to the lactotroph^3, but its physiological function is largely unknown. Pituitary galanin expression is extremely sensitive to the oestrogen status of the animal. A marked elevation occurs during pregnancy and lactation^4, and exogenous 17β-oestradiol can cause a 4,000-fold increase in messenger RNA levels^5. Here we report that galanin is secreted by a minority of lactotrophs and is essential for the regulation of basal and vasoactive-intestinal-polypeptide-stimulated prolactin release. Hyperoestrogenization increases the number of galanin-secreting cells and the resulting increase in basal prolactin release is completely abolished by treatment with galanin anti-serum. Galanin is a potent lactotroph growth factor and galanin-immunoneutralization completely inhibits the previously reported^6–8 mitogenic effects of oestrogen on the lactotroph. These findings represent direct evidence for paracrine regulation of lactotroph function and demonstrate that the effect of oestrogen on lactotroph proliferation and prolactin release are mediated by locally secreted galanin.LIKE our other senses, the auditory system can produce illusions. Prominent among these are distortion products^1–5: when listening to two tones, one of frequency f1 and the second of a higher frequency f2 , an individual may hear not only these primary tones, but also a difference tone of frequency f2-f1 , a sum tone of frequency f2+f1 , and combination tones of frequencies such as 2 f1-f2 and 2 f2-f1 . Discovered by Tartini early in the eighteenth century^6,7, these illusory sounds are sufficiently conspicuous that they were employed to carry melodies in classical compositions. Distortion products originate within the cochlea, where they manifest themselves in the basilar membrane's vibration^8. Here we demonstrate distortion products in individual hair cells of the bullfrog's sacculus, where they emerge from a nonlinearity inherent in the mechanoelectrical transduction process. In addition to offering an explanation for cochlear distortion products, our results suggest that the mechanical properties of hair bundles significantly influence the basilar membrane's motion.THE transduction mechanisms and the neurophysiological basis of magnetoreception in birds are still largely unexplained, even though the role of the magnetic compass in the orientation of birds is fairly well understood^1. The discussion on magnetoreception in birds and terrestrial vertebrates focuses mainly on two mechanisms: small particles of magnetite^2,3 and biochemical bi-radical reactions of excited macromolecules^4,5. When the bi-radical hypothesis was first proposed, magnetic resonance phenomena in the retina were suggested as the primary processes^4, which led to the question of whether magnetoreception was light-dependent. Homing experiments^6 and electrophysiological evidence^7 from pigeons have produced evidence consistent with such a mechanism. An effect of the spectral composition of light on magnetic compass orientation in amphibians has recently been described^8: under blue light of 450 nm and below, newts oriented as they did under the full spectrum, whereas they showed a roughly 90° counterclockwise shift when tested under wavelengths at or above 500 nm. Here we report the first orientation tests on migratory birds under light of different wavelengths; the results suggest a light-dependent process that appears to differ from that reported in newts.THE orientation of migratory birds is based on a complex of interacting compass mechanisms (the geomagnetic field, stars, patterns of skylight polarization and, perhaps, the Sun)^1,2. A magnetic compass develops in birds that have never seen the sky^3–8, but the preferred direction of magnetic orientation may be modified during the first three months of life by exposing naive birds to either the clear daytime or night sky under conditions in which magnetic directions differ substantially from true or geographic directions^5–7,9. We hypothesized that celestial rotation, which indicates geographic directions both day and night, served as the calibrating reference^7, and showed that a rotating pattern of artificial stars provided a sufficient stimulus to calibrate magnetic orientation in young Savannah sparrows ( Passerculus sandwichensis )^10. During daytime either the Sun's disc or patterns of polarized skylight could provide the reference to geographic compass directions^11,12. Here we report that visual access to natural skylight polarization patterns is necessary for calibration of magnetic orientation during daylight.THE high-pressure, low-temperature metamorphic rocks known as blueschists have long been considered to form in subduction zones, where the descent of a relatively cold slab leads to the occurrence of unusually low temperatures at mantle pressures. Until now, however, the link between blueschist-facies rocks and subduction zones has been indirect, relying on a spatial association of blueschists with old subduction complexes, and estimates of the geothermal gradients likely to exist in subduction zones. Here we strengthen this link, by reporting the discovery of blueschist-facies minerals (lawsonite, aragonite, sodic pyroxene and blue amphibole) in clasts from a serpentinite seamount in the forearc of the active Mariana subduction zone. The metamorphic conditions estimated from the mineral compositions are 150–250 °C and 5–6 kbar (16–20 km depth). The rocks must have been entrained in rising serpentine mud diapirs, and extruded from mud volcanoes onto the sea floor. Further study of these rocks may provide new insight into the tectonics of trench-forearc systems, and in particular, the processes by which blueschist-facies clasts come to be associated with forearc sediments in ancient subduction complexes.Francis Bacon: History, Politics and Science, 1561-1626. By B. H. G. Wormald. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 409. £45, $69.95.200% of Nothing: An Eye-Opening Tour Through the Twists and Turns of Math Abuse and Innumeracy. By A. K. Dewdney. Wiley: 1993. Pp. 192. $19.95, £12.95.Bad Science: The Short Life and Weird Times of Cold Fusion. By Gary Taubes. Random House: 1993. Pp. 503. $25.THE presence of microscopic luminescence banding in cave calcite deposits (speleothems) has recently been reported^1–3. The luminescence seems to be caused by excitation of humic and fulvic acids derived from the overlying soil and subsequently incorporated into the calcite^3,4. We have tested whether such luminescence corresponds to annual growth layers, using high-precision thermal–ionization mass-spectrometric ^238U–^234U–^230 Th ages from banded sections of a Holocene stalagmite. We report here that the timespans yielded by counting bands, on the assumption that they are annual, agree within error limits with those obtained by our uranium-thorium dating. This demonstration that the banding is annual should make banded speleothems valuable resources for providing high-resolution records of past climate (in which precipitation can be estimated from growth rates^5,6 and temperatures from stable-isotope measurements^7) and solar–terrestrial correlations (as the luminescence intensity can be related to the solar sunspot cycle^1–3).MUCH attention has been focused recently on the design and fabrication of large-scale molecular structures^1. Carbon nanotubes formed by an arc-discharge method^2,3 have attracted particular attention. These tubes range from about 1 to 30 nanometres in diameter and a micrometre or so in length. To construct smaller tubes, direct chemical synthesis may be a more convenient approach. The cyclic oligomers of glucose known as cyclodextrins (CDs) would seem to be ideal candidates for the components of a molecular tube: they contain cylindrical cavities about 0.7 nm deep, with diameters of 0.45 nm, 0.7 nm and 0.85 nm for α-CD, β-CD and γ-CD respectively^4. Lehn has recently reported the use of 'bouquet molecules' built from β-CD with long side chains as artificial ion channels^5. We have previously prepared rotaxane super-molecules in which CDs are threaded on a polymer chain, and we^6 and others^7,8, have reported polyrotaxanes with many threaded CDs. Here we report the crosslinking of adjacent CD units in apolyrotaxane to create a molecular tube. By removing the bulky ends of the polymer thread, the tube can be unthreaded and can act as a host for reversible binding of small molecules.THE discovery of carbon nanotubes^1,2 has stimulated many theoretical studies of their physical properties^3–12, and their bulk synthesis^13 should soon make possible experimental measurements of these properties^14. All studies so far have assumed that the nanotubes have perfect cylindrical symmetry. Here we show that van der Waals forces between adjacent nanotubes can deform them substantially, destroying this cylindrical symmetry. We present transmission electron microscopy images of two adjacent aligned tubes, about 100 Å in diameter, which show flattening of the tubes along the contact region. Calculations on two-layer nested nanotubes indicate that these deformations can be explained on the basis of van der Waals interactions. We predict that these effects should be observable at least for tubes as small as 20 Å in diameter, and suggest that they may have a significant influence on the tubes' physical properties.UNLIKE all other planetary satellites, Saturn's moon Titan has a massive atmosphere^1–8. At visible wavelengths, a thick stratospheric haze hides the surface from view. The emission from Titan in the infrared is largely from methane, nitrogen and hydrogen also in the stratosphere^4. In the near-infrared, however, the extinction from haze decreases, and narrow windows exist in which the atmosphere absorbs only weakly^9–14, and through which we might therefore catch a glimpse of the surface. Within two of these windows, Lemmon et a1 .^15,16 recently observed a difference in Titan's albedo when the satellite was at eastern and western elongation with respect to Saturn. Although these observations could be taken to imply that Titan's surface is heterogeneous (and therefore is not covered by a global methane–ethane ocean as predicted previously^7), they could also be explained by transient clouds. Here I present observations from two more rotational periods which record the same albedo difference, indicating that the heterogeneity is most unlikely to be associated with transient features and must be intrinsic to the surface. These results also imply that Titan is locked in a synchronous orbit about Saturn.The complexity of solid structures containing hydrogen bonds should be a salutary reminder that there is a long way to go before some of the simplest solid structures are understood.SUPERNOVA 1993J in the spiral galaxy M81 is the brightest supernova since SN1987A and, like the latter, appears to be another 'peculiar' type II supernova. The available photometry^1,2 of the supernova region before the explosion requires the presence of at least two supergiants (one of early spectral type and the other of late type), but the actual progenitor has yet to be identified. Here we show that the explosion of a late-type supergiant can explain the initial sharp peak in the supernova light curve, provided that the star had lost almost all of its hydrogen-rich envelope before the explosion. In our model, the secondary brightening of the supernova, ∼10 days later, is then a consequence of the radioactive decay of ^56Ni (and subsequently ^56Co) produced in the explosion. The progenitor could have lost its hydrogen-rich envelope either in a strong stellar wind or, as seems more likely, through mass transfer to a companion star. In the latter case, the companion should reappear after the supernova photosphere has receded, the system having become a binary composed of a neutron star with a massive stellar companion.SPECTRAL analyses of supernovae have allowed them to be broadly divided into two classes, type I and type II. Supernova 1993J was identified^1–3 as a type II supernova following the detection of a weak hydrogen line in its early spectrum. But the optical light curve^4 of SN1993J is atypical for this class of supernova, with the intensity rising to a second maximum after the initial outburst. The light curve around the second maximum more closely resembles that of the type Ib supernova 1983N (ref. 5), the progenitor of which may have been a helium star^6. Here we show that the secondary brightening and subsequent decay of the light curve can be explained by the radioactive decay of ^56Co; combined with the early spectrum, this suggests that the progenitor may have been a red supergiant with an unusually thin hydrogen-rich envelope. If this model is correct, the spectrum will rapidly evolve from type II to type Ib, in which case SN1993J would be classified as a type lib supernova^7–8. We suggest that the progenitor was in a binary system, and had lost most of its hydrogen envelope to the companion star before the explosion.THE measurement of crustal motions in technically active regions is being performed increasingly by the satellite-based Global Positioning System (GPS)^1,2, which offers considerable advantages over conventional geodetic techniques^3,4. Continuously operating GPS arrays with ground-based receivers spaced tens of kilometres apart have been established in central Japan^5,6 and southern California to monitor the spatial and temporal details of crustal deformation. Here we report the first measurements for a major earthquake by a continuously operating GPS network, the Permanent GPS Geodetic Array (PGGA)^7–9 in southern California. The Landers (magnitude Afw of 7.3) and Big Bear ( M _w 6.2) earthquakes of 28 June 1992 were monitored by daily observations. Ten weeks of measurements, centred on the earthquake events, indicate significant coseismic motion at all PGGA sites, significant post-seismic motion at one site for two weeks after the earthquakes, and no significant preseismic motion. These measurements demonstrate the potential of GPS monitoring for precise detection of precursory and aftershock seismic deformation in the near and far field.ATMOSPHERIC general circulation models predict enhanced greenhouse warming at high latitudes^1 owing to positive feedbacks between air temperature, ice extent and surface albedo^2–4. Previous analyses of Arctic temperature trends have been restricted to land-based measurements on the periphery of the Arctic Ocean^5,6. Here we present temperatures measured in the lower troposphere over the Arctic Ocean during the period 1950–90. We have analysed more than 27,000 temperature profiles, measured by radiosonde at Russian drifting ice stations and by dropsonde from US ‘Ptarmigan’ weather reconnaissance aircraft, for trends as a function of season and altitude. Most of the trends are not statistically significant. In particular, we do not observe the large surface warming trends predicted by models; indeed, we detect significant surface cooling trends over the western Arctic Ocean during winter and autumn. This discrepancy suggests that present climate models do not adequately incorporate the physical processes that affect the polar regions.THE recent discovery^1 and bulk synthesis^2 of nanometre-scale carbon tubules has led to much speculation about possible uses of these graphitic structures^3–5. Broughton and Pederson predicted on the basis of computer simulations that open nanotubes may be filled with liquid by capillary suction^6. Here we describe experiments in which annealing of the tubules in the presence of liquid lead results in opening of the capped tube ends and subsequent filling of the tubes with molten material through capillary action. The nanotubes thus act as moulds for the fabrication of (possibly metallic) wires, some of which are less than two nanometres in diameter.GQ MUS (Nova Muscae 1983) was the first classical nova from which X-rays were detected during outburst1'2. Those Exosat observations were consistent with thermonuclear burning on the surface of a white dwarf emitting 10^37–10^38 erg s^−1 at (3.0–3.5) × 10^5 K or with shocked circumstellar material emitting 10^35 erg s^−1 by thermal bremsstrahlung at 10^7 K. Here we report the detection by the Rosat satellite^3 of GQ Mus as a very soft black-body-like source. If the observed X-ray flux is being radiated at the Eddington luminosity (10^38 erg s^−1) from a one-solar-mass white dwarf, its effective temperature must be ∼3.5 × 10^5 K. We conclude that the white dwarf is burning hydrogen-rich material near its surface. GQ Mus is, however, the only one of 26 recent novae detected in the all-sky Rosat survey; this suggests that either most novae eject all their accreted material during outburst, or GQ Mus is now burning recently accreted material. GQ Mus appears identical to the supersoft X-ray sources CAL83, CAL87 and RX J0527.8–6954 (ref. 4), lending support to the suggestion that these sources are white dwarfs accreting and burning material from a companion^5.OLIGODENDROCYTES myelinate axons in the vertebrate central nervous system. It would, therefore, make sense if axons played a part in controlling the number of oligodendrocytes that develop in a myelinated tract. Although oligodendrocytes themselves normally do not divide, the precursor cells that give rise to them do. Here we show that the proliferation of oligodendrocyte precursor cells in the developing rat optic nerve depends on electrical activity in neighbouring axons, and that this activity-dependence can be circumvented by experimentally increasing the concentration of platelet-derived growth factor, which is present in the optic nerve and stimulates these cells to proliferate in culture. These findings suggest that axonal electrical activity normally controls the production and/or release of the growth factors that are responsible for proliferation of oligodendrocyte precursor cells and thereby helps to control the number of oligodendrocytes that develop in the region.USING a laser interferometer we can create grating patterns of high optical contrast (interference fringes) directly on the retina^1–3. With coarse fringe patterns, the alternating light and dark bars of the pattern can be seen, but the bars of the finest fringes are not subjectively resolved. We report here that when we rapidly modulate the contrast of a fine fringe pattern (keeping overall luminance constant), observers experience flicker, even if the fringes are too finely spaced to be perceived as a grating. For this flicker to be seen, the pattern needs to be resolvable by the photoreceptors themselves, but not necessarily by later stages of visual processing. It can be explained if, in man, signals associated with individual cone receptors do not depend linearly on light intensity, but instead are scaled by a fast sensitivity-regulating or light-adaptation mechanism. Contrast-modulation flicker is not demonstrable in rod vision; rod vision therefore lacks such a local adaptation process.TO calculate the depth difference between a pair of points on a three-dimensional surface from binocular disparities, it is necessary to know the absolute distance to the surface^1,2. Traditionally, it has been assumed that this information is derived from non-visual sources such as the vergence angle of the eyes^3,4. It has been shown^5,6 that the horizontal gradient of vertical disparity between the images in the two eyes also contains information about the fixation distance^7–9. Recent results^10,11, however, indicated that manipulations of the vertical disparity gradient have no effect on either the perceived shape or the perceived depth of surfaces defined by horizontal disparities. Following the reasoning of Longuet-Higgins^12 and Tyler^13, we suggest that vertical disparities are best understood as a consequence of perspective viewing from two different vantage points and the results we report here show that the human visual system is able to exploit vertical disparities and use them to scale the perceived depth and size of stereoscopic surfaces, if the field of view is sufficiently large.MODELS of evolution in parasite–host or predator–prey systems assume that particular pairs of species either always interact or never interact^1. But, in nature, a particular parasite species may interact with a particular host species at some times (or in some places) but not at others, even if host availability is not variable. These differences could stem either from variation among con-specific hosts in their resistance to parasitism or from variation among conspecific parasites in their tendency to attack particular host species. We report here that both of these effects exist, that they are probably due to genetic variation both in parasites and in hosts, and that they interact to produce spatial variation in ecological relationships. We studied three potentially interacting species, a herbivorous insect and two of its potential host plants, at each of two sites. At one site, a plant species was avoided by the insects because of a combination of local insect preference and local plant resistance. This result shows that the diet is a property neither of the parasite nor of the host, but of the parasite–host interaction.The Change: Women, Ageing and the Menopause. By Germaine Greer. Hamish Hamilton/Knopf: 1991/1992. Pp. 472. £15.99, $24. (Also published in paperback by Penguin in the United Kingdom, £6.99.)THE supply of dissolved inorganic carbon (DIC) is not considered to limit oceanic primary productivity^1, as its concentration in sea water exceeds that of other plant macronutrients such as nitrate and phosphate by two and three orders of magnitude, respectively. But the bulk of oceanic new production^2 and a major fraction of vertical carbon flux is mediated by a few diatom genera whose ability to use DIG components other than CO_2, which comprises < 1% of total DIC^3, is unknown^4. Here we show that under optimal light and nutrient conditions, diatom growth rate can in fact be limited by the supply of CO_2. The doubling in surface water p CO_2 levels since the last glaciation from 180 to 355 p.p.m.^5,6 could therefore have stimulated marine productivity, thereby increasing oceanic carbon sequestration by the biological pump.EXPERIMENTAL investigations of convecting, particle-laden fluids show two regimes for convection driven by cooling from above^1. In very dilute suspensions, convection will maintain a homogeneous distribution of particles throughout the convecting layer provided that particle fall velocities are small compared with turbulent fluid velocities. Above a critical concentration, convection is unable to keep the particles suspended, so the particles settle, leaving behind a layer of convecting fluid virtually free of particles. Here we apply these results to cooling magma chambers, in which crystallization leads to an increase in suspended crystal content with time. Discrete sedimentation events are predicted each time the concentration exceeds the critical value. For common igneous minerals, critical concentrations are very small (typically 0.002–0.03 wt%) and layers of the order of centimetres to a few metres thick will result. Because minerals of different density and size have different critical concentrations and settling velocities, complex fluctuations in sedimentation rate and mineral proportions can occur in a multi-component melt. This may lead to either regular repetitive cycles or more complex fluctuations. The process is confined to low-viscosity magmas, such as basalts, in which the crystals are able to separate from the active thermal boundary layer during convection.FUTURE greenhouse warming is expected to be particularly pronounced in boreal regions^1, and consequent changes in vegetation in these regions may in turn affect global climate^2–4. It is therefore important to establish how boreal ecosystems might respond to rapid changes in climate. Here we present palaeoecological evidence for changes in terrestrial vegetation and lake characteristics during an episode of climate warming that occurred between 5,000 and 4,000 years ago at the boreal treeline in central Canada. The initial transformation — from tundra to forest-tundra on land, which coincided with increases in lake productivity, pH and ratio of inflow to evaporation — took only 150 years, which is roughly equivalent to the time period often used in modelling the response of boreal forests to climate warming^5,6. The timing of the treeline advance did not coincide with the maximum in high-latitude summer insolation predicted by Milankovitch theory^7, suggesting that northern Canada experienced regionally asynchronous middle-to-late Holocene shifts in the summer position of the Arctic front. Such Holocene climate events may provide a better analogue for the impact of future global change on northern ecosystems than the transition from glacial to nonglacial conditions.DETERMINISTIC chaos is characterized by long-term unpredictability arising from an extreme sensitivity to initial conditions. Such behaviour may be undesirable, particularly for processes dependent on temporal regulation. On the other hand, a chaotic system can be viewed as a virtually unlimited reservoir of periodic behaviour which may be accessed when appropriate feedback is applied to one of the system parameters^1. Feedback algorithms have now been successfully applied to stabilize periodic oscillations in chaotic laser^2, diode^3, hydrodynamic^4 and magnetoelastic^5 systems, and more recently in myocardial tissue^6. Here we apply a map-based, proportional-feedback algorithm^7,8 to stabilize periodic behaviour in the chaotic regime of an oscillatory chemical system: the Belousov–Zhabotinsky reaction.IN 1964 Condo^1 suggested that the decay characteristics of negative (π^− and K^−) mesons in helium bubble chambers could be explained by the capture of these particles in large-angular-momentum meta-stable orbitals of exotic helium atoms. Russell^2 predicted that similar "atoms' might be formed by antiprotons in liquid helium. Nearly two decades later the postulated metastability of K^− and π^− mesons in liquid helium was observed experimentally^3–5. We recently observed^6 that about 3% of the antiprotons stopped in liquid helium survive for several microseconds before annihilating in the helium nuclei. This is more than a million times longer than the typical (picosecond) lifetimes of antiprotons that come to rest in matter, and it represents the signature of the formation of metastable antiprotonic atoms. Here we show that the same phenomenon is observed in gas-phase helium, but that surprisingly the lifetime of the 'atoms' is the same as in the liquid phase, despite the reduction in collisional de-excitation. In addition, we show that the presence of trace amounts of hydrogen gas greatly reduces the lifetime, suggesting that a single collision with H_2 is sufficient to destroy the metastability.THE distribution of more than 150 γ-ray bursts detected by the BATSE experiment is isotropic on the sky but radially non-uniform^1,2. This raises the possibility that bursts are cosmological (at z ≲l) and therefore very energetic events, releasing ∼10^50 erg sr^−1 on a timescale of seconds. The coalescence of two neutron stars^3–7 or the accretion-induced collapse of a white dwarf^8 can release up to 10^53 erg in the form of neutrino-antineutrino pairs, so that the conversion of <1% into γ-rays by annihilation^9 could generate γ-ray bursts, but in all such models an optically thick wind tends to form^10,11, preventing the γ-rays from escaping and converting their energy into kinetic energy of the ejected material. We present here a possible solution to this difficulty. When a stellar-mass neutron star is disrupted by a black hole, it forms a thick disk which emits νν̄ pairs. These neutrinos expel a wind from the disk, but angular momentum conservation means that a clear funnel forms along the rotation axis. Neutrino annihilation within the matter-free funnel can then create γ-rays which escape to the distant observer.EFFORTS to use the variability of X-ray emission from active galactic nuclei (AGNs) as a diagnostic of physical processes in the unresolvable cores have been hampered by the discovery^1,2 that the variable emission has a 'red noise' character, which seems to indicate the absence of any preferred timescale. The only exception is the claim of a precise periodicity in emission from NGC6814^3. Here we analyse archival Exosat observations of the bright Seyfert galaxy NGC5548, and find in the power spectrum a broad peak corresponding to quasi-periodic oscillations (QPOs) with period of ∼500 s. Both the frequency and magnitude of the QPOs vary systematically with total X-ray luminosity. Similar behaviour has been seen in compact galactic X-ray binaries, and we suggest that intensity-correlated QPOs may be a generic feature of accretion onto a compact object. If the QPOs in NGC5548 derive from instability or variability in an accretion disc around a black hole, the black hole mass can be only a few hundred thousand solar masses, an uncomfortably small number for most AGN models.X-linked agammaglobulinaemia (XLA) is a human immunodeficiency caused by failure of pre-B cells in the bone marrow to develop into circulating mature B cells. A novel gene has been isolated which maps to the XLA locus, is expressed in B cells, and shows mutations in families with the disorder. The gene is a member of the src family of proto-oncogenes which encode protein-tyrosine kinases. This is, to our knowledge, the first evidence that mutations in a src -related gene are involved in human genetic disease.Europe is making heavy weather of the patenting of transgenic animals and plants.Economists in the United States are offended at their representation on the new president's economic councils, but there is a sense in which they can blame only themselves.The appearance of the multicellular animals, or Metazoa, in the fossil record about 600 million years ago marks a revolution in the history of life. Molecular biology is continuing to increase our understanding of metazoan evolution, yet information from fossils is still an important component in deciphering metazoan phylogeny, and data on rapidly radiating animal groups place early metazoan evolution in a new perspective.How to Profit from Fullerenes: Winning Strategies for Emerging Markets. Technical Insights: 1992. Pp. 165. $1,225 ($1,275 outside North America). (For further information, contact P. Finlay, Technical Insights, PO Box 1304, Fort Lee, New Jersey 07024-9967, USA.)Chimpanzee Material Culture: Implications for Human Evolution. By W. C. McGrew. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 277. £40, $79.95 (hbk); £16.95, $27.95 (pbk).Taming the Atom: The Emergence of the Visible Microworld. By Hans Christian von Baeyer. Random House: 1992. Pp. 223. $23. (To be published by Viking in the United Kingdom in March.)Measurements of γ-rays from the Small Magellanic Cloud seem to have ruled out the possibility that cosmic rays are uniformly spread through extragalactic space, but do not say much more about their origin.New for 1993 — a scientific spell-checking program, a database of protection chemistry, a gene mapping kit for Saccharomyces cerevisiae , a fluorescence polarization analyser and a portable hand-held microscope.Nature 360, 762-765 (1992) THE sentence starting on line 29 of this letter should read "After 1 min the cAMP levels decay to an intermediate level and, in parallel, Cdc25 reaches an intermediate state of phosphorylation that is higher than the state of phosphorylation of Cdc25 in glucose-starved cells (Fig.THE principal driving forces of protein folding are the burial of hydrophobic residues in the interior of proteins and the exposure of charged residues at the surface^1. Charged residues are only occasionally found in the interior, where they form hydrogen bonds to oppositely charged residues or main-chain atoms^2. Ribonucleotide reductase, a key enzyme in DNA synthesis, catalyses the de novo production of deoxyribonucleotide precursors. It is composed of two different dimeric proteins Rl and R2 (refs 3–5). R2 subunits contain buried iron-centres with each centre formed by two ferric ions coordinated by four carboxylates and two histidine ligands^6. Iron-free R2, apoR2, is a precursor of active R2 and folds into a stable protein which is transformed into active R2 by ferrous ions and molecular oxygen. Here we show that the iron-free protein does not undergo any major structural changes compared with the iron-containing R2. The effect of this is a clustering of four carboxyl side chains in the interior of the subunit, in contrast to the normal distribution of charged residues in proteins.HUMAN adenovirus (Ad2), like many other viruses^1, contains a virion-associated proteinase essential for the synthesis of infectious virus particles^2–4. We observed proteinase activity in wild-type virus but not in the ts-1 virus^2, which contains a mutation in the Ad2 L3 endoprotease gene^5 that confers temperature-sensitive processing of virion precursor proteins. Unexpectedly, we did not observe proteinase activity with purified recombinant^6,7 endoprotease protein ( M _ r 23 K). Purified recombinant endo-protease protein, however, complemented the mutation in ts-1 virions, restoring proteinase activity when mixed together. This implied that cofactors may be required. Here we reconstitute proteinase activity in vitro with three purified viral components: (1) the recombinant endoprotease protein; (2) an 11-amino-acid peptide that originates from the carboxy terminus of pVI, the precursor to virion component VI; and (3) adenovirus DNA. The use of DNA for a proteinase activity is unprecedented.IN the fission yeast Schizosaccharomyces pombe , the double-stranded chromosomal break (DSB) at the mating-type locus (mat1) initiates recombination during mating-type switching^1–3. A constant DSB level is maintained throughout the cell-cycle^1. In the strand-segregation model for mating-type switching, it was postulated that if the DSB is generated during or soon after mat1 replication^4, one of the chromatids could be repaired and switched during replication in the next cell cycle, while the other chromatid inherits the break^3–6. Here we report a molecular characterization of swi7 , one of the genes required for DSB formation. Surprisingly, a gene complementing the swi 7 mutation maps to chromosome I and encodes S. pombe DNA polymerase-α. Disruption of this gene is lethal in both switching and non-switching strains, as expected. S. pombe DNA polymerase-α must therefore play a role in generating the DSB at mat1 , suggesting that DSB formation is coupled with DNA replication.MUSCLE contraction occurs by mutual sliding between thick (myosin) and thin (actin) filaments^1,2. But the physical and chemical properties of the sliding force are not clear; even the precise direction of sliding force generated at each cross-bridge is not known. We report here the use of a recently developed in vitro motile assay system^3–5 to show supercoiling of an actin filament in which the front part of the filament was fixed to a glass surface through cross-linked heavy-meromyosin and the rear part was able to slide on a track of heavy-meromyosin. A left-handed single turn of superhelix formed just before supercoiling, suggesting that the sliding force has a right-handed torque component that induces the right-handed rotation of an actin filament around its long axis. The presence of the torque component in the sliding force will explain several properties of the contractile system of muscle.THE remarkable ability of tumour necrosis factor (TNF), especially in combination with interferon, selectively to kill or inhibit malignant cell lines is so far unmatched by any other combination of cytokines^1–4. But clinical trials in cancer patients have on the whole been disappointing^5–7, and it has been estimated that a TNF dose would be effective only at 5–25 times the maximum tolerated dose^4. High TNF concentrations give a much more pronounced antitumour activity in mice^1,8–10, in which murine TNF is about 50-fold more systemically toxic than human TNF^11,12. But there is little or no species specificity in cytotoxicity of murine TNF and human TNF on human as well as on murine cell lines^13,14. This dual action of TNF may be explained by the existence of two types of receptor for TNF^15,16: the smaller, TNF-R55, is present on most cells and particularly on those susceptible to the cytotoxic action of TNF^17; the larger, TNF-R55, is also present on many cell types^15,16, especially those of myeloid origin, and is strongly expressed on stimulated T and B lymphocytes^18. In mice, human TNF binds only to murine TNF-R55 (ref. 15), which can then mediate cytotoxic activity on malignant cells^15–17,19. As human TNF does not bind to murine TNF-R75, the latter must be responsible for the much enhanced systemic toxicity of murine TNF. Human TNF can, however, become toxic in mice when a second pathway is activated^1,11,20. There is no reciprocal situation in the human system: human and murine TNF bind almost equally well to the two human TNF receptors. Here we describe human TNF mutants that still interact with the human TNF-R55 receptor but which have largely lost their ability to bind to human TNF-R75. Activation of TNF-R55 is sufficient to trigger cytotoxic activity towards transformed cells. One representative human TNF mutant retains its antitumour activity in nude mice carrying tumours derived from human cancers. Under the appropriate conditions, such human TNF mutants are expected to induce less systemic toxicity in man, while still exerting their direct antitumour effect.NATRIURETIC peptides inhibit the release and action of many hormones through cyclic guanosine monophosphate (cGMP)^1,2, but the mechanism of cGMP action is unclear^3. In frog ventricular muscle and guinea-pig hippocampal neurons, cGMP inhibits voltage-activated Ca^2+ currents by stimulating phosphodiesterase activity and reducing intracellular cyclic AMP^4,5; however, this mechanism is not involved in the action of cGMP on other channels^6 or on Ca^2+ channels in other cells^7,8. Natriuretic peptide receptors in the rat pituitary also stimulate guanylyl cyclase activity but inhibit secretion by increasing membrane conductance to potassium^9,10. In an electrophysiological study on rat pituitary tumour cells^11, we identified the large-conductance, calcium- and voltage-activated potassium channels (BK) as the primary target of another inhibitory neuropeptide, somatostatin. Here we report that atrial natriuretic peptide also stimulates BK channel activity in GH_4C_1 cells through protein dephosphorylation. Unlike somatostatin, however, the effect of atrial natriuretic peptide on BK channel activity is preceded by a rapid and potent stimulation of cGMP production and requires cGMP-dependent protein kinase activity. Protein phosphatase activation by cGMP-dependent kinase could explain the inhibitory effects of natriuretic peptides on electrical excitability and the antagonism of cGMP and cAMP in many systems^12.THE accumulation in brain of senile plaques containing β-amyloid protein (Aβ) is a defining feature of Alzheimer's disease^1–3. The amyloid precursor protein (APP)^4 from which Aβ is derived is subject to several genetic mutations which segregate with rare familial forms of the disease, resulting in early onset of dementia and plaque formation^5–9, suggesting that APP metabolism plays a causal role in the disease. Various cell types have been shown to release a soluble form of Aβ, thus allowing for the in vitro study of Aβ generation^10–12. We report here evidence that a substantial portion of the APP secreted by human mixed brain cell cultures, as well as that present in cerebrospinal fluid, is of a novel form cleaved precisely at the amino terminus of Aβ, suggesting that a secretory pathway is involved in Aβ genesis.The Making of Memory: From Molecules to Mind. By Steven Rose. Bantam: 1992. Pp. 355. £16.99.γ-AMlNOBUTYRlC acid (GABA), a major inhibitory neurotransmitter in the mammalian nervous system, is known to operate bicuculline-sensitive CI^− channels through GABA_A receptors and bicuculline-insensitive cation channels through GABA_B receptors^1,2. Recent observations indicate that the retina may contain GABA receptors with unusual pharmacological properties^3–5. Here we report that GABA gates bicuculline-insensitive CI^− channels in rod bipolar cells of the rat retina, which were not modulated by flunitrazepam, pentobarbital and alphaxalone and were only slightly blocked by picrotoxinin. Moreover, the GABA_B receptor agonist baclofen, and the antagonist 2-hydroxysaclofen had no effect. The underlying single-channel conductance was 7 pS and the open time 150 ms. These values are clearly different from those obtained for GABA_A receptor channels recorded in other neurons of the same preparation, and in other parts of the brain^1,6–8. The bicuculline- and baclofen-insensitive GABA receptors were activated selectively by the GABA analogue cis -4-aminocrotonic acid (CACA)^9. Hence they may be similar to those receptors termed GABAC receptors^10.THE mole rat, Spalax ehrenberghi , is an extreme example of natural visual degeneration in mammals: visual pathways are regressed and incomplete^1, and the absence of visual cortical potentials or an overt behavioural response to light have led to the conclusion that Spalax is completely blind^2–4. But structural and molecular investigations of the atrophied, subcutaneous eye suggest a functional role for the retina in light perception^5,6, and entrainment of circadian locomotor and thermoregulatory rhythms by ambient light demonstrates a capacity for photoperiodic detection^2,7–9. We report here that severe regression of thalamic and tectal structures involved in form and motion perception is coupled to a selective hypertrophy of structures subserving photoperiodic functions. As an alternative to the prevalent view that ocular regression results from negative or nonselective evolutionary processes^10–12, the differential reduction and expansion of visual structures in Spalax can be explained as an adaptive response to the underground environment.Industry's record on research casts doubt on pleas to fund British science on a ‘purchaser–provider’ basis.ALTHOUGH phytoalexins^1,2 have long been inferred to be important in the defence of plants against fungal infection^1,2, there are few reports showing that they provide resistance to infection. Several plants, including grapevine, synthesize the stilbene-type phytoalexin resveratrol^3–7 when attacked by pathogens. Stilbenes with fungicidal potential are formed in several unrelated plant species, such as peanut ( Arachis hypogaea ), grapevine ( Vitis vinifera ) and pine ( Pinus sylvestris )^3,5,11–15. Stilbene biosynthesis only specifically requires the presence of stilbene synthase^6,9. Furthermore, the precursor molecules for the formation of hydroxy-stilbenes are malonyl-CoA and p -coumaroyl-CoA, both present in plants^9. To investigate the potential of stilbene biosynthetic genes in a strategy of engineering pathogen resistance, we isolated stilbene synthase genes from grapevine, where they are expressed at a high level, and transferred them into tobacco^10. We report here that regenerated tobacco plants containing these genes are more resistant to infection by Botrytis cinerea . This is, to our knowledge, the first report of increased disease resistance in transgenic plants based on an additional foreign phytoalexin.PLANT growth in arctic tundra is strongly nitrogen limited despite large pools of soil organic nitrogen^1–4. Here we report that fieldcollected roots of Eriophorum vaginatum , an arctic sedge, rapidly absorb free amino acids, accounting for at least 60% of the nitrogen absorbed by this species in the field. In solution culture, Eriophorum accumulates more nitrogen and biomass when supplied with amino acids than when grown on inorganic nitrogen, whereas Hordeum vulgare (a cereal adapted to mineral soils) grows least when nitrogen is supplied as amino acids. To our knowledge, this is the first documentation of preferential absorption and use of organic nitrogen by a non-mycorrhizal vascular plant. The direct absorption of amino acids by Eriophorum short-circuits the bottleneck in arctic nitrogen cycles imposd by temperature-limited mineralization.HERBIVORES can consume a sufficiently large proportion of primary production to regulate plant biomass in some environments^1–3. Little is known, however, about how rates of herbivory vary among ecosystems and how herbivores influence the global distribution of vegetation. Patterns of herbivory in terrestrial ecosystems have been summarized recently^4,5, but comparisons with aquatic systems are uncertain because past generalizations about herbivory in aquatic systems are based on surprisingly few data^6–8. Herbivory is thought to be higher in aquatic than in terrestrial ecosystems^9–11 and the impact of herbivores in aquatic systems is believed to decrease with increasing primary productivity^12–15, a pattern opposite to that in terrestrial systems^4,5. Here we examine these hypotheses using data from 44 aquatic sites. Herbivore biomass and herbivory rates increase at similar rates with increasing primary productivity in aquatic and in terrestrial systems. For a given level of primary productivity, aquatic and terrestrial herbivores reach similar biomass, but aquatic herbivores remove on average 51% of annual primary production, three times more than terrestrial herbivores. Mass-specific rates of herbivory are greater in aquatic than in terrestrial systems.IN oceanic rifts, the spreading direction is usually nearly perpendicular to the ridge axis, but at the Reykjanes^1 and Mohns^2–4 ridges this direction is highly oblique (30° to 40° to the axis). These ridges possess axial valleys containing oblique raised features (highs), corresponding to second- or third-order ridge axis discontinuities^5. At the Reykjanes ridge, Searle and Laughton^1 observed small highs which they interpreted as volcanic domes. Here we present a fault map of the Mohns ridge obtained from image processing of Seabeam data. We argue that the oblique highs in this ridge are of tectonic origin. The axial valley is interpreted as the surface trace of a deformable band of oceanic lithosphere inherited from an earlier stage of perpendicular spreading. We describe laboratory experiments on brittle–ductile models which support this interpretation, in which stretching at 30° to a deformable band reproduces the en échelon horst-and-graben pattern of the Mohns ridge.GEOMETRICALLY regular stripes of stones are found on many unvegetated alpine and polar hillslopes; known as ‘sorted stripes’ because of the characteristic textural sorting between surface stones and fine-grained soil, they contrast markedly with the lack of order typical of natural landscapes. The spacing of the stripes can range from centimetres to metres (about 10–20 times the average stone diameter^1,2), with individual stripes extending down-slope for many tens of metres (Fig. 1). A variety of formative mechanisms have been proposed^3, but it is still unclear how such orderly stripes can arise spontaneously, and what dictates the spacing. Here we present two-dimensional computer simulations in which the displacement of surface stones is governed by the preferential growth of needle-ice in stone-free regions of soil during each freezing cycle. Regular patterns of stones and soil that closely resemble natural stripes are found to emerge spontaneously from the model as a result of identifiable feedbacks between soil texture, ice growth and local slope.INCREASING atmospheric concentrations of the three main greenhouse gases—carbon dioxide, methane, and nitrous oxide— account for about 70% of anticipated global warming^1, but the production–consumption budgets are not balanced for any of these gases^2. Snow can cover between 44 and 53% of the land area of the Northern Hemisphere^3 and may be several metres deep in alpine and sub-alpine regions for more than half the year. Most trace-gas budgets assume that trace-gas exchange stops when soil is snow covered or soil temperatures drop to ~0°C (refs 4,5). Thus alpine and sub-alpine soils are generally considered to be net sinks for atmospheric CO_2. Some reports^6,7, however, suggest that soil microorganisms beneath the snow continue to respire at temperatures close to 0 °C. Here we present evidence that the soils under alpine and sub-alpine snowpacks emit CO_2 and N_2O and take up atmospheric CH_4 throughout the snow-covered period. These fluxes represent an important part of the annual trace-gas budget for these ecosystems.RECENT results^1,2 from the Greenland Ice-core Project (GRIP) Summit ice core suggest that the climate in Greenland has been remarkably stable during the Holocene, but was extremely unstable for the time period represented by the rest of the core, spanning the last two glaciations and the intervening Eemian inter-glacial. Here we present the complete oxygen isotope record for the Greenland Ice Sheet Project 2 (GISP2) core, drilled 28 km west of the GRIP core. We observe large, rapid climate fluctuations throughout the last glacial period, which closely match those reported for the GRIP core. However, in the bottom 10% of the cores, spanning the Eemian interglacial and the previous glacia-tion, there are significant differences between the two records. It is possible that ice flow may have altered the chronological sequences of the stratigraphy for the bottom part of one or both of the cores. Considerable further work will be necessary to evaluate the likelihood of this, and the extent to which it will still be possible to extract meaningful climate information from the lowest sections of the cores.THE direct-current electrical conductivity of glacial ice depends on its acidity^1–3, and can also indicate changes in climate, as ice formed in cold, dusty periods has a high concentration of alkaline dust^1,4,5, which significantly reduces the conductivity^6,7 compared to warmer, less dusty periods. Here we present electrical conductivity records for the Greenland Ice Sheet Project 2 (GISP2) and Greenland Ice-core Project (GRIP) ice cores, drilled 28 km apart to enable direct comparison of the results. The upper parts of both records are consistent with previous evidence from other Greenland cores^4,8–12 for a stable Greenland climate during the Holocene, and a series of warm events punctuating the last glacial period. However, there is a significant discrepancy between the two records in the bottom 10% of the cores, calling into question recent reports of climate variability in the last interglacial^4,8 and the penultimate glaciation^8. At this stage, it is too early to say what exactly is causing the discrepancy, although ice flow may have introduced some discontinuities into the records. Further work will be necessary to establish how much climatic information it will eventually be possible to extract from the lower parts of the two cores.THE polymerization of two or more types of monomer to form random copolymer molecules yields commercially important thermotropic liquid-crystalline polymeric materials^1. The limited degree of crystallization observed for these random copolymers is thought to occur through a process of segregation: random but similar sequences of the different monomer units on adjacent chains come into register to form a layered structure with crystalline periodicity perpendicular to the chain axes but with aperiodicity parallel to the chains, giving 'non-periodic layer' crystals^2,3. If, as has been believed, the melt is a nematic liquid crystal , the question of how the necessary large-scale molecular rearrangements can occur even when crystallization is rapid is puzzling. Here we report the results of a wide-angle X-ray scattering study of a series of oriented molten samples of a class of these materials known as B–N random copolymers, which show that segregated, layered structures are already present in the melt. In other words, the melt contains smectic-type regions within a nematic matrix. The presence of these regions of sequence matching opens up the possibility of controlling the microstructure, and thus the properties, of thermoplastics through the introduction of specifically synthesized non-random sequences into the molecular chains.STUDIES of the solar wind in the inner heliosphere (between the solar-wind source surface at ∼0.01 AU and 0.3 AU) are hampered by the lack of in situ spacecraft measurements. Radio propagation measurements—using both natural^1–7 and spacecraft^8–14 radio signals—have provided many insights, but information on large-scale solar-wind structure inside 0.3 AU that can be related to coronal features or direct spacecraft measurements at larger distances has nevertheless remained elusive. Here we report the detection of solar-wind structure between 0.08 and 0.53 AU, based on the response of the 13-cm radio signals from the Pioneer Venus Orbiter to electron-density fluctuations and solar-wind speed within this region. These Doppler scintillation measurements were made during the late declining phase of the most recent cycle of solar activity, when the solar wind exhibited recurrent high-speed streams. Near 0.5 AU, we find narrow regions of enhanced scintillation which appear to be associated with compressed plasma at the leading edges of these streams, consistent with previous scintillation measurements^15,16. Inside 0.2 AU, however, scintillation enhancements are conspicuously absent from the fast streams, and instead occur in regions where the average solar wind is slow. They exhibit high variability, and appear to be the interplanetary manifestation of coronal mass ejections. The plasma structures giving rise to these enhanced scintillations apparently undergo significant evolution inside 0.3 AU.The 2.2 Å crystal structure of the 251K α_2β_2γ_2 dimeric hydroxylase protein of methane mono-oxygenase from Methylococcus capsulatus (Bath) reveals the geometry of the catalytic di-iron core. The two iron atoms are bridged by exogenous hydroxide and acetate ligands and further coordinated by four glutamate residues, two histidine residues and a water molecule. The dinuclear iron centre lies in a hydrophobic active-site cavity for binding methane. An extended canyon runs between αβ pairs, which have many long α-helices, for possible docking of the reductase and coupling proteins required for catalysis.Eukaryotic activator proteins (activators) stimulate transcription by increasing assembly of the preinitiation complex. We have developed methods to quantify the stable assembly of general transcription factors into transcriptional complexes in response to activators. We show that activators function during at least two stages of preinitiation complex assembly: first, to recruit the general transcription factor TFIIB, and then at a second step, after TFIIB entry. It is at this second step that the TATA-box binding protein associated factors act. This step also seems to be critical for activators to stimulate transcription synergistically.The selective cleavage of carbon–hydrogen bonds in organic compounds is a critical step in many organic syntheses, and is particularly important in the conversion of hydrocarbons to useful organic compounds. An organometallic ruthenium complex can cleave C–H bonds in a variety of aromatic systems, leading to addition to alkenes by C–C bond formation. The catalyst operates with a degree of efficiency, selectivity and generality that will make it extremely valuable in organic synthesis.We have attempted to reproduce the findings of Benveniste and co-workers, who reported in 1988 that degranulation of human basophil leukocytes is triggered by very dilute (10^2–10^120) antiserum against IgE. The results were contrary to conventional scientific theory and were not satisfactorily explained. Following as closely as possible the methods of the original study, we can find no evidence for any periodic or polynomial change of degranulation as a function of anti-lgE dilution. Our results contain a source of variation for which we cannot account, but no aspect of the data is consistent with the previously published claims.Empowering Technology: Implementing a US Strategy. Edited by Lewis M. Branscomb. MIT Press: 1993. Pp. 315. & pound;33. 75, $37.50 (hbk); & pound;15.95, $17.95 (pbk).Domestication of Plants in the Old World. Second Edition. By Daniel Zohary and Maria Hopf Oxford University Press (Clarendon Press): 1993. Pp. 278. & pound;35, $52.50Flattening the Earth. By John P. Snyder University of Chicago Press: 1993. Pp. 365. $45.00, & pound;35.95Art Restoration: The Culture, the Business and the Scandal. By James Beck with Michael Daley. John Murray: 1993. Pp. 210. & pound;17.99A British newspaper, The Sunday Times , has so consistently misrepresented the role of HIV in the causation of AIDS that Nature plans to monitor its future treatment of this issue, if only to save readers the trouble of buying it.New products for the cell biologist worth noting this week include a nonradioactive method for detecting cell culture contamination, a medium for the production and maintenance of B-cell hybridomas and a high-pressure homogenizer.An electrical biosensor is described that can continuously track morphological changes of adherent cells providing quantitative data from both sparse and confluent cultures. The method is capable of detecting vertical motion of cells of the order of 1 nm, much below the resolution of an optical microscope.THE animal cell genome is organized into a series of replicons with an average size of 50–300 kilobases^1; each of these units is characterized by its own origin of replication which serves as the point of initiation for DNA synthesis. In animal viruses, origin usage can be regulated by cis -acting elements^2, and in some cases, replication may be cell-type specific^3. Little is known, however, about the organization and control of endogenous tissue-specific gene replication. To understand this process, we have used a replication direction assay to examine DNA fragments covering more than 200 kilobases of the human & beta;-like globin domain, and have identified a single bidirectional origin located upstream of the β-globin itself. This locus is used to initiate DNA synthesis in expressing cells, where the globin domain replicates early, and in non-expressing cells, which are characterized by late replication of the same region^4,5. Deletion of this origin sequence, as occurs in the haemoglobin Lepore syndrome^6, cancels bidirectional DNA synthesis at this site and leads to a striking reversal of replication direction upstream to the locus. This represents the first genetic proof of the existence of specific, discrete origins of replication in animal cells.THE human Ras-related nuclear protein Ran/TC4 (refs 1–4) is the prototype of a well conserved family of GTPases that can regulate both cell-cycle progression^5–8 and messenger RNA transport^9. Ran has been proposed to undergo tightly controlled cycles of GTP binding and hydrolysis, to operate as a GTPase switch^10,11 whose GTP- and GDP-bound forms interact differentially with regulators and effectors. One known regulator, the protein RCC1 (refs 12, 13), interacts with Ran to catalyse guanine nucleotide exchange, and both RCC1 and Ran are components of an intrinsic checkpoint control that prevents the premature initiation of mitosis. To test and extend the GTPase-switch model, we searched for a Ran-specific GTPase-activating protein (GAP), and for putative effectors (proteins that interact specifically with Ran/TC4–GTP). We report here the identification of a Ran GAP and its use to characterize the GTP-hydrolysing properties of mutant Ran proteins, and the identification and cloning of a binding protein specific for Ran/TC4–GTP.INTERFERONS IFN-α/β and IFN-γ act through independent cell-surface receptors, inducing gene expression through tyrosine phosphorylation of cytoplasmic transcription factors^1–5. IFN-α stimulates phosphorylation and nuclear localization of the 84/91K and 113K subunits of latent ISGF3 (interferon-stimulated gene factor 3), which combine with the 48K DNA-binding subunit^6,7 to bind regulatory elements of IFN-α-responsive genes^8–10. TFN-γ activates p91 alone^2, inducing IFN-γ-responsive genes through a distinct DNA element^11,12. Genetic complementation studies implicated the tyrosine kinase Tyk2 in IFN-α signalling^13 and, more recently, the related Jak2 kinase in IFN-γ signalling^14. We now present biochemical evidence for Jak-family kinase involvement in IFN signal transduction. Jak1 was activated in response to IFN-α and IFN-γ Jak2 responded exclusively to IFN-γ. Overexpression of either Jak1 or Jak2 stimulated p91 DNA-binding activity and p91-dependent transcription. Overexpression also activated endogenous Jak kinases, suggesting that interactions between Jak kinases are required during interferon signalling.Participants at Nature 's conference "From DNA to Drugs" in Amsterdam (2–3 December) found that applying molecular biology to medical problems combines daunting challenges with revolutionary possibilities.BINDING of interferons IFN-α and IFN-γ to their cell surface receptors promptly induces tyrosine phosphorylation of latent cytoplasmic transcriptional activators^1–4 (or Stat proteins, for signal transducers and activators of transcription). Interferon-α activates both Stat91 ( M _r 91,000; ref. 1) and Statll3 ( M _r 113,000; ref. 2) whereas IFN-γ activates only Stat91 (refs 3, 4). The activated proteins then move into the nucleus and directly activate genes induced by IFN-α and IFN-γ. Somatic cell genetics experiments have demonstrated a requirement for tyrosine kinase-2 (Tyk2) in the IFN-α response pathway^5 and for Jak2 (ref. 6), a kinase with similar sequence^7, in the IFN-γ response pathway. Here we investigate the tyrosine phosphorylation events on Stat and Jak proteins after treatment of cells with IFNs α and γ and with epidermal growth factor (EGF). Stat91 is phosphorylated on Tyr 701 after cells are treated with IFN-α and EGF, as it was after treatment with IFN-γ (ref. 8). We find that Jakl also becomes phosphorylated on tyrosine after cells are treated with these same three ligands, although each ligand is shown to activate at least one other differ-ent kinase. Jakl may therefore be the enzyme that phosphorylates Tyr701inStat91.MAINTENANCE of a stable internal environment within complex organisms requires specialized cells that sense changes in the extracellular concentration of specific ions (such as Ca^2+). Although the molecular nature of such ion sensors is unknown, parathyroid cells possess a cell surface Ca^2+-sensing mechanism that also rec-ognizes trivalent and polyvalent cations (such as neomycin) and couples by changes in phosphoinositide turnover and cytosolic Ca^2+ to regulation of parathyroid hormone secretion^1–4. The latter restores normocalcaemia by acting on kidney and bone^2. We now report the cloning of complementary DNA encoding an extracellular Ca^2+ -sensing receptor from bovine parathyroid with pharmacological and functional properties nearly identical to those of the native receptor. The novel ∼120K receptor shares limited similarity with the metabotropic glutamate receptors^5 and features a large extracellular domain, containing clusters of acidic aminoacid residues possibly involved in calcium binding, coupled to a seven-membrane-spanning domain like those in the G-protein-coupled receptor superfamily.ELUCIDATION of the reactions responsible for the calcium-regulated fusion of secretory granules with the plasma membrane in secretory cells would be facilitated by the identification of participant proteins having known biochemical activities. The successful characterization of cytosolic^1–3 and vesicle^4,5 proteins that may function in calcium-regulated secretion has not yet revealed the molecular events underlying this process. Regulated secretion consists of sequential priming and triggering steps which depend on ATP and Ca^2+, respectively, and require distinct cytosolic proteins^6. Characterization of priming-specific factors (PEP proteins) should enable the ATP-requiring reactions to be identified. Here we show that one of the mammalian priming factors (PEP3) is identical to phosphatidylinositol transfer protein (PITP)^7. The physiological role of PITP was previously unknown. We also find that SEC14p, the yeast phosphatidylinositol transfer protein which is essential for constitutive secretion^8–10, can substitute for PEP3/PITP in priming. Our results indicate that a role for phospholipid transfer proteins is conserved in the constitutive and regulated secretory pathways.EXPRESSION of viral genes in transgenic plants is a very effective tool for attenuating plant viral infection^1–3. Nevertheless, the lack of generality and risk issues related to the expression of viral genes in plants^4 might limit the exploitation of this strategy. Expression in plants of antibodies against essential viral proteins could provide an alternative approach to engineer viral resistance. Recently, expression of complete^5–7 or engineered^7–9 antibodies has been successfully achieved in plants. The engineered single-chain Fv antbody scFv (refs 10,11) is particularly suitable for expression in plants because of its small size and the lack of assembly requirements. Here we present evidence that constitutive expression in transgenic plants of a scFv antibody, directed against the plant icosahedral tombusvirus artichoke mottled crinkle virus, causes reduction of infection incidence and delay in symptom development.CONSPICUOUS visual features commonly attract gaze^1,2, but how the brain selects targets for eye movements is not known. We investigated target selection in rhesus monkeys performing a visual search task^3 by recording neurons in the frontal eye field, an area known to be responsible for generating purposive eye movements^4,5. Neurons with combined visual- and eye movement-related activity were analysed. We found that the initial visual responses to search stimulus arrays were the same whether the target or a distractor was in the response field. We also found that the neural activity evolved to specify target location before the execution of eye movements, ultimately peaking when the target was in the response field and being suppressed when the target was beside but not distant from the response field. These results demonstrate a possible mechanism by which a desired target is fixated and inappropriate eye movements are prevented.AN as-yet unresolved issue in developmental neurobiology is whether the discrete areas that form the mammalian cortex emerge from a uniform cortical plate or whether they are already specified in the germinal zone^1,2. A feature of the primate striate cortex is that the number of neurons per unit area is twice that of anywhere else in the cerebral cortex^3. Here we take advantage of this unique structural feature to investigate whether the extra striate cortical cells are due to increased neuron production during neurogenesis. We labelled precursors undergoing terminal cell division with ^3H-thymidine and allowed them to migrate to the cortical plate. Cell counts revealed that their rate of production in the germinal zone of striate cortex is higher than in that giving rise to extrastriate cortex. Also, we used ^3H-thymidine pulse injections to investigate cell cycle dynamics and found that this phase of increased production of striate cortical cells is associated with changes in the parameters of the cell cycle. These results show that cortical area identity is at least partially determined at the level of the ventricular zone.WE have found that mutations in the gene daf -2 can cause fertile, active, adult Caenorhabditis elegans hermaphrodites to live more than twice as long as wild type. This lifespan extension, the largest yet reported in any organism^1, requires the activity of a second gene, daf -16. Both genes also regulate formation of the dauer larva, a developmentally arrested larval form that is induced by crowding and starvation and is very long-lived^2–4. Our findings raise the possibility that the longevity of the dauer is not simply a consequence of its arrested growth, but instead results from a regulated lifespan extension mechanism that can be uncoupled from other aspects of dauer formation, daf -2 and daf -16 provide entry points into understanding how lifespan can be extended.FIVE hundred years of fishing and fifty years of research have produced only vague accounts of the spawning and migrations of Atlantic cod ( Gadus morhua ) off Newfoundland in the north-west Atlantic^1. Here I report the discovery of 'spawning columns' and a 'highway' used by cod to traverse the northeastern Newfoundland Shelf during annual springtime feeding migrations. Sea research using echosounders^2,3 showed that cod spawned in dense shoals (to one fish per m^3) that featured midwater spawning columns comprised of pairs of fish. Immature joined mature post-spawning cod to migrate in large (scales of tens of kilometres and hundreds of millions of fish) size-structured aggregations led by larger 'scouts'. Cod traversed the cold waters of the shelf along a deep highway of warm oceanic water (2–2.5 °C). During migration, fish spacing appeared to maximize search volumes while maintaining visual contact. Aggregations fragmented when prey (capelin Mallotus villosus ; shrimp, Pandalus spp.) were encountered.The Undivided Universe: An Ontological Interpretation of Quantum Theory.. By D. Bohm and B. J. Hiley. Routledge: 1993. Pp. 397. £25, $29.95.VIRTUALLY all microorganisms require iron for growth. The paucity of iron in surface ocean water (∼0.02−1.0 nM (refs 1, 2)) has spurred a lively debate concerning iron limitation of primary productivity^3–6, yet little is known about the molecular mechanisms used by marine microorganisms to sequester iron. Terrestrial bacteria use a siderophore-mediated ferric uptake system^7. A sidero-phore is a low-molecular-mass compound with a high affinity for ferric ion which is secreted by microorganisms in response to low-iron environments; siderophore biosynthesis is regulated by iron levels, with repression by high iron. Although open-ocean marine microorganisms (such as phytoplankton^8 and bacteria^9) produce siderophores, the nature of these siderophores has not been investigated. We report here the first structure determination, to our knowledge, of the siderophores from an open-ocean bacterium, alterobactin A and B from Alteromonas luteoviolacea. A. luteoviol-acea is found in oligotrophic^10 and coastal^11 waters. Alterobactin A has an exceptionally high affinity constant for ferric ion. We suggest that at least some marine microorganisms may have developed higher-affinity iron chelators as part of an efficient iron-uptake mechanism which is more effective than that of their terrestrial counterparts.THE electrical conductivity of the Earth's lower mantle constrains both the propagation to the surface of geomagnetic disturbances in the core and the nature of core–mantle coupling. Extrapolations of laboratory measurements on materials representative of the lower mantle agree weakly^1,2 or not at all^3,4 with recent geophysical models^5–8 of lower-mantle electrical conductivity based on variations of magnetic and electrical fields measured at the Earth's surface. Here we report d.c. conductivity measurements on samples with compositions approximating that of the lower mantle, at pressures of 1.2 to 40 GPa and temperatures in the range 20 to 400 °C. Our results agree with some of those obtained previously^1,2. But in contrast to this previous work, we extrapolate the results to lower-mantle conditions by adopting a functional form for the conductivity that incorporates the effect of pressure as well as temperature. The resulting estimates of conductivity are in agreement with the geophysical determinations^5–8. We find that, because of a very weak dependence on temperature, pressure and composition, the conductivity is likely to vary by no more than about a factor of five across the entire lower mantle, reaching a maximum value of only 3–10 S m^−1. Lateral temperature variations as large as a few hundred degrees will therefore be hard to detect geophysically, and the compositionally distinct D″ layer at the base of the lower mantle remains the only possible location for a highly conducting layer.DESPITE considerable advances over the past 20 years in our understanding of continental lithospheric deformation (see, for example, refs 1 and 2), we know little about the detailed spatial and temporal variations in strain rate at geologically relevant scales (∼10^2−10^4 km and ∼1–100 million years). Such measurements are needed to constrain dynamic models of lithospheric deformation^3. Although it is not yet obvious how detailed strain-rate information can be obtained from mountain belts, subsidence data from sedimentary basins should contain information about at least the vertical component of the strain-rate tensor. Here I show that inverse theory can be used to calculate the temporal strain rate variation needed to fit observed subsidence patterns in extensional sedimentary basins. No a priori information concerning either the duration of rifting or the total strain is required. Inverse calculations produce good fits to synthetic data and to subsidence data from the Dolomites of northern Italy. Calculated strain rates are not constant but vary between 10^−18 and 10^−15 s^−l. Error analysis shows that these results are significant and well resolved. All of the stratigraphic sections studied exhibit a minimum in strain rate during extension—a feature predicted by models of lithosphere deformation by power-law creep.THE strontium isotope ratio in sea water is influenced by climate, tectonics, weathering and hydrothermal activity at ocean ridges^1–4. Its evolution through time, determined primarily by measuring the strontium isotope composition of marine carbonates, holds information about variations in these processes, and is also useful for stratigraphic correlation and dating^5–7. Carbonates are absent from some marine sediments such as siliceous oozes and red clays, and can be significantly diagenetically altered in others, especially in Eocene and older sediments. Here we show that marine barite is an effective alternative monitor of seawater ^87Sr/^86Sr. We find that microcrystals of marine barite separated from Holocene Pacific, Atlantic and Indian Ocean sediments all record the modern seawater ^87Sr/^86Sr value. Moreover, the ^87Sr/^86Sr of barite from 25 sediment samples spanning the past 35 Myr falls within the range of published data for carbonates over this time period. We conclude that marine barite reliably records both present and past variations in seawater strontium isotope composition.The Council for Science and Technology is not likely to meet the needs of the British science community.ICE-CORE reconstructions of atmospheric methane concentrations for the past 220 kyr have revealed large variations associated with different climatic periods^1–4. But the phase relationship between climate and methane has been uncertain because of dating uncertainties and the coarse sampling interval of available methane records. Here we present a high-resolution record of atmospheric methane from 40 to 8 kyr ago from the GRIP ice core in Green-land. Our improved resolution and dating allow us to conclude that the large changes in atmospheric methane concentration during the last deglaciation were in phase (±200 years) with the variations in Greenland climate. Our results confirm the previous observation^3 that methane increased to Holocene levels when much of the Northern wetlands was still ice-covered, lending support to the suggestion^3 that low-latitude wetlands were responsible for the observed changes. We observe oscillations in methane concentration associated with the warm periods (interstadials) that occurred throughout the glacial period^5, suggesting that the interstadials were at least hemispheric in their extent. We propose that variations in the hydrological cycle at low latitudes may be responsible for the variations in both methane and Greenland temperature during the interstadials.ELECTRICAL charge separation following contact between two materials (contact electrification or the triboelectric effect) is well known to occur between different materials as a consequence of their different electronic structures^1,2. Here we show that the phenomenon occurs between two surfaces of the same material if one is coated with a single chemisorbed monolayer. We use the surface force apparatus^3 to study contact electrification^4 and adhesion between two silica surfaces, one coated with an amino-silane. The presence of this monolayer results in significantly enhanced adhesion between the surfaces, owing to electrostatic attraction following contact electrification, in accord with Derjaguin's electrostatic theory of adhesion^5. At the same time, the observed increase in adhesion is consistent with Fowkes' acid–base model^6 (in which acid–base interactions between surface groups are considered to be the predominant factor determining adhesion), as the monolayer converts the originally acidic silica surface to a basic (amine-terminated) one. These observations demonstrate a link between acid–base interactions and contact electrification.THERE are many absorption lines in the visible and near-infrared spectra of stars located on the far side of diffuse interstellar clouds. The origin of these 'diffuse interstellar bands' (DIBs) has remained an unanswered question since their discovery almost 70 years ago^1,2. There are now over 100 known bands^1,3–6 and it is clear from the range of line widths, depths and shapes that the lines are unlikely to come from a single 'carrier'. Many of the proposed carriers, such as gas-phase carbon chains^7, fullerenes^8 and dust grains^9, fail in having ultraviolet absorption lines where none has yet been observed in the stellar spectra. Poly cyclic aromatic species such as Ci_16H_10^+ (ref. 10) and C_10H_8 (ref. 11) were recently claimed to be good candidates for carriers of some of the DIBs. Here we present laboratory evidence that highly unsaturated hydrocarbons with carbon numbers 6–12 may be the carriers of some of the DIBs in the range 480–1,000 nm. We deposit mass-selected molecules in a neon matrix at 5 K and measure their near-infrared, visible and ultraviolet spectra. Not only do these species have visible and near-infrared lines corresponding to fifteen DIBs, but they also show no absorption lines in the ultraviolet, consistent with astronomical observations.Tyrosine kinases and tyrosine phosphatases are abundant in central nervous system tissue, yet the role of these enzymes in the modulation of neuronal excitability is unknown. Patch-clamp studies of an Aplysia voltage-gated cation channel now demonstrate that a tyrosine phosphatase endogenous to excised patches determines both the gating mode of the channel and the response of the channel to protein kinase A. Moreover, a switch in gating modes similar to that triggered by the phosphatase occurs at the onset of a prolonged change in the excitability of Aplysia bag cell neurons.Baryonic matter constitutes a larger fraction of the total mass of rich galaxy clusters than is predicted by a combination of cosmic nucleosynthesis considerations (light-element formation during the Big Bang) and standard inflationary cosmology. This cannot be accounted for by gravitational and dissipative effects during cluster formation. Either the density of the Universe is less than that required for closure, or there is an error in the standard interpretation of element abundances.IgE and its receptors are believed to have evolved as a mechanism to protect mammals against parasites. But other and intrinsically innocuous antigens can subvert this system to provoke an allergic response. For human populations in industrialized countries, allergy and asthma now represent a far greater threat than parasitic infection, and the main impetus for current studies of the IgE system is the hope of understanding and intervening in the aetiology of allergic diseases.The Engineer in the Garden. By Colin Tudge. Jonathan Cape: 1993. Pp. 398. & pound;17.99.Gene Future. By Thomas F. Lee. Plenum Press: 1993. Pp. 339. & dollar;24.95, & pound;19.96.Behavioral Endocrinology. Edited by J. B. Becker, S. M. Breedlove and D. Crews. MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 574. & dollar;34.95.The Slow Plague: A Geography of the AIDS Pandemic. By Peter Gould. Black-well: 1993. Pp. 228. & pound;35 (hbk), & pound;12.99 (pbk).The Sonar of Dolphins. By Whitlow W. L. Au. Springer-Verlag: 1993. Pp. 277. DM 148, & pound;58.50.Feral Children and Clever Animals: Reflections on Human Nature. By Douglas Keith Candland. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 411. & dollar;30.Fear of Physics: A Guide for the Perplexed. ByLawrence M. Krauss. Basic Books: 1993. Pp. 206. & dollar;20. (To be published in the UK by Jonathan Cape in 1994 at & pound;17.99).The Enlightenment of Matter: The Definition of Chemistry from Agricola to Lavoisier. By Marco Beretta. Watson Publishing International: 1993. Pp. 396. & dollar;49.95.The Private Lives of Albert Einstein. By Roger Highfield and Paul Carter. Faber and Faber: 1993. Pp. 355. & pound;14.95.Galileo, Courtier: The Practice of Science in the Culture of Absolutism. By Mario Biagioli. University of Chicago Press: 1993. Pp. 402. & pound;23.95, & dollar;29.95.T HE pulsar braking index, n , is a dimensionless quantity describing the rate at which a magnetized neutron star loses rotational energy^1. It can be determined from pulsar timing measurements, and for distant pulsars is found to lie close to n = 3 (ref. 2), as predicted by theoretical models of pulsar emission mechanisms^3–5. In contrast, the timing parameters—in particular the second derivative of the pulsation frequency—of the nearby pulsar Geminga^6–11 indicate an extremely large braking index of about 10-30. To understand this property of Geminga, we consider here the effect on the measured timing parameters of a pulsar's motion through space. We find that the Doppler effect alone can give a high apparent braking index, but only if the pulsar is very close and has an abnormally high velocity (>1000kms^-1). A more likely (but related) cause of the high braking index is the pulsar's proper motion: failure to correct for changes in the source coordinates with time can greatly influence the higher derivatives of the pulsar frequency, and lead to an erroneous value of n . A self-consistent analysis of the timing data, which account for both the proper motion and the Doppler effect, should permit a reliable estimate of the distance to Geminga.The 2.2 Å crystal structure of activated rod transducin, G_tα-GTP_γS, shows the bound GTP_γS molecule occluded deep in a cleft between a domain structurally homologous to small GTPases and a helical domain unique to heterotrimeric G proteins. The structure, when combined with biochemical and genetic studies, suggests: how an activated receptor might open this cleft to allow nucleotide exchange; a mechanism for GTP-induced changes in effector and receptor binding surfaces; and a mechanism for GTPase activity not evident from previous data.GTPases of the Ras superfamily regulate many aspects of cell growth, differentiation and action. Their functions depend on their ability to alternate between inactive and active forms, and on their cellular localization. Numerous proteins affecting the GTPase activity, nucleotide exchange rates and membrane localization of Ras superfamily members have now been identified. Many of these proteins are much larger and more complex than their targets, containing multiple domains capable of interacting with an intricate network of cellular enzymes and structures.L'università dei Tre Tradimenti. By Raffaele Simone. Laterza: 1993. Pp. 151. L13,000.Concepts of Symbiogenesis: A Historical and Critical Study of the Research of Russian Botanists. By L. N. Khakhina. Edited by L. Margulis and M. McMenamin. Translated by S. Merkel and R. Coalson. Yale University Press: 1992. Pp. 177. $37, £22.50.The Man Who Sold the Milky Way: A Biography of Bart Bok. By David H. Levy. University of Arizona Press: 1993. Pp. 247. $35.00; £29.95.Codebreakers: The Inside Story of Bletchley Park. Edited by F. H. Hinsley and Alan Stripp Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 321. £17.95, $25.Science and technology have a recently developed affinity with the development of the poor countries of the world, but have few effective ways of winning benefit for either partner in the relationship.The US Surgeon-General has revived a long-simmering debate about existing legal restraints on drug abuse.This week's GATT agreement (if signed) leaves doubts about the protection of intellectual property unresolved. With UNESCO absent from the scene, the world's academies should take up the issueS ETS of ordered overlapping cloned genomic DNA fragments that span each of the human chromosomes are urgently needed for identification of human disease genes. Such a physical map also provides unique material to study the structure and function of the genome. We have therefore exhaustively analysed the CEPH yeast artificial chromosome (YAC) library, which contains 33,000 clones, whose insert size was individually determined. These YACs have an average length of 0.9 megabases and cover the equivalent of 10 haploid genomes. Several mapping techniques were combined to provide multiple sources of structural information for most of these clones. Finally, the library was screened with more than 2,000 genetic markers quasiuniformly distributed over 90% of the genome. These results should allow the scientific community to construct detailed maps of all human chromosomes. Moreover, we propose a data analysis strategy that produces a first-generation integrated map covering most of the human genome.T HE L-selectin, a cell surface C-type lectin, directs lymphocyte traffic to lymph nodes^1, and contributes to lymphocyte homing to Peyer's patches^2,3 and to leukocyte interactions with inflamed venules^4,5. Here we report that the mucosal vascular addressin MAdCAM-1, a mucosal endothelial adhesion molecule with immunoglobulin- and mucin-like domains^6, is a facultative ligand for L-selectin. MAdCAM-1 isolated from mesenteric lymph nodes, but not from cultured endothelioma cells, bears N -glycanase-resistant sialic acid-containing carbohydrate which supports adhesion of L-selectin-transfected lymphoid cells under shear. Interacting lymphoid cells display a 'rolling' behaviour similar to the selectin-dependent rolling of neutrophils observed in inflamed venules. MAdCAM-1 is also a ligand for the lymphocyte integrin homing receptor for Peyer's patches, α4βll (ref. 7), and may be uniquely adapted to support both selectin-mediated lymphocyte rolling and integrin-mediated adhesion and arrest in vivo .S EGMENTATION in Drosophila is based on a cascade of hierarchical gene interactions initiated by maternally deposited morphogens that define the spatially restricted domains of gap gene expression at blastoderm (reviewed in ref. 1). Although segmentation of the embryonic head is morphologically obscured, the repeated patterns of expression of the segment polarity genes reflect the formation of seven head segments^2,3; two of these depend on the segmentation and homeotic genes used in the trunk, whereas the others form as a result of the activity of the head-specific genes orthodenticle ( otd ), empty spiracles ( ems ) and buttonhead ( btd ). The genes ems and otd encode homeodomain proteins, suggesting that they may function as transcription factors^4–6. They are expressed in overlapping stripes in the early embryonic head of Drosophila , and their vertebrate homologues, otx and emx , are expressed in overlapping domains in the anterior central nervous system of the mouse embryo^7,8. We show here that btd is expressed in a stripe covering the head anlagen of the segments affected in btd lack-of-function mutants and that btd encodes a zinc-finger-type transcription factor with sequence and functional similarity to the prototype mammalian transcription factor Sp1 (ref. 9). When expressed in the spatial pattern of btd , a transgene providing Sp1 activity can support development of the mandibular segment in the head of btd mutant embryos. A ubiquitous transcription factor from humans can therefore replace an essential component of the genetic circuitry required to specify the development of a particular head segment in the fly.Never can there have been such a determination to attain improvement by science and technology as there has been in India since 1947, but success is sadly still a long way off.V ARIOUS functions of glutamate transmission are mediated by both ionotropic and metabotropic glutamate receptors^1. The metabotropic glutamate receptors (mGluRs) consist of at least six different subtypes that are classified into three subgroups, mGluR1/mGluR5, mGluR2/mGluR3, and mGluR4/mGluR6 (refs 1-5), but their physiological roles are largely unknown. Here we report the identification of a very potent agonist for mGluR2/mGluR3, DCG-IV, and the specific localization of mGluR2 in granule cell dendrites that form dendrodendritic synapses with mitral cells in the accessory olfactory bulb. Using the DCG-IV agonist for mGluR2 in combination with slice patch-recording, we demonstrate that the granule cell mGluR2 presynaptically suppresses inhibitory GABA (γ-aminobutyrate) transmission to the mitral cell. Our results indicate that mGluR2 in granule cells plays an important role in the persistent excitation of olfactory sensory transmission in the accessory olfactory bulb by relieving mitral cells from the GABA inhibition.Two months ago, the superconducting supercollider was killed by the US Congress. Here, a particle physicist provides a post mortem and asks whether Europe should build its own collider.M ORPHOLOGICALLY a synapse consists of a presynaptic release site containing vesicles, a postsynaptic element with membrane specialization, and a synaptic cleft between them^1. The number of release sites shapes the properties of synaptic transmission between neurons^2–4. Although excitatory interactions between cortical neurons have been examined^5–9, the number of release sites remains unknown. We have now recorded excitatory postsynaptic potentials evoked by single pyramidal cells in hippocampal interneurons and visualized both cells using biocytin injections. Light and electron microscopy showed that excitatory postsynaptic potentials were mediated by a single synapse. We also reconstructed the entire axon arborization of single pyramidal cells, filled in vivo , in sections counterstained for parvalbumin, which selectively marks basket and axoaxonic cells^10,11. Single synaptic contacts between pyramidal cells and parvalbumin-containing neurons were dominant (>80%), providing evidence for high convergence and divergence in hippocampal networks^12.R APID evolution of host association is now occurring independently in two populations of the host-specialist butterfly Euphydryas editha , each of which has recently incorporated a novel host species into its diet. The reasons for these episodes of rapid evolution lie in human land use practices: logging in one case and cattle ranching in the other. In contrast to other insects that have used tolerance of human activities to expand their ranges into disturbed habitats^1–3, these rare butterflies have remained at their original sites and evolved adaptations to the changes occurring at those sites. At both sites, the proportion of insects preferring the novel host has increased, in one case clearly because of genetic changes in the insect population. This process is now starting to generate insects that refuse to accept their ancestral host, foreshadowing a new problem in conservation biology. By adapting genetically to human-induced changes in their habitat, the insects risk becoming dependent on continuation of the same practices. This is a serious risk, because human cultural evolution can be even faster than the rapid genetic adaptation that the insects can evidently achieve.T HE major events of the cell division cycle are triggered by periodic changes in the activity of cyclin-dependent protein kinases (CDKs). In mammals, the members of the CDK family include CDK2 and CDC2, which are thought to be involved in the control of DNA replication and mitosis, respectively^1–3. The protein kinase activity of these enzymes is controlled by a complex array of mechanisms^4–6. Activation of the CDK catalytic subunit requires association with a positive regulatory subunit (cyclin) and phosphorylation (at Thr 160 in CDK2). This activated complex can be inhibited by additional phosphorylation at Thr 14 and Tyr 15. Here we report the identification of a new mechanism for the regulation of CDK2 activity. We find that CDK2/cyclin complexes in mouse fibroblasts associate tightly with a 20K protein (CAP20). Complexes containing CAP20 were isolated from cell lysates and found to have negligible kinase activity, indicating that CAP20 association in vivo may inhibit CDK2 activity. We purified CAP20 from 3T3 cells and found that low concentrations of the protein completely inhibit the kinase activity of CDK2 in vitro . Thus CAP20 represents a new negative regulatory subunit that inhibits the activity of CDK2/cyclin complexes in mammalian cells.T HE division cycle of eukaryotic cells is regulated by a family of protein kinases known as the cyclin-dependent kinases (CDKs)^1,2. The sequential activation of individual members of this family and their consequent phosphorylation of critical substrates promotes orderly progression through the cell cycle^3,4. The complexes formed by CDK4 and the D-type cyclins have been strongly implicated in the control of cell proliferation during the G1 phase^3–6. CDK4 exists, in part, as a multi-protein complex with a D-type cyclin, proliferating cell nuclear antigen and a protein, p21 (refs 7–9). CDK4 associates separately with a protein of M _r 16K, particularly in cells lacking a functional retinoblastoma protein^9. Here we report the isolation of a human p16 complementary DNA and demonstrate that p16 binds to CDK4 and inhibits the catalytic activity of the CDK4/cyclin D enzymes. p16 seems to act in a regulatory feedback circuit with CDK4, D-type cyclins and retinoblastoma protein.D EREGULATION of cell proliferation is a hallmark of neoplastic transformation. Alteration in growth control pathways must translate into changes in the cell-cycle regulatory machinery, but the mechanism by which this occurs is largely unknown. Compared with normal human fibroblasts, cells transformed with a variety of viral oncoproteins show striking changes in the subunit composition of the cyclin-dependent kinases (CDKs)^1. In normal cells, CDKs exist predominantly in multiple quaternary complexes, each containing a CDK, cyclin, proliferating cell nuclear antigen and the p21 protein. However, in many transformed cells, proliferating cell nuclear antigen and p21 are lost from these multiprotein enzymes. Here we have investigated the significance of this phenomenon by molecular cloning of p21 and in vitro reconstitution of the quaternary cell-cycle kinase complexes. We find that p21 inhibits the activity of each member of the cyclin/CDK family. Furthermore, over expression of p21 inhibits the proliferation of mammalian cells. Our results indicate that p21 may be a universal inhibitor of cyclin kinases.I N 1983, Poupinet et al .^1 observed that compressional seismic waves traversing the inner core along a trajectory parallel to the Earth's rotation axis arrive faster than the same (PKIKP) waves travelling in the equatorial plane. They interpreted this observation as revealing prolate topography of the inner-core boundary. In 1986, Morelli et al .^2 and Woodhouse et al .^3 suggested that inner-core anisotropy could explain both the travel-time observations and the anomalous splitting of some of the Earth's normal modes. Inner-core anisotropy continues to be the preferred explanation for the travel-time anomalies, although there is disagreement about the magnitude of anisotropy^4–6. More recent explanations for the anomalous splitting involve topography of the inner-core and core–mantle boundaries as well as lateral heterogeneity of the core^7–11. In particular, Widmer et al .^11 dismissed a rather complex recent model of inner-core anisotropy^12 because it could not explain the splitting of several previously unidentified modes. Here I show that the anomalous splitting of all currently identified modes can in fact be explained by cylindrical anisotropy of the Earth's inner core that is also compatible with the observed PKIKP travel-time anomalies. The resulting model should be regarded as an upper limit to the amount of anisotropy, as lateral heterogeneity also undoubtedly contributes to the splitting.B ENEATH an active mid-ocean ridge, the mantle upwells in response to the divergence of the newly formed plates, leading to high temperatures and pressure-release melting below the ridge axis. The width of the upwelling region and the amount of melting depend on mantle rheology^1–5, but all models predict a maximum decrease in seismic velocity at the ridge axis. It has also been suggested, however, that the alignment of anisotropic minerals by shear in the upwelling mantle will increase seismic velocity for rays travelling subvertically through the upwelling zone^6,7. Here we report the observation of a consistent pattern of anomalously early P-wave arrival times at an array of ocean-bottom seismographs deployed across the axis of the southern Mid-Atlantic Ridge: P-waves from distant earthquakes arrive earlier at stations near the axis than at those further away. Our results are consistent with a model of anisotropy in which the degree of mineral alignment is greatest directly beneath the ridge axis, and significant anisotropy extends tens of kilometres from the axis.T HE system of dikes in the uppermost mantle below oceanic spreading centres bears witness to the processes involved in the supply of melt to the ridge. Such systems cannot be studied on currently active ridges, but can be seen in ophiolites; in particular, the Oman ophiolite allows us to examine segments of a fast-spreading ridge^1. Here we present a statistical analysis of the orientation of intrusions in the uppermost mantle section of the Oman ophiolite spreading centres, which points to the existence of two systems: dikes whose azimuth is parallel to the sheeted dikes (which we thus consider as related to the extensional lithospheric stress field) and sills, roughly parallel to the Moho^2. Branching contemporaneous dikes and sills are frequently observed. We suggest that these relations can be explained by repeated sudden changes of the dominant stress field from lithospheric to asthenospheric. Such changes could result from the episodic relaxation of lithospheric stress in response to tension fracturing of the lithospheric lid, related to sudden melt surges. This episodic behaviour is recorded in the sheeted dike complex, with each dike (each about one metre wide) representing one of these fractures.C LIMATE warming can cause changes in the optical properties of low clouds, which may in turn amplify or diminish the warming^1,2. But both the sign and magnitude of such feedbacks have been uncertain, largely because the observational evidence for variations in the large-scale optical properties of clouds has been very limited. Recently, analysis of data from the International Satellite Cloud Climatology Project yielded a relationship between low-cloud optical thickness and cloud temperature that implies a positive feedback between clouds and climate^3. Here we use a two-dimensional radiative–convective model to assess the effect of such a feedback on the climate change associated with a doubling of the atmospheric carbon dioxide concentration. We find that, zonally averaged, the feedback is positive in the Northern Hemisphere and is stronger at lower than at higher latitudes. The positive feedback amplifies the overall global climate sensitivity, and the latitudinal gradient in the strength of the feedback acts to eliminate the highlatitude amplification of the greenhouse warming predicted by most climate models.L IQUID water, the medium in which life both began and persists, is in many ways a most unusual fluid. Much is known about the macroscopic properties of the condensed and gaseous states of water, but our understanding of the microscopic forces that define water structure remains incomplete^1. This structure, described in terms of correlations between the pairs of atoms O–H, O–O and H–H (ref. 2), can be studied by neutron diffraction techniques involving isotopic substitution^3. In particular, the signature of hydrogen bonding is apparent in neutron diffraction experiments as a peak in the pair correlation function of O and H ( g _ OH (r)) at about 1.9 Å (refs 3, 4). Here we extend such studies into the supercritical regime of water, in which there is no longer any distinction between the liquid and vapour phases. We find that at the supercritical temperature of 400 °C almost all hydrogen bonding is broken down, even though the thermal energy k _ B T is considerably less than the energy of the hydrogen bond. Our results are markedly different from the predictions of computer simulations under comparable conditions^5 using a common model of water^5–7. Our results provide a sensitive test of models of water structure more generally, and give some indication of the environment that solute molecules will experience in extraction and reaction processes that employ supercritical water as a solvent^8.W HEN fullerenes^1,2 are fragmented by laser irradiation, they lose C_2 fragments and retain a closed carbon cage^3. The detailed mechanism of this process remains unknown, although survival of the cage implies that annealing (rearrangement of the bonding) must play an important role^3,4. Here we use ab initio quantum-chemical calculations to show that fullerene annealing happens more readily than fragmentation, and that both are intimately related. Our findings imply that the assumptions commonly made about fullerenes^5—that they are composed of five- and six-membered rings of sp ^2 carbons— are not valid under high-energy conditions. In particular, the appearance of sp ^3 carbon and seven-membered rings is central in both the annealing and fragmentation processes. Our theoretical predictions imply that the high-energy processes of fullerene growth^6–11 and coalescence^12 are much richer than previously thought, and that their mechanisms may also involve structures containing sp ^3 carbon and seven-membered rings. Our results may aid in the design of experimental methods for controlling the nature of fullerene cages (for example, doping, opening and re-closing them).WHEN an action potential reaches a synaptic terminal, fusion of a transmitter-containing vesicle with the presynaptic membrane occurs with a probability ( p _r) of less than one^1. Despite the fundamental importance of this parameter, p _r has not been directly measured in the central nervous system. Here we describe a novel approach to determine p _r monitoring the decrement of NMDA ( N -methyl-D-aspartate)-receptor mediated synaptic currents in the presence of the use-dependent channel blocker MK-801 (ref. 2). On a single postsynaptic CA1 hippocampal slice neuron, two classes of synapses with a sixfold difference in p _r are resolved. Synapses with low p _r contribute to over half of transmission and are more sensitive to drugs enhancing transmitter release. Switching between these two classes of synapses provides the potential for large changes in synaptic efficacy and could underlie forms of activity-dependent plasticity.THE predominant inhibitory neurotrasmitter of the brain, GABA (γ-amino butyric acid), activates chloride-selective ion pores integral to the receptor complex. Subunits comprising the pre-sumed hetero-pentameric GABA channel have been cloned^1–4, but little information is available on the domains important for activation. Rat wild-type or mutated α_1-, & beta;_2- and γ_2-subunits (designated α, β and γ) were coexpressed in Xenopus oocytes and examined electrophy siologically. We report here the identification of two separate and homologous domains of the β-subunit, each of which contributes a tyrosine and threonine essential for activation by GABA. Conservative substitution of each of these four amino acids dramatically decreased GABA channel sensitivity to activation by GABA and the GABA agonist muscimol. These substitutions, however, did not impair activation by the barbiturate pentobarbital, indicating these two different classes of agonists activate GABA channels through distinct mechanisms. We also present evidence suggesting that the two identified domains of the β-subunit contribute a major component of the GABA receptor.NITRIC oxide, a free-radical gas produced endogenously by several mammalian cell types^1–6, has been implicated as a diffusible inter-cellular messenger subserving use-dependent modification of synaptic efficacy in the mature central nervous system^7–10. It has been suggested on theoretical grounds that nitric oxide might play an analogous role during the establishment of ordered connections by developing neurons^11. We report here that nitric oxide rapidly and reversibly inhibits growth of neurites of rat dorsal root ganglion neurons in vitro . In addition, we show that exposure to nitric oxide inhibits thioester-linked long-chain fatty acylation of neuronal proteins, possibly through a direct modification of substrate cysteine thiols. Our results demonstrate a potential role for nitric oxide in the regulation of process outgrowth and remodelling during neuronal development, which may be effected at least in part through modulation of dynamic protein fatty acylation in neuronal growth cones.CELL patterning in the body segments of the Drosophila embryo requires activity of the segment polarity genes, a molecularly heterogeneous group defined by a generic mutant phenotype^1. Two of these genes, wingless ( wg ) and hedgehog ( hh ), encode proteins that enter the secretory pathway^2–4, implicating them as signals that instruct the fates of neighbouring cells^5. Genetic analysis has identified wg transcription as one of the targets of hh activity^6,7 and it has been suggested that the spatial control of wg expression depends on the limited range of the hh signal and the differential competence of responding cells^8.I have tested this model by driving ubiquitous expression of the hh gene using the HspTO promoter. Here I report that, as predicted, this causes the ectopic activation of wg in only a subset of the cells of each parasegment. Using another target of hh activity as a probe, I demonstrate that the competence of cells to express wg is independent of their ability to receive the hh signal. Finally, I show that wg activation requires the function of the segment polarity gene fused , suggesting that the putative hh signal is transduced by the serine/threonine kinase that fused encodes.THE Himalaya and adjacent Tibetan plateau, constituting Earth's largest region of elevated topography and anomalously thick crust, formed as a consequence of Cenozoic collision between India and Asia—itself considered the archetypal continent–continent collision^1–3. Here we report the first results from an attempt to image the structure of the crust beneath this region using deep seismic reflection profiling. Our ∼100-km-long profile, acquired in the Tethyan Himalaya, shows a mid-crustal reflection that prob-ably marks the active thrust fault along which the Indian plate is underthrusting southern Tibet; upper-crustal reflections with geo-metries suggestive of large-scale structural imbrication of the upper crust; and Moho reflections from the base of the double-normal-thickness crust underlying the region. These results lend substantial support to the view that crustal thickening beneath southernmost Tibet was accomplished by wholesale underthrusting of Indian continental crust beneath the structurally imbricated upper crust comprising the Tethyan Himalaya.LAVA lakes and active strombolian vents have persisted at some volcanoes for periods exceeding the historic record. They liberate prodigious amounts of volatiles and thermal energy but erupt little lava, a paradox that raises questions about how volcanoes grow. Although long-lasting surface manifestations can be sustained by convective exchange of magma with deeper reservoirs, residence times of magmas beneath several basaltic volcanoes are ∼10–100 years^1,2, indicating that where surface activity continues for more than 100–1,000 years, the reservoirs are replenished by new magma. Endogenous growth of Kilauea volcano (Hawaii) through dyke intrusion and cumulate formation is a well-understood consequence of the steady supply of mantle-derived magma^3,4. As we show here, inferred heat losses from the Halemaumau lava lake indicate a period of dominantly endogenous growth of Kilauea volcano during the nineteenth century. Moreover, heat losses and degassing rates for several other volcanoes, including Stromboli, also indicate cryptic influxes of magma that far exceed visible effluxes of lavas. We propose that persistent activity at Stromboli, and at other volcanoes in different tectonic settings, is evidence of endogenous growth, involving processes similar to those at Kilauea.As a liquid approaches its glass transition temperature T_g, its viscosity increases rapidly. The glass transition can be induced either by lowering the temperature through T_g or by increasing the pressure (and thereby the density) at constant temperature. The effect of temperature on viscosity is well studied, but the density dependence of viscosity close to T_g is less well understood. Here we report measurements of the viscosity of glycerol, one of the most widely studied glass-forming liquids, at pressures of up to 3 GPa using centrifugal-force viscometry in a diamond-anvil cell. We find that free-volume theory^1,2, which ascribes an incom-pressible hard-sphere volume to the molecules, provides a good description of the viscosity over the entire pressure range (and by extrapolation, up to the glass transition at ∼5 GPa). We are thus able to predict the effect of pressure on T_g and on the glass fragility (the structural breakdown in the liquid close to the transition).THE Energetic Gamma Ray Experiment Telescope (EGRET) on the Compton Gamma Ray Observatory satellite recently detected^1 pulsed γ-radiation from the radio pulsar PSR1706–44; this is only the fourth radio pulsar to be identified as a γ-ray source. The other three (Vela, the Crab and PSR1509–58) are all associated with supernova remnants (SNRs), whereas very few—perhaps four—of the remaining 500 or so galactic radio pulsars have convincing associations with SNRs2. We have mapped the field around PSR1706 – 44 at 843 MHz with a resolution of 44 arcsec using the Molonglo Observatory Synthesis Telescope, and have identified a shell-type SNR at a distance of about 3 kpc—consistent with the distance deduced for the pulsar. The pulsar is seen as a slightly variable point source, located in an enhanced knot on the arc of the SNR shell.Many natural and man-made materials exhibit structure on more than one length scale; in some materials, the structural elements themselves have structure. This structural hierarchy can play a large part in determining the bulk material properties. Understanding the effects of hierarchical structure can guide the synthesis of new materials with physical properties that are tailored for specific applications.Larvae and Evolution: Toward a New Zoology. By Donald L. Williamson. Chapman and Hall: 1992. Pp. 223. á£29.95, $39.95.A Tapestry of Orbits. By Desmond King-Hele. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 244. á£35, $54.95.From the Greenwich Hulks to Old St Pancras: A History of Tropical Disease in London. By G. C. Cook. Athlone: 1992. Pp. 338. £35.Complexity: The Emerging Science at the Edge of Order and Chaos. By M. Mitchell Waldrop. Simon and Schuster/Viking: 1992. Pp. 380. $23 (hbk), á£9.99 (pbk). Complexity: Life at the Edge of Chaos. By Roger Lewin. Macmillan, New York/Dent: 1993. Pp. 208. $22, á£15.99.The Institute of Medicine in the United States has described a chilling tale of how the military used service people in tests of the effectiveness of poison gases against humans.Research tools for the molecular biologist featured this week include paints for the detection of human chromosomes 11 and 12, a kit for isolating differentially expressed genes, gel chambers, gels and other paraphernalia.A sensitive, high-throughput fluorescent DNA analyser has been developed that uses sheathflows of buffer around each element in an array of gel capillaries.Nature 360, 641-646 (1992) IN this Review Article, in the figure in Box 4 on page 644, the labels 'Orang' and 'Human' in the diagram labelled "Classification at family, subfamily and tribe level of the Hominoidea" were inadvertently trans-posed.STUDIES of extant protein sequences indicate that amino-acid insertions and deletions are preferentially located in loop regions^1, which has traditionally been explained as the result of selection removing deleterious mutations within secondary structural elements from the population. But there is no a priori reason to discount the possibility that insertions within secondary structure could either be tolerated until compensatory mutations arise, or have effects that are propagated away from secondary structure into loops. Earlier studies have indicated that insertions are generally tolerated, although much less well within secondary structure elements than in loop regions^2–8. Here we show that amino-acid insertions in an α-helix of T4 lysozyme can be accepted in two different ways. In some cases the inserted amino acids are accommodated within the helix, leading to the translocation of wild-type residues from the helix to the preceding loop. In other cases the insertion causes a ‘looping-out’ in the first or last turn of the helix. The individual structural responses seem to be dominated by the maintenance of the interface between the helix and the rest of the protein.THE TATA-binding protein TBP is necessary for the transcription of eukaryotic genes. Multi-protein complexes formed by TBP and different TBP-associated factors are involved in the initiation of transcription by polymerases I and II, and probably III as well^1. During the formation of an active initiation complex, TBP makes specific contacts with other proteins, for example TFIIB and RNA polymerase II (refs 2-4). Here we describe the cloning and characterization of a Drosophila gene product with considerable sequence similarity to TBP and a highly restricted expression pattern in the embryo. This TBP-related factor is a DNA-binding protein but is not likely to be a basal transcription factor. Our results suggest that TBP-related factor is a sequence-specific transcription factor that shares the DNA-binding properties of TBP.L-SELECTIN participates in the initial attachment of leukocytes to the vascular endothelium^1–3. On lymphocytes, it mediates binding to high endothelial venules of lymph nodes. As a selectin^4–6 it functions as a calcium-dependent lectin^7,8 recognizing carbohydrate-bearing ligands on endothelial cells^9–11. Two lymph node ligands for L-selectin have been identified as sulphated glycoproteins of M_r∼50K and ∼90K, called SgpSO and Sgp90 (ref. 10). The recently cloned SgpSO (ref. 12), now designated GlyCAM-1, is a high endothelial venule-associated, mucin-like glycoprotein containing predominantly O-linked carbohydrate chains. Sialylation of GlyCAM-1 is necessary for its ligand activity^9,10,13 and a role for fucosylation is suspected^13. We have used chlorate as a metabolic inhibitor of sulphation, and report here that GlyCAM-1 has an additional requirement for sulphate.DURING epithelial morphogenesis, the establishment of tight junctions precedes the development of both the asymmetry in protein and lipid composition between apical and basolateral cell surfaces (the 'fence' function) and the restriction in the transport of ions and nonelectrolytes through the extracellular clefts between cells (the 'gate' function)^1,2. Molecular models that explain both functions envision strands of particles extending as rings in the cell's perimeter that interact with similar strands located at the apposing cell^2–5. This model accounts for the 'fence' function, because the strands prevent diffusion of protein and lipids, and also for the 'gate' function, because the interaction between strands minimizes the width of the extracellular clefts, increasing transepithelial resistance to ions and decreasing non-electrolyte permeability. Here we describe the results of energy depletion, which for the first time separates both functions: it abolishes the gate function, as determined by the dramatic decrease in transepithelial resistance, but it leaves the fence function intact, as determined by the maintenance of lipid polarity.Nature 356, 529-532 (1992) SHOWN below is a revision of the nucleotide sequence and inferred amino acid sequence for a cellular adhesion regulatory molecule, the gene for which is now known as CMAR (CAR in this letter). The authors acknowledge helpful information received from Drs Alejandro Aruffo and Po-Ying Chan of Bristol-Myers Squibb, Pharmaceutical Research Institute, Seattle, USA, and H.CONCENTRATING urine is mandatory for most mammals to prevent water loss from the body. Concentrated urine is produced in response to vasopressin by the transepithelial recovery of water from the lumen of the kidney collecting tubule through highly water-permeable membranes^1,2. In this nephron segment, vaso-pressin regulates water permeability by endo- and exocytosis of water channels from or to the apical membrane^3,4. CHIP28 is a water channel in red blood cells and the kidney proximal tubule^5, but it is not expressed in the collecting tubule^6. Here we report the cloning of the complementary DNA for WCH-CD, a water channel of the apical membrane of the kidney collecting tubule. WCH-CD is 42% identical in amino-acid sequence to CHIP28. WCH-CD transcripts are detected only in the collecting tubule of the kidney. Immunohistochemically, WCH-CD is localized to the apical region of the kidney collecting tubule cells. Expression of WCH-CD in Xenopus oocytes markedly increases osmotic water permeability. The functional expression and the limited localization of WCH-CD to the apical region of the kidney collecting tubule suggest that WCH-CD is the vasopressin-regulated water channel.ADORSALIZING signal acts during gastrulation to change the specification of lateral mesodermal tissues from ventral (blood, mesenchyme) to more dorsal fates (muscle, heart, pronephros)^1–3. This signal, from Spemann's organizer, cannot be mimicked by the mesoderm inducers activin and fibroblast growth factor^2. The gene noggin is expressed in the organizer^4, and could be the dorsalizing signal. Here we show that soluble noggin protein added to ventral marginal zones during gastrulation induces muscle, but that activin does not. Dorsal pattern can be partially rescued in ventralized embryos by injection of a plasmid that expresses noggin during gastrulation. The results suggest that the noggin product may be the dorsalizing signal from the organizer.Treatise on Invertebrate Paleontology, Part R, Arthropoda 4, Volumes 3 and 4: Hexapoda. By F. M. Carpenter. Edited by R. L. Kaesler. Geological Society of America/University of Kansas: 1992. Pp. 677. $87.50.DURING gastrulation, the three germ layers of the embryo are formed and organized along the anterior-posterior body axis. In the mouse, gastrulation involves the delamination of ectodermal cells through the primitive streak and their differentiation into mesoderm^1. These processes do not occur in embryos homozygous for a retrovirally induced recessive prenatal lethal mutation, the strain 413-d insertional mutation^23. Instead of giving rise to mesoderm, embryonic ectoderm in 413-d mutants overproliferates and then rapidly degenerates, although extraembry_sonic lineages remain viable^2. Here we isolate a candidate for the mutated gene which encodes a new member of the transforming growth factor-p (TGF-p) superfamily^4. Expression is first detected in primitive streak-stage embryos at about the time of mesoderm formation. It then becomes highly localized in the node at the anterior of the primitive streak. This region is analogous to chick Hensen's node and Xenopus dorsal lip (Spemann's organizer), which can induce secondary body axes when grafted into host embryos (reviewed in refs 5 and 6). Our findings suggest that this gene, named nodal , encodes a signalling molecule essential for mesoderm formation and subsequent organization of axial structures in early mouse development.SIGNALLING for the B-cell immunoglobulin isotype switch requires T-cell-derived cytokines and T–B cell interaction, which operates primarily through the CD40 molecule on B cells with its ligand (CD40L) on activated T cells (reviewed in ref. 1). The CD40L is a type II membrane protein^2–5 with homology to tumour necrosis factor-α and -β^6,7, and has important functions in B-cell activation and differentiation^2,4,8. Human CD40L maps on Xq26.3-27.1 (ref. 3), the region where a primary immunodeficiency characterized by an immunoglobulin isotype switch defect (the hyper-IgM immunodeficiency syndrome, HIGM1) has been localized^9,10. The hypothesis that HIGM1 involves an abnormality of the CD40L has been tested. We report here the lack of CD40L expression in four unrelated male children with the hyper-IgM syndrome. CD40L transcripts in these patients showed either deletions or point mutations clustered within a limited region of the CD40L extracellular domain. These genetic alterations with abnormal CD40L expression provide a molecular basis for immunoglobulin isotype switch defects observed in this immunodeficiency.The plight of IBM and General Motors should be a lesson to successful technical companies everywhere.Bones: A Forensic Detective's Case-book. By Douglas Ubelaker and Henry Scammell. Edward Burlingame Books (Harper Collins ): 1992. Pp. 317. $23.XCHROMOSOME-LINKED immunodeficiency with hyper-IgM (HIGM1, MIM number 308230) is a rare disorder characterized by recurrent bacterial infections, very low or absent IgG, IgA and IgE, and normal to increased IgM and IgD serum levels^1–3. HIGM1 has been suggested to result from ineffective T-cell help for B cells^4. We and others^5–8 have identified a novel, TNF-related activation protein (TRAP) that is exclusively expressed on the surface of stimulated T cells^6,8. TRAP, a type II transmembrane protein of M_r 33,000, is the physiological ligand for CD40 (refs 5–8). Crosslinking of CD40 on B cells induces, in the presence of lymphokines, immunoglobulin class switching from IgM to IgG, IgA or IgE^5,9–1 1 . Mapping of the TRAP gene to the X-chromosomal location q26.3–q27.1 (ref. 6) suggested a causal relationship to HIGM1, which had previously been assigned to Xq26 (refs 12–14). Here we present evidence that point mutations in the TRAP gene give rise to nonfunctional or defective expression of TRAP on the surface of T cells in patients with HIGM1. The resultant failure of TRAP to interact with CD40 on functionally intact B cells is responsible for the observed immunoglobulin isotype defect in HIGM1.THE neurotransmitter dopamine acts through various receptor subtypes that are largely associated with enhancement or inhibition of adenylyl cyclases^1,2. These dopamine-sensitive adenylyl cyclases are highly concentrated in the corpus striatum and associated limbic structures of the brain, where their levels exceed by orders of magnitude^3,4 those in other areas of the brain. Here we use in situ hybridization to show that messenger RNA for three of these adenylyl cyclases^5–7 is not found in the corpus striatum. We have isolated and expressed a complementary DNA encoding new adenylyl cyclase whose selective concentration in the corpus striatum indicates that it may be responsible for the synaptic actions of dopamine.President Bill Clinton deserves a longer respite from his most severe critics than he is getting.PERIPHERAL sensory deprivation induces reorganization within the somatosensory cortex of adult animals^1-6. Although most studies have focused on the somatosensory cortex^1–6, changes at subcortical levels (for example the thalamus) could also play a fundamental role in sensory plasticity^7–11. To investigate this, we made chronic simultaneous recordings of large numbers of single neurons across the ventral posterior medial thalamus (VPM) in adult rats. This allowed a continuous and quantitative evaluation of the receptive fields of the same sample of single VPM neurons per animal, before and after sensory deprivation. Local anaesthesia in the face induced an immediate and reversible reorganization of a large portion of the VPM map. This differentially affected the short latency (4–6 ms) responses (SLRs) and long latency (15–25 ms) responses (LLRs) of single VPM neurons. The SLRs and LLRs normally define spatiotemporally complex receptive fields in the VPM^12. Here we report that 73% of single neurons whose original receptive fields included the anaesthetized zone showed immediate unmasking of SLRs in response to stimulation of adjacent cutaneous regions, and/or loss of SLRs with preservation or enhancement of LLRs in response to stimulation of regions just surrounding the anaesthetized zone. This thalamic reorganization demonstrates that peripheral sensory deprivation may induce immediate plastic changes at multiple levels of the somatosensory system. Further, its spatiotemporally complex character suggests a disruption of the normal dynamic equilibrium between multiple ascending and descending influences on the VPM.HALDANE'S rule states that "When in the F_1 offspring of two different animal races one sex is absent, rare, or sterile, that sex is the heterozygous [heterogametic or XY] sex"^1. This rule represents one of the few patterns characterizing animal speciation^2,3. Traditional explanations of Haldane's rule^1,4–6 claim that heterogametic hybrids are unfit because they lack an X chromosome that is 'compatible' with the autosomes of one species. Recent work^2,7 shows that this explanation is incorrect for hybrid sterility: contrary to prediction, homogametic hybrids carrying both X chromosomes from the same species remain fertile. Until now, similar tests have not been performed for hybrid inviability. Here I show that homogametic hybrids who carry both X chromosomes from the same species are inviable. These results show that the genetic causes of Haldane's rule differ for hybrid sterility versus inviability. Haldane's rule does not, therefore, have a single genetic basis.LIQUID crystals have been used extensively as active media in display devices such as full-colour television screens. These devices are generally based on changes in the arrangement of the liquidcrystal molecules induced by electric fields, which change their optical properties^1. Ferroelectric liquid crystals^2,3 exhibit spontaneous polarization and therefore show a faster response to changes in the applied field. Switching of this field causes a reversal in the direction of polarization^2–;5. Here we report polarization switching in ferroelectric liquid crystals driven by a photochemical process. The liquid-crystal films are doped with a photochromic compound which undergoes trans–cis isomerization on irradiation. Photoisomerization induces a change in the switching potential of the host liquid-crystal film, and thereby causes switching at the irradiated sites. The process is fast, stable, reversible and repeatable, and should be exploitable in device applications.THE plasma precipitating into the Earth's dayside auroral atmosphere has characteristics which show that it originates from the shocked solar-wind plasma of the magnetosheath^1'2. The particles of the magnetosheath plasma precipitate down a funnel-shaped region (cusp) of open field lines resulting from reconnection of the geomagnetic field with the interplanetary magnetic field^3. Although the cusp has long been considered a well defined spatial structure maintained by continuous reconnection, it has recently been suggested^4–6 that reconnection instead may take place in a series of discontinuous events; this is the ‘pulsating cusp model’. Here we present coordinated radar and satellite observations of a series of discrete, poleward-moving plasma structures that are consistent with the pulsating-cusp model.The idea that a sufficiently intense sound wave might make a liquid glow with light is almost an exercise in magic; but the facts are verifiable, the understanding lags behind.Progress towards an international moratorium on the testing and development of nuclear weapons has been slow and tortuous. The time is now ripe for a treaty to be agreed.Direct photometric evidence has established that the central bulge of our Galaxy (the Milky Way) is actually a stellar bar. The dynamics of the bar will drive material into the Galaxy's centre but recent X-ray observations suggest that much of the inflowing gas is driven out again in a high-pressure galactic wind. A small portion of the remainder appears to be falling onto an extraordinarily dense cluster of stars at the Galaxy's nucleus, which may contain a massive black hole.Academic Press Dictionary of Science and Technology. Edited by Christopher Morris. Academic: 1992. Pp. 2,432. £68, $115.Wolfgang Pauli und C. G. Jung: Ein Briefwechsel, 1932-1958. Edited by C. A. Meier Springer. Pp. 275. DM98.The Environment in International Relations. By Caroline Thomas. Royal Institute for International Affairs, London: 1992. Pp. 291. £25, $42.95 (hbk); £12.50, $21.95 (pbk). Global Environmental Change and International Relations. Edited by Ian Rowlands and Malory Greene. Macmillan: 1991. Pp. 202. £42.50 (hbk); £15.99 (Pbk).The International Politics of the Environment. Edited by Andrew Hurrell and Benedict Kingsbury. Clarendon (Oxford University Press): 1991. Pp. 492. £40, $72 (hbk); £15.95, $19.95 (pbk).Conversion and the Environment. Edited by Neils P. Gleditsch. International Peace Research Institute, Oslo: 1992. Pp. 337. NK240, $40. Verification Report 1992: Yearbook on Arms Control and Environmental Agreements. Edited by J. B. Poole and R. Guthrie. Verification Technology Information Centre, London: 1992. Pp. 372. £25.Environmental Legacy of the Former Soviet Republics. By Ruben A. M. Natsakania. Centre for Human Ecology, University of Edinburgh: 1992. Pp. 209. £20 (pbk).Paradise Deferred: Environmental Policymaking in Central and Eastern Europe. By Duncan Fisher. Royal Institute for International Affairs, London: 1992. Pp. 82. £10, $20 (pbk).The Invisible Man: The Life and Liberties of H. G. Wells. By Michael Coren. Bloomsbury: 1993. Pp. 240. £20. (To be published in the United States by Atheneum later this year.)The Chemical Weapons Convention will work only if verification procedures are sensitive to public scrutiny.The case for a comprehensive test-ban treaty, necessary for global security and civility, is made more pointed by worries about proliferation. But now the British seem to be dragging their feet.The three-dimensional structure of the lipase–-procolipase complex, co-crystallized with mixed micelles of phosphatidylcholine and bile salt, has been determined at 3 Å resolution by X-ray crystallography. The lid, a surface helix covering the catalytic triad of lipase, adopts a totally different conformation which allows phospholipid to bind to the enzyme's active site. The open lid is an essential component of the active site and interacts with procolipase. Together they form the lipid–water interface binding site. This reorganization of the lid structure provokes a second drastic conformational change in an active site loop, which in its turn creates the oxyanion hole (induced fit).Mr William Waldegrave, Britain's cabinet minister in charge of science, has offered a bottle of decent champagne to one who can tell him why the Higgs boson is worth finding (see page 781). These notes may be helpful.At UNESCO's celebration of the double helix's fortieth anniversary in Paris last week, nostalgia was overlaid by vigorous optimism about the future of molecular biology.The oxygen isotope compositions of fresh volcanic glasses from submarine volcanoes of 'enriched mantle' (EM-1 and EM-11) type appear to require the presence of subducted crustal components in the source of these lavas. These data confirm earlier inferences from trace elements and radiogenic isotopes, and also provide a rare opportunity to estimate the proportion of subducted material that reaches the source region of ocean island basalts.Atherosclerosis, the principal cause of heart attack, stroke and gangrene of the extremities, is responsible for 50% of all mortality in the USA, Europe and Japan. The lesions result from an excessive, inflammatory-fibroproliferative response to various forms of insult to the endothelium and smooth muscle of the artery wall. A large number of growth factors, cytokines and vasoregulatory molecules participate in this process. Our ability to control the expression of genes encoding these molecules and to target specific cell types provides opportunities to develop new diagnostic and therapeutic agents to induce the regression of the lesions and, possibly, to prevent their formation.Encyclopedia of the Solid Earth Sciences. Editor-in-chief Philip Kearey Blackwell Scientific: 1993. Pp. 713. £99.50, $179.95.Both countries want industry to be more competitive, but differ in their recipes for using science and technology.Against some odds, President Boris Yeltsin has won the part of the Russian referendum that he says matters most, but the really hard work is only just beginning.Opportunities for foreign scientists to gain employment in Japan have blossomed and can be expected to continue to grow in the coming years.DAMAGE-SPECIFIC recognition and incision of DNA during nucleotide excision repair in yeast^1 and mammalian cells^2 requires multiple gene products. Amino-acid sequence homology between several yeast and mammalian genes suggests that the mechanism of nucleotide excision repair is conserved in eukaryotes^2–7, but very little is known about its biochemistry. In the yeast Saccharomyces cerevisiae at least 6 genes are needed for this process, including RAD1 and RAD10 (ref. 1). Mutations in the two genes inactivate nucleotide excision repair^8,9 and result in a reduced efficiency of mitotic recombinational events between repeated sequences^10–15. The RadlO protein has a stable and specific interaction with Radl protein^16,17 and also binds to single-stranded DNA and promotes annealing of homologous single-stranded DNA^18. The amino-acid sequence of the yeast RadlO protein is homologous with that of the human excision repair gene ERCC1 (ref. 3). Here we demonstrate that a complex of purified Radl and RadlO proteins specifically degrades single-stranded DNA by an endonucleolytic mechanism. This endonuclease activity is presumably required to remove non-homologous regions of single-stranded DNA during m. tic recombination between repeated sequences as previously suggested^13, and may also be responsible for the specific incision of damaged DNA during nucleotide excision repair.THE tumour-suppressor gene p53 is inactivated in most human malignancies^1 either by missense mutations^1 or by binding to oncogenic proteins^2–4. In human soft tissue sarcomas, inactivation apparently results from MDM2 gene amplification^4. MDM2 is an oncogene product^5,6 that may function by binding to p53 and inhibiting its ability to activate transcription3. Here we show that, when expressed in Saccharomyces cerevisiae , human MDM2 inhibits human p53's ability to stimulate transcription by binding to a region that nearly coincides with the p53 acidic activation domain. The isolated p53 activation domain fused to another DNA-binding protein is also inactivated by MDM2, confirming that MDM2 can inhibit p53 function by concealing the activation domain of p53 from the cellular transcription machinery.DURING light-adaptation by the vertebrate eye, the rods are desensitized and the light response is accelerated^1,2. When light is absorbed by the rods, a phosphodiesterase is activated that hydrolyses cyclic GMP^3,4. A light-induced decrease in cytoplasmic Ca^2+ concentration^5–7 is part of this light-adaptation process^8,9. The protein S-modulin ( M _r 26,000) is known to increase the fraction of light-activated cyclic GMP-phosphodiesterase (PDE) at high Ca^2+ concentrations in frog rod photoreceptors^10. Here I present evidence that S-modulin lengthens the lifetime of active PDE (PDE^*) at high Ca^2+ concentrations. These S-modulin effects are observed in the physiological range of Ca^2+ concentration (30 nM to 1 µM; half-maximum effects at 200–400 nM). At the high Ca^2+ concentrations at which S-modulin prolongs the lifetime of PDE^*, S-modulin inhibits rhodopsin phosphorylation (half-maximum effect at ˜100 nM Ca^2+). ATP is necessary for the S-modulin effects on PDE activation. I therefore conclude that the Ca^2+-dependent regulation of PDE by S-modulin is mediated by rhodopsin phosphorylation. This regulation seems to be the principal mechanism of light adaptation in vertebrate photoreceptors.THE transcription factor Oct-1 belongs to a family containing a POU DNA-binding domain. This bipartite domain is composed of a POU-specific domain (POU_s) and a POU-homeodomain (POU_hd) connected by a flexible linker. The left half of the optimal POU binding site, the octamer ATGCAAAT, is recognized by POU_s and the right half by POU_hd. We have determined the solution structure of POU_s by nuclear magnetic resonance. It consists of four α -helices connected by short loops. Helices I and IV are in a parallel coiled-coil arrangement. The folding topology appears to be similar to that of the bacteriophage Λ-represser and 434 represser. For the well defined parts of the protein (residues 1–71), the average root-mean square deviation for the backbone atoms is 0.9 Å. Based on the observed selective exchange broadening in the (^15N, ^1H)-HMQC (heteronuclear multiple quantum coherence) spectrum of the POU_s–DNA complex we conclude that DNA-binding is mediated by helix III. We propose a model for the POU–DNA complex in which both recognition helices from the two subdomains have adjacent positions in the major groove.DEATH by apoptosis is characteristic of cells undergoing deletion during embryonic development, T- and B-cell maturation and endocrine-induced atrophy^1. Apoptosis can be initiated by various agents^1–5 and may be a result of expression of the oncosuppressor gene p53 (refs 6–8). Here we study the dependence of apoptosis on p53 expression in cells from the thymus cortex. Short-term thymocyte cultures were prepared from mice constitutively heterozygous or homozygous for a deletion in the p53 gene introduced into the germ line after gene targeting. Wild-type thymocytes readily undergo apoptosis after treatment with ionizing radiation, the glucocorticoid methylprednisolone, or etoposide (an inhibitor of topoisomerase II), or after Ca^2+-dependent activation by phorbol ester and a calcium ionophore. In contrast, homozygous null p53 thymocytes are resistant to induction of apoptosis by radiation or etoposide, but retain normal sensitivity to glucocorticoid and calcium. The time-dependent apoptosis that occurs in untreated cultures is unaffected by p53 status. Cells heterozygous for p53 deletion are partially resistant to radiation and etoposide. Our results show that p53 exerts a significant and dose-dependent effect in the initiation of apoptosis, but only when it is induced by agents that cause DNA-strand breakage.THE p53 tumour suppressor gene is the most widely mutated gene in human tumorigenesis^1,2. p53 encodes a transcriptional activator^3–7 whose targets may include genes that regulate genomic stability^8,9, the cellular response to DNA damage^10,11, and cell-cycle progression^12,13. Introduction of wild-type p53 into cell lines that have lost endogenous p53 function can cause growth arrest^14–16 or induce a process of cell death known as apoptosis^17,18. During normal development, self-reactive thymocytes undergo negative selection by apoptosis^19, which can also be induced in immature thymocytes by other stimuli, including exposure to glucocorticoids^15 and ionizing radiation^16. Although normal negative selection involves signalling through the T-cell receptor^14, the induction of apoptosis by other stimuli is poorly understood. We have investigated the requirement for p53 during apoptosis in mouse thymocytes. We report here that immature thymocytes lacking p53 die normally when exposed to compounds that may mimic T-cell receptor engagement and to glucocorticoids but are resistant to the lethal effects of ionizing radiation. These results demonstrate that p53 is required for radiation-induced cell death in the thymus but is not necessary for all forms of apoptosis.GENOMIC imprinting has been implicated in the onset of several embryonal tumours but the mechanism is not well understood^1–3. Maternal chromosome 11p15 loss of heterozygosity^4 and paternal chromosome 11 isodisomy^5,6 suggest that imprinted genes are involved in the onset of Wilms' tumour and the Beckwith–Wiedemann syndrome. The insulin-like growth factor II ( IGF2 ) gene located at 11pl5.5 has been put forward as a candidate gene as it is maternally imprinted (paternally expressed) in the mouse^7, and is expressed at high levels in Wilms' tumours^8,9. We report here that the IGF2 gene is expressed from the paternal allele in human fetal tissue, but that in Wilms' tumour expression can occur biallelically. These results provide, to our knowledge, the first evidence that relaxation of imprinting may play a role in the onset of disease and suggest a new genetic mechanism involved in the development of cancer.GENOMIC imprinting, or parental allele-specific expression of genes, has been demonstrated at the molecular level in insects and mice^1,2 but not in man. Imprinting as a potential mechanism of human disease is suggested by paternal uniparental disomy of 11 p15 in Beckwith–Wiedemann syndrome^3 and by maternal uniparental disomy of 15ql1–12 in Prader–Willi syndrome^4. Beckwith–Wiedemann syndrome is characterized by multiorgan overgrowth and predisposition to embryonal tumours such as Wilms^9 tumour of the kidney^5. A loss of heterozygosity of 11 p15 is also frequently found in a wide variety of tumours, including Wilms' tumour and lung, bladder, ovarian, liver and breast cancers^6–11; 11pl5 also directly suppresses tumour growth in vitro ^12. Two genes in this band, H19 and insulin-like growth factor-II ( IGF2 ) undergo reciprocal imprinting in the mouse, with maternal expression of H19 (ref. 13) and paternal expression of IGF2 (ref. 14). Here we find that both of these genes show monoallelic expression in human tissues and, as in mouse, H19 is expressed from the maternal allele and IGF2 from the paternal allele. In contrast, 69% of Wilms' tumours not undergoing loss of heterozygosity at lip showed biallelic expression of one or both genes, suggesting that relaxation or loss of imprinting could represent a new epigenetic mutational mechanism in carcinogenesis.IT is commonly believed^1,2 that the mutation rate is much higher in the human male germ line than in the female germ line because the number of germ-cell divisions per generation is much larger in males than in females. But direct estimation of mutation rates is difficult, relying mainly on sex-linked genetic diseases^3, so the ratio (α_m) of male to female mutation rates is not clear. It has been noted^4 that if α_m is very large, then the rate of synonymous substitution in X-linked genes should be only 2/3 of that in autosomal genes, and comparison of human and rodent genes supported this prediction^4. As the number of X-linked genes used in the study was small and the X-linked and autosomal sequences were non-homologous, and given that the synonymous rate varies among genes^5, we sequenced the last intron (~1 kb) of the Y-linked and X-linked zinc-finger-protein genes (ZFY and ZFX) in humans, orang-utans, baboons and squirrel monkeys. The ratio Y/X of the substitution rate in the Y-linked intron to that in the X-linked intron is ~2.3, which is close to that estimated from synonymous rates in the ZFY and ZFX genes^6–8 and implies α_m≈6. This estimate of α_m supports the view that the evolution of DNA sequences in higher primates is male-driven. It is, however, much lower than the previous estimate^4 and therefore raises a number of issues.THE picture of a tiny passerine host feeding a huge cuckoo nestling challenges evolutionary biologists who explain animal behaviour as adaptive^1–4. Cuckoo eggs sometimes resemble the eggs of the host, but nestlings of the common cuckoo, Cuculus canorus , look very different from the young of the host. The inability of the host to discriminate against such divergent nestlings is especially puzzling as some cuckoo hosts show a finely tuned discrimination ability between eggs^5–8. Here I present a simple model to explain this paradox. The model shows that although learning to recognize eggs is adaptive, learning to recognize nestlings might not be. The mechanism of learned recognition, previously shown to maintain egg recognition, is unlikely to be adaptive for hosts like those of the common cuckoo, in which only the parasitic nestling remains in the nest. The reason that discrimination against parasite nest-lings is not adaptive is that the cost of misimprinting (learning to recognize the parasite nestling as the parents' own) exceeds the benefit of correct learning. The model also explains why nestling discrimination is mostly found in host–parasite systems in which the parasite and the hosts' young are reared together^1.President Bill Clinton's budget compromises are sending conflicting signals about his seriousness.Beyond Modularity: A Developmental Perspective on Cognitive Science. By Annette Karmiloff-Smith MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 234. $34.95, £27.50.AT ocean trenches, sea-floor sediments may either be scraped off the subducting plate, or accompany it into the mantle. Some of the subducted sediment may then be recycled to the arc crust by magmatism^1; the rest may be recycled into the mantle, and contribute to mantle heterogeneity^2. Strong evidence for sediment contributions to arc volcanism has come from isotope tracers, such as ^207Pb and ^10Be (refs 3–5), but a global mass balance requires consideration of element fluxes^6. Here we report the sedimentary fluxes into eight trenches around the globe of trace elements that are enriched in arc volcanics (Ba, Sr, K, Rb, Cs, La, Th and U)^7 We show that the volcanic outputs clearly reflect the sediment inputs, once the effects of melting are taken into account^8. Where the sediment flux into a trench is high for a particular element, the associated volcanics are enriched in this same element. Thus, some of the geochemical characteristics of arc volcanics can be traced back to the sediments at the trench. A mass balance of the inputs and outputs will ultimately provide estimates for how much sediment is recycled to the arc, and how much to the deeper mantle.MARINE snow, generally defined as aggregated particles of diameter greater than 0.5 mm, is thought to play an important role in oceanic biogeochemical cycles^1. Recent studies have focused on its unusual physical, biological and chemical properties but its temporal variability has received scant attention^2–6. Here we report observations of the abundance, volume concentration and size distribution of marine snow over a five-month period at a single site in the Northeast Atlantic. At a depth of 270 m, marine snow particles demonstrated strong seasonal and diel variability. Volume concentrations in spring were about 20 times those in summer and autumn with late morning concentrations up to three times higher than at other times of the day. Our results suggest that the marine snow forms as a result of highly dynamic interactions in the particle pool. We believe that the mid-water biota and their migratory behaviour are responsible for the diel variability; they are therefore likely to have a significant influence on marine snow concentrations and hence on open-ocean material flux.AMINES have long been characterized as amphoteric (acting as both donor and acceptor) in terms of their hydrogen-bond interactions in the condensed phase. With the possible exception of (NH_3)_2, however, no gas-phase complexes exhibiting hydrogen-bond donation by ammonia, the ‘simplest amine’, have been observed^1,2. Here we present high-resolution optical and microwave spectra of the benzene–ammonia dimer in the gas phase, which show that the ammonia molecule resides above the benzene plane and undergoes free or nearly free internal rotation. In the vibrationally averaged structure, the C _3 symmetry axis of NH_3 is tilted by about 58^° relative to the benzene C_6 axis, such that the ammonia protons interact with the benzene π-cloud. Our ab initio calcula-tions predict a ‘monodentate’ minimum-energy structure, with very low barriers to rotation of ammonia. The larger separation of the two molecular components, and the smaller dissociation energy, relative to the benzene–water dimer^3 reflect the weak hydrogen-bond donor capability of ammonia, but the observed geometry greatly resembles the amino–aromatic interaction found naturally in proteins^4.IN the European Space Agency's 1992 Giotto Extended Mission, the Dust Impact Detection System operated successfully during a fly-by that took the spacecraft within about 200 km of the nucleus of comet Grigg–Skjellerup. During the encounter, three meteoroid impacts were detected on Giotto's front shield. The particle masses were found to be lOO^+105_-50 µg, 2^+4_-1 µg and 20^+25_-10 µg, suggesting that the mass distribution of the cometary dust was dominated by larger particles. This is supported by the independent detection of a very large meteoroid (14^+40_-4 mg) by the Giotto Radio-Science Experiment, and is consistent with data over the same mass range from the 1986 encounter with comet Halley. The results indicate a higher rate of mass loss from the nucleus than previously thought, and hence a higher dust-to-gas mass ratio.THE apparent emptiness of the outer Solar System has been a long-standing puzzle for astronomers, as it contrasts markedly with the abundance of asteroids and short-period comets found closer to the Sun. One explanation for this might be that the orbits of distant objects are intrinsically short-lived, perhaps owing to the gravitational influence of the giant planets. Another possibility is that such objects are very faint, and thus they might easily go undetected. An early survey^1 designed to detect distant objects culminated with the discovery of Pluto. More recently, similar surveys yielded the comet-like objects 2060 Chiron^2 and 5145 Pholus^3 beyond the orbit of Saturn. Here we report the discovery of a new object, 1992 QB_1, moving beyond the orbit of Neptune. We suggest that this may represent the first detection of a member of the Kuiper belt^4,5, the hypothesized population of objects beyond Neptune and a possible source of the short-period comets^6–8.OF the one thousand or so detected sources of cosmic γ-ray bursts (GRBs), only three are known to have exhibited recurrent activity^1–4. These events differ from the majority of GRBs in that they are of much shorter duration and have relatively soft spectra^5. The recurrent sources can thus be considered as a distinct class of objects—the soft gamma repeaters (SGRs). The embryonic distribution of the SGRs suggests that they are of galactic origin^4, whereas the distribution^6 of GRBs seems to be inconsistent with any known galactic source population. Here we report the detection by the Burst and Transient Source Experiment (BATSE) ^7 of three short, very soft transient events from a location consistent with that of the ‘old’ repeater SGR 1900 + 14 (ref. 8). Our results suggest that the SGR active phase lasts at least 13 years, which, in conjunction with the arguments for a galactic origin, lends support to suggestions^4,5 that SGRs are neutron stars.Expression of globin genes in developing erythroid cells is controlled by upstream locus control regions. Activity of these regions in vivo requires an erythroid-specific nuclear factor (NF-E2) that binds AP-1-like recognition sites. Its tissue-specific component (p45 NF-E2) has been characterized by complementary DNA cloning as a new basic region–leucine zipper protein which dimerizes with a ubiquitous partner to form native NF-E2.Protestations to the contrary notwithstanding, people have been busy bridging the gap between deterministic wave mechanics and the notion that everything is uncertain; quantum mechanics is the better for it.People in rural regions of the developing world are hungry for electricity to meet the most rudimentary of needs. Small solar-power systems have proved themselves to be an appropriate technology.The Ninetyeast Ridge hotspot track displays strontium, neodymium and lead isotope variations over time that reflect simple radioactive decay in the plume source rather than a change in the mantle components present. The lead isotope variations indicate that the time spent by the plume source in a non-convecting mantle boundary layer was only a few hundreds of millions of years, contrary to the conventional view of individual plume sources as old (1–3 Gyr) or persistent features.Eastern Germany should tolerate the temporary indignities of unifications for the sake of the better times ahead.There is a danger that President Bill Clinton, in seeking better terms of trade with Japan, will impoverish the rest of us without improving the lot of the United States.Although DNA is the carrier of genetic information, it has limited chemical stability. Hydrolysis, oxidation and nonenzymatic methylation of DNA occur at significant rates in vivo , and are counteracted by specific DNA repair processes. The spontaneous decay of DNA is likely to be a major factor in mutagenesis, carcinogenesis and ageing, and also sets limits for the recovery of DNA fragments from fossils.Forschen auf Deutsch: der Machiavelli für Forscher — und solche die es noch werden wollen*.. By Siegfried Bär with cartoons by Irena Volpi Harri Deutsch, Frankfurt: 1992. Pp. 125. DM20 (pbk).Encyclopedia of Microbiology. By Joshua Lederberg Academic: 1992. Four volumes (pp. 648, 646, 642 and 582). £450, $695.Regulating Toxic Substances: A Philosophy of Science and the Law. By Carl F. Cranor Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 252. $45, £35.Mesoamerican Writing Systems: Propaganda, Myth, and History in Four Ancient Civilizations. By Joyce Marcus Princeton University Press: 1993. Pp. 495. $49.95, £35.LIGHT absorption by the visual pigment rhodopsin^1,2 triggers, through G-protein coupling, a cascade of events in the outer segment of the rod cell of the vertebrate retina that results in membrane hyperpolarization and nerve excitation^3–5. Rhodopsin, which contains 348 amino acids^6–8, has seven helices that cross the disk membrane^6,9 and its amino terminus is extracellular. A wealth of biochemical data is available for rhodopsin: 11- cis retinal is bound^10 to lysine 296 in helix VII; glutamic acid 113 on helix III is the counterion to the protonated Schiff's base^11,12; a disulphide bridge, cystine 110–187, connects helix III to the second extracellular loop e2 (refs 13, 14); the carboxy terminus has two palmitoylated cysteines forming a cytoplasmic loop i4 (ref. 15); three intracellular loops i2, i3 and i4 mediate activation of the heterotrimeric G protein transducin^16,17; glutamic acid 135 and arginine 136 at the cytoplasmic end of helix III affect binding of transducin^18. But to provide a framework to interpret these data, not only for rhodopsin but for other G-protein-coupIed receptors, requires the structure to be determined. Here we present a projection map of rhodopsin showing the configuration of the helices.THE nuclear DNA-binding protein NF-E2 is thought to mediate the powerful erythroid enhancer activity of the α- and β-globin locus control regions^1–4 and participates in the control of genes encoding two enzymes of haem biosynthesis (porphobilinogen deaminase and ferrochelatase) ^1,5. The major component of NF-E2 is a 45K polypeptide (designated p45 NF-E2) that belongs to the basic region–leucine zipper family of transcription factors^6. This subunit of NF-E2 is specifically expressed in haematopoietic progenitor cells and differentiated cells of the erythroid, megakary-ocyte and mast cell lineages^6. The gene encoding p45 NF-E2 (murine gene Nfe2 ) has been mapped to mouse chromosome 15 near the mutation microcytosis ( mk ). Homozygous mk mice have severe hypochromic microcytic anaemia as a result of decreased globin synthesis and defects in intestinal and erythroid iron absorption. Here we investigate whether the mk mutation lies within Nfe2 by characterizing the p45 NF-E2 gene and determining its DNA sequence in wild-type and mk alleles. The mk allele carries a missense mutation that causes substitution of valine by alanine at amino acid 173 of the p45 NF-E2 protein. Expression of p45 NF-E2 messenger RNA was detected in erythroid tissues of normal mice and in the duodenum of normal and severely anaemic β-thalassaemic (Hbb ^ d-th3 /Hbb ^ d-th3 ) mice. We propose that the mk mutation results in an impaired form of NF-E2 which fails to regulate both globin production and iron metabolism properly.ADRENOLEUKODYSTROPHY (ALD) is an X-linked disease affecting 1/20,000 males either as cerebral ALD in childhood or as adrenomyeloneuropathy (AMN) in adults^1. Childhood ALD is the more severe form, with onset of neurological symptoms between 5–12 years of age. Central nervous system demyelination progresses rapidly and death occurs within a few years. AMN is a milder form of the disease with onset at 15–30 years of age and a more progressive course. Adrenal insufficiency (Addison's disease) may remain the only clinical manifestation of ALD. The principal biochemical abnormality of ALD is the accumulation of very-long-chain fatty acids (VLCFA) because of impaired β -oxidation in peroxisomes^1,2. The normal oxidation of VLCFA-CoA in patients' fibroblasts^3–5 suggested that the gene coding for the VLCFA-CoA synthetase could be a candidate gene for ALD. Here we use positional cloning to identify a gene partially deleted in 6 of 85 independent patients with ALD. In familial cases, the deletions segregated with the disease. An identical deletion was detected in two brothers presenting with different clinical ALD phenotypes. Candidate exons were identified by computer analysis of genomic sequences^6 and used to isolate complementary DNAs by exon connection^7 and screening of cDNA libraries. The deduced protein sequence shows significant sequence identity to a peroxisomal membrane protein of M _r 70K that is involved in peroxisome biogenesis and belongs to the ‘ATP-binding cassette’ superfamily of transporters.A UNIVERSAL biomarker of cellular ageing in eukaryotic postmitotic cells is the appearance over time of autofluorescent lysosomal residual bodies called age pigments or lipofuscin granules^1. Their role in the process of cellular ageing has been debated without resolution^2. Neither the identity nor mechanism of formation of the fluorophores has been definitively determined. A postmitotic cell type that accumulates large quantities of age pigments is the ocular retinal pigment epithelium^2. We have now identified the major orange-emitting fluorophore of these pigments using fast-atom bombardment tandem mass spectrometry with collisional activation analysis^4. It is an amphoteric quaternary amine that arises as a Schiff base reaction product of retinaldehyde and ethanolamine. This compound should display lysosomotropic detergent behaviour which would help explain many of the age-related changes shown in this cell. These results suggest a new role for Schiff base reaction products as lysosomotropic amines in the genesis of cellular age pigments.THE dynamic nature of neuronal growth cone filopodia led to the suggestion that the primary function of filopodia is to sample their immediate environment^1–3, responding to and transducing environmental signals that affect growth cone behaviour^4–6 and shape^7–11. Filopodia seem well suited to serve as antenna-like sensors, their broad span allows sampling of information over a greatly enhanced radius, and forward-projecting filopodia encounter potential cues in the molecular terrain long before the advancing growth cone itself^12. Filopodia in culture can serve structural roles^13, exert mechanical tension^14–16 and selectively adhere to their surrounding^17–20. Whether or not filopodia have a general sensory role has not been tested directly, largely because of their small size, which limits an electrophysiological approach, and their integral relationship with the parent growth cone, which prevents resolution of their different functions. Here we use surgical procedures to isolate individual filopodia from their parent growth cone and, by monitoring their morphology and calcium second messenger systems, we show that neuronal growth cone filopodia contain signal transduction mechanisms that allow autonomous responses and the transmission of distant environmental information to their parent growth cone.Numerical modelling of mantle convection in a spherical shell with an endothermic phase change at 670 km depth reveals an inherently three-dimensional flow pattern, containing cylindrical plumes and linear sheets which behave differently in their ability to penetrate the phase change. The dynamics are dominated by accumulation of downwelling cold material above 670 km depth, resulting in frequent avalanches of upper-mantle material into the lower mantle. This process generates long-wavelength lateral heterogeneity, helping to resolve the contradiction between seismic tomographic observations and expectations from mantle convection simulations.Dunnock Behaviour and Social Evolution. By N. B. Davies. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 272. £35, $70 (hbk); £13.50, $28 (pbk).OCEANIC lithosphere is assumed to possess platelike properties whether it is lying at the Earth's surface or descending deep into the mantle; yet the geometries of subducting slabs indicate significant deformation as they descend through the mantle^1–4, suggesting that lithospheric plates might be so weakened during subduction as to act not as a rigid solid, but as a viscous fluid. Numerical and laboratory experiments have shown that fluid 'slabs' can indeed take on realistic profiles^5–7; however, it has not been clear whether a fluid or 'weak' model of slab dynamics can account for deep earthquakes, which are usually ascribed to the deformation of a rigid or 'strong' slab. Here we show, using numerical simulations of slab evolution, that a weak slab model is in fact consistent with seismic observations. Assuming that earthquakes occur at a rate proportional to deformation rate, we reproduce the observed variation with depth of seismicity rate and focal mechanisms, and the cessation of seismicity at 670 km depth. Provided that sinking material encounters resistance at depth (here modelled as a viscosity jump at 670 km), the pattern of seismicity can be explained by any mechanism for deep earthquakes in which the rate of seismicity is proportional to strain rate in the slab.THE transition between the last glacial period and the present interglacial was marked by pronounced and abrupt changes in climate^1,2, one of which, the Younger Dryas event, resulted in a return to almost full-glacial conditions. Here we present evidence for a short but intense cold period in eastern North America, pre-dating the Younger Dryas, revealed by analysing the organic, pollen and midge content of lake sediments at very high resolution. We name this event the Killarney Oscillation and it lasted from 11,160 to 10,910 radiocarbon years BP. Because this corresponds to the Gerzensee Oscillation in Switzerland and can be correlated with other short-term events reported from across the North Atlantic seaboard^3–14, we conclude that a single event affected all of the North Atlantic region. This pre-Younger Dryas cold period is similar in nature and geographic extent to the major cooling of the Younger Dryas^15, raising the possibility that these two events are causally related.Two models have been proposed to account for gas exchang between the atmosphere and the oceans: one involves direct transport of the gas through a surface boundary layer^1; the other also includes a substantial enhancement of the gas flux due to bubbles formed by breaking waves^2,3. In a long time-series of dissolved oxygen measurements, Wallace and Wirick^4 observed sharply increased fluxes that seemed to be associated with wave activity. But the lack of vertical resolution meant that they could not rule out water advection and entrapment, rather than bubble-mediated air injection, as the cause of the increased flux. They were also unable to calculate transfer coefficients. Here we report simultaneous in situ observations from a vertical array of dissolved-gas sensors and a variety of other instruments during a single storm event. Our results confirm the importance of bubbles for the gas-transfer process. They also imply that existing transfer coefficients underestimate the transfer of weakly soluble gases during periods of bubble penetration.A History of Hypnotism. By Alan Gauld. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 738. £75, $140.THE classical superconducting quantum interference device (SQUID) is based on the Josephson effect^1, and usually consists of a macroscopic superconducting loop with two artificial weak links (Josephson junctions) through which the supercurrent passes by quantum-mechanical tunnelling. Fink et al .^2 proposed a new type of SQUID based on a homogeneous mesoscopic superconducting loop, in which interference between the supercurrents passing through the two halves of the ring results in a critical current that varies with the applied magnetic field in an oscillatory manner. Here we describe the experimental observation of these oscillations in a mesoscopic superconducting aluminum loop without artificial weak links. In this new type of quantum interferometer, 'weak-link' regions with a strongly reduced superconducting order parameter appear periodically at half-integer magnetic flux quanta owing to the interplay between the shielding and transport currents in the loop.ACCORDING to Milankovitch theory^1,2, the ice ages are related to variations of insolation in northern latitudes resulting from changes in the Earth's orbital and orientation parameters (precession, eccentricity and obliquity). Here we investigate the stability of the Earth's orientation for all possible values of the initial obliquity, by integrating the equations of precession of the Earth. We find a large chaotic zone which extends from 60° to 90° in obliquity. In its present state, the Earth avoids this chaotic zone and its obliquity is essentially stable, exhibiting only small variations of ± 1.3° around the mean value of 23.3°. But if the Moon were not present, the torque exerted on the Earth would be smaller, and the chaotic zone would then extend from nearly 0° up to about 85°. Thus, had the planet not acquired the Moon, large variations in obliquity resulting from its chaotic behaviour might have driven dramatic changes in climate. In this sense one might consider the Moon to act as a potential climate regulator for the Earth.DURING a survey of the southern sky for millisecond pulsars, we have discovered one with by far the greatest flux density of any known millisecond pulsar, often exceeding 1 Jy at 430 MHz. The dispersion measure (integrated electron density along the line of sight) is the smallest for any known pulsar. This object, PSR J0437–4715, may be the closest known pulsar, and is several times closer than any other known millisecond pulsar. Its rotation period is 5.75 ms, and it is in a 5.7-day circular orbit with a low-mass companion. The spin-down energy flux density is the third highest known, after the Crab and Vela pulsars. These properties make possible studies of the pulsar at radio wavelengths with unprecedented detail, and indicate that it should be possible to detect both the pulsar and its companion at optical and perhaps shorter wavelengths.Was light from the primaeval Sun the agent of the differentiation of the planets as we know them? The density was probably too great for ordinary radiation pressure to suffice, but there are ways around that difficulty.Britain is a glutton for the reorganization of its research enterprise. There have been two major upheavals in the past 30 years, in the early 1960s and in 1972. Soon there will be a third.Numerical study of the global stability of the spin-axis orientation (obliquity) of the planets against secular orbital perturbations shows that all of the terrestrial planets could have experienced large, chaotic variations in obliquity at some time in the past. The obliquity of Mars is still in a large chaotic region, ranging from 0° to 60°. Mercury and Venus have been stabilized by tidal dissipation, and the Earth may have been stabilized by capture of the Moon. None of the obliquities of the terrestrial planets can therefore be considered as primordial.Parsimony analysis is a powerful tool for the study of biological evolution. It is used to construct phylogenetic trees, to evaluate alternative hypotheses objectively, and to study evolutionary pattern and process. Yet, as comparative data sets expand, the pitfalls of parsimony analysis are catching experts and novices alike.Archaeology: The Science of Once and Future Things. By Brian Hayden. W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 484. $23.95, £18.95 (pbk).The Third Man: The Life and Times of William Murdoch 1754–1839, the Inventor of Gas Lighting. By John Griffiths. Andre Deutsch: 1992. Pp. 373. £20.The Janus Faces of Genius: The Role of Alchemy in Newton's Thought. By B. J. T. Dobbs. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 359. £30, $47.95.The British government's call for advice on science policy raises the question of what government's role should be.Making a splash this week — a technical presentation graphics package, a plasmid drawing program, a troubleshooting program for HPLC, molecular modelling software and data acquisition products.NUCLEAR pre-messenger RNA splicing requires the action of five small nuclear (sn) RNAs, Ul, U2, U4, US and U6, and more than 50 proteins^1,2. The mechanistic similarity of nuclear pre-mRNA splicing and group II self-splicing suggests that many of the central processes of nuclear pre-mRNA splicing are based on RNA–RNA interactions^3,4. To understand the mechanism of pre-mRNA splicing, the interactions, and their temporal relationships, that occur between the snRNAs and the pre-mRNA during splicing must be identified. Several snRNA–snRNA^5–9 and snRNA–intron^9–12 interactions have been demonstrated but the putative RNA-based interactions that recognize the AG dinucleotide at the 3′ splice site during 3′ cleavage and exon ligation are unknown. We report here the reciprocal suppression between 5′ and 3′ splice site mutations in the yeast actin intron, and propose that the 3′ splice site is positioned for 3′ cleavage and exon ligation, at least in part, through a non-Watson–Crick interaction between the guanosines at the 5′ and 3′ splice sites.THE dihydroxylated form of vitamin D_3 (l,25-dihydroxy-D_3) mediates a biological response by binding to intracellular receptors^1–4 which belong to the steroid receptor superfamily^5. These receptors act as ligand-dependent transcription factors that bind to specific DNA sequences (reviewed in refs 6–9). We have identified two classes of vitamin D response elements that are activated either by the vitamin D receptor (VDR) alone or by heterodimers of VDR and the retinoid-X receptor- α (RXR- α )^10. The motif GGGTGA arranged as a direct repeat with a spacing of six nucleotides or as a palindrome without spacing, or as an inverted palindrome with a 12-nucleotide spacing, confers vitamin D inducibility mediated by VDR alone. A second class of response elements, composed of directly repeated pairs of motifs (GGTCCA, AGGTCA, or GGGTGA) spaced by three nucleotides, is synergistically activated by RXR and VDR, but only in the presence of both ligands. Thus, the RXR ligand and the nature of the response element determine whether a nuclear receptor is co-regulated by RXR.CLASSICAL genetic studies on the human malaria parasite Plasmodium falciparum have been hampered by a complex life cycle which alternates between vertebrate and invertebrate hosts. Consequently, only a few genetic crosses have been performed so far^1–4. In addition, molecular genetics has provided only limited access to the genes of this pathogen, a consequence of an unusually high A + T content^5,6. To overcome these limitations we have constructed an ordered telomere-to-telomere contig map of P. falciparum chromosome 2 by isolating overlapping yeast artificial chromosome clones. This approach was used to examine the strain-dependent polymorphisms commonly observed for P. falciparum chromosomes^7,8. Our analysis reveals that polymorphisms of chromosome 2 are restricted to regions at either end, representing 20% of the chromosome. Transcription mapping of the entire chromosome suggests a compartmentalization of chromosome 2 into a transcribed central domain and silent polymorphic ends.WILD-TYPE reverse transcriptase has evolved for the survival of human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) by natural selection^1. In contrast, therapy relying on inhibitors of reverse transcriptase by nucleosides like zidovudine (AZT) or dideoxyinosine (ddl), and by non-nucleosides like pyridinones or nevirapine^2–6, may exert different selection pressures on this enzyme. Therefore the acquisition of resistance to reverse transcriptase inhibitors by selection of mutations in the pol gene^7–15 may require compromises in enzyme function that affect viral replication. As single mutations are unlikely to confer broad resistance when combinations of reverse transcriptase inhibitors are used, multiple mutations may occur that result in further compromises. Certain drug combinations may prevent the co-existence of adequate reverse transcription function and multi-drug resistance (MDR). Unlike bacterial or eukaryotic drug resistance, retroviral drug resistance is conferred only by mutations in its own genome^16 and is limited by genome size. Combining drugs directed against the same essential viral protein may thus prevent HIV-1 MDR, whereas the conventional approach of targeting different HIV-1 proteins for combination therapy may not, because genomes with resistance mutations in different HIV-1 genes might recombine to develop MDR^17. Here we show that several mutations in the HIV-1 reverse transcriptase gene that confer resistance to inhibitors of this enzyme can attenuate viral replication. We tested whether combinations of mutations giving rise to single-agent resistance might further compromise or even abolish viral replication, and if multidrug-resistant viruses could be constructed. Certain combinations of mutations conferring resistance to AZT, ddl and pyridinone are incompatible with viral replication. These results indicate that evolutionary limitations exist to restrict development of MDR. Furthermore, a therapeutic strategy exploiting these limitations by using selected multidrug regimens directed against the same target may prevent development of MDR. This approach, which we call convergent combination therapy, eliminated HIV-1 replication and virus breakthrough in vitro , and may be applicable to other viral targets. Moreover, elimination of reverse transcription by convergent combination therapy may also limit MDR.DUCHENNE progressive muscular dystrophy is a lethal and common X-linked genetic disease^1 caused by the absence of dystrophin^2,3, a 427K protein encoded by a 14 kilobase transcript^4. Two approaches have been proposed to correct the dystrophin deficiency in muscle. The first, myoblast transfer therapy, uses cells from normal donors^5–7, whereas the second involves direct intramuscular injection of recombinant plasmids expressing dystrophin^8. Adenovirus is an efficient vector for in vivo expression of various foreign genes^9–13. It has recently been demonstrated that a recombinant adenovirus expressing the lac-Z reporter gene can infect stably many mouse tissues, particularly muscle and heart^12,13. We have tested the ability of a recombinant adenovirus, containing a 6.3 kilobase pair Becker-like dystrophin complementary DNA^14 driven by the Rous sarcoma virus promoter to direct the expression of a 'minidystrophin' in infected 293 cells and C2 myoblasts, and in the mdx mouse^15,16, after intramuscular injection. We report here that in vivo , we have obtained a sarcolemmal immunostaining in up to 50% of fibres of the injected muscle.LIGAND-BINDING assays are used for determination of minute amounts of substances in the bloodstream. Such assays require a receptor that specifically binds the substance of interest. The receptor used is often an antibody^1–5, but antibodies require special handling and a costly production procedure^5. We have used molecular imprinting, a method for creating selective recognition sites in synthetic polymers^6–8, to prepare polymers that mimic antibody combining sites. Molecular imprints made against theophylline^9 and diazepam^10 showed strong binding and cross-reactivity profiles similar to those of antibodies. Here we describe a new radiolabelled ligand-binding assay, the molecularly im-printed sorbent assay, which uses antibody mimics. This assay accurately measures drug levels in human serum, with results comparable to those obtained using a well established immunoassay technique. Antibody mimics, which are stable and readily prepared by molecular imprinting, may provide a useful general alternative to antibodies.CLASS I molecules of the major histocompatibility complex (MHC) transport peptides to the cell surface for surveillance by T cells^1. Ligand specificity is stringent and differs from allele to allele^2–4. Here we report analysis of natural ligands of 'unconventional' glycophosphatidyl-anchored mouse class I molecules, Qa-2. The function of these molecules is unclear^5–6; they can serve as recognition structures for 'unrestricted' cytotoxic T cells but have not been found to present peptides to T cells, although the DNA sequence suggests a similar peptide binding groove to that of 'conventional' class I molecules^7, and other unconventional class I molecules can present antigens in a few cases^8–10. Pool sequencing of natural Qa-2 ligands shows that Qa-2 molecules are indeed peptide receptors, having ligand specificity similar to that of conventional class I molecules, that is, a predominant length of nine amino acids, anchor positions, and hydrophobic termination of peptides. But ligand specificity is much more stringent than with other class I molecules: of the nine positions, two are anchors and four have rather limited occupancy.The Proterozoic Biosphere: A Multidisciplinary Study. Edited by J. William Schopf and Cornelis Klein. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 1,348. £105, $195.GLUTAMATE-GATED ion channels mediate most excitatory synaptic transmission in the central nervous system and play crucial roles in synaptic plasticity, neuronal development and some neuropathological conditions^1–3. These ionotropic glutamate receptors have been classified according to their preferred agonists as NMDA ( N -methyl-D-aspartate), AMPA ( α -amino-3-hydroxy-5-methyl-4-isoxazole propionate) and KA (kainate) receptors^4. On the basis of sequence similarity and pharmacological properties, the recently cloned glutamate receptor subunits have been assigned as components of NMDA (NMDAR1, 2A–D), AMPA (GluRl–4) and KA (GluR5–7, KA1, KA2) receptors^5–7. Protein phosphorylation of glutamate receptors by protein kinase C and cyclic AMP-dependent protein kinase (PKA) has been suggested to regulate their function^8–18, possibly playing a prominent role in certain forms of synaptic plasticity such as long-term potentiation^19 and long-term depression^9. Here we report that the GluR6 glutamate receptor, transiently expressed in mammalian cells, is directly phosphorylated by PKA, and that intracellularly applied PKA increases the amplitude of the glutamate response. Site-specific mutagenesis of the serine residue (Ser 684) representing a PKA consensus site completely eliminates PKA-mediated phosphorylation of this site as well as the potentiation of the glutamate response. These results provide evidence that direct phosphorylation of glutamate receptors modulates their function.MODULATION of transmitter release underlies several forms of learning-related synaptic plasticity, including presynaptic facilitation and long-term potentiation^1–4. Although the presynaptic terminals of most neurons are not accessible for direct study, it has often been possible to correlate changes in calcium influx in the cell body, owing to modulation of K^+ or Ca^2+ channels, with changes in release^5–7. Some forms of presynaptic plasticity, however, do not involve changes in Ca^2+ influx^8–12. Moreover, the presence of multiple types of K^+ and Ca^2+channels with different subcellular distributions makes the direct measurement of Ca^2+ influx into presynaptic terminals essential. Using synapses recon-stituted in culture between Aplysia sensory and motor neurons^13, we have imaged Ca^2+ influx in presynaptic terminal regions in response to action potentials, and demonstrate that presynaptic facilitation produced by 5-hydroxytryptamine involves enhanced Ca^2+ influx through dihydropyridine (DHP)-insensitive Ca^2+ channels^14 present near release sites. This increased influx is attributable to spike broadening and is significantly correlated with the magnitude of presynaptic facilitation. By contrast, DHP-sensitive channels appear to aid the recovery from depression due to high-frequency stimulation.NEURONS sensitive to both place and direction from distinct regions of the hippocampal formation^1–2, allometric relationships between spatial learning and hippocampal structure^3,4 and pronounced impairments in spatial learning after lesions in this area^5–8, indicate that the hippocampal formation subserves allocentric spatial learning^9,10. To learn more about the process of spatial representation, we have developed a task that provides independent control of both landmark and directional cues. On the basis of physiological^11 and behavioural^12 work, this task also makes it possible to investigate the relevance of associative learning principles, such as predictability^13, to the spatial domain. We report here that although rats learn to discriminate between landmarks on the basis of their proximity to a reliably predicted food reward, they will only learn to use them to represent its location if they maintain stable locations within a geometric frame of reference.Two problems limit the interpretation of recent experiments^1–3 supporting Darwin's^4 suggestion that female choice for ornate males may account for the evolution of long tails in birds. First, in some species tail elongation may have been favoured by natural rather than sexual selection. Second, it is unclear how female preferences for elaborate males have evolved, because current tests of competing models are often inconclusive^5–7. We have integrated aerodynamics theory with comparative data on sexual dimorphism in tail length to evaluate the flight costs of different forms of tail elongation. We report here that long tails with shallow forks are aerodynamically optimal, exhibit correspondingly low sexual dimorphism and may therefore have evolved under natural selection. Other long-tail types impair flight and show greater sexual dimorphism, but variation in their initial evolutionary cost suggests differences in how female preferences for them may have evolved.THE Earth's core–mantle boundary (CMB) juxtaposes liquid iron and crystalline silicates, and is a region of large vertical thermal gradients. The D" region, which extends up to 200–300 km above the CMB, often has elevated shear-wave velocity and suggestions of lateral variations in structure^1. Recent improvements in our ability to assemble and analyse records from regional seismic networks have allowed us to examine long profiles of travel times, amplitudes and waveforms from more than a thousand short-period seismometers^2. We observe, across Canada and the United States, P waves that have grazed the CMB from the powerful nuclear test in Lop Nor, China, on 21 May 1992. First-arrival travel times and large secondary arrivals are consistent with a 1.5% compressional velocity increase with depth ∼ 130 km above the CMB—about half the thickness of D" in this locality^3. Our observations, together with evidence for the absence of such a thin, fast layer in neighbouring regions, suggest the presence of lateral heterogeneity in composition or phase at the base of the mantle.IT is widely understood that the collapse of the West Antarctic ice sheet (WAIS) would cause a global sea level rise of 6 m, yet there continues to be considerable debate about the detailed response of this ice sheet to climate change^l–3. Because its bed is grounded well below sea level, the stability of the WAIS may depend on geologically controlled conditions at the base which are independent of climate. In particular, heat supplied to the base of the ice sheet could increase basal melting and thereby trigger ice streaming, by providing the water for a lubricating basal layer of till on which ice streams are thought to slide^4,5. Ice streams act to protect the reservoir of slowly moving inland ice from exposure to oceanic degradation, thus enhancing ice-sheet stability. Here we present aerogeophysical evidence for active volcanism and associated elevated heat flow beneath the WAIS near the critical region where ice streaming begins. If this heat flow is indeed controlling ice-stream formation, then penetration of ocean waters inland of the thin hot crust of the active portion of the West Antarctic rift system could lead to the disappearance of ice streams, and possibly trigger a collapse of the inland ice reservoir.MODEL simulations suggest that at equilibrium, global warming driven by higher atmospheric concentrations of greenhouse gases will lead to increased terrestrial carbon storage^1,2, implying a negative feedback between the global vegetation/soil system and the atmospheric CO_2 concentration. But changes in vegetation and soil type that result in a net release of CO_2 to the atmosphere (such as those caused by wildfires) could be more rapid than changes that result in a net increase in terrestrial carbon storage (such as species immigration and soil formation), so that in its transient response to climate change, the terrestrial vegetation/soil system could be a net source of carbon to the atmosphere. Here we use two general circulation models^3,4 to estimate the transient response of the terrestrial surface to a step doubling of atmospheric CO_2. We find that vegetation and soil changes could prove to be a significant source of CO_2 in the first 50–100 years following a climate warming, increasing the atmospheric CO_2 concentration by up to a third of the present level.ARCTIC tundra has been a net sink for carbon dioxide during historic and recent geological times^1–4, and large amounts of carbon are stored in the soils of northern ecosystems. Many regions of the Arctic are warmer now than they have been in the past^5–10, and this warming may cause the soil to change from a carbon dioxide sink to a source by lowering the water table^11–12, thereby accelerating the rate of soil decomposition (CO_2 source)^3,13–15 so that this dominates over photosynthesis (CO2 sink). Here we present data indicating that the tundra on the North Slope of Alaska has indeed become a source of carbon dioxide to the atmosphere. This change coincides with recent warming in the Arctic, whether this is due to increases in greenhouse gas concentrations in the atmosphere or to some other cause. Our results suggest that tundra ecosystems may exert a positive feedback on atmospheric carbon dioxide and greenhouse warming.Physics has a more urgent responsibility than it appreciates to make the most general tool of its trade more widely understood, to which end proofs positive are more relevant than abstractions.What is it that defines an animal? The definition provided here, made on the basis of developmental biology, suggests methods for resolving phylogenetic problems.Frederica P. Perera, Kari Hemminki, Ewa Gryzbowska, Grazyna Motykiewicz, Jadwiga Michalska, Regina M. Santella, Tie-Lan Young, Christopher Dickey, Paul Brandt-Rauf, Immaculata DeVrvo, William Blaner, Wei-Yann Tsai & Mieczyslaw Chorazy Nature 360, 256-258 (1992) IN Table 1 on page 257, the P values for the comparisons of PAH-DNA adducts between the 'Exposed winter' (EW) to 'Control summer' (CS) and 'Exposed summer' (ES) to CS are reversed.LAKE Malawi in East Africa harbours 500–1,000 endemic species of cichlid fishes, all presumably derived by adaptive radiation from a single founding population within the past two million years^1–3. The species of this 'flock' differ strikingly in their ecology and behaviour^4, moderately in their external morphology^1 and very little in their molecular characteristics^5,6. Here we describe high sequence variability of class II major histocompatibility complex genes in a sample of species from Lake Malawi. The variability provides a set of molecular markers for studying adaptive radiation and should be useful for estimating the size of the population that founded the species flock.GROWTH cones in developing nervous systems encounter a sequence of extracellular cues during migration^1,2. In theory, a growth cone can navigate by selectively expressing or activating surface receptor(s) that recognize extracellular cues appropriate to each migratory phase. Using the simple Caenorhabditis elegans nervous system, we attempted to demonstrate that path selection by migrating growth cones can be predictably altered by ectopic expression of a single receptor. The unc-5 gene of C. elegans encodes a unique receptor of the immunoglobulin superfamily (UNC-5), required cell-autonomously to guide growth cone and mesodermal cell migrations in a dorsal direction on the epidermis^3,4. We report here that the UNC-5 receptor induces dorsally oriented axon trajectories when ectopically expressed in the touch receptor neurons which normally extend pioneer axons longitudinally or ventrally on the epidermis^5. These errant trajectories depend on unc-6 , which encodes a putative epidermal path cue^6, just as normal dorsally oriented axon trajectories do (such as those of certain motor neurons^4), suggesting that UNC-5 acts to reorient the touch cell growth cones by using its normal guidance mechanisms. These results support previous evidence that UNC-5 and UNC-6 play instructive rules in guiding growth cone migrations on the epidermis in C. elegans ^4) and indicate that pioneering growth cones, which normally migrate in different directions, may use equivalent intracellular signalling mechanisms for guidance.THE discussion of candidate source craters for the catastrophic impact that occurred at the boundary between the Cretaceous and Tertiary periods (K/T boundary) has recently centred on two buried craters: the Chicxulub in Mexico (>200 km diameter) and the Manson in Iowa (∼35 km diameter), both of which have ^40Ar–^39Ar ages of 65 Myr, indistinguishable from that of impact glass spherules found in K/T boundary sediments^1–4. Here we report the strontium, neodymium and oxygen isotopic compositions of core samples of impact melt rock recovered from drill holes into both the Chicxulub and Manson craters, and compare these with previously published isotopic data for impact glasses from the K/T boundary of the Beloc Formation in Haiti^5–7. The Chicxulub melt rocks are isotopically indistinguishable from the K/T impact glass, strongly supporting the proposition that Chicxulub is a source crater for the K/T catastrophe. The Manson melt rocks, by contrast, have a clearly different isotopic composition, strongly suggesting that they are unrelated to the K/T impact spherules.BOTH the marine sediment record and numerical modelling of the atmospheric summer circulation over the northern Indian Ocean and southeast Asia have shown that the monsoonal climate exhibits a direct but nonlinear response to the intensity of solar insolation during summer, with a time lag of several thousand years^1,2. Here we present evidence from a high-resolution record of oxygen isotopes and carbonate spanning the past 24,000 calendar years that the response of the southwest monsoon over the Arabian Sea to long-term, gradual insolation changes occurred in several distinct events of less than 300 years duration, at 14,300, 13,500, 13,060, 9,900, 8,800 and 7,300^14C yr BP . Thus, during this transitional period from glacial to post-glacial conditions the slow solar forcing seems to have induced very rapid changes in local climate. We speculate that the rapid response may be related to albedo changes in Asia.A new tectonic model, postulating the growth of giant subduction-accretion complexes along a single magmatic arc now found contorted between Siberia and Baltica, shows that Asia grew by 5.3 million square kilometres during the Palaeozoic era. Half of this growth may have occurred by the addition of juvenile crust newly extracted from the mantle, supporting models of considerable continental growth continuing throughout the Phanerozoic eon.Evolution and the Recognition Concept of Species: Collected Writings of Hugh E. H. Paterson. Edited by Shane F. McEvey. Johns Hopkins University Press: 1993. Pp. 234. $32.95, £24.50.Superconductivity: The Next Revolution?. By Gianfrance Vidali. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 165. £25, $49.95 (hbk); £9.95, $16.95 (pbk).The Elusive Transformation: Science, Technology, and the Evolution of International Politics. By Eugene B. Skolnikoff. Princeton University Press: 1993. Pp. 322. $39.50, £30.00.The Advancement of Science. By Philip Kitcher. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 493. $39.95, £30.WE failed to recognize the following typographical error in the proofs of this research article. In Table 1, page 211, the unit cell constant for the b axis of the recombinant crystal form should have been 88.3 A instead of 38.3 A. A statement in Fig. 4 should read that Lys 199 and His 242 are located at the 'top1 of Fig.THE oxygen isotope (δ^18O) composition of foraminiferal tests from deep-sea sediments is widely used as a palaeoclimate proxy, but it includes contributions from sea surface temperature, global ice volume and local salinity, which are difficult to separate. Recently a new technique for deriving palaeotemperatures has been developed which is based on the abundance ratios of unsaturated alkenones in phytoplankton algae^1,2. Here we use a combination of oxygen isotope and alkenone records in a deep-sea core from the juncture of the Arabian Sea and the Bay of Bengal to extract the salinity signal from the former record. Variations in salinity are related to the balance between evaporation and precipitation^3, and are thus a sensitive indicator of climate change. Our 170-kyr salinity record enables us to reconstruct changes in the Indian monsoon over this period, considerably extending earlier studies (which reached back to 18 kyr ago)^4–8. Like these previous studies, we find that large variations in the monsoon occurred during the transition from the last glacial period to the present interglacial, but our results also provide a view of the monsoon throughout the last glacial and demonstrate the potential of this approach for reconstructing palaeosalinity.THE foaminess of ocean waves, relative to fresh water, has long been attributed to the effect of salts in reducing bubble coalescence^9. This phenomenon is exploited in extraction processes using froth flotation^1, in which the extraction efficiency increases as the bubble size gets smaller. But whereas the bubble-stabilizing effect of surfactants is well understood, the effect of salts is not; the fact that salts decrease the surface tension of water and that they are desorbed from the air–water interface would, if anything, be expected to destabilize bubbles. Here we report the results of experiments conducted to study the stabilization of bubbles by salts. We find that bubble coalescence is inhibited by some salts whereas others have no effect and that this inhibition occurs only upon the 'matching' of a two-valued empirical property assigned to each anion and cation. We believe these observations can be explained only by the local influence of the ions on water structure, possibly in a way related to the hydrophobic interaction^2–8.THE search for new copper oxide superconductors^1 has been pursued mainly by exploring a range of chemical compositions (counter-cations and oxygen content) and reaction temperatures. We have explored the effects of an additional variable, the reaction pressure, and have thereby synthesized some new compounds, including (Ca_1- y Sr_ y )_1- x CuO_2 which shows superconductivity at 110 K (refs 2, 3). Here we report the synthesis of a new family of high-pressure phases with the formula Sr_ n +1Cu_ n O_ 2n+1+δ ( n = 1, 2, 3,...) extending from Sr_2CuO_3.1, ( n = 1) to SrCuO_2 ( n = ∞ )^4. Sr_2CuO_3.1 and Sr_3Cu_2O_5+ δ′ ( n =2) are superconductors with transition temperatures ( T _ c ) of 70 and 100K, respectively. The metal sublattice of Sr_2CuO_3.1, is of the tetragonal K_2NiF_4 (or Nd_2CuO_4) type with lattice constants a = 3.764 Å and c-12.548 A, and iodometric measurements suggest that nearly half of the oxygen atoms are missing from the counter-layers to Sr_2O_1.1. Homogeneous pyramidal or the oxygen atoms are missing from the counter-layers to Sr_2O_1.1. Homogeneous pyramidal or octahedral coordination, which has generally been believed to be indispensable to attain T _ c s of ∼100 K, is thus absent. The n = 2 and 3 members seem to correspond to the high-pressure phases in the Ca–Sr–Cu–O system recently reported by Adachi et al .^5.MODELLING the structure and kinematics of spiral galaxies requires accurate maps of the mass-tracing stellar population. But this has hitherto been difficult because of dust obscuration and the presence of luminous young stars. To minimize the effects of dust and maximize sensitivity to the dominant stellar population, we have obtained K-band (2.2-μm) images of the nearby 'grand-design' spiral galaxy NGC5194 (M51). Our observations reveal remarkable dynamical structures not visible in conventional optical images. We find that the spiral arms extend significantly further towards the galaxy's centre than previously observed and can be traced continuously through almost three revolutions — roughly twice as far as with optical images. The coherence of the arms over this large radial range challenges current theories of spiral structure. We suggest that a combination of several mechanisms, such as the interaction of M51 with the neighbouring galaxy NGC5195, forcing by the central 'bar', or distortions from density waves, is required to generate the observed structure.This week's excitement over a report suggesting a genetic basis for homosexuality has been overdone, suggesting that there is a long way to go before public understanding is enlightened.In higher eukaryotes, the Ras and Raf-1 proto-oncoproteins transduce growth and differentiation signals initiated by tyrosine kinases. The Ras polypeptide and the amino-terminal regulatory domain of Raf-1(residues 1–257) are shown to interact, directly in vitro and in a yeast expression system. Raf-1(1-257) binds GTP-Ras in preference to GDP-Ras, and inhibits Ras-GAP activity. Mutations in and around the Ras effector domain impair Ras binding to Raf-1(1-257) and Ras transforming activity in parallel.Since 1980, volcanologists have confronted more volcanic crises than any time since the Mont Pelee catastrophe in 1902. Good science alone will not do the job of reducing volcano risk.WE have noted an error in our numbering of amino acids in this letter. The valine in transmembrane domain VI that confers antagonist affinity to the human receptor was erroneously numbered as 319. The correct numbering should be human valine 349. In addition, the numbering of three of the canine mutants shown in Fig.Among this week's tools for separation – a modular capillary electrophoresis system with in-built autosampler, chromatography data systems, and columns for chiral separations and the separation.IN Fig. 2b of this article, the sizing of DNA fragments was incorrect. The corrected sizes are shown below, together with the appropriately amended section of the legend to Fig. 2<.Section D (which represents the 5' end of the atk cDNA sequence) detected 0.7, 1.7, 1.8, 2.5 and 6.2 kb Mspl fragments in normal gen-omic DNA; in patient E, no 6.LIKE nuclear premessenger introns, group II self-splicing introns are excised from primary transcripts as branched molecules, containing a 2′–5′ phosphodiester bond. For this reason, it is widely believed that the ribozyme (catalytic RNA) core of group II introns, or some evolutionarily related molecule, gave rise to the RNA components of the spliceosomal splicing machinery of the eukaryotic nucleus^1. One difficulty with this hypothesis has been the restricted distribution of group II introns. Unlike group I self-splicing introns, which interrupt not only organelle primary transcripts, but also some bacterial and nuclear genes^2–5, group II introns seemed to be confined to mitochondrial and chloroplast genomes (reviewed in ref. 6). We now report the discovery of group II introns both in cyanobacteria (the ancestors of chloroplasts^7) and the γ subdivision of purple bacteria, or proteobacteria^8, whose α subdivision probably gave rise to mitochondria^9. At least one of these introns actually self-splices in vitro .THE turns joining segments of secondary structure have been proposed to be key elements in dictating the folded structures of native proteins^1–9. An alternative view assumes that turns play a passive role and are merely default structures that occur as a consequence of interactions between antiparallel segments of secondary structure, with chain reversal being dictated by the context surrounding the turn and not by the sequence of the turn itself^10,11. The solvent-exposure of turns and their tolerance to evolutionary variance suggests that they may have little or no effect on the formation of native structures. Previous investigations have focused on various types of β-turns that connect antiparallel (β-strands^1–3,12,13, with comparatively little reported on the structural role of interhelical turns. Here we probe the structural importance of such a turn in an antiparallel 4-helix bundle by randomly substituting an interhelical tripeptide in cytochrome b-562 with many different amino-acid sequences. Thirty-one of the resulting substituted proteins were characterized and all of them were shown to fold into stable, native-like structures. These results suggest that this interhelical turn does not does not play a dominant role in determining the folded structure of this antiparallel 4-helix bundle.THE Ras proteins are key regulators of the growth of eukaryotic cells, but their direct target enzymes, or 'effectors', are unknown^1. The protein encoded by the c- raf-1 proto-oncogene is thought to function downstream of p21^ras because disruption of Raf blocks signalling by Ras in a number of systems^2–5. Here we report that the amino-terminal cysteine-rich regulatory region of p74 c-raf-1 expressed as a glutathione-S-transferase (GST) fusion protein binds directly to Ras with relatively high affinity (50 nM). The binding is strictly dependent on the Ras protein being in the active GTP-bound conformation rather than the inactive GDP-bound state. Raf–GST interacts with wild-type and oncogenic Ras (Val 12) but fails to interact with a biologically inert effector mutant of Ras (Ala 38) and a dominant negative mutant (Asn 17). A peptide based on the effector region of Ras inhibits the interaction. Raf–GST acts as a potent competitive inhibitor of the GTPase-activating proteins p120^GAPand neurofibromin. In addition, Raf itself displays weak GTPase-stimulating activity towards Ras. It is therefore likely that Raf is a direct effector of Ras.FIGURE 1c in this letter shows a comparison of amino-acid sequences for exon 2 of SOD-1, but incorrectly positions the residue numbers and the mutations on the sequences. The corrected panel is shown here.Also, in Table 3, the base-pair change for family 9967C should read GGC->CGC.INTRACELLULAR signalling from receptor tyrosine kinases in mammalian cells involves the activation of a signal cascade which includes p21^ ras and the protein kinases p74^ raf-1 , MAP kinase kinase and MAP kinases^1–8. In the yeasts Schizosaccharomyces pombe and Saccharomyces cerevisiae the response to mating pheromones requires the Spkl and KSS1/FUS3 kinases, which have sequence homology to vertebrate MAP kinases^9–12. The recent cloning of complementary DNAs for mammalian^13–15 and frog^16 MAP kinase kinases has shown that they are homologous to the S. pombe Byr1 (ref. 17) and S. cerevisiae STE7 (ref. 18) kinases, which have been proposed to function upstream of Spk1 and KSS1/FUS3, respectively^19–22. We have investigated whether these apparently similar kinase pathways are functionally conserved between vertebrates and S. pombe . We report here that expression of mammalian MAP kinase kinase alone fails to complement a byr1 mutant of S. pombe . When coexpressed with Raf kinase, however, MAP kinase kinase is activated by phosphorylation and the mating defect of the byr1 mutant is rescued. This suggests that the pathways are functionally homologous and that Raf kinase may directly phosphorylate and activate MAP kinase kinase.TETANUS toxin inhibits neurotransmitter release by selectively blocking fusion of synaptic vesicles^1,2. Recently tetanus toxin was shown to proteolytically degrade synaptobrevin II (also named VAMP-2), a synaptic vesicle-specific protein^3,4, in vitro and in nerve terminals^5,6. As targets of tetanus toxin, synaptobrevins probably function in the exocytotic fusion of synaptic vesicles. Here we describe a new synaptobrevin homologue, cellubrevin, that is present in all cells and tissues tested and demonstrate that it is a membrane trafficking protein of a constitutively recycling pathway. Like synaptobrevin II, cellubrevin is proteolysed by tetanus toxin light chain in vitro and after transfection. Our results suggest that constitutive and regulated vesicular pathways use homologous proteins for membrane trafficking, probably for membrane fusion at the plasma membrane, indicating a greater mechanistic and evolutionary similarity between these pathways than previously thought.MACROPHAGES interact with other cells and components of the extracellular environment by means of adhesion receptors^1,2. Adhesion to artificial substrata in vitro facilitates isolation of macrophages^3, and has been used to generate antibodies that inhibit their migration in vivo ^4,5. Unlike other cell types, macrophages attach to tissue culture plastic in the absence of divalent cations. Here we use an adhesion assay exploiting this property to isolate a rat monoclonal antibody, 2F8, which totally inhibits divalent cation-independent adhesion of murine macrophages to tissue culture plastic in the presence of fetal calf serum. Immunoprecipitation from macrophages and stably transfected Chinese hamster ovary cells revealed that the antigen recognized by monoclonal 2F8 is identical to murine macrophage scavenger receptor^6,7. We propose a novel function for this molecule, previously described as an endocytic receptor, thus providing a mechanism for mononuclear phagocyte recruitment to and retention in ligand-rich tissues such as in atherosclerotic lesions.VASOPRESSIN is a peptide hormone synthesized by neurons of the supraoptic and paraventricular nuclei, which project axon terminals to the neurohypophysis. Consistent with its antidiuretic properties, vasopressin release rises as a function of plasma osmolality^1–3, a response that results from accelerated action potential discharge^4–6. Previous studies have shown that increases in fluid osmolality depolarize supraoptic neurons in the absence of synaptic transmission^7–9, suggesting that these cells behave as intrinsic osmoreceptors. The mechanism by which changes in osmolality are transduced into an electrical signal is unknown, however. Here we report that changes in cell volume accompany physiological variations in fluid osmolality and that these modulate the activity of mechanosensitive cation channels in a way that is consistent with the macroscopic regulation of membrane voltage and action potential discharge. These findings define a function for stretch-inactivated channels in mammalian central neurons.THE mushroom bodies in the protocerebrum are believed to be the structures of the insect brain most closely associated with higher-order sensory integration and learning^1. Drosophila melanogaster mutants with olfactory learning deficits have anatomically abnormal mushroom bodies or altered patterns of gene expression in mushroom body neurons^2–4. In addition, anatomical reorganization of the mushroom bodies occurs in adult flies^5, and possibly in adult honeybees^6,7; disturbance of electrical activity in this region disrupts memory formation in honeybees^8. Little is known, however, about the relationship of naturally occurring anatomical changes in the mushroom bodies to naturally occurring behavioural plasticity. We now report that age-based division of labour in adult worker honeybees ( Apis mellifera ) is associated with substantial changes in certain brain regions, notably the mushroom bodies. Moreover, these striking changes in brain structure are dependent, not on the age of the bee, but on its foraging experience, thus demonstrating a robust anatomical plasticity associated with complex behaviour in an adult insect.The Most Solitary of Afflictions: Madness and Society in Britain, 1700–1900. By Andrew Scull. Yale University Press: 1993. Pp. 448. $45, £29.95.DISORDERS in perceiving and exploring the visual space contra-lateral to a brain lesion have been frequently described. Many patients with hemi-neglect for extrapersonal space also show neglect in a representational domain when the task requires imagining a well-known piazza from a given vantage point^1,2 or comparing two visual images^3–5. Cognitive^6 and psychophysiological^7 studies show a functional parallelism between the perceptual and imaginative domain^7, indicating that spatial perception and imagery share the same neural substrata. Here we describe a patient with a persistent disorder in visual imagery for familiar piazzas in the absence of any neglect for stimuli located in a far^8 or near^9 space or on his own body^10. Contrary to previous cases involving imagery disorders, computerized tomography scans showed a lesion confined to the right frontal lobe, suggesting the role of the frontal lobe in some specific types of mental imagery.THE four-year cycle of microtine rodents in boreal and arctic regions was first described in 1924 (ref. 1). Competing hypotheses on the mechanisms underlying the small mammal cycle have been extensively tested^2–5, but so far the sustained rodent oscillations are unexplained. Here we use two mutually supportive approaches to investigate this question. First, building on studies of the interaction between rodents and their mustelid predators^6–9, we construct a predator–prey model with seasonality. Second, we use a new technique of nonlinear analysis^10,11 to examine empirical time-series data, and compare them with the model dynamics. The model parameterized with field data predicts dynamics that closely resemble the observed dynamics of boreal rodent populations. Both the predicted and observed dynamics are chaotic, albeit with a statistically significant periodic component. Our results suggest that the multiannual oscillations of rodent populations in Fennoscandia are due to delayed density dependence imposed by mustelid predators, and are chaotic.IN the mid-1970s, theoretical ecologists were responsible for stimulating interest in nonlinear dynamics and chaos^1–3. Ironically, the importance of chaos in ecology itself remains controversial^4–17. Proponents of ecological chaos point to its ubiquity in mathematical models and to various empirical findings^15,16,18. Sceptics^12,19,20 maintain that the models are unrealistic and that the experimental evidence is equally consistent with stochastic models. More generally, it has been argued^9,11,21,23 that interdemic selection and/or enhanced rates of species extinction will eliminate populations and species that evolve into chaotic regions of parameter space. Fundamental to this opinion is the belief^24,25 that violent oscillations and low minimum population densities are inevitable correlates of the chaotic state. In fact, rarity is not a necessary consequence of complex dynamical behaviour^26,27. But even when chaos is associated with frequent rarity, its consequences to survival are necessarily deleterious only in the case of species composed of a single population. Of course, the majority of real world species (for example, most insects) consist of multiple populations weakly coupled by migration, and in this circumstance chaos can actually reduce the probability of extinction. Here we show that although low densities lead to more frequent extinction at the local level^28, the decorrelating effect of chaotic oscillations reduces the degree of synchrony among populations and thus the likelihood that all are simultaneously extinguished.THERMAL convection in the mantle is the most important dynamic process in the Earth's interior. Two quite different approaches are currently used to provide and analyse information regarding lateral temperature variations in the upper mantle. On the one hand, the major-element chemistry of basalts erupted at mid-ocean ridges is directly influenced by the temperature of the mantle beneath^1–5; on the other, seismic velocity studies^6–17 can be used to map lateral temperature variations on a global scale (lower seismic velocities corresponding to higher mantle temperatures). Here we make a first attempt at relating these two approaches, by examining the global co-variation between mid-ocean-ridge basalt chemistry and upper-mantle shear-wave velocity. We find a strong correlation between basalt chemistry and variations in seismic velocity at depths of 100–170 km and lateral scale-lengths of 1,000–2,400 km, supporting a common thermal origin for the two types of signal. The departure of a few points from the general correlation may either reflect locally poor resolution of the tomographic model or, more interestingly, point to real anomalies that will repay closer examination.CHEMICAL weathering today is generally assumed to occur primarily in soils^1,2. The rise of vascular plants during the Silurian and Devonian periods about 400 Myr ago brought about an increase in soil microbial activity and thus in soil CO_2 generation, and it has therefore been widely believed that, as a result of these changes, soil CO_2 replaced atmospheric CO_2 as the primary agent of chemical weathering^3–6. Here we show that the aerated region above the water table (the vadose zone) exerts a strong influence on the CO_2 concentration to which runoff is exposed as it percolates beneath the soil, and we argue that this could have been the case before the Silurian. We present calculations which show that, for present-day atmospheric CO_2 concentrations, a low level of microbial respiration may be sufficient to support appreciable CO_2 concentrations in the vadose zone because of the slow rate of CO_2 loss to the surface. Despite the small amount of microbial respiration in pre-Silurian soils, CO_2 concentrations in subsoil vadose zones might therefore have been sufficient to account for the apparent constancy of chemical weathering since the mid-Proterozoic^7, obviating the need to invoke high levels of atmospheric CO_2 to explain the weathering record.A NEW generation of phosphate-eliminating sewage treatment plants and the recent prohibition of phosphates in detergents have considerably reduced the concentrations of phosphate in surface waters^1. But there has been concern that replacing phosphate in detergents with complexing agents might cause increased mobilization of heavy metals, and consequent pollution of ground waters^2,3. Here we present a twelve-year analysis of phosphate, manganese and cadmium in the river Glatt, Switzerland, and in an adjacent aquifer which is infiltrated by the river water. Together with a reduction of phosphate concentrations in both river and ground water over the study period, we find lower ground water concentrations of manganese and cadmium. We postulate that lower phosphate levels have decreased the amount of oxidizable organic carbon in the river bed, and hence havecreated less reducing conditions in the infiltrating water. This in turn has resulted in decreased reductive dissolution of manganese and cadmium in the ground water. It thus appears that eliminating phosphate has led to an unexpected improvement in drinking water quality with respect to heavy metals.AI: The Tumultuous History of the Search for Artificial Intelligence. ByDaniel Crevier Basic Books: 1993. Pp. 386. $27.50.RECENT results^1,2 from two ice cores drilled in central Greenland have revealed large, abrupt climate changes of at least regional extent during the late stages of the last glaciation, suggesting that climate in the North Atlantic region is able to reorganize itself rapidly, perhaps even within a few decades. Here we present a detailed stable-isotope record for the full length of the Greenland Ice-core Project Summit ice core, extending over the past 250 kyr according to a calculated timescale. We find that climate instability was not confined to the last glaciation, but appears also to have been marked during the last interglacial (as explored more fully in a companion paper^3) and during the previous Saale–Holstein glacial cycle. This is in contrast with the extreme stability of the Holocene, suggesting that recent climate stability may be the exception rather than the rule. The last interglacial seems to have lasted longer than is implied by the deep-sea SPECMAP record^4, in agreement with other land-based observations^5,6. We suggest that climate instability in the early part of the last interglacial may have delayed the melting of the Saalean ice sheets in America and Eurasia, perhaps accounting for this discrepancy.SEVERAL studies have addressed the likely effects of CO_2-induced climate change over the coming decades^1–10, but the longer-term effects have received less attention. Yet these effects could be very significant, as persistent increases in global mean temperatures may ultimately influence the large-scale processes in the coupled ocean–atmosphere system that are thought to play a central part in determining global climate. The thermohaline circulation is one such process—Broecker has argued^11 that it may have undergone abrupt changes in response to rising temperatures and ice-sheet melting at the end of the last glacial period. Here we use a coupled ocean-atmosphere climate model to study the evolution of the world's climate over the next few centuries, driven by doubling and quadrupling of the concentration of atmospheric CO_2. We find that the global mean surface air temperature increases by about 3.5 and 7 °C, respectively, over 500 years, and that sea-level rise owing to thermal expansion alone is about 1 and 2 m respectively (ice-sheet melting could make these values much larger). The thermal and dynamical structure of the oceans changes markedly in the quadrupled-CO_2 climate—in particular, the ocean settles into a new stable state in which the thermohaline circulation has ceased entirely and the thermocline deepens substantially. These changes prevent the ventilation of the deep ocean and could have a profound impact on the carbon cycle and biogeochemistry of the coupled system.THE powerful emissions from the nuclei of active galaxies and quasars are thought to arise from the accretion of matter onto a massive black hole. Angular momentum will prevent matter from falling directly onto the central mass; instead, an 'accretion disk' should form, within which the gravitationally bound material will lose angular momentum and gradually spiral inwards. Accretion disks in active galactic nuclei have not hitherto been observed directly, but theoretical models1 suggest that they are comparable in size to the gravitational radius of the central black hole (about 10^13 cm) and are heated to high temperatures by the energy released from the accreting matter. Using the Planetary Camera on the Bubble Space Telescope, we have discovered an unexpectedly large (2 x 10^20 cm radius) disk of cool dust and gas surrounding a bright unresolved nucleus in theactive galaxy NGC4261. We suggest that the bright point corresponds to thermal emission from the hot disk favoured by theoreticians, and that this is fuelled by material flowing from the cool 'outer' accretion disk. The spin axis of the accretion disk appears to determine the direction of the galaxy's radio jets.DNA on Trial: Genetic Identification and Criminal Justice. Edited by Paul R. Billings. Cold Spring Harbor Laboratory Press: 1993 Pp. 154. $55.Before the Computer: IBM, NCR, Burroughs, and Remington Rand and the Industry They Created, 1865–1956. By James W. Cortada. Princeton University Press: 1993. Pp. 344. $55, £39.50.When the US National Institutes of Health get a new leader, important decisions will have to be made about funding strategies and research support if they are to continue as a paradigm of scientific excellence.Featured this week — antibody purification kits, a diode-array detector for liquid chromatography, software for chromatography applications, columns, media and a collection of catalogues for one-stop shopping.Work published over the past month provides insight into the mechanism of genomic imprinting in mice and the possible phenotypic consequences of imprinting in humans.The general enthusiasm for the fortieth anniversary of the structure of DNA should not blind us to a few blemishes on the otherwise fair face of molecular biology.One of President Bill Clinton's early decisions was to lift the ban on federally supported research on human fetal tissue. Under what circumstances can research on this material be justified?ACTIVATION of receptor tyrosine kinases such as those for epidermal growth factor (EGF), platelet-derived growth factor, or nerve growth factor converts the inactive, GDP-bound form of Ras to the active, GTP-bound form^1–4, and a dominant negative mutant of Ras interferes with signalling from such receptors^5–8. The mechanisms by which receptor tyrosine kinases and Ras are coupled, however, are not well understood. Many cytoplasmic proteins regulated by such receptors contain Src-homology (SH) 2 and 3 domains, and the SH2- and SH3-containing protein Grb2, like its homologue from Caenorhabditis elegans , Sem-5, appears to play an important role in the control of Ras by receptor tyrosine kinases^9–11. Here we show that overexpression of Grb2 potentiates the EGF-induced activation of Ras and mitogen-activated protein kinase by enhancing the rate of guanine nucleotide exchange on Ras. Cellular Grb2 appears to form a complex with a guanine-nucleotide-exchange factor for Ras, which binds to the ligand-activated EGF receptor, allowing the tyrosine kinase to modulate Ras activity.MANY of the actions of receptor tyrosine kinases are mediated by the protein Ras^1–5, including the activation of various downstream serine/threonine kinases and the stimulation of growth and differentiation^6–12. The human protein Grb2 binds to ligand-activated growth factor receptors and downstream effector proteins through its Src-homology (SH) domains SH2 and SH3, respectively^13,14, and like its homologue from Caenorhabditis elegans , Sem-5, apparently forms part of a highly conserved pathway by which these receptors can control Ras activity^15–18. Here we show that the SH3 domains of Grb2 bind to the carboxy-terminal part of hSos1, the human homologue of the Drosophila guanine-nucleotide-releasing factor for Ras, which is essential for control of Ras activity by epidermal growth factor receptor and sevenless^19,20. Moreover, a synthetic 10-amino-acid peptide containing the sequence PPVPPR specifically blocks the interaction. These results indicate that the Grbl/hSos1 complex couples activated EGF receptor to Ras signalling.MANY tyrosine kinases, including the receptors for hormones such as epidermal growth factor (EGF), nerve growth factor and insulin, transmit intracellular signals through Ras proteins^1–4. Ligand binding to such receptors stimulates Ras guanine-nucleotide-exchange activity^5–9 and increases the level of GTP-bound Ras^10–12, suggesting that these tyrosine kinases may activate a guanine-nucleotide releasing protein (GNRP). In Caenorhabditis elegans and Drosophila , genetic studies have shown that Ras activation by tyrosine kinases requires the protein Sem-5/drk, which contains a single Src-homology (SH) 2 domain and two flanking SH3 domains^13–15. Sem-5 is homologous to the mammalian protein Grb2, which binds the autophosphorylated EGF receptor and other phosphotyrosine-containing proteins such as Shc through its SH2 domain^16,17. Here we show that in rodent fibroblasts, the SH3 domains of Grb2 are bound to the proline-rich carboxy-terminal tail of mSos1, a protein homologous to Drosophila Sos. Sos is required for Ras signalling^18–20 and contains a central domain related to known Ras-GNRPs^21–23. EGF stimulation induces binding of the Grb2-mSos1 complex to the autophosphorylated EGF receptor, and mSos1 phosphorylation. Grb2 therefore appears to link tyrosine kinases to a Ras-GNRP in mammalian cells.The decline of a London insurance market is a warning and a threatened cost to everybody.Whenever the European enterprise takes another step forward, its leaders say there will be no change. The European Communities' research policy is just one illustration that such a doctrine does not make sense.TERMINAL differentiation and cell proliferation are in many cases, as in muscle cells^1, mutually exclusive processes. While differentiating myoblasts are withdrawn from the cell cycle^2, myogenesis is inhibited by some mitogens and overexpression of some oncogenes^3,4, including proto-oncogene c- fos ^5 (which expresses a growth-associated protein constituting the regulatory factor AP-1 in conjunction with c-Jun^6,7). MyoD, a muscle-specific transcription factor of the basic helix–loop–helix family^8,9, acts at both levels because it triggers a muscle differentiation programme in non-muscle cells^10–12, and induces a complete block of cell proliferation^13,14. Antagonistic interaction between MyoD and c-Jun has been demonstrated^15. We here show that c- fos expression greatly decreases upon muscle cell differentiation, concomitant with MyoD-induced activity. We have identified a MyoD-binding site overlapping with the serum-responsive element in the c- fos promoter. We demonstrate that MyoD can act as a negative regulator for c- fos transcription by blocking serum responsiveness through this binding site. These data suggest that the MyoD negative effect on cell growth could be partly mediated by transcriptional inactivation of growth-responsive genes.PROTEIN phosphorylation is important in synaptic transmission and plasticity^1. At the neuromuscular junction, phosphorylation of acetylcholine (ACh) receptor-channels increases the rate of agonist-induced channel desensitization^2. In contrast, potentiation of ACh channel activity through protein phosphorylation has not been described. We report here that calcitonin gene-related peptide (CGRP), a neuropeptide present at presynaptic motor nerve terminals^3,4, enhances the postsynaptic response at developing neuromuscular junctions by increasing the burst duration of embryonic ACh channels. The effect of CGRP on these ACh channels is mimicked by dibutyryl-cyclic AMP and by cAMP-dependerit protein kinase (PKA) and prevented by a specific peptide inhibitor of PKA. Moreover, postsynaptic inhibition of PKA reduced the amplitude and decay time of spontaneous synaptic currents, suggesting that endogenous CGRP may act as a potentiating factor during the early phase of synaptogenesis.THE potential importance of intracellular calcium-binding proteins in rapid and highly localized Ca^2+ signalling is poorly understood. During fast synaptic transmission, which occurs at specialized active zones where Ca^2+ diffuses only a few tens of nanometres from channels to neurotransmitter release sites^1, a cytoplasmic Ca^2+ buffer would have to be extremely fast or present in millimolar concentrations to intercept a significant fraction of the calcium ions en route to their targets^2–5. Therefore, Ca^2+ buffers have been presumed to be unimportant in fast exocytosis^1,6,7 and another fast calcium-mediated process, electrical resonance in hair cells^4,8. Here I present evidence to the contrary by showing that hair cells in the frog sacculus contain millimolar concentrations of a mobile cytoplasmic calcium buffer that captures Ca^2+ within a few microseconds after it enters through presynaptic Ca^2+ channels and carries it away from the point of entry. This spatial buffering reduces the presynaptic free Ca^2+ by up to 60 per cent and probably restricts the region in which the internal calcium ion concentration exceeds 1 μM to within <250 nm of each synaptic site. The buffer can thus influence both electrical resonance and synaptic transmission. Calbindin-D_28K or a related protein may serve as the mobile calcium buffer, an action similar to its function in transporting Ca^2+ across intestinal epithelial cells.ODORANT stimulation leads to a depolarization of olfactory receptor neurons^1–3. A mechanism underlying this transduction, which occurs in the sensory cilia^3–6, involves a G-protein-mediated increase in adenylyl cyclase activity^7–10, and therefore a rise in internal cyclic AMP and consequent opening of a cAMP-gated cation channel on the plasma membrane^11–22. Another mechanism, not as well established, involves the opening of an inositol trisphosphate-activated cation channel on the plasma membrane^23 as a result of phospholipase C activity^24,25. In both cases, an influx of cations is thought to generate the depolarizing receptor potential. We now report, however, that the mechanism is actually more complex. The odorant-induced current appears to contain an inward chloride component also, which is triggered by calcium influx through the cation-selective channel. This newly found chloride component can be as large as the cationic component. The co-existence of cationic and chloride components in the odorant response, possibly unique among sensory transduction mechanisms, may serve to reduce variations in the transduction current resulting from changes in external ionic concentrations around the olfactory cilia. Our finding can explain the longstanding puzzle of why removal of most mucosal cations still does not diminish the amplitude of the olfactory receptor cell response^26–28.TUMOURS are induced by Agrobacterium tumefaciens on a variety of plants^1–3. The virulence determinants of A. tumefaciens reside on a large tumour-inducing (Ti) plasmid. This plasmid carries two regions essential for tumour induction, namely the T region and the Vir region. During infection the T region is transferred to the plant cell, where it becomes stably integrated in one of the host chromosomes as T-DNA. Expression of T-DNA leads to the production of the plant hormones auxin and cytokinin, as well as to the synthesis of specific amino-acid derivatives termed opines. Agrobacterium strains are classified according to the types of opines produced by the tumours they induce. The Vir region contains genes that are expressed in the bacterium and are required for T-DNA transfer to plant cells, and several other genes that affect the efficiency of transfer and the host range. Vir regions from different Ti plasmids may vary slightly in the genes they contain: for instance, the virF gene, which is present in the Vir-region of octopine Ti plasmids, is absent from nopaline Ti plasmids^4,5. Mutation of the virF gene leads to a weakened virulence of octopine strains on tomato^6 and Nicotiana glauca (shrub tobacco)^4. Nopaline strains are strongly attenuated in N. glauca compared with octopine strains because of the absence of the virF virulence gene from the Ti plasmid in nopaline strains^4. The virF gene product may be transferred to and be active in plant cells. Here we isolate transgenic N. glauca plants in which the virF coding sequence is expressed using the cauliflower mosaic virus 35S promoter. The presence of the VirF protein converts the non-host N. glauca into a host for tumour formation by A. tumefaciens nopaline strains and octopine virF mutants. Our results indicate that certain virulence gene products such as the VirF protein may be transferred to plant cells during tumour induction, where they function as mediators of T-DNA transfer.AMONG the Eukaryota, the true fungi comprise four divisions (Chytridiomycota, Zymogomycota, Ascomycota and Basidio-mycota) that constitute a natural group which is thought to have diverged about 1 billion (10^9) years ago, believed also to be the time of divergence between metaphyta and metazoa lineages^1. The endosymbionts responsible for the most prevalent plant root symbiosis, the vesicular–arbuscular mycorrhizae (VAM) or, more appropriately, arbuscular mycorrhizae, comprise 130 species of fungi classified in the Zygomycotina, order Glomales^2–4. The arbuscular endomycorrhizae are considered to be ecologically important for most vascular plants^5–8 in view of their beneficial effects on plant growth and survival. They are one of the few plant-fungus associations with a fossil record and may even have facilitated the origin of land flora. But the biochemical and genetic characterization of these microsymbionts has been hampered by the inability to grow them in pure culture. To investigate the origin and clarify the phylogenetic relationships of these organisms, we have sequenced ribosomal DNA genes from twelve species. Our phylogenetic analyses confirm the existence of three families within arbuscular fungi on the basis of morphological characters. We obtain approximate dates for the divergence of major branche's on the phylogenetic tree. These include an estimate for the origin of VAM-like fungi of 353–462 Myr ago, which is consistent with the hypothesis that VAM were instrumental in the colonization of land by ancient plants.Macrocyclic Chemistry: Aspects of Organic and Inorganic Supramolecular Chemistry. By B. Dietrich, P. Viout and J.-M. Lehn. VCH: 1993. Pp. 384. DM148, £61, $99.PARASITES can modify host behaviour for their own benefit after infection^1–4. Whether these changes also minimize loss of host fitness is less well known^5–7. Although parasitoids are abundant^8, few cases are known of behavioural changes in host–parasitoid systems^9. Bumblebees ( Bombus spp., Apidae, Hymenoptera) are primitively eusocial insects with an annual life cycle. Reproduction occurs in late summer when males and young queens are released^10,11. Parasitoid conopid flies (Conopidae, Diptera) are abundant in summer, and up to 70% of field-caught bumblebee workers may be parasitized^12. Development of the parasitoid usually takes ^10–12 days and ends with the host's death when the larva pupates. Here we report a novel strategy used against these parasitoids, based on the exploitation of temperature effects on parasite development. We demonstrate that parasitized workers of the bumblebee Bombus terrestris L. stay in the field overnight rather than returning to their nest. This behaviour retards the development of the parasite and reduces the chances of successful development. In choice experiments, parasitized foragers actively seek out cold temperatures. This behaviour therefore enhances colony success by prolonging the life of parasitized workers while at the same time reducing parasitoid fitness.THE abundances of isotopes in the ^238U decay series can be used as both tracers and chronometers of magmatic processes. In the subsolidus asthenosphere, the activity of each daughter isotope (defined as the product of its concentration and decay constant, and denoted by parentheses) is assumed to be equal to that of its parent. By contrast, (^230Th/^238U) is greater than unity in most recent mid-ocean-ridge and ocean-island basalts^1, implying that thorium is more incompatible (that is, it is partitioned into the melt phase more strongly) than uranium. Melting of spinel peridotite cannot produce the (^230Th) excesses, because measured partition coefficients for pyroxenes and olivine demonstrate that uranium is more incompatible than thorium for this rock^2. Here I report garnet–melt partitioning data which show that for this mineral-melt pair thorium does behave more incompatibly than uranium, thus supporting the suggestion that mid-ocean-ridge basalts (MORB) are produced by melting initiated at depths where garnet is stable^3–6. Using these data, I show that the observed (^230Th/^238U) ratios of MORB and most ocean-island basalts can be explained by slow, near-fractional melting initiated in the garnet stability field.THE discovery^1–6 of the spherical carbon cage compound buck-minsterfullerene (C_60) and the recent development of methods to produce it in bulk^7 have led to an explosion in research in the physical and chemical properties of this unique species^8,9. Nevertheless, the question of the formation mechanism of C_60 (or of the other fullerenes) is still far from settled. We have shown elsewhere that carbon clusters in the gas phase develop from linear chains to planar ring systems to fullerenes as their size increases. One can easily envisage the transformation from chains to rings, but how the three-dimensional near-spherical fullerenes evolve from large planar rings is not obvious. Here we show that 'heating' these large ring systems above their 'melting' point leads to 100% fullerene formation accompanied by the evaporation of a small carbon fragment (C_1 or C_3 for odd systems and C_2 for even systems). We propose a mechanism, based on these data, for efficient C_60 production in carbon arcs.THE potential development of optoelectronic devices based on the nonlinear polarization of molecular materials has aroused much recent interest^1,2. The search for large second-order electric susceptibilities (that is, proportional to the square of an applied electric field) has concentrated on acentric organic or organometallic chromophores with an organic π-electron system coupling electron donor and acceptor groups^3–6. It is conceivable that mixed-valence compounds characterized by an intervalence charge-transfer (IVCT) transition^7, in which the donor and acceptor centres are both metal atoms, might also have the potential to provide a large second-order response^8, but this possibility has not been widely explored. Here we report the first hyperpolarizability, β, of a bimetallic complex ion, [(CN)_5Ru-μCN-Ru(NH_3)_5]^- (I in Fig. 1), and a novel organometallic analogue, [(η^5-C_5H_5)Ru(PPh_3)_2-μ-CN-Ru(NH_3)_5]^3+ (II). Measurements of β (which is related to the bulk second-order response) in solution at a wavelength of 1,064 nm using the newly developed hyper-Rayleigh scattering technique^9,10 give values greater than 10^–27 e.s.u., which are among the largest reported for solution species. The ease with which the energy of the IVCT transition can be modified suggests that there may be considerable potential for this class of chromophore in nonlinear optical devices.The discovery in 1986 of the first copper oxide superconductor stimulated an explosion of research activity that continues to the present day. The early years of high-temperature superconductivity were characterized by the rapid discovery of many new materials with increasingly high transition temperatures. The record now stands at ~133 K, attributed to a mercury-containing compound reported by Schilling et al. in 1993, although the dream of achieving room-temperature superconductivity has yet to be fulfilled. THE recent discovery^1 of superconductivity below a transition temperature ( T _c) of 94 K in HgBa_2CuO_4+δ has extended the repertoire of high- T _c superconductors containing copper oxide planes embedded in suitably structured (layered) materials. Previous experience with similar compounds containing bismuth and thallium instead of mercury suggested that even higher transition temperatures might be achieved in mercury-based compounds with more than one CuO_2 layer per unit cell. Here we provide support for this conjecture, with the discovery of superconductivity above 130 K in a material containing HgBa_2Ca_2Cu_3O_1+x (with three CuO_2 layers per unit cell), HgBa_2CaCu_2O_6+x (with two CuO_2 layers) and an ordered superstructure comprising a defined sequence of the unit cells of these phases. Both magnetic and resistivity measurements confirm a maximum transition temperature of ∼ 133 K, distinctly higher than the previous established record value of 125–127 K observed in Tl_2Ba_2Ca_2Cu_3O_10 (refs 2,3).TIGHTLY collimated outflows of gas are often associated with regions of star formation; they interact with the ambient interstellar medium to produce the knots of shock-excited emission known as Herbig–Haro (HH) objects^1,2. Two interpretations have been suggested for these objects: they may represent either the shocking of dense clumps of material that have been ejected into the surrounding molecular cloud^3, or the interaction of stationary knots with fast, low-density jets^4,5. Here we report the discovery of a complex of HH objects and associated wakes that require compact knots of material to have been ejected over a wide opening angle in a seemingly explosive event. Our observations suggest that, at least in this case, the former interpretation is correct, and they highlight the need to search other star-forming regions in order to establish the frequency of such events.COMPACT groups of galaxies have such high apparent densities that their members are separated in projection by only a few galactic radii, making them the most promising environment in the low-redshift Universe for studying the effects of galaxy merging. But the dynamical and evolutionary status of these groups is still subject to considerable uncertainty^1–3, partly because of the bias introduced by the selection criteria used to identify them^4. Using the Rosat X-ray telescope^5, we have detected a large cloud of hot gas centred on the compact group HCG62. From the properties of this gas, rather than the galaxies themselves, we are able to infer both the distribution of dark matter (which extends significantly beyond the apparent optical confines of the group and dominates its total mass) and the evolution of the group as a whole. The compact core of galaxies seems to have formed as a result of orbital decay in a much more extended system, and should culminate in a final merger within a few billion years. We suggest that a new class of 'fossil' groups, consisting of a large elliptical galaxy embedded at the centre of an extended X-ray halo, awaits discovery by Rosat.The proteins Grb2–Sem-5, Shc and Sos have been implicated in the signalling pathway from tyrosine kinase receptors to Ras. Grb2–Sem-5 binds directly to murine Sos1, a Ras exchange factor, through two SH3 domains. Sos is also associated with ligand-activated tyrosine kinase receptors which bind Grb2–Sem-5, and with the Grb2–Sem-5 binding protein, Shc. Ectopic expression of Drosophila Sos stimulates morphological transformation of rodent fibroblasts. These data define a pathway by which tyrosine kinases act through Ras to control cell growth and differentiation.The three-dimensional structure of the basic/helix–loop–helix/leucine zipper domain of the transcription factor Max complexed with DNA has been determined by X-ray crystallography at 2.9 Å resolution. Max binds as a dimer to its recognition sequence CACGTG by direct contacts between the α-helical basic region and the major groove. This symmetric homodimer, a new protein fold, is a parallel, left-handed, four-helix bundle, with each monomer containing two α-helical segments separated by a loop. The two α-helical segments are composed of the basic region plus helix 1 and helix 2 plus the leucine repeat, respectively. As in GCN4, the leucine repeat forms a parallel coiled coil.The once abstract notions of fractal space and time now appear naturally and inevitably in chaotic dynamical systems and lead to 'strange kinetics' and anomalous transport properties. An understanding of this kind of dynamical behaviour should provide insights into, for example, turbulent fluid dynamics and particle random-walk processes.The Immunology of Human Pregnancy. By Henry N. Claman. Humana: 1993. Pp. 232. $59.50.Isaac Newton: Adventurer in Thought. By A. Rupert Hall. Blackwell: 1992. Pp. 468. £19.95, $29.95.Invention: The Care and Feeding of Ideas. By Norbert Wiener. MIT Press: 1993. Pp. 159. $19.95, £17.95.Exploding the Gene Myth. By Ruth Hubbard and Elijah Wald. Beacon: 1993. Pp. 206. $24. Biology as Ideology: The Doctrine of DNA. By Richard C. Lewontin. HarperPerennial: 1993. Pp. 128. $10 (pbk).THE prototype members of the heparin-binding fibroblast growth factor (FGF) family^1–6, acidic FGF (FGF-1) and basic FGF (FGF-2), are among the growth factors that act directly on vascular cells to induce endothelial cell growth and angiogenesis. In vivo , the role of the FGF prototypes in vascular pathology has been difficult to determine. We report here the introduction, by direct gene transfer into porcine arteries, of a eukaryotic expression vector encoding a secreted form of FGF-1. This somatic transgenic model defines gene function in the arterial wall in vivo . FGF-1 expression induced intimal thickening in porcine arteries 21 days after gene transfer, in contrast to control arteries transduced with an Escherichia coli β -galactosidase gene. Where there was substantial intimal hyperplasia, neocapillary formation was detected in the expanded intima. These findings suggest that FGF-1 induces intimal hyperplasia in the arterial wall in vivo and, through its ability to stimulate angiogenesis in the neointima, FGF-1 could stimulate neovascularization of atherosclerotic plaques. Potentially, gene transfer of FGF-1 could also be used as a genetic intervention to improve blood flow to ischaemic tissues in selected clinical settings.THE development of new blood vessels (angiogenesis) is required for many physiological processes including embryogenesis, wound healing and corpus luteum formation^1,2. Blood vessel neoformation is also important in the pathogenesis of many disorders^1–5, particularly rapid growth and metastasis of solid tumours^3–5. There are several potential mediators of tumour angiogenesis, including basic and acidic fibroblast growth factors, tumour necrosis factor- α and transforming factors- α and - β ^1,2. But it is unclear whether any of these agents actually mediates angiogenesis and tumour growth in vivo . Vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) is an endothelial cell-specific mitogen and an angiogenesis inducer released by a variety of tumour cells and expressed in human tumours in situ . To test whether VEGF may be a tumour angiogenesis factor in vivo , we injected human rhabdomyosar-coma, glioblastoma multiforme or leiomyosarcoma cell lines into nude mice. We report here that treatment with a monoclonal antibody specific for VEGF inhibited the growth of the tumours, but had no effect on the growth rate of the tumour cells In vitro. The density of vessels was decreased in the antibody-treated tumours. These findings demonstrate that inhibition of the action of an angiogenic factor spontaneously produced by tumour cells may suppress tumour growth in vivo .EXTRACELLULAR deposition of amyloid β -protein ( β -AP), or A4 protein ( M _r 4,000), is associated with Alzheimer's disease and with Down's syndrome (trisomy for chromosome 21)^1–3. The large membrane-bound precursor protein (APP) of β -AP is normally cleaved within the β -AP region by a putative proteinase (APP secretase) to release its extracellular portion; β-AP is produced by an alternative proteolytic processing^4–6. Here we demonstrate that APP contains a proteinase inhibitor domain for the matrix metalloproteinase gelatinase A, which is located in the C-terminal glycosylated region of the secretory forms of APP. In addition, we show that the gelatinase has an APP secretase-like activity, which hydrolyses the Lys l6-Leu l7 bond in the β -AP sequence. Our results indicate that the proteinase inhibitor domain of APP and gelatinase A may be involved in the formation of β -AP.Spiders in Ecological Webs. By D. H. Wise Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 328. £45, $79.95.INCLUSIVE fitness theory predicts that organisms can often increase their fitness by helping relatives^1. Indeed, many animals modify their behaviour towards kin in a fashion consistent with theory^2–4. Morphogenesis may also be sensitive to kinship environment, especially in species that facultatively produce distinct morphs that differ in their ability to harm relatives, such as those that produce alternative cannibalistic and non-cannibalistic phenotypes^5–9. We tested this hypothesis by examining whether consanguinity affected the probability that structurally distinctive cannibal morphs^5,10 would develop in larval Arizona tiger salamanders ( Ambystoma tigrinum nebulosum ). We report here that when tiger salamander larvae are reared in mixed-brood groups they are significantly more likely to develop the cannibal morphology and at an earlier age than siblings reared in pure-sibship groups. In general, morphogenesis may be responsive to kinship in any species that facultatively develops structures that can be used against conspecifics as weaponry.NATURAL oxidation of ferrous to ferric iron by bacteria such as Thiobacillus ferrooxidans or Gallionella ferruginea ^1, or by chemical oxidation^2,3 has previously been thought always to involve molecular oxygen as the electron acceptor. Anoxic photochemical reactions^4–6 or a photobiological process involving two photosystems^7–9 have also been discussed as mechanisms of ferrous iron oxidation. The knowledge of such processes has implications that bear on our understanding of the origin of Precambrian banded iron formations^10–14. The reducing power of ferrous iron increases dramatically at pH values higher than 2–3 owing to the formation of ferric hydroxy and oxyhydroxy compounds^1,2,15 (Fig. 1). The standard redox potential of Fe^3+/Fe^2+ ( E _0 = +0.77 V) is relevant only under acidic conditions. At pH 7.0, the couples Fe(OH)_3/Fe^2+ ( E′ _0 = -0.236V) or Fe(OH)_3 + HCO^−_3FeCO_3 ( E′ _0 = +0.200 V) prevail, matching redox potentials measured in natural sediments^9,16,17. It should thus be possible for Fe(n) around pH 7.0 to function as an electron donor for anoxygenic photosynthesis. The midpoint potential of the reaction centre in purple bacteria is around +0.45 V (ref. 18). Here we describe purple, non-sulphur bacteria that can indeed oxidize colourless Fe(u) to brown Fe(in) and reduce CO_2 to cell material, implying that oxygen-independent biological iron oxidation was possible before the evolution of oxygenic photosynthesis.SILICA-rich lavas, erupted at island-arc or continental volcanoes, are often produced by a complex process involving the assimilation of crust into a crystallizing, mantle-derived basaltic magma^1. The different strontium, neodymium and oxygen isotopic compositions of mantle-derived magmas and continental crust provide a powerful method for tracing the different contributions to continental silicic magmas, and for understanding the parameters controlling the composition and volume of erupted magma^1–4. In the large rhyolite eruptive centres of the western United States, the largest-volume, explosive rhyolite eruptions have more mantle-like Nd isotope ratios than other silicic lavas from the same centre^2–4, a relationship that has been interpreted as reflecting increased influx of mantle-derived basaltic magma to a crustal magma chamber before large-volume eruptions^1. Here we report isotope data for lavas from Unzen volcano, which suggest a similar relationship: the Nd isotope composition is more mantle-like in three larger-volume dacite eruptions (>0.1 km^3) than in one small-volume (0.02 km^3) eruption. We accordingly suggest that, in small-volume systems like Unzen, where the timescales for magma-chamber evolution are of the order of decades, isotope data such as those presented here might be used in volcanic hazard evaluation.Software piracy is wrong, but more flexible policies for selling it would help combat the crime.LABORATORY gravity currents are frequently used to model a range of environmental and industrial flows^1. The manner in which these flows become diluted with distance by the surrounding fluid has important implications for turbidity currents^2, pyroclastic flows^3,4, avalanches^5, accidental dense gas releases^6, fire propagation^7 and emission of industrial pollutants. Here we present an experimental technique for quantifying the entrainment of ambient fluid into the head of a gravity current propagating along a horizontal surface. The technique relies on the neutralization of an alkaline current by entrainment of acidic ambient fluid, and is visualized by using a pH indicator. Dimensional analysis indicates that the proportion of ambient fluid entrained into a gravity current head depends only on the initial volume of the current and distance from the release point, and is independent of the initial value of the density difference. This result is confirmed by the experimental data, which also show that little dilution of the head takes place during the slumping phase^8,9. Thereafter the dilution increases with the downstream distance, in quantitative agreement with the predictions of a theoretical model which evaluates the volume of entrained fluid. We apply the results to show that sediment slumps of initially high sediment concentrations will become dilute turbidity currents owing to entrainment of sea water before they have propagated extensively over the floors of ocean basins.THE Black Sea is the world's largest anoxic basin; it is also a contemporary analogue of the environment in which carbonaceous shales and petroleum source beds formed^1. Recently, Repeta et al . ^2,3 reported that anoxygenic photosynthesis may be an important component of carbon cycling in the present Black Sea, owing to a shoaling of the chemocline and consequent penetration of the photic zone by anaerobic waters in the past few decades^4,5. It has been suggested^4 that this was due to an anthropogenic decrease in freshwater input to the Black Sea, although natural causes were not ruled out. Here we report the distributions of sequestered photosynthetic pigments in eight core samples of sediments from the Black Sea ranging in age from zero to 6,200 years before the present. Our results show that photosynthetic green sulphur bacteria (Clorobiaceae) have been active in the Black Sea for substantial periods of time in the past. This finding indicates that the penetration of the photic zone by anaerobic waters is not a recent phenomenon, and suggests that natural causes for shoaling of the chemocline are more likely than anthropogenic ones^4.IN the past few decades, there has been considerable debate about whether vegetational and soil changes associated with changing land-use can cause surface-water acidification in lakes^1,2. Although it is now widely accepted that the severe and extensive acidification that has occurred recently in southern Scandinavia, northern Britain and North America^3,4 has been chiefly caused by atmospheric acid deposition, the role of changing land-use for moderate acidification is still not fully understood^5,6. Here we report analyses of sediment records from Swedish lakes, which provide evidence that land-use changes can have an important influence on the pH of acid-sensitive lakes. Following the expansion of an agrarian economy during the Iron Age (from about 2,500 years ago), pH increased from about 5.5 to about 6.5. Our results suggest that this pH increase was caused by burning, agriculture, forest grazing and other culture-related practices that increased the base saturation and pH of the soils, and enhanced the transport of base cations and nutrients from the soils to the surface waters, thus indicating these lakes may be naturally more acidic than had been thought. Following this period of alkalization, pH in many lakes fell to about 4.5 during the present century. Although cessation of former land-use practices could account for some of this change, the unprecedentedly low pH in recent years must be due predominantly to acid deposition.DIAMOND films prepared by chemical vapour deposition (CVD) have received considerable attention because of their high thermal conductivity, optical transparency, hardness, inertness and semiconducting properties^1,2. The control of film geometry (by thinning, polishing, patterning and shaping) is essential for most applications. Polishing by reaction with oxygen gas or ions usually results in pitting at grain boundaries^3,4, and other techniques^5–8 are generally slow. Thinning or polishing of single-crystal diamond^9 and CVD films^4,10 by high-temperature diffusional reaction with solid transition metals has been reported previously. But these approaches require either a hydrogen atmosphere^9, which is undesirable industrially, or high pressures (200–3,000 p.s.i.) during the heat treatment^4,10. We report here a method for shaping and thinning which does not suffer from these limitations. It involves the use of molten rare-earth metals such as cerium or lanthanum to etch away the diamond film surface. Substantial thinning and shaping can be achieved in just a few hours. We anticipate that this technique may open up new applications of diamond films in optics and biomedicine.ACCRETION disks^1,2 are found in many astrophysical objects, ranging from newly formed stars and mass-transferring binary systems to quasars and other active galactic nuclei. An important feature of accretion disks is the boundary layer—the interface between the disk and the accreting objects—where up to half the accretion luminosity may be liberated. The lack of a satisfactory description of the flow and thermal structure of this layer has long been a handicap when modelling disk spectra. Here we report numerical solutions of a model of thin accretion disks around a central white dwarf which includes a self-consistent description of the boundary layer. We find two distinct kinds of solution depending on the mass accretion rate Ṁ . At high rates, we find optically thick boundary layers whose radial width and peak temperature decrease with decreasing Ṁ , but when the accretion rate falls below a critical value, the boundary layer becomes optically thin, and the width and temperature increase dramatically. Our results provide an explanation for the hard X-rays observed^3 in cataclysmic variables, particularly at low Ṁ . It should be possible to extend our analysis to other accretion-disk systems.Self-Made Man: And His Undoing. by Jonathan Kingdon Simon and Schuster: 1993. Pp. 369. £25, $30.Beyond Southern Skies: Radio Astronomy and the Parkes Telescope. by Peter Robertson Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 357. £40, $75.No Breathing Room: The Aftermath of Chernobyl. by Grigori Medvedev Basic Books: 1993. Pp. 213. $20, £16.50. UK distribution, HarperCollins. Ablaze: The Story of Chernobyl. by Piers Paul Read Random House/Secker and Warburg. Pp. 416. $25, £18.50. UK publication date, 26 May.Europe's faltering vision of its future has been brought about by social and historical forces for which it had not bargained; the need now is for a clear statement of its goals.Nature 362, 40–43 (1993). THE penultimate sentence of the first introductory paragraph of this letter should read, "We find that the triplet excited state of Pt2(P2O5H2)44–, with a lifetime of about 4 JJLS, undergoes a contraction in the separation of the P-planes of 0.52 ±0.13 A relative to theground state.OLIGOMERS containing tracts of cytidine form hemiprotonated base pairs at acid pH and have been considered to be double-stranded. We have solved the structure of the DNA oligomer 5′-d(TCCCCC) at acid pH and find that it is a four-stranded complex in which two base-paired parallel-stranded duplexes are intimately associated, with their base pairs fully intercalated. The relative orientation of the duplexes is antiparallel, so that each base pair is face-to-face with its neighbours. The NMR spectrum displays only six spin systems, showing that the structure is highly symmetrical on the NMR timescale; the four strands are equivalent. A model derived by energy minimization and con-strained molecular dynamics shows excellent compatibility with the observed nuclear Overhauser effects (NOEs) particularly for the very unusual inter-residue sugar-sugar NOEs HI′-HI′, Hl′-H2" and H1′-H4′. These NOEs are probably diagnostic for such tetrameric structures.SPONTANEOUS errors in DNA replication have been suggested to play a significant role in neoplastic transformation and to explain the chromosomal alterations seen in cancer cells^1. A defective replication factor could increase the mutation rate in clonal variants arising during tumour progression, but despite intensive efforts, increases in tumour cell mutation rates have not been unambiguously shown^2. Here we use an unbiased genomic fingerprinting technique^3 to show that 12 per cent of colorectal carcinomas carry somatic deletions in poly(dA . dT) sequences and other simple repeats. We estimate that cells from these tumours can carry more than 100,000 such mutations. Only tumours with affected poly(dA . dT) sequences carry mutations in the other simple repeats examined, and such mutations can be found in all neoplastic regions of multiple tumours from the same patient, including adenomas. Tumours with these mutations show distinctive genotypic and phenotypic features. We conclude that these mutations reflect a previously undescribed form of carcinogenesis in the colon (predisposition to which may be inherited) mediated by a mutation in a DNA replication factor resulting in reduced fidelity for replication or repair (a 'mutator mutation').PATCH-CLAMP experiments have shown that fusion of secretory granules with the plasma membrane does not always occur as an all-or-none event, but can develop slowly in a fluctuating manner or can be transient^1–5. These observations suggested that release could be detected during such incomplete fusion events. To test this hypothesis we have combined patch-clamp measurements of the activity of single exocytotic fusion pores in beige mouse mast cells with the electrochemical detection of serotonin released during the exocytotic events. We report here that on fusion pore opening there is a small release of serotonin which is directly proportional to the pore conductance. We also show that a significant release occurs during transient fusion events. These results demonstrate, to our knowledge for the first time, release of a neurotransmitter from a secretory vesicle that did not undergo complete fusion.THE degradation of most cellular proteins starts with their covalent conjugation with ubiquitin^1,2. This labels the proteins for rapid hydrolysis to oligopeptides by a (26S) proteolytic complex containing a (20S) degradative particle called the proteasome^3,4. Some system in the cytosol also generates antigenic peptides from endogenously synthesized cellular and viral proteins^5–10. These peptides bind to newly synthesized class I major histocompatibility complex molecules in the endoplasmic reticulum and peptide/class I complexes are then transported to the cell surface for presentation to cytotoxic T cells^11,12. How these peptides are produced is unknown, although a modification that promotes ubiquitin-dependent degradation of a viral protein enhances its presentation with class I^13 and indirect evidence suggests a role for proteolytic particles closely resembling and perhaps identical to the proteasome^4,12,14,15. Using cells that exhibit a temperature-sensitive defect in ubiquitin conjugation, we report here that nonpermissive temperature inhibited class I-restricted presentation of ovalbumin introduced into the cytosol, but did not affect presentation of an ovalbumin peptide synthesized from a minigene. These results implicate the ubiquitin-dependent proteolytic pathway in the production of antigenic peptides.GENETIC studies show that intercellular signalling is involved in key steps in Drosophila melanogaster development, but it has not previously been possible to investigate these processes in simplified in vitro systems. Analysis of engrailed ( en ) and wingless ( wg ) and other segment polarity genes suggests that two or more intercellular signalling processes may be involved in intrasegmental patterning^1–3. Expression of en and wg begins about three hours after egg laying, in adjacent rows of cells in the posterior half of each segmental primordium^4–7. In wg ^− embryos and in conditional mutants in which wg function is inactivated during a critical period between three and five hours after egg laying, early en expression begins normally but then disappears within several hours^4,8–10. The wg gene encodes a protein highly similar to the product of the mouse Wnt-1 proto-oncogene, a secreted glycoprotein^11,12; wg protein is proposed to function as an extracellular signal, maintaining en expression and activating other molecular and morphogenetic processes in nearby cells^4,8,9,13. Several lines of evidence support the model, including the secretion of wg protein in the embryo^7,14, genetic mosaic experiments^15–17 and cell lineage studies^18. We tested this model using purified embryonic cells isolated by whole animal cell sorting^19, and validated three key predictions: (1) when en -expressing cells from early embryos are grown alone in culture, they rapidly and selectively lose en expression; (2) purified wg -expressing cells provide a locally active signal that prevents this loss; (3) heterologous cells engineered to express wg also show signalling activity, indicating that wg protein alone, or in conjunction with more generally expressed factors, is the signal.IN 1948 the German physicist, Manfred Richter, reported that colour vision has a seasonal variation^1,2. For four colour-normal subjects, he found a sinusoidal variation in the proportion of red and green required to match a monochromatic yellow, the equation known as the 'Rayleigh match'^3. In summer, subjects required more red in their mixture. The measurements were made with the Nagel anomaloscope, an instrument introduced in 1907^4,5 and which today, essentially unchanged, remains the definitive clinical instrument for classifying the many phenotypic variations in colour vision. The variation that Richter recorded in the red–green ratio was large (three Nagel units), and it now takes on fresh interest because it is comparable in size to the difference in Nagel settings later reported between normal observers of different genetic types^6,7. We have been able to replicate Richter's result, but report here that it is almost certainly instrumental: the Nagel anomaloscope proves to be very sensitive to ambient temperature.IN humans, trauma to a peripheral nerve may be followed by chronic pain syndromes which are only relieved by blockade of the effects of sympathetic impulse traffic^1–4. It is presumed that, after the lesion, noradrenaline released by activity of sympathetic postganglionic axons excites primary afferent neurons by activating α-adrenoceptors^2,5, generating signals that enter the 'pain pathways' of the central nervous system. The site of coupling is unclear. In some patients local anaesthesia of the relevant peripheral nerve^6 does not alleviate pain, implying that ectopic impulses arise either within the central nervous system, or in proximal parts of the primary afferent neurons. In experimentally lesioned rats, activity can originate within the dorsal root ganglia^7,8. Here we report that, after sciatic nerve ligation, noradrenergic perivascular axons in rats sprout into dorsal root ganglia and form basket-like structures around large-diameter axotomized sensory neurons; sympathetic stimulation can activate such neurons repetitively. These unusual connections provide a possible origin for abnormal discharge following peripheral nerve damage. Further, in contrast to the sprouting of intact nerve terminals into nearby denervated effector tissues in skin^9,10, muscle^11, sympathetic ganglia^12 and sweat glands^13, the axons sprout into a target which has not been partially denervated.RELATIVE motion is one of the most salient cues for segmentation of a visual scene into separate objects. This is illustrated by the vivid contours that are perceived when random dot patterns move in different directions^1,2. Once motion is halted in such displays the segmentation contours disappear. This makes random dot patterns ideal for the study of contour from motion processing in isolation. Contour from motion processing obviously relies on direction-selective neurons, which are found in many visual cortical areas^3–5. It is, however, largely unknown at what level of processing their signals interact to serve the global process of motion-based image segmentation. To answer this quesion, we recorded visually evoked potentials, both in man and in awake monkey, to a stimulus specifically designed to signal the presence of neuronal activity related to contour from motion processing. We report here that response components specific to contour from motion were elicited only when the stimulus yielded a contour percept. In awake monkey, the sources of these components were located within the supra-and infra-granular layers of primary visual cortex. We conclude that VI is involved in image segmentation processing,Disease Transmission by Insects: Its Discovery and 90 Years of Effort to Prevent It. By James R. Busvine.Springer: 1993. Pp. 361. DM98, $69, £38.50.THE gametes of many lower eukaryotic organisms emit pheromones that attract gametes of the opposite mating type or sex^1–4. Gametes move or grow in the direction of the highest pheromone concentration, suggesting that the strength of the pheromonal signal is used to infer proximity, or that the strongest signal is most likely to be noticed. Here I offer a new explanation of pheromonal signalling and chemotaxis in gametes. I show that pheromonal signals can be interpreted as sexually selected traits that honestly advertise variation in quality among gametes, given that signals are costly to produce and that gametes compete; by 'quality' I refer to some aspect of a gamete's fitness. A gamete's preference for a mating partner, then, is predicted to vary with the quality of a prospective partner as inferred from the strength of its signal. This view can explain characteristics of the signalling and mate selection behaviours of gametes that are not predicted by models of mate choice based on proximity or 'passive attraction' to the strongest signal^5. These include repeated partner exchanges^2, escalated exchanges of mating pheromones^6–9, and rejection of gametes that signal at low levels^8,9.DNA has been successfully isolated from both fossilized plant^1 and animal tissues^2–6. The oldest material, dated as 25–40 million years old (Tertiary), was obtained from amber-entombed bees^4,5 and termites^6. Tissues from both these insects yielded DNA of good quality, which could be amplified by the polymerase chain reaction (PCR) and subsequently sequenced, including the genes encoding 18S ribosomal RNA^5,6 and 16S rRNA^6. We report here the extraction of DNA from a 120–135-million-year-old weevil (Nemonychidae, Coleoptera) found in Lebanese amber, PCR amplification of segments of the 18S rRNA gene and the internal transcribed spacer, and the corresponding nucleotide sequences of their 315- and 226-base-pair fragments, respectively. These sequen-ces were used for preliminary phylogenetic analysis of the nemonychid's sequence with three extant coleopterans: Lecontellus pinicola (Nemonychidae), Hypera brunneipennis (Curculionidae) and the mealworm Tenebrio molitor (Tenebrionidae), and two extant dipterans: the fruitfly Drosophila melanogaster (Drosophilidae) and mosquito Aedes albopictus (Culicidae) for the purpose of ascertaining the origin of the extracted and amplified DNA. The results revealed that the PCR-amplifted material is that of the extinct nemonychid weevil. This represents the oldest fossil DNA ever extracted and sequenced, extending by 80 million years the age of any previously reported DNA^4–6.THE temperature distribution in the Earth's core places important constraints on the Earth's internal heat budget and on models of the geodynamo. The solid inner core crystallizes from a liquid outer core, consisting mainly of iron alloyed with a lighter element, at a depth of about 5,100 km (corresponding to a pressure of about 3.3 Mbar). Thus, the most reliable means of determining the temperature gradient in the core is to estimate the melting temperature of iron and iron-rich compounds at the pressure of the inner core boundary. Current estimates range from about 4,000 to 8,000 K; but these estimates, obtained from shock compression^1–3, theory (discussed in ref. 4) and extrapolation of static pressure data^2,3,5, are poorly constrained. Here I present melting-point measurements on iron and iron–oxygen compounds at static pressures of up to Mbar. Extrapolation of these results to 3.3 Mbar yields a temperature at the inner-core boundary of 4,850±200 K. A weak change in optical absorption observed above 2,000 K may correspond to the solid–solid phase transition found in shock experiments at 2 Mbar (ref. 1).An outbreak of respiratory disease in the United States warns of the need for vigilance on microorganisms.VARIATIONS in the oxygen isotope content (δ^18O) of late Quaternary deep-sea sediments mainly reflect changes in continental ice mass^1, and hence provide important information about the timing of past ice ages. Because these sediments cannot yet be dated directly beyond the range of radiocarbon dating (40-50 kyr), ages for the δ^18O record have been generated^2,3 by matching the phase of the changes in δ^18O to that of variations in the Earth's precession and obliquity. Adopting this timescale yields a close correspondence between the time-varying amplitudes of these orbital variations and those of a wide range of climate proxies^4, lending support to the Milankovitch theory that the Earth's glacial-interglacial cycles are driven by orbital variations. Recently Winograd et al .^5 reported a record of δ^18O variations in a fresh-water carbonate sequence from Devils Hole, Nevada, dated by U–Th disequilibrium^6. They concluded that the timing of several of the features in the record, which reflects changes in the temperature of precipitation over Nevada as well as changes in the isotopic composition of the moisture source^5,7, showed significant deviations from that predicted by Milanko-vitch theory. Here we demonstrate that applying the Devils Hole chronology to ocean cores requires physically implausible changes in sedimentation rate. Moreover, spectral analysis of the Devils Hole record shows clear evidence of orbital influence. We therefore conclude that transfer of the Devils Hole chronology to the marine record is inappropriate, and that the evidence in favour of Milankovitch theory remains strong.ZEOLITES are microporous aluminosilicates which, in their protonated form, act as solid catalysts^1, and are widely used in the oil and petrochemical industries for processes such as cracking, isomerization and alkylation if hydrocarbons^2. The proposed mechanisms^3–5 of these processes mostly involve proton transfer and formation of carbenium or carbonium ions as reactive intermediates, but the detailed function of the zeolite and in particular the relation between acidity and catalytic activity is not well understood. Here we report experimental and theoretical studies of denterium–hydrogen exchange between deuterated methane and protonated zeolites — a prototypical hetero-geneous catalytic reaction between a hydrocarbon and an acid zeolite. We monitored this slow exchange reaction in two different zeolites using infrared spectroscopy, and used ab initio quantum chemistry calculations to determine both the reaction mechanism and the acidity–activity relationship. Combining our theoretical results with recent estimates^8–11 of the acidity differences within zeolites enables us to reproduce the experimentally observed reaction rates and thus to obtain a detailed microscopic picture of this heterogeneous catalytic process.DYNAMICAL processes in very thin liquid films play a critical role in phenomena such as lubrication, wetting, spreading and emulsions, but these dynamics remain poorly understood at the molecular level. Heslot et al .^1–5 observed molecular layering effects in a spreading liquid droplet, which they interpreted in terms of flow anomalies. Here we report that evaporation dynamics can also lead to the formation of distinct molecular layers in a thin liquid film. We use ellipsometry to follow the evolution in time of the thickness profile of a film of tetrakis(2-ethylhexoxy )silane deposited on silicon wafers. From an initially smooth gradient, we observe the formation of molecular steps 10 Å in height. The evaporation rate shows an oscillatory dependence on film thickness, leading us to conclude that layering results from faster evaporation of incomplete layers relative to complete layers.ELECTRONS occupying surface states on the close-packed surfaces of noble metals form a two-dimensional nearly free electron gas^1–3. These states can be probed using the scanning tunnelling microscope (STM), providing a unique opportunity to study the local properties of electrons in low-dimensional systems^4. Here we report the direct observation of standing-wave patterns in the local density of states of the Cu(lll) surface using the STM at low temperature. These spatial oscillations are quantum-mechanical interference patterns caused by scattering of the two-dimensional electron gas off step edges and point defects. Analysis of the spatial oscillations gives an independent measure of the surface state dispersion, as well as insight into the interaction between surface-state electrons and scattering sites on the surface.A SMALL proportion of meteorites found on Earth are thought to come from planet-sized bodies^1,2. The 'lunar meteorites' are now well established as having come from the Moon^3–6 on the basis of direct comparison with lunar samples. The SNC meteorites (shergottites, nakhlites and chassignites) — seven achondrite meteorites distinguished by extremely young formation ages (<1.3 Gyr), high volatile contents, distinctive oxygen isotopic ratios and rare earth compositions — are igneous rocks, believed^2 to have formed on a planet, probably Mars. But it is hard to reconcile the weakly shocked nature of many lunar and SNC meteorites with the strong shock metamorphism known to accompany impacts of the size required to eject material from a planet-sized body. Computer modelling^7–10 of impacts has yet to resolve this issue, although it has been proposed^9,10 that surface rarefaction near an impact can produce high-velocity, weakly shocked ejecta. Here we present the results of a cratering experiment which separates and captures the ejecta from diffe-rent regions around the impact site. We recover high-velocity, weakly shocked material as predicted^9,10, lending additional support both to our understanding of cratering mechanics and to a planetary or lunar origin for the SNC and lunar meteorites.The trial in Paris of four scientists for negligence in the protection of haemophiliacs from infection with HIV in the period 1983–85 will cast a long shadow over the links between science and the public service everywhere.Neurofibromatosis type 2 (NF2) is a monogenic dominantly inherited disease predisposing carriers to develop nervous system tumours. To identify the genetic defect, the region between two flanking polymorphic markers on chromosome 22 was cloned and several genes identified. One is the site of germ-line mutations in NF2 patients and of somatic mutations in NF2-related tumours. Its deduced product has homology with proteins at the plasma membrane and cytoskeleton Interface, a previously unknown site of action of tumour suppressor genes in humans.The extreme sensitivity of chaotic systems to tiny perturbations (the ‘butterfly effect’) can be used both to stabilize regular dynamic behaviours and to direct chaotic trajectories rapidly to a desired state. Incorporating chaos deliberately into practical systems therefore offers the possibility of achieving greater flexibility in their performance.Paleomagnetism of the Atlantic, Tethys and lapetus Oceans. By Rob Van der Voo. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 411. £60, $89.95.Lapsed members should ask for better terms before agreeing to rejoin UNESCO.Last week's government paper on British research has the air of finality proper in a policy statement. The discussion, after all, is long since over. The question now is whether the new policy is wise.Styles of Scientific Thought: The German Genetics Community, 1900–1933. By J. Harwood. University of Chicago Press: 1993. Pp. 423. $74.75, £51.95 (hbk); $27.50, £17.95 (pbk).Natural Selection: Domains, Levels, and Challenges. By George C. Williams. Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 208. £35, $55 (hbk); £14.95, $24.95 (pbk).Inside NASA: High Technology and Organizational Change in the American Space Program. By Howard E. McCurdy. Johns Hopkins University Press: 1993. Pp. 215. $32.95, £27.50.Featured this week — an epitope mapping system, an instrument for the purification of proteins, peptides and glycoproteins from complex mixtures by continuous elution electrophoresis and a radiolabelled ligand for brain research.RNAs linked to the chemical nuclease 1,10-phenanthroline-copper cut double-stranded DNA of complementary sequence. This cleavage reaction is applicable to all sequences and can be used to measure the distance between marker genes in base pairs, map the size of a transcription unit and define positions of chromosomal breakpoints.Genetic analysis of domestic animals demonstrates the feasibility of marker-assisted selection of economically important traits and may foreshadow good things to come (other than better bacon) for human geneticists.THE photosynthetic oxidation of water occurs within a multi-protein complex called photosystem II (PSII), located in the thylakoid membranes of plants and cyanobacteria. Little information on PSII architecture is available; even the oligomeric nature of the complex is contentious, with various predictions of monomeric^1, dimeric and tetrameric^2–4 forms. Biochemistry suggests that it consists of an outer shell of easily removable light-harvesting proteins and a more resistant core^5. The core itself can be split into further light-harvesting proteins and a reaction centre^5,6. The reaction centre polypeptides bind the electron transfer components, and probably contain amino-acid residues liganded to the cluster of four Mn atoms that is believed to constitute the water 'splitting' site^6–8. We report here the first, to our knowledge, three-dimensional functionally intact structure of PSII of higher plants, complete with antennae and core light-harvesting proteins. Our model has been obtained by digital image processing of ordered two-dimensional arrays of the complex, such as have often been observed^4,9–12.THE striking similarity between the first two human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) isolates Lai/LAV (formerly LAV, isolated at the Pasteur Institute^1,2) and Lai/IIIB (formerly HTLV-IIIB, reported to be isolated from a pooled culture at the Laboratory of Tumor Cell Biology (LTCB) of the National Cancer Institute^3,4) provoked considerable controversy in light of the high level of variability found among subsequent HIV-1 isolates^5. In November 1990, the Office of Scientific Integrity at the National Institutes of Health commissioned our group to analyse archival samples established at the Pasteur Institute and LTCB between 1983 and 1985. Retrospective analyses^6,7 have shown that contamination of a culture derived from patient BRU by one from patient LAI was responsible for the provenance of HIV-1 Lai/LAV; the contaminated culture (M2T-/B) was sent to LTCB in September 1983^6,7. Our goals were to determine which HIV-1 variants were present in the samples and the sequence diversity among HIV-1 isolates from the earliest stages of the AIDS epidemic. We examined archival specimens and report here the detection of six novel HIV-1 sequences in the cultures used to establish the pool: none is closely related to HIV-1 Lai/IIIB. A sample derived from patient LAI contained variants of both HIV-1 Lai/IIIB and HIV-1 Lai/LAV, and a sequence identical to a variant of HIV-1 Lai/IIIB was detected in the contaminated M2T-/B culture. We conclude that the pool, and probably another LTCB culture, MoV, were contaminated between October 1983 and early 1984 by variants of HIV-1 Lai from the M2T-/B culture. Therefore, the origin of the HIV-1 Lai/IIIB isolate also was patient LAI.INFECTION of CD4^+ T cells by human immune deficiency virus-1 (HIV-1) causes severe dysfunction of cellular immunity^1–3, but paradoxically results in intense polyclonal activation of B cells, possibly accounting for both hypergammaglobulinaemia and frequent development of B-cell malignancies seen in HIV-infected patients^4–7. We have reported that human CD4^+ T-cell clones infected with HIV in vitro markedly stimulate immunoglobulin synthesis by B cells through a non-cognate, contact-dependent mechanism^8. We show here that HIV-infected T-cell clones do not express the CD40 ligand (CD40L), a molecule critical for non-cognate B-cell activation^9, but a small proportion of them do express membrane tumour-necrosis factor (TNF)-α. The ability of HIV-infected T-cell clones to induce polyclonal B-cell activation appears to be restricted to TNF-α-positive T blasts and is inhibited by antibodies against both TNF-α and TNF-α receptor. Freshly isolated CD4^+ T cells from HIV-infected individuals express TNF-α on the cell membrane and induce TNF-α-mediated immunoglobulin production by B cells. Thus, membrane TNF-α seems to be involved in the polyclonal B-cell activation induced by HIV-infected T cells.TISSUE-SPECIFIC homing of lymphocytes is regulated by interac-tions with the endothelium of specialized venules, such as the high endothelial venules (HEY) in lymph nodes and mucosal Ivmphoid tissues^1–3. The mucosal vascular addressin, a 58–66K glycoprotein adhesion receptor for lymphocytes, is selectively expressed on HEV of mucosal lymphoid organ and on lamina propria venules and helps direct lymphocyte traffic to these mucosal tissues^4,5. We now report the isolation of a complementary DNA that, on transfection into COS cells, encodes immunoreactive addressin that specifically binds the mucosal HEV-binding T-cell lymphoma TK1. The predic-ted amino-acid sequence defines the mucosal addressin as a novel immunoglobulin family member, MAdCAM-1, with two amino-terminal domains that display strong homology to previously described vascular adhesion receptors for leukocytes, ICAM-1 (ref. 6) and VCAM-1 (ref. 7). The membrane proximal domain is homologous to the third domain (Cα2) of another mucosa-associ-ated immunoglobulin family member, IgA1 (refs 8,9). In addition to the immunoglobulin domains, there is a erine/threonine-rich region which may serve as a backbone to present carbohydrate ligands to lymphocytes. MAdCAM-1 is thus a complex multi-domain receptor displaying several structural motifs that may participate in lymphocyte homing interactions.MULTIPLE endocrine neoplasia type 2A (MEN 2A) is a dominantly inherited cancer syndrome that affects tissues derived from neural ectoderm. It is characterized by medullary thyroid carcinoma (MTC) and phaeochromocytoma^l. The MEN2A gene has recently been localized by a combination of genetic and physical mapping techniques to a 480-kilobase region in chromosome 10qll.2 (refs 2,3). The DNA segment encompasses the RET proto-oncogene, a receptor tyrosine kinase gene expressed in MTC and phaeochromocytoma and at lower levels in normal human thyroid^4. This suggested RET as a candidate for the MEN2A gene. We have identified missense mutations of the RET proto-oncogene in 20 of 23 apparently distinct MEN 2A families, but not in 23 normal controls. Further, 19 of these 20 mutations affect the same conserved cysteine residue at the boundary of the RET extracellular and transmembrane domains.DIVERSE types of calcium channels in vertebrate neurons are important in linking electrical activity to transmitter release, gene expression and modulation of membrane excitability^1. Four classes of Ca^2+ channels (T, N, L and P-type) have been distinguished^2–6on the basis of their electrophysiological and pharmacological properties. Most of the recently cloned Ca^2+ channels^7–16 fit within this functional classification. But one major branch of the Ca^2+ channel gene family, including BII (ref. 15) and doe-1 (ref. 16), has not been functionally characterized. We report here the expression of doe-1 and show that it is a high-voltage-activated (HVA) Ca^2+ channel that inactivates more rapidly than previously expressed calcium channels. Unlike L-type or P-type channels, doe-1 is not blocked by dihydropyridine antagonists or the peptide toxin ω-Aga-IVA, respectively. In contrast to a previously cloned N-type channel^14, doe-1 block by ω-CTx-GVIA requires microm-olar toxin and is readily reversible. Unlike most HVA channels, doe-1 also shows unusual sensitivity to block by Ni^2+. Thus, doe-1 is an HVA Ca^2+ channel with novel functional properties. We have identified a Ca^2+ channel current in rat cerebellar granule neurons that resembles doe-1 in many kinetic and pharmacological features.ALTHOUGH anatomical and neurochemical studies suggest that endogenous opioids act as neurotransmitters^1–7, their roles in normal and pathophysiological regulation of synaptic transmission are not defined. Here we examine the actions of prodynorphin-derived opioid peptides in the guinea-pig hippocampus and show that physiological stimulation of the dynorphin-containing dentate granule cells can release endogenous dynorphins, which then activate κ_1 opioid receptors present in the molecular layer of the dentate gyrus. Activation of κ_1 receptors by either pharmacologically applied agonist or endogenously released peptide reduces excitatory transmission in the dentate gyrus, as shown by a reduction in the excitatory postsynaptic currents evoked by stimulation of the perforant path, a principal excitatory afferent. In addition, released dynorphin peptides were found to block the induction of long-term potentiation (LTP) at the granule cell-perforant path synapse. The results indicate that endogenous dynorphins function in this hippocampal circuit as retrograde, inhibitory neurotransmitters.VERTEBRATES and invertebrates both have GABA (γ-aminobutyric acid) as a major inhibitory neurotransmitter^1,2. GABA_A receptors in vertebrates assemble as heteromultimers to form an integral chloride ion channel^3. These receptors are targets for drugs and pesticides^4 and are also implicated in seizure-related diseases^5,6. Picrotoxinin (PTX) and cyclodiene insecticides are GABA_A receptor antagonists which competitively displace each other from the same binding site^7. Insects^8 and vertebrates^9 showing resistance to cyclodienes also show cross-resistance to PTX. Previously, we used a field-isolated Drosophila mutant Rdl (Resistant to dieldrin) ^10 insensitive to PTX and cyclodienes to clone a putative GABA receptor^11. Here we report the functional expression and novel pharmacology of this GABA receptor and examine the functionality of a resistance-associated point mutation (alanine to serine) within the second membrane-spanning domain, the region thought to line the chloride ion channel pore. This substitution is found globally in Drosophila populations^12. This mutation not only identifies a single amino acid conferring high levels of resist-ance to the important GABA receptor antagonist PTX but also, by conferring resistance to cyclodienes, may account for over 60% of reported cases of insecticide resistance^13.Manual of Ornithology: Avian Structure and Function. By Noble S. Proctor and Patrick J. Lynch. Yale University Press: 1993. Pp. 340. £30, $45.RANDOM association of VL and VH repertoires contributes considerably to antibody diversity^1. The diversity and the affinity are then increased by hypermutation in B cells located in germinal centres^2. Except in the case of 'heavy chain' disease^3, naturally occurring heavy-chain antibodies have not been described, although antigen binding has been demonstrated for separated heavy chains^4 or cloned VH domains^5. Here we investigate the presence of considerable amounts of IgG-like material of M _r 100K in the serum of the camel ( Camelus dromedarius )^6. These molecules are composed of heavy-chain dimers and are devoid of light chains, but nevertheless have an extensive antigen-binding repertoire, a finding that calls into question the role of light chains in the camel. Camel heavy-chain IgGs lack CH1, which in one IgG class might be structurally replaced by an extended hinge. Heavy-chain IgGs are a feature of all camelids. These findings open new perspectives in the engineering of antibodies.IN May 1992 a joint survey by the Ministry of Forestry and World Wide Fund for Nature of the Vu Quang Nature Reserve, Ha tinh province, found three sets of long straight horns of a new bovid (Mammalia, Artiodactyla) in hunters' houses^1. None of the specimens had dentition. On four follow-up visits by Vietnamese scientists new specimens were discovered and surveys of forests in neighbouring Nghe an province revealed more localities and some partial specimens. In all, we have examined more than 20 specimens. Three have complete upper skulls and dentitions, two have lower jaws and dentitions. Three complete skins have been collected. The specimens are distinct in appearance, morphology and DNA sequence and cannot be ascribed to any known genus. Only two bovid genera are known from this part of Asia, Bos and Naemorhedus = Capricornis ^2,3. A new genus and species are therefore described. Such a discovery is of great significance. It has been more than 50 years since any comparable find of a large mammal species has been made; the last being the kouprey Bos = Novibos sauveli , another Indochinese bovid (Urbain, 1937). Moreover, the bovids (cattle, goats and antelopes) are a mammal family of great value to mankind. Many species have proven or potential value for domestication or cross-breeding. A three-month field study is planned to observe the living animal.The annual AIDS conferences should be replaced by more effective channels of communication.THE ^18O/^16O ratio in atmospheric CO_2 is a signal dominated by CO_2 exchange with the terrestrial biosphere and it has considerable potential to resolve the current importance of the oceans and individual terrestrial biomes as net sinks for anthropogenic CO_2. Fractionation of the oxygen isotopes of CO_2 occurs in plants owing to differential diffusion of C^18O^16O and C^16O_2 and to isotope effects in oxygen exchange with chloroplast water. Kere we investigate the consequences of these effects for the global distribution of oxygen isotopes in CO_2. We predict that ^18O isotopic exchange fluxes, especially between the atmosphere and terrestrial biosphere, are large, with considerable spatial variation. Near 70° N, where precipitation (and soil water) is most depleted in ^18O, photosynthesis and respiration both deplete the atmospheric CO_2 of O. This provides an explanation for the depletion of ^18O in atmospheric CO_2 at high northern latitudes^1.NEUTROPHIL recruitment into tissues is a multistep process involving sequential engagement of adhesion molecules, including selectins (E,P,L), which are reactive with oligosaccharides, and the family of (β2 integrins which are reactive with endothelial intercellular adhesion molecules^1–3. These processes result in the initial rolling of leukocytes along the endothelial surfaces, followed by the firm attachment of leukocytes to the endothelium. The intravenous infusion of cobra venom factor into rats results in acute lung injury that is neutrophil-dependent, oxygen radical mediated and P-selectin-dependent^4,5. Here we report that infusion of sialyl-Lewis X, a ligand for P-selectin^6–9, dramatically reduced lung injury and diminished the tissue accumulation of neutrophils, whereas irrelevant oligosaccharides had no such effects. These results suggest that sialyl-Lewis X carbohydrates may be used as a new strategy for anti-inflammatory therapy.EVIDENCE that carbon monoxide can serve as an intercellular messenger in brain^1–3, a role much like that demonstrated for nitric oxide in various tissues^4, prompted us to investigate whether carbon monoxide participates in long-term potentiation (LTP), the cellular mechanism that may underlie certain forms of learning and memory. Although LTP is triggered in the postsynaptic neuron, at least some fraction of LTP is expressed presynaptically as an increase in the quantity of neurotransmitter released^5–14. Thus, a retrograde signal must form the communication link between the postsynaptic site of induction and the presynaptic site of expression. To test whether carbon monoxide might act as a retrograde signal in LTP, we have investigated the effect on LTP of inhibitors of the enzyme haem oxygenase-2, which catalyses the production of carbon monoxide in the brain. We find that these inhibitors prevent the induction of LTP and have no effect on one form of long-term depression. Furthermore, they will reverse LTP that is already established.UPLIFT of the Tibetan plateau about 7–8 Myr ago^1,2 may have been responsible^3–5 for the apparent intensification of the Asian monsoon ^6–10 around that time. Increases in the oceanic ^87Sr/^86Sr ratio during the Neogene period have been attributed^11,12 to increased erosion from the Himalayan orogen. It has been suggested that the monsoonal intensification may have enhanced overall erosion rates in the region^5,13. If this were the case, sediment accumulation rates would have increased in the surrounding basins at this time. Here we present a reanalysis of stratigraphic data from the Indo-Gangetic foreland and the Bengal fan, which demonstrates that both of these basins experienced a decline in sediment-accumulation rates 8 Myr ago. Thus it seems that monsoonal intensification was accompanied by a decrease in mechanical weathering. This decrease could be due to reduced tectonic activity, decreased Himalayan glaciation or slope stabilization from dense plant cover.SINCE the discovery in 1977 of sea-floor hydrothermal systems, the study of the chemistry of the venting fluids has transformed our understanding of the geochemical cycles that influence the composition of sea water and the ocean crust. With few exceptions (Guaymas basin being the most notable), the vent systems studied so far are free of sedimentary influence and the chemistry of the fluids can be explained on the basis of interactions between sea water and basalt. Such fluids typically contain low methane concentrations, ranging from 50 to 120 μM (refs 1–7), and ammonium concentrations less than 10 μM (ref. 8). Here we report CH_4 and NH_4^+ concentrations from the Endeavour segment of the Juan de Fuca Ridge which are many times greater than those measured previously at any unsedimented mid-ocean ridge. The ^13C/^12C ratio of this CH_4 is the lowest yet found in any hydrothermal environment, implying an unusual source. We attribute these high CH_4 and NH_4^+ concentrations to the decomposition of sub-sea-floor organic matter associated with sediments buried at an earlier stage of the ridge's evolution. These data illustrate that the organic geochemistry of unsedimented ridges may be more complex than suspected hitherto.MOLECULES that perform logic operations are prerequisites for molecular information processing and computation^1–11. We^12,13 and others^14–16 have previously reported receptor molecules that can be considered to perform simple logic operations by coupling ionic bonding or more complex molecular-recognition processes with photonic (fluorescence) signals: in these systems, chemical binding (the 'input') results in a change in fluorescence intensity (the 'output') from the receptor. Here we describe a receptor (molecule (1) in Fig. 1) that operates as a logic device with two input channels: the fluorescence signal depends on whether the molecule binds hydrogen ions, sodium ions or both. The input/output characteristics of this molecular device correspond to those of an AND gate.THE weak extended X-ray source at the Galactic Centre has so far lacked a reasonable explanation. Measurements of this roughly elliptical source from the Ginga satellite revealed^1 emission in the 6.7-keV line of ionized iron, indicating that the X-rays originate in an optically thin plasma. But to account for the hard X-ray spectrum, this plasma needs to be very hot — too hot, in fact, to be confined by the gravitational potential of the Galactic Centre^2. We have recently shown^3 that the morphology of the emitting region changes at energies above 11 keV: the source becomes extended in the galactic plane, resembling the distribution of the molecular gas clouds in this region. Here we report the detection of a pronounced absorption feature in the emission spectrum in the energy range 8–11 keV. This result, combined with the changing spatial distribution, suggests that the high-energy emissions arise from the scattering of X-rays from the nearby compact sources by the dense molecular clouds. As no comparable absorption feature is seen at lower energies, the softer X-ray emissions may still be understood in terms of thermal emission from a plasma, but the required temperature is no longer unreasonably high.The three-dimensional structure of the class II histocompatibility glycoprotein HLA-DR^1 from human B-cell membranes has been determined by X-ray crystallography and is similar to that of class I HLA. Peptides are bound in an extended conformation that projects from both ends of an 'open-ended' antigen-binding groove. A prominent non-polar pocket into which an 'anchoring' peptide side chain fits is near one end of the binding groove. A dimer of the class II αβ heterodimers is seen in the crystal forms of HLA-DR1, suggesting class II HLA dimerization as a mechanism for initiating the cytoplasmic signalling events in T-cell activation.Primitive meteorites contain grains of silicon carbide, graphite and diamond formed outside the Solar System and probably before its birth. The isotopic compositions of these grains provide a record of stellar nucleosynthesis and of condensation processes near carbon stars; the fact of their survival places constraints on conditions in the solar nebula and early Solar System. The search is now on for other surviving stellar condensates, such as nitrides and oxides.Biotic Interactions and Global Changes. Edited by Peter M. Kareiva, Joel G. Kingsolver and Raymond B. Huey. Sinauer: 1993. Pp. 480. $65, £58.95 (hbk); $32.95, £29.95 (pbk). Climate Change and Its Biological Consequences. By David M. Gates. Sinauer: 1993. Pp. 280. $18.95, £16.95 (pbk).The Biokinetics of Flying and Swimming. By Akira Azuma Springer: 1992. Pp. 265. DM280, £150, $198.The Golem: What Everyone Should Know About Science. By Harry M. Collins and Trevor Pinch. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 164. £±0.95, $19.95.Collected Works of A. M. Turing. 3 Volumes. By A. M. Turing. North-Holland: 1992/1993. Distributed by Elsevier.To have survived this far is a triumph, perhaps also an augury for the future, but Russian researchers remain anxious about the long-term future.A direct search for expanding trinucleotide repeat sequences has paid off with the identification of the latest disorder caused by this mechanism — spinocerebellar ataxia type 1.Featured this week — a fusion protein cleavage system, an enzyme immunoassay kit for the quantitative determination of 12(S)-hydroxyeicosatetraenoic acid levels and a new mRNA detection system.DESPITE almost a century of research, the mechanism of anaesthesia remains obscure and there is still no agreement on the location of the site(s) of action^1–7. Because the potencies of general anaesthetics increase in proportion to their solubility in olive oil, this led to a consensus that the site is within the cell membrane^8–10. This led to theories that lipid bilayer perturbation was the primary event, which was then transmitted to a membrane protein^11. But at the concentrations used clinically, such perturbations are small^3. A plausible site would be in or on ion channels at the synapse, where a number of modulatory effects have been described^6. A possible location for such a site would be at the protein–lipid interface^5,12,13. We report here that anaesthetics inhibit protein kinase C, a key component in signal transduction. The potency is a linear function of the octanol–water partition coefficient (the Meyer–Overton rule of anaesthesia). The effect was obtained in a lipid-free assay, implicating a hydrophobic site in the protein, supporting the contention that a (membrane) protein may be a target for anaesthetic interactions^14–17. In a lipid-dependent assay, a potential role of lipids in the protein-site model was demonstrated. The inhibition was absent in the isolated catalytic domain, suggesting that the site of inhibition is on the regulatory subunit, which is unique to protein kinase C.Soon, the European Commission's writ should run to higher education. Present arguments in France about the constitution of universities point to the need for a coherent European policy in the field.ALTHOUGH vitamin C is critical to human physiology^1–5, it is not clear how it is taken up into cells. The kinetics of cell and tissue accumulation of ascorbic acid in vitro indicate that the process is mediated by specific transporters at the cell membrane^6. Some experimental observations have linked the transport of ascorbic acid with hexose transport systems in mammalian cells, although no clear information is available regarding the specific role(s) of these transporters, if any, in this process^7–16. Here we use the Xenopus laevis oocyte expression system to show that the mammalian facilitative hexose transporters are efficient transporters of the oxidized form of vitamin C (dehydroascorbic acid). Two transport pathways, one with low affinity and one with high affinity for dehydroascorbic acid, were found in oocytes expressing the mammalian transporters, and these oocytes accumulated vitamin C against a concentration gradient when supplied with dehydroascorbic acid. We obtained similar results in experiments using normal human neutrophils. These observations indicate that mammalian facilitative hexose transporters are a physiologically significant pathway for the uptake and accumulation of vitamin C by cells, and suggest a mechanism for the accumulation of ascorbic acid against a concentration gradient.THE skeletal and cardiac isoforms^1 of the ryanodine receptor Ca^2+channel (RyRC) constitute the Ca^2+ release pathway in sarcoplasmic reticulum of skeletal and cardiac muscles, respectively ^2,3. A direct mechanical and a Ca^2+-triggered mechanism (Ca^2+-induced Ca^2+ release) have been respectively proposed to explain the in situ activation of Ca^2+ release in skeletal and cardiac muscle^4,5. In non-muscle cells, however, where the RyRC also participates in Ca^2+ signalling^6–11, the mechanism of RyRC activation is unknown. Cyclic adenosine 5′-diphosphoribose (cADPR)^12, which is present in many mammalian tissues^13, has been reported to induce Ca^2+ release from ryanodine-sensitive intracellular Ca^2+ stores in sea urchin eggs^14. Here we provide evidence that cADPR directly activates the cardiac but not the skeletal isoform of the RyRC. This, together with results on sea urchin eggs^14, suggests that cADPR is an endogenous activator of the non-skeletal type of RyRC and may thus have a role similar to inositol 1,4,5-trisphosphate^15 in Ca^2+ signalling.CHOLESTERYL ester transfer protein (CETP) is a plasma protein that mediates the exchange of neutral lipids among the lipoproteins^1–3. Because the principal core lipid of very-low-density lipoprotein (VLDL) is triglyceride and that of high-density lipoprotein (HDL) is cholesterol ester, CETP mediates a 'heteroexchange' of cholesterol ester for triglyceride between those lipoproteins. As a result, animals that express CETP tend to have higher VLDL and low-density lipoprotein (LDL) cholesterol levels, whereas those with no CETP activity tend to have high HDL cholesterol levels^2. Because VLDL and LDL are associated with the progression of atherosclerosis, and HDL are considered anti-atherogenic, CETP could be an 'atherogenic' protein, that is, given the other conditions required for atherosclerosis to develop, expression of CETP would accelerate the rate at which the arterial lesions progress. We report here that transgenic mice expressing CETP had much worse atherosclerosis than did non-expressing controls, and we suggest that the increase in lesion severity was due largely to CETP-induced alterations in the lipoprotein profile.THE NMDA ( N -methyl D-aspartate) receptors in the brain play a critical role in synaptic plasticity, synaptogenesis and excitotoxicity^1–3. Molecular cloning has demonstrated that NMDA receptors consist of several homologous subunits (NMDAR1, 2A–2D)^4–7. A variety of studies have suggested that protein phosphorylation of NMDA receptors may regulate their function^7–12 and play a role in many forms of synaptic plasticity such as long-term potentiation^13,14. We have examined the phosphorylation of the NMDA receptor subunit NMDAR1 (NR1) by protein kinase C (PKC) in cells transiently expressing recombinant NR1 and in primary cultures of cortical neurons. PKC phosphorylation occurs on several distinct sites on the NR1 subunit. Most of these sites are contained within a single alternatively spliced exon in the C-terminal domain, which has previously been proposed to be on the extracellular side of the membrane^4,5,15. These results demonstrate that alternative splicing of the NR1 messenger RNA regulates its phosphorylation by PKC, and that mRNA splicing is a novel mechanism for regulating the sensitivity of glutamate receptors to protein phosphorylation. These results also provide evidence that the C-terminal domain of the NR1 protein is located intracellularly, suggesting that the proposed transmembrane topology model for glutamate receptors may be incorrect.DEFINITIVE erythropoiesis in birds originates from stem cells that emerge in the splanchnopleural mesoderm near the embryonic aorta^1–4. The yolk sac is still generally held to be the unique provider of haematopoietic stem cells during mammalian ontogeny^5, although there may be an alternative intraembryonic source of stem cells in the mouse fetus^6,7. Here we search for a possible non-yolk-sac source of stem cells by grafting intraembryonic splanchnopleura from 10- to 18-somite mouse embryos into adult immunodeficient SCID mice. We find significant amounts of donor-derived serum IgM, normal numbers of IgM-secreting plasma cells, and the Bla (IgM^a_brightB220_dullCD5^+) cell subset to be fully reconstituted by donor progenitors 3 to 6 months after engraftment. The haematogenic capacity revealed in our experiments is present in a previously unrecognized site, the earliest described in the embryo, 12 hours before fetal liver colonization.IT is widely accepted that during murine embryogenesis, totipotent haematopoietic stem cells first originate in the yolk sac, then migrate to the fetal liver and finally colonize the bone marrow shortly before birth^1,2. This view is based on in vitro studies showing that yolk sac cells can differentiate into various haematopoietic lineages^1,3–7 and in vivo studies showing that yolk sac contains spleen colony-forming units (CFU-S) beginning at day 8 of gestation^1. However, some investigators have failed to find statistically significant numbers of CFU-S arising from day 9 yolk sac^3,8–11 and, although one group reported that yolk sac could repopulate the haematopoietic system of W mutant mice^2, others have failed to confirm yolk sac-derived repopulation of adults^3,12. In the avian and amphibian systems, the yolk sac gives rise only to early, transitory haematopoiesis whereas the definitive adult haematopoietic stem cells in these vertebrates are derived from the mesodermal region containing the dorsal aorta^13–17. Because this analogous area of the mouse embryo has not been previously examined for haematopoietic activity, we directly compared the CFU-S activity of the aorta, gonad, mesonephros (AGM) region with the yolk sac and fetal liver during embryogenesis. Here we report that this intra-embryonic AGM region contains CFU-S activity at a higher frequency than that in embryonic yolk sac and that such activity appears in the AGM region before the fetal liver.ION permeation through membrane channels is thought to be governed by a narrow region of the channel pore termed the selectivity filter^1, which has been proposed to discriminate among ions by both specific binding and molecular sieving, as determined by pore diameter. Recent evidence suggests that a conserved domain (known as H5, P or SS1-SS2) in voltage-gated potassium^2–8, sodium^9–13 and calcium ^12channels contributes to the lining of the pore. Here we investigate whether the H5 domain determines pore diameter and examine the role of pore diameter in controlling ion permeation. These studies rely on differences in single channel conductance, ion selectivity and apparent pore diameter between cyclic nucleotide-gated channels cloned from bovine retina^14 and catfish olfactory neurons^15. Using chimaeric retinal–olfactory channels, we find that the H5 domain determines these differences in permeation properties, providing structural evidence that the cyclic nucleotide-gated channels are indeed members of the voltage-gated channel family^15–17. Moreover, these results show directly that the H5 domain helps form the selectivity filter and that molecular sieving is important in controlling ion permeation.Gravitational Experiments in the Laboratory. By Y. T. Chen and Alan Cook. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 268. £40, $59.95.STUDIES of human auditory^1–3 and somatosensory^3 modalities have shown that there is an oscillatory response in the γ-band (at about 40 Hz) frequency which is elicited by either steady state^1–3 or transient^4 stimulation. The auditory 40-Hz response is generated at least partially in the auditory cortex^4,5as a result of thalamocortical interaction^6 and may serve perceptual integration^7,8 and conscious perception^9. A connection to selective attention has been implied in human^10 and animal^11 studies, although the evidence is inconclusive^12. Moreover, fundamental differences between the human and animal 40-Hz responses^13 prohibit generalization. Furthermore, most experiments have used steady-state stimulation during which the brain does not regain its resting state between stimuli as it does when transient stimulation is used^14. Here we study the effect of selective attention on the auditory γ-band (40-Hz) transient response using subjects listening to tone pips presented in one ear while ignoring a concurrent sequence of tone pips in the other ear. The 40-Hz response was larger when subjects paid attention to stimuli rather than ignored them. This attention effect was most pronounced over the frontal and central scalp areas. Our results demonstrate a physiological correlate of selective attention in the 40-Hz transient response in humans.THE Prisoner's Dilemma is the leading metaphor for the evolution of cooperative behaviour in populations of selfish agents, especially since the well-known computer tournaments of Axelrod^1 and their application to biological communities^2,3. In Axelrod's simulations, the simple strategy tit-for-tat did outstandingly well and subsequently became the major paradigm for reciprocal altruism^4 12. Here we present extended evolutionary simulations of heterogeneous ensembles of probabilistic strategies including mutation and selection, and report the unexpected success of another protagonist: Pavlov. This strategy is as simple as tit-for-tat and embodies the fundamental behavioural mechanism win-stay, lose-shift, which seems to be a widespread rule13. Pavlov's success is based on two important advantages over tit-for-tat: it can correct occasional mistakes and exploit unconditional cooperators. This second feature prevents Pavlov populations from being undermined by unconditional cooperators, which in turn invite defectors. Pavlov seems to be more robust than tit-for-tat, suggesting that cooperative behaviour in natural situations may often be based on win-stay, lose-shift.THE strong partitioning of cobalt and nickel from silicate melts into solid silicate and metal phases^1–3 during the large-scale fractionation processes that took place early in Earth history^4–9 determines their abundance in mantle-derived magmas and in the metallic core. The global distributions of these elements have therefore been used to constrain models of the Earth's chemical evolution^4–8, as well as that of the Moon^10,11. But in virtually all model calculations^4,6,7,10,11 the effect of pressure on partitioning has been neglected — these models have used partition coefficients determined at very low pressures. Here we present crystal-field spectra of doped silicate glasses quenched from high-pressure, high-temperature melts, which show that the coordination of cobalt and nickel ions in silicate melts changes at high pressures. Our results suggest that the partitioning of these species into the melt phase increases markedly with pressure, such that the crystal/melt and metal/melt partition coefficients decrease by more than an order of magnitude at lower-mantle conditions.THE Tibetan plateau has had a central role in the development of recent models for the mechanics of mountain belts^1,2 and Cenozoic global climate change^3. The present elevation and extensional deformation of the plateau probably result from uplift owing to convective thinning of the underlying lithospheric mantle^1,2. An age for the uplift would provide a valuable constraint on these models; but because recently proposed indicators of uplift are all climate-dependent, they are equivocal, possibly reflecting global cooling rather than regional uplift^4. Here we present new geochemical data on post-mid-Miocene lavas from the plateau, which show that the lavas were derived from the lithospheric mantle. Simple thermal arguments indicate that the generation of such magmas also necessitates thinning of the lithospheric mantle. Thus volcanism is coincident with uplift, providing a climate-independent means of dating the onset of uplift. Dating by the laser ^40Ar/^39Ar technique places the beginning of this volcanism, and therefore the time of uplift of the Tibetan plateau, at 13 Myr ago.Alison Abbott and Declan Butler compare and contrast the cases of Germany and France. What is it like to work in these two very different countries?New products in the field of spectroscopy include a fluorescence spectrophotometer for routine assays, ultraviolet/visible range systems, and ultra micro cells for 0.5 μl volume.THE protein TFIIB is a general transcription initiation factor^1 that interacts with a promoter complex (D·DNA) containing the TATA-binding subunit (TFIIDτ, or TBP) of TFIID to facilitate subsequent interaction with RNA polymerase II (ref. 2) through the associated TFIIF (ref. 3). The potential bridging function^2,4 of TFIIB raises the possibility of two structural domains and emphasizes the importance of TFIIB structure–function studies for a further understanding of preinitiation complex assembly and function^1. Here we show that human TFIIB (refs 5,6) is comprised of functionally distinct N- and C-terminal domains. The C-terminal domain, containing the direct repeats and associated basic regions, is necessary and sufficient for interaction with the D·DNA complex. By contrast, the N-terminal domain that is dispensable for formation of the TFIIDτ–TFIIB–promoter (D·B·DNA) complex is required for subsequent events leading to basal transcription initiation. On the basis of these results, we discuss structural and functional similarities between TFIIB and TFIIDτ, which have similar structural organization and motifs^5.How eukaryotic promoter-specific activator proteins (activators) stimulate transcription is a central question. We have previously shown that an acidic activator can directly interact with the general transcription factor TFIIB and increase its stable assembly into a preinitiation complex^1,2. We have proposed that this increase in TFIIB assembly is at least part of the mechanism by which an acidic activator functions^1,2. A prediction of this hypothesis is that a TFIIB mutant unable to interact with an acidic activator could not support activated transcription, and here we present experiments that verify this prediction. In conjunction with previous studies, our results argue that interaction between an acidic activator and TFIIB is necessary for transcriptional activation.Hemispheric Asymmetry: What's Right and What's Left. By Joseph B. Hellige. Harvard University Press: 1993. Pp. 396. $41.95, £27.95.IN most species, including the fission yeast Schizosaccharomyces pombe , the Cdc2/cyclin B mitosis-inducing kinase is maintained in an inhibited state during interphase as a result of phosphorylation of a tyrosine residue in the ATP-binding region of Cdc2 (refs 1–3). This site is phosphorylated by Wee1 kinase^4–9 and dephosphorylated by Cdc25 phosphatase^10–15. In fission yeast an additional element of the G2/M control Nim1/Cdr1 kinase, has been identified which functions as a potent mitotic inducer^16,17. These studies suggested that Nim1 acts by inhibiting Wee1, perhaps by direct phosphorylation. Consistent with this model, we report here that Wee1 is hyperphosphorylated in cells that overproduce Nim1. Likewise, Wee1 phosphorylation is reduced in nim1 ^− cells. Highly purified Nim1 kinase phosphorylates Wee1 in vitro , resulting in strong inhibition of Wee1 kinase. These observations show that Nim1 promotes the onset of mitosis by inhibiting Wee1.THE G2-M phase transition in eukaryotes is regulated by the synergistic and opposing activities of a cascade of distinct protein kinases and phosphatases. This cascade converges on Cdc2, a serine/threonine protein kinase required for entry into mitosis (reviewed in ref. 1). In the fission yeast Schizosaccharomyces pombe , inactivation of the Cdc2/cyclin B complex is achieved by phosphorylation of tyrosine 15 by Weel (refs 2, 3). The action of the Weel kinase is opposed by the action of the Cdc25 phosphatase, which dephosphorylates Cdc2 on tyrosine 15, thereby activating the Cdc2/cyclin B complex^4–9. Much less is known about the regulatory signals upstream of cdc25 and wee1 . Genetics indicate that the mitotic inducer nim1/cdr1 acts upstream of wee1 , possibly as a negative regulator of wee1 (refs 10, 11). To characterize the nim1/cdr1 protein (Nim1), we have overproduced it in both bacterial and baculoviral expression systems. We report that Nim1 possesses intrinsic serine-kinase, threonine-kinase and tyrosine-kinase activities. Co-expression of the Nim1 and Wee1 kinases in insect cells results in the phosphorylation of Weel and therefore a shift in its electrophoretic mobility on SDS–polyacrylamide gels. When Weel is phosphorylated, its ability to phosphorylate Cdc2 on tyrosine 15 is inhibited; treatment with phosphatase restores this kinase activity. Furthermore, purified bacterially produced Nim1 kinase directly phosphorylates and inactivates Weel in vitro . These results show that nim1/cdr1 functions as a positive regulator of mitosis by directly phosphorylating and inactivating the mitotic inhibitor Weel.DURING normal fetal ontogeny, one of the first organs to harbour CD4-positive cells is the thymus^1. This organ could therefore be one of the earliest targets infected by human immunodeficiency virus type 1 (HIV-1) in utero. HIV-1-infected cells and pathological abnormalities of the thymus have been seen in HIV-1-infected adults and children, and in some fetuses aborted from infected women^2–5. Studies of HIV-1 pathogenesis have been hampered by lack of a suitable animal model system. Here we use the SCID-hu mouse^6 as a model to investigate the effect of virus infection on human tissue. The mouse is homozygous for the severe combined immunodeficiency (SCID) defect^7,8. The model is constructed by implanting human fetal liver and thymus under the mouse kidney capsule. A conjoint human organ develops, which allows normal maturation of human thymocytes. After direct inoculation of HIV-1 into these implants, we observed severe depletion of human CD4-bearing cells within a few weeks of infection. This correlated with increasing virus load in the implants. Thus the SCID-hu mouse may be a useful in vivo system for the study of HIV-1-induced pathology.HUMAN immunodeficiency virus (HIV) disease is typified by declining CD4^+ T lymphocyte counts in the peripheral circulation, a loss which may be secondary to accelerated destruction, to suppressed differentiation, and/or to sequestration of circulating cells into tissue spaces. As it is hard to distinguish between these possibilities in human subjects, the pathogenic mechanisms associated with HIV infection are unclear. In particular, little is known about the events that occur within infected lymphoid organs in which most CD4 T lymphocytes mature and function^1,2. To obtain a better description of HIV pathogenesis in vivo , we have implanted human haematolymphoid organs into the immunodeficient SCID mouse to create the SCID-hu mouse^3,4. We have previously shown that these organ systems promote long-term multilineage human haematopoiesis and are permissive for infection with HIV^5,6. Here we report that human thymopoiesis is suppressed by HIV infection, thereby precluding regeneration of the peripheral T-cell compartment.EFFICIENT egress of major histocompatibility complex (MHC) class I molecules from the endoplasmic reticulum (ER) depends on peptide binding^1–7. For MHC class II molecules, invariant chain (Ii) promotes ER exit of newly assembled, peptide-free dimers^8–14. This raises the question of whether a mechanism exists elsewhere in the cell that dictates selective expression of peptide-associated class II molecules. We report here that dissociation of MHC class II–Ii complexes at low pH and physiological temperature leads to inclusion of empty class II in protein aggregates, and that this aggregation is specifically prevented by peptide binding. Combined with data showing that antigen exposure increases cell surface class II expression on living cells by a post-translational mechanism^12, these results provide evidence for peptide-dependent intracellular editing of class II dimers, which limits surface expression of empty molecules unsuitable for antigen-specific T-cell activation.THE fragile X syndrome is the most frequent form of inherited mental retardation after Down's syndrome, having an incidence of one in 1,250 males^1,2. The fragile X syndrome results from amplification of the CGG repeat found in the FMR-1 gene^3–6. This CGG repeat shows length variation in normal individuals and is increased significantly in both carriers and patients^3–6; it is located 250 base pairs distal to a CpG island^6 which is hypermethylated in fragile X patients^4–7. The methylation probably results in downregulation of FMR-1 gene expression^8. No information can be deduced about the function of the FMR-1 protein from its predicted sequence. Here we investigate the nature and function of the protein encoded by the FMR-1 gene using polyclonal antibodies raised against the predicted amino-acid sequences. Four different protein products, possibly resulting from alternative splicing, have been identified by immunoblotting in lymphoblastoid cell lines of healthy individuals. All these proteins were missing in cell lines from patients not expressing FMR-1 messenger RNA. The intracellular localization of the FMR-1 gene products was investigated by transient expression in COS-1 cells and found to be cytoplasmic. Localization was also predominantly cytoplasmic in the epithelium of the oesophagus, but in some cells was obviously nuclear.THE origin of the broad interstellar infrared emission bands (at 3.3, 6.2, 7.8, 8.6 and 11.3 μ m) found in the vicinity of many galactic and extragalactic sources is still poorly understood. The original suggestion^1 that the bands are associated with aromatic species embedded in small carbon particles was later challenged by the proposal^2 that they originate from vapour-phase, neutral polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons (PAHs); Allamandola et al . independently argued^3 that PAH cations are the source of the bands. This latter proposal has steadily gained acceptance, but the lack of experimentally determined emission spectra of PAH cations has made it difficult to test the idea. We have recently measured the visible and infrared spectra of the neutrals and cations of four PAHs—naphthalene^4, anthracene^5, pyrene^6 and perylene^7—dispersed in argon matrices at 12 K, to approximate the low-pressure, gas-phase conditions of the interstellar medium. Here we compare the infrared absorption from these four molecules (neutrals and cations), integrated over the spectral regions corresponding to the interstellar bands, with the astronomical observations. We find that the interstellar bands cannot be explained solely on the basis of neutral PAH species, but that cations must be a significant, and in some cases dominant, component.Crystal structures of haloalkane dehalogenase were determined in the presence of the substrate 1,2-dichloroethane. At pH 5 and 4 °C, substrate is bound in the active site without being converted; warming to room temperature causes the substrate's carbon–chlorine bond to be broken, producing a chloride ion with concomitant alkylation of the active-site residue Asp_124. At pH 6 and room temperature the alkylated enzyme is hydrolysed by a water molecule activated by the His_289–Asp_260 pair in the active site. These results show that catalysis by the dehalogenase proceeds by a two-step mechanism involving an ester intermediate covalently bound at Asp_124.PLASTICITY is a property of the nervous system that allows it to modify its response to an altered input. This capacity for change suggests that there are molecular mechanisms in neurons that can couple stimuli to long-term alterations in phenotype^1–3. Neuronal excitation elicits rapid transcriptional activation of several immediate–early genes^4, for example c-fos, c-jun and zif268 . Many immediate–early genes encode transcription factors that control expression of downstream genes whose products are believed to bring about long-term plastic changes^3,4. Here we use a highly sensitive differential complementary DNA cloning procedure to identify genes that may participate in long-term plasticity. We cloned 52 cDNAs of genes induced by the glutamate analogue kainate in the hippocampus dentate gyrus. The number of these candidate plasticity-related genes (CPGs) is estimated to be 500–1,000. One of the cloned CPGs ( 16C8 ), encoding a protease inhibitor, is induced by a stimulus producing long-term potentiation and during dentate gyrus development; a second, cpgl , is dependent on activation of the NMDA ( N -methyl-D-aspartate) receptor for induction and encodes a new small, dentate-gyrus-specific protein. Seventeen of the cloned CPGs encode known proteins, including six suggesting that strong neuronal activation leads to de novo synthesis of vesicular and other synaptic components.TRANSFORMATION of the well-studied maize transposable elements into other plant species^1 should enable transposon tagging methodology^2 to be used for the isolation of interesting genes in the heterologous host. Here we describe the isolation of a transposon-tagged male sterile mutant in Arabidopsis thaliana using the maize Enhancer–Inhibitor ^3,4 transposable element system introduced into Arabidopsis . The mutant lacks pollen, preventing normal self-fertilization, a characteristic important for production of hybrid seed in many crop plants. We have identified an Enhancer -transposase-mediated Inhibitor element insertion responsible for the male sterile phenotype, and isolated the corresponding gene named MALE STERILITY 2 . Critical evidence that the Inhibitor -element-containing gene is involved in the male sterile phenotype is provided by the DNA sequences of new excision-derived alleles from independent stable fertile and male sterile progeny of the original mutant.THE compositions of magmas produced by decompression melting of upwelling mantle rocks are sensitive to the extent and mean pressure of melting; these, in turn, depend respectively on the depth at which the solidus is encountered^1,2 and on the thickness of the lithosphere, which provides a barrier to upwelling mantle^2,3. Here we report major- and trace-element data for lavas erupted during rifting of the Greenland–European continent ∼60 Myr ago, which show a trend to higher extents of melting at lower pressures as rifting proceeded. We attribute these changes to progressive thinning of the continental litho-sphere during the initial phase of magmatism. Our analysis also shows that mantle melting began well within the garnet stability field, supporting previous suggestions^4–8 that anomalously hot mantle was present beneath the region at the time of rifting. The modest extents of melting that we infer for the earliest rift lavas can largely account for their high contents of incompatible elements, thus reducing the degree of geochemical enrichment ('plume-like' character) required in the mantle source region.Initially envisaged as rather unreactive, aromatic-like molecules, the fullerenes instead undergo a wide variety of reactions characteristic of alkenes. The many derivatives of C_60, and the few of C_70, that have now been reported offer new directions for organic chemistry.Archibald Garrod and the Individuality of Man. By Alexander G. Bearn. Oxford University Press: 1993. Pp. 227. á£35, $65.To a Rocky Moon: A Geologist's History of Lunar Exploration. By Don E. Wilhelms. University of Arizona Press: 1993. Pp. 477. $29.95, á£26.99.The Second Culture: British Science in Crisis — The Scientists Speak Out. By Clive Cavendish Rassam. Aurum: 1993. Pp. 242. £16.95.PHYTOPLANKTON production in the surface waters of stratified oceans is fed mainly by nitrogen that has been recycled within the euphotic zone^1. The nitrogen that is lost from surface waters as organic matter exported to the deep ocean must be balanced by inputs of new nitrogen to the upper ocean^2,3. Sediment trap studies^2 have shown that the ^15N/^14N ratio (δ^15N) of the exported organic matter is higher than that of the suspended particulates, and suggest that the rich nitrate pool below the euphotic zone is the source of 'new' nitrogen for the upper ocean. Yet steep vertical concentration gradients suggest that diffusive upward transport of nitrate is extremely limited, raising the question of how the nitrate reaches the surface waters. Here we present evidence that abundant diatom ( Rhizosolenia ) mats migrate vertically between surface waters and deep nitrate pools in the central North Pacific Ocean. Rising mats contain significantly larger internal nitrate pools than sinking mats. Mat δ^15N is similar to that of the sub-nitricline nitrate, and consistently heavier than that of near-surface particulate organic matter. We conclude that Rhizosolenia mats may transport the equivalent of 50% of the new nitrogen requirements into the surface waters of the North Pacific gyre.PREDYNASTIC occupation of the Nile valley and delta, dating back to at least 5000 BC, has been attributed by most archaeologists to environmental factors, primarily regional climate change and fluctuating Nile flood stages^1–5. Here we propose instead that initiation of farming settlements in the Nile delta was closely related to eustatic sea level. We present geological analyses of late Quaternary subsurface sections throughout the delta which reveal that the deceleration in sea-level rise that occurred at about 6500–5500 BC was a prime factor in the accumulation of Nile silt, and the creation of the widespread and fertile delta plain. As rising sea level reduced the gradient of the river course, a system of meandering Nile distributaries evolved, with increased overbank deposition burying the former (early Holocene), partially vegetated sandy plain. The broadening, seasonally flooded, fecund plain, with its increasing plant cover, provided a setting that was conducive to evolving agricultural activity and was therefore instrumental in the development of Predynastic communities in the Nile delta.ELECTRIC-field-induced evaporation of ions from a needle-like surface, and their subsequent identification by time-of-flight mass spectrometry, forms the basis of the atom-probe technique^1. This has proved to be a powerful analytical tool^2,3, permitting the quantitative determination of material composition in a small selected region of the surface (depths of 1–5 nm) with single-layer resolution. Positional information for the atoms within each layer is lost, however. In contrast, the field-ion microscope^3 provides atomic-resolution images of surfaces, but without information about the nature of the atoms. Several attempts have been made to combine these two techniques by extending the time-of-flight measurement into two dimensions, but they have been limited by their inability to identify all chemical species^4 or to combine spatial and temporal information for multiple events^5, especially for ions with very similar mass-to-charge ratios^6. Here we make use of a recently developed^7 multiple-impact detector to construct a position-sensitive atom probe with sufficiently high temporal resolution (of the order of 10 ns) to avoid these earlier problems; thus, reliable composition and position data can be obtained at the same time. We illustrate the performance of this instrument by imaging the three-dimensional distribution of chemical heterogeneities in a nickel-based alloy on a near-atomic scale.DATA storage on magnetic and optical disks and in semiconducting devices is being achieved at ever higher areal densities^1,2. The use of the scanning tunnelling microscope (STM) for both data storage and nanofabrication has been explored recently^3–9. These approaches use the STM tip to produce nanometre-scale marks or structures on a surface, sometimes with atomic precision. Most studies have, however, neglected erasure of recorded marks (an exception is described in ref. 10), despite the fact that erasure is essential for any practical recording device. Here we demonstrate the use of the STM for reproducible and reversible recording and erasing of marks about 10 nm in size. These are written at ambient temperature and pressure onto the surface of a composite medium consisting of a thin layer of a vanadate glass deposited on vanadium bronze, β-Na_ x V_2O_5. The present recording speed of 1 ms is several orders of magnitude too slow for practical applications; this remains a challenge for future study.THE high abundance ratio of deuterium to hydrogen in the atmosphere of Venus (120 times that on Earth) can he interpreted either as the signature of a lost primordial ocean^1, or of a steady state in which water is continuously supplied to the surface of Venus by comets or volcanic outgassing, balancing loss through hydrogen escape^2,3. New observations^4–6 of a water concentration of only 30 parts per million in Venus' atmosphere imply that the residence time of water in the atmosphere, before it escapes to space, is short compared with the age of the Solar System, casting doubt on the primordial ocean hypothesis. But a recent theoretical reanalysis of collisional ejection^7 has increased estimates of the deuterium escape efficiency by a factor of 10: this means that if the venusian water budget is in steady state, the D/H ratio of the source water must be 10–15 times higher than that on Earth, ruling out cometary water, whose D/H ratio is thought to be lower than this^8. Here I suggest that these observations can be understood either as the result of continuous outgassing from a highly fractionated mantle source (such as might result from severe dessication of the mantle, or massive hydrogen escape early in the planet's history) or Rayleigh fractionation after massive outgassing from catastrophic resurfacing of the planet in the past 0.5–1 Gyr.SOLAR flares are closely associated with magnetic activity on the surface of the Sun. They typically occur^1 in complex sunspot groups, where the vertical magnetic fields reverse abruptly, and the horizontal (transverse) fields connecting the vertical poles are both sheared and strong. A single field inversion line may be the site of many flares^1. Here we report observations of a large, active sunspot group which reveal a series of oppositely directed vertical-field inversions separated by extremely narrow elongated channels of intense horizontal fields. In a minimum-energy configuration, lines of force connecting oppositely directed vertical fields simply arch across the inversion line; but when newly emerged sunspots move through older magnetic-field configurations, the poles are pushed together and the field lines turn sharply along the inversion line to reconnect with the vertical field some distance away. These multiple channels of horizontal field imply a large curl term (▿×B), and hence a substantial electric current. Our observations show that almost all of the larger flares in this region occur in these highly convoluted fields.CATACLYSMIC variables are interacting binary stellar systems containing a main-sequence secondary component and a collapsed primary component, usually a white dwarf. A subset of these systems give rise to classical novae, in which an explosive outburst caused by 'runaway' thermonuclear processes on the surface of the white dwarf produces a large increase in visual magnitude and the ejection of substantial quantities of stellar material^1. Radio emission has been detected from several classical novae^17, and is attributed to the thermal bremsstrahlung mechanism operating within an isothermal, expanding shell of ionized gas. Such observations offer a means of directly probing the shells during the early stages of their evolution — long before they can be resolved by optical telescopes. Here we report radio observations of one of the brightest novae in recent years, Nova Cygni 92, using the MERLIN radiotelescope array. The structure of the shell is first resolved eighty days after the initial outburst, revealing nonspherical expansion and thermal electron temperatures that rapidly exceed the expected value for a radiatively excited hydrogen plasma. We explain the observed temperatures by means of a model in which the gas is heated in shocks produced by the thermonuclear runaway.So far, the experimentalists have had the most fun from fullerenes, but now the theorists are catching up. Not before time, for they have to live down the shame of not having predicted them.One of the persistent controversies that surfaces in the media about AIDS is whether the heterosexual population is at risk. The latest projections provide an emphatic affirmative.The past year has seen many controversies about AIDS research and researchers. What productive events have occurred, and what is likely to happen in the next year?Two potent inhibitors based on the crystal structure of influenza virus sialidase have been designed. These compounds are effective inhibitors not only of the enzyme, but also of the virus in cell culture and in animal models. The results provide an example of the power of rational, computer-assisted drug design, as well as indicating significant progress in the development of a new therapeutic or prophylactic treatment for influenza infection.Making only the assumption that you are a random intelligent observer, limits for the total longevity of our species of 0.2 million to 8 million years can be derived at the 95% confidence level. Further consideration indicates that we are unlikely to colonize the Galaxy, and that we are likely to have a higher population than the median for intelligent species.Bats: A Community Perspective. By J. S. Findley. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 167. £27.95, $44.95.Desert Geomorphology. By Ron Cooke, Andrew Warren and Andrew Goudie. UCL Press: 1993. Pp. 536. £75, $125 (hbk), £24.95, $59.95 (pbk).Climate System Modeling. Edited by K. E. Trenberth. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 788. £35, $49.95.Heisenberg's War: The Secret History of the German Bomb. By Thomas Powers. Knopf/Cape: 1993. Pp. 610. $27.50, £20.Oxford women have won an in proving that universities have a responsibility to foster their promotion.First news of the British Government's new policy for supporting science suggest that some of the proposed changes may be beneficial. But the new policy must be judged in the round, which is not yet possible.Making a splash this week — a new fluorescence electrophoresis system for carbohydrate profiling and analysis, transcription kits for capped RNA and a computer-controlled electrophoresis system.A computerized database, called TBASE, has been developed to organize and make available information on transgenic animals and targeted mutations by using resources at the Oak Ridge National Laboratory (ORNL) and Johns Hopkins University (JHU). The database is available through the JHU Computational Biology Gopher Server. To ensure that all interested users have access, several mechanisms will be installed to accommodate varying levels of telecommunication network connectivity.PHOSPHORYLATION of the heptapeptide repeats in the C-terminal domain (CTD) of the largest subunit of RNA polymerase II has been widely proposed as an essential step in transcription initiation^1–8 on the basis of findings indicating (1) that the CTDs of RNA polymerase II molecules actively engaged in transcription are highly phosphorylated^4,9,10; (2) that polymerase molecules containing non-phosphorylated CTDs preferentially enter the preinitiation complex^3,11,12 where they are subsequently phosphorylated^3,13; and (3) that essential initiation factors b from yeast^14–16, δ from rat^17,18, and BTF2(TFIIH) from human cells^19–21 have closely associated CTD-kinase activities. Here we take advantage of a highly purified enzyme system which supports both CTD phosphorylation and basal transcription to test this hypothesis directly. Using the isoquinoline sulphonamide derivative H-8, which is a potent inhibitor of CTD kinase, we show that basal transcription occurs in the absence of CTD phosphorylation.THE dependence of cell-cycle progression on the integrity of the genome has been described as checkpoint control^1,2. A number of mutants of the fission yeast Schizosaccharomyces pombe , selected for their sensitivity to DNA damage caused by radiation ( rad mutants) or to the DNA synthesis inhibitor hydroxyurea ( hus mutants) have been classified as checkpoint mutants because they fail to arrest the cell cycle in response to DNA damage or incompletely replicated DNA^3–6. Coupling of the checkpoint pathways that monitor DNA repair a'nd replication to control of the cell cycle is essential. In a search for components that interact with the cell-cycle regulatory kinase p34^ cdc2 , we have identified a novel fission yeast protein kinase homologue which is involved in cell-cycle arrest when DNA damage has occurred or when unligated DNA is present. We have called the gene encoding this protein chkl for checkpoint kinase. Multiple copies of chkl partially rescue the ultraviolet sensitivity of rad 1-1 , a mutant deficient in checkpoint control^3–5. Identification of a gene involved in check-point control as a rescue of a cdc2 mutant links the rad1-dependent DNA-damage-sensing pathway and p34^ cdc2 activity.THE Ras-related Rho subfamily of GTP-binding proteins (p21s), which includes Rho, Rac and Cdc42Hs, is implicated in different aspects of cytoskeletal organization^1,2. These proteins behave like Ras (p21^ ras ) in that their active GTP-bound form is inactivated by intrinsic hydrolysis of the nucleotide γ-phosphate, which can be stimulated by GTPase-activating proteins (GAPs). We have previously shown that there is a diversity of GAPs that recognize this subfamily^3, including n -chimaerin, which is enriched in the hippocampus^4; we also detected proteins that bind these p21 proteins and seem to inhibit GTP hydrolysis. We now report the characterization of a hippocampal complementary DNA encoding a tyrosine kinase that specifically binds Cdc42Hs in its GTP-bound form. This binding is mediated by a unique sequence of 47 amino acids C-terminal to an SH3 domain and inhibits both the intrinsic and GAP-stimulated GTPase activity of Cdc42Hs. Our findings indicate that there may be a regulatory mechanism that sustains the GTP-bound active form of Cdc42Hs and which is directly linked to a tyrosine phosphorylation pathway.LEUKAEMIA inhibitory factor (LIF) has a variety of effects on different cell types in vitro ^1, inhibiting the differentiation of embryonic stem cells^2,3 and promoting the survival and/or proliferation of primitive haematopoietic precursors^4,5 and primordial germ cells^6,7. Here we show that LIF-deficient mice derived by gene targeting techniques have dramatically decreased numbers of stem cells in spleen and bone marrow. Injection of spleen and marrow cells from these mice promotes long-term survival of lethally irradiated wild-type animals, however, showing that the LIF^− stem cells remain pluripotent. The numbers of committed progenitors are also reduced in the spleen but not the bone marrow, suggesting that stem cells interact differently with the splenic and medullary microenvironment. Heterozygous animals are intermediate in phenotype, implying that LIF has a dosage effect, and defects in stem cell number can be compensated by exogenous LIF. LIF thus appears to be required for the survival of the normal pool of stem cells, but not their terminal differentiation.THE majority ( ∼ 75%) of infant acute leukaemias have a reciprocal translocation between chromosome 11q23 and one of several partner chromosomes^1. The gene at 1lq23 (named MLL , ALL-1 , HRX or HTRX-1 ; refs 2–6) has been cloned and shares homology with the Drosophila developmental gene trithorax ^3–5. Rearrangements of this gene (called HRX here) occur in introns and cluster in a region of ∼ 10 kb; individual patients have different breakpoints^3–10. Here we describe three pairs of infant twins with concordant leukaemia who each share unique (clonal) but non-constitutive HRX rearrangements in their leukaemic cells, providing evidence that the leukaemogenic event originates in utero and unequivocal support for the intra-placental 'metastasis' hypothesis for leukaemia concordance in twins^11.How does cyclic AMP potentiate insulin secretion from pancreatic islet β -cells? This question is fundamental to understanding how hormones such as glucagon, which elevates cAMP^1, stimulate insulin secretion and so contribute to the normal secretory response of the islet^2,3. It is well established that a rise in the cytoplasmic Ca^2+ concentration ([Ca^2+]_i) is essential for insulin secretion^4 and therefore cAMP has been proposed to act by elevating [Ca^2+_i. But studies on permeabilized β -cells indicate that cAMP increases insulin release even when [Ca^2+]_i is held constant^5,6. We have used microfluorimetry and the patch-clamp technique to measure changes simultaneously in Ca^2+ currents, [Ca^2+]_i and exocytosis^7–9 in a single β -cell in response to cAMP. We show here that cAMP, through activation of protein kinase A, increases Ca2+-influx through voltage-dependent L-type Ca2+ channels, thereby elevating [Ca^2+]_i and accelerating exocytosis. More importantly, cAMP also promotes insulin release by a direct interaction with the secretory machinery, which accounts for as much as 80% of its effect.TRANSMITTER receptors are localized to discrete cellular sites^1 such that only those responses appropriate for a particular pattern of inputs are activated^2–4. How neurons select between synaptic and extrasynaptic responses during development is not understood. We have investigated how contact during synapse formation between identified leech neurons^5–7 selectively suppresses the modulation of extrasynaptic channels by protein kinase C^8–10. A microelectrode with an isolated membrane patch containing channels from an uninnervated target neuron was 'crammed'^11 into a similar cell contacted by a presynaptic partner. We report here that within a few minutes, the crammed channels were rendered insensitive to activation of protein kinase C, demonstrating the action of a cytoplasmic signal. Treatment of the neurons with selective inhibitors of tyrosine kinases^12, which are signalling molecules during normal and oncogenic cellular differentiation^13,14, prevented the loss of channel modulation. Thus, tyrosine kinases mediate early functional changes during specific synapse formation that are induced by neuronal contact.THE neurotrophins are a family of neurotrophic factors that promote survival and differentiation of various neuronal populations^1,2. Although the long-term effects of neurotrophins on neuronal survival and differentiation have been intensively studied, nothing is known about their effects on synaptic function. Here we report that acute exposure to neurotrophin-3 (NT-3)^3,4 or brain-derived neurotrophic factor (BDNF)^5, but not nerve growth factor (NGF)^6, rapidly potentiates the spontaneous and impulse-evoked synaptic activity of developing neuromuscular synapses in culture. The effect appears to be presynaptic in origin and to be mediated by the Trk family of receptor tyrosine kinases^7. These results provide evidence for the regulation of the function of developing synapses by neurotrophins.Evolution. By Mark Ridley. Blackwell Scientific: 1993. Pp. 670. £39.50,$39.95 (hbk), £19.50 (pbk).UNDERSTANDING the mechanisms of long-term potentiation (LTP) should provide insights into the molecular basis of learning and memory in vertebrates. lonotropic glutamate receptors play a central role in LTP; AMPA ( α -amino-3-hydroxy-5-methyl-4-isoxazolepropionate) receptors and NMDA ( N -methyl-D-aspar-tate) receptors mediate synaptic responses that are enhanced in LTP and, in addition, NMDA receptors are necessary for the induction of LTP in most pathways^1. There is also circumstantial evidence that metabotropic glutamate receptors (mGluRs) may be involved in LTP because the specific mGluR agonist aminocyc-lopentane dicarboxylate can augment tetanus-induced LTP^2 and, under certain circumstances, can itself induce a slow-onset potentiation^3,4. But the absence of any effective mGluR antagonist has prevented the determination of whether mGluRs are involved in the induction of tetanus-induced LTP. We report here that ( RS )- α -methyl-4-carboxyphenylglycine is a specific mGluR antagonist in the hippocampus and have used this compound to examine the nature of the involvement of mGluRs in LTP. We show that synaptic activation of mGluRs is necessary for the induction of both NMDA receptor-dependent and NMDA receptor-independent forms of LTP in the hippocampus.WE often search for a face in a crowd or for a particular object in a cluttered environment. In this type of visual search, memory interacts with attention: the mediating neural mechanisms should include a stored representation of the object and a means for selecting that object from among others in the scene^1–4. Here we test whether neurons in inferior temporal cortex, an area known to be important for high-level visual processing, might provide these components. Monkeys were presented with a complex picture (the cue) to hold in memory during a delay period. The cue initiated activity that persisted through the delay among the neurons that were tuned to its features. The monkeys were then given 2–5 choice pictures and were required to make an eye movement to the one (the target) that matched the cue. About 90–120 milliseconds before the onset of the eye movement to the target, responses to non-targets were suppressed and the neuronal response was dominated by the target. The results suggest that inferior temporal cortex is involved in selecting the objects to which we attend and foveate.THE rapid radiation of angiosperms during the Late Cretaceous has been thought to reflect their rise to vegetational dominance^1–3. The number of species in a clade and its vegetational importance are not necessarily related, however. Quantitative studies of the recently discovered Big Cedar Ridge flora, found preserved in situ in a mid-Maastrichtian volcanic ash in central Wyoming, USA, reveal that dicotyledonous angiosperms accounted for 61% of the species but constituted just 12% of vegetational cover. Dicots, many of which appear to have been herbaceous, were abundant only in areas disturbed just before burial. By contrast, free-sporing plants were 19% of the species but 49% of cover. The only abundant and ubiquitous angiosperm was a single species of palm (about 25% of cover). A comparably low abundance of dicots was found in two other nearly contemporaneous floras buried by volcanic ash, whereas coeval floras from fluvial environments are dominated by dicots^4. This shows that, even as late as the mid-Maastrichtian, in northern mid-latitudes there were areas away from streams that were not yet dominated by dicots. Despite vigorous taxonomic diversification during the previous 30 Myr^3, dicots played a subordinate role in these areas of fern-dominated vegetation.The US Congress should rewrite the food and drug law that bans chemicals that may be quite harmless.COLLISIONS between continents generate the world's most striking mountains; the deep structure of these collision zones, inferred from seismic reflection profiles^1–3, can be equally dramatic, if less well understood. Improved knowledge of the structure of ancient collisional belts, now known to have developed through plate tectonic processes^4,5, can provide important new insights into the mechanisms of crustal growth. Although many such belts have been partly destroyed by severe post-collisional deformation^6,7 or magmatism^8, some have been preserved in the stable interiors of continents^9: one example is the Early Proterozoic Trans-Hudson orogen^9,10, in western Canada. Here we present seismic reflection images across the entire orogen, which reveal a broadly symmetric structure, with reflections linked to island-arc rocks dipping beneath both bounding Archaean cratons. The observed reflection geometries imply a doubling of crustal thickness during the collision, along crust-penetrating faults. The presence of a significant amount of Archaean crust at depth, the extent of which could not have been determined from surface mapping, suggests the need for caution in inferring crustal growth rate from the surface area of juvenile crust^11,12.THERE has been considerable controversy regarding the role of carbon dioxide in the metamorphism and melting of the Earth's crust, fuelled principally by reports of experimental evidence for CO_2-enhanced partial melting of the assemblage phlogopite mica + quartz in the model system KAlO_2–MgO–SiO_2H_2O–CO_2^1,2. The analogous process in the crust would lead to the formation of granulite–facies rocks at temperatures characteristic of amphibolite-facies metamorphism; the granulite fades^3–5 would thus be indicative not of unusually high temperatures, but of the influx of carbonic fluids^4–6. Moreover, the similarity of their low-temperature melts to the compositions of some calc-alkaline lamprophyres led Peterson and Newton^2 to suggest that such magmas might be generated by the introduction of CO_2-rich fluids, providing a means of large-scale mass transfer in the deep crust. These ideas have been highly influential^6, but there are aspects of Peterson and Newton's results that are hard to reconcile with other available data. I have accordingly tried to replicate the results of refs 1 and 2 but, as I report here, have been unable to do so. The present results thus cast doubt on the general idea of melt fluxing by CO_2, and the formation of magnesium-and CO_2-rich magmas at crustal pressures.MANY polymer gels undergo a volume phase transition in electric fields^1–5. We report here the synthesis of a polyelectrolyte gel that incorporates magnetic particles of iron oxide into the polymer network; these particles couple the gel volume transition to the NMR relaxation times of the surrounding water. We find that the water proton relaxation rates ( T _2^−1) in aqueous suspensions of particles of the magnetic gel increase significantly in an electric field. Such changes can also be induced by the hyperpolarization of red blood cells in the suspension, presumably as a result of the electric fields at the cell membrane surfaces. These gels may play a part in magnetic resonance imaging analogous to that of voltage-sensitive dyes in optical imaging^6–9.FOLLOWING reports of intense optical luminescence from porous silicon^1,2, the opportunity for engineering optoelectronic devices using this material^3,4 has attracted considerable attention. At present, however, the question of the origin of the luminescence has not been fully resolved^5. The quantum-confinement model^6–8 suggests that a quantum size effect gives optical transitions, and hence luminescence, in the visible range—this idea gains support from the wavelength dependence of the luminescence on porosity. An alternative model^9,10 attributes the luminescence to siloxene-like compounds^11 formed on the silicon surface. A third model, which invokes hydrogenated amorphous silicon as a possible source^12,13, seems to be contradicted by X-ray absorption fine structure (XAFS) studies^14–16. Here we report optical luminescence in porous silicon and siloxene induced by soft X-rays with energies near the silicon K-edge (1,839 eV). Using the luminescence together with the total electron yield, we can obtain the XAFS spectra for the luminescent sites in both materials. Our results show that the luminescence from porous silicon does not derive from siloxene (either freshly prepared or annealed), and thus suggest that the quantum-confinement model seems to provide the only viable explanation.THE magnetosphere in the vicinity of the orbits of Saturn's icy satellites consists of a low-density plasma, in which the electrons are an order of magnitude cooler than the accompanying heavy ions^1. Most models^2–12 neglect this fact, even though radiative cooling and diffusive loss rates are both too slow to account for the observed temperatures. Shemansky and Hall^13 have recently proposed that the electrons could be cooled by the presence of a large abundance of neutral gas, derived mainly from the breakdown products of H_2O (mainly O and OH) from the icy satellites. Hydrogen radicals have been reported in this region^13, but these originate from the atmosphere of Saturn itself; no satellite-derived neutral species have been detected. Here we report the detection of neutral OH molecules near the orbit of Tethys, using the Faint Object Spectrograph on the Hubble Space Telescope. Our results suggest that neutral OH is one of the dominant species in Saturn's inner magnetosphere, implying a source rate for H_2O twenty times greater than current theoretical estimates^5,6. One possible explanation is that the micrometeorite erosion rates of the inner satellites are significantly higher than expected.ON 10 July 1992, the Giotto spacecraft flew within about 200 km of the nucleus of comet Grigg—Skjellerup; this is only the third comet at which in situ measurements have been made, and the encounter constituted the closest approach so far of a spacecraft to a cometary nucleus. Here we report the detection by the EPONA instrument on Giotto of charged, energetic particles deep within the inner coma of Grigg—Skjellerup. In contrast to previous spacecraft encounters with comets Giacobini—Zinner (in 1985) and Halley (in 1986), well defined, periodic intensity variations recorded in the particle fluxes suggest that the ions close to the nucleus were strongly coupled to the ambient magnetic field. The present data indicate that Giotto flew on the nightside of the nucleus.Multicolour near-infrared femtosecond experiments of a genetically modified bacterial reaction centre show that the phase of two excited-state vibrational modes is conserved for a period of picoseconds over a large range of temperatures. The direct visualization of low-frequency nuclear vibrations in this protein, which is embedded in its natural membrane, implicates coherent nuclear motion in the primary electron transfer reaction in functional reaction centres.A series of experiments with genetically engineered chromatophores from purple bacteria suggests an unexpected coupling between molecular vibrations and the electron transfer at the heart of photosynthesis.The Last Panda. By George B. Schaller. University of Chicago Press: 1993. Pp. 291. $24.95, £19.95.Nature 362, 469-471 (1993) FIGURE 1 c was omitted from the above letter during the production process and is now shown below. In addition, part of the label at the bottom left-hand corner of Fig. 4a was unclear. This should read 'A2(M6, M8)'.THE U1 small nuclear ribonucleoprotein (snRNP) particle is one of the Sm class of snRNPs essential for splicing of precursor messenger RNA^1–5. Mammalian Ul snRNP contains a 165-nucleo-tide long RNA molecule and at least 11 proteins: the Ul-specific 70K proteins A and C, and the common U snRNP proteins (B′, B, Dl, D2, D3, E, F and G). One of the functions of Ul snRNP is recognition of the 5′ splice site, an event that requires both Ul RNA and Ul proteins^6–10. The 70K protein is the only heavily phosphorylated Ul protein in the cell^11,12. Isolated Ul snRNPs are associated with a kinase activity that selectively phosphorylates the 70K protein in vitro in a reaction requiring ATP. Here we investigate the role of phosphorylation of the 70K protein in the splicing of pre-mRNA. The 70K protein on Ul snRNPs was phosphorylated in vitro with either ATP, or with ATP-γS, which gave a thiophosphorylated product that was resistant to dephos-phorylation by phosphatases. When HeLa nuclear splicing extracts that had been depleted of endogenous Ul snRNPs were complemented with Ul snRNPs possessing normal phosphorylated 70K protein, mature spliceosomes were generated and the splicing activity of the extracts was fully restored. By contrast, if thiophosphorylated Ul snRNPs were used instead, splicing was completely inhibited, although formation of the mature spliceosome was unaffected. Our data show that the state of phosphorylation of the Ul-specific 70K protein is critical for its participation in a pre-catalytic step of the splicing reaction.Much has been done in the past few years to throw light on the energetics of vesicle formation in monolayer and bilayer membranes. The physics of the process is becoming clear, but the chemistry remains obscure.THE p53 protein is apparently central to the development of human cancers because both alleles are often found to be mutated in different tumour types^1. In addition, wild-type p53 can inhibit transformation by viral and cellular oncogenes in vitro , so p53 has been classified as a tumour suppressor^2. Investigations of the normal function of p53 have indicated that at least one of its functions could involve the activation of gene expression through the binding of specific DNA-regulatory sequences^3,4. Also, overexpression of p53 can mediate growth arrest^5 and repress transcription from a variety of promoters^6,7. We demonstrate here both in vivo and in vitro that expression of wild-type p53 specifically represses the activity of promoters whose initiation is dependent on the presence of a TAT A box. Promoters whose accurate transcription is directed by a pyrimidine-rich initiator element, however, are immune to the effects of p53. Furthermore, we observe that repression is mediated by an interaction of p53 with basal transcription factor(s). Thus, p53 appears to repress the activity of certain promoters through direct communication with TATA box-dependent basal transcription machinery.On the eve of the announcement by the British government of its plan to reorganize the country's scientific enterprise, how should scientists see themselves in relation to the world in which they live?HETEROTRIMERIC GTP-binding proteins (G proteins) regulate cellular activity by coupling to hormone or sensory receptors. Stimulated receptors catalyse the release of GDP from G protein α-subunits^1–4 and GTP bound to the empty α-subunits provides signals that control effectors such as adenylyl cyclases, phos-phodiesterases, phospholipases and ion channels^4. Three cytoplas-mic loops of the activated receptor are thought to interact with three sites on the heterotrimeric G protein to provide high-affinity interaction and catalyse G-protein activation^5–8. The carboxyl terminus of the α-subunit is particularly important for interaction with the receptor^9–14. Here we study the structure of part of the active interface between the photon receptor rhodopsin and the G protein transducin, or G_t, using nuclear magnetic resonance. An 11-amino-acid peptide from the C terminus of the α-summit of G_t (α_t (340–350)) binds to rhodopsin and mimics the G protein in stabilizing its active form, metarhodopsin II. The peptide α_t(340–350) binds to both excited and unexcited rhodopsin and conformational differences between the two bound forms suggest a mechanism for activation of G proteins by agonist-stimulated receptors. Insight into receptor-catalysed GDP release will have broad application because the GTP/GDP exchange and the intrinsic GTPase activity of GTP-binding proteins constitute a widespread regulatory mechanism^15.AGONIST-BOUND receptors activate heterotrimeric (αβγ) G proteins by catalysing replacement of GDP bound to the α-subunit by GTP^1–5. Mutations in the C terminus of the α-subunit^6,7, its covalent modification by pertussis toxin-catalysed ribosylation of ADP^8, peptide-specific antibodies directed against it^9–11, and peptides mimicking C-terminal sequences^12, all inhibit receptor-mediated activation of G proteins. The logical prediction—that specific amino-acid residues at the C-termini of α-subunits can determine the abilities of individual G proteins to discriminate among specific subsets of receptors—has so far not been tested experimentally. Different hormone receptors specifically activate G_q or G_i whose α-subunits (α_q or α_i) stimulate phosphatidylinositol-specific phospholipase C or inhibit adenylyl cyclase, respectively^1–5. Here we replace C-terminal amino acids of α_q with the corresponding residues of α_i2 to create α_q/α_i2 chimaeras that can mediate stimulation of phospholipase C by receptors otherwise coupled exclusively to Gj. A minimum of three a _ i2 amino acids, including a glycine three residues from the C terminus, suffices to switch the receptor specificity of the α_q/α_i2 chimaeras. We propose that a C-terminal turn, centred on this glycine, plays an important part in specifying receptor interactions of G proteins in the G_i/G_0/G_z family.TRANSGENIC animals containing rearranged heavy or light chains are used to study the process of hypermutation, which characterizes the maturation of the antibody response^1–3. LK6 mice contain five copies of a transgene coding for a light chain produced in response to the hapten 2-phenyloxazolone^4. We have selected hybridomas from secondary responses that express the transgene as the only light chain^2. Some of these hybridomas contain transgene copies carrying mutations known to improve antibody affinity^5. We have analysed the expression of the five transgene copies in those hybridomas. We report here that the somatic hypermutation process can affect the successful expression of antibody light-chain transgenes. When mutations that improve the antibody affinity appear in one transgene copy, antigenic selection favours cells that downregulate the other copies at multiple levels of gene expression, including examples where nonsense mutations correlate with a drop in messenger RNA level.Embryonic spinal motor neurons are thought to depend for survival on unidentified factors secreted both by their peripheral targets and by cells within the central nervous system^1. The neurotrophins are a family of polypeptides required for survival of discrete central and peripheral neuronal populations in vivo and in vitro ^2,3. In spite of their ability to reduce motor neuron death in vivo ^4–6, the known neurotrophins have been thought to be without direct effect on motor neurons^7–10. Here we show that picomolar concentrations of three of them, brain-derived neurotrophic factor, neurotrophin-3 and neurotrophin-5, can prevent the death of cultured embryonic rat spinal motor neurons. Furthermore, messenger RNA coding for neurotrophins is present at appropriate stages in spinal cord and limb bud, and mRNA for their receptors is found in motor neurons. These neurotrophins may therefore be physiological motor neuron growth factors.IN cystic fibrosis (CF), numerous epithelial cell functions are abnormal, including Cl^− conductance, sodium absorption, mucin sulphation and enzyme secretion^1–4. Although the CF gene product, the cystic fibrosis transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR), functions as a small linear Cl^− channel^5–8, it is difficult to attribute such pleiotropic disease manifestations solely to a defect in Cl^− conductance. This has led to speculation that CFTR regulates the activity of other proteins. One possible example is the protein kinase A activation of outward rectifying Cl^− channels (ORCC), which is defective in membrane patches excised from CF cells^9–16. Whether CFTR regulates the activity of an independent anion channel is debatable, because ORCC occur exclusively in excised membrane patches and could be an excision-induced molecular derivative of CFTR. 'Knockout' mice that lack CFTR^17,18 provide a means to define the relationship between CFTR and ORCC. Here we report that ORCC are present in CFTR(−/−) mouse nasal epithelial cells and thus cannot be a derivative of the CFTR molecule. Also ORCC were regulated by protein kinase A in membrane patches from normal but not CFTR(−/−) cells. These observations are the first, to our knowledge definitive demonstration that CFTR regulates the activity of another protein.THE excitatory amino acid, L-glutamate, acting through its N -methyl-D-aspartate (NMD A) receptor, may contribute to neuronal death following cerebral vascular occlusion^1–3. In support of this hypothesis, NMDA receptor antagonists reduce the volume of infarction produced by occlusion of the middle cerebral artery in vivo ^4,5 and attenuate Ca^2+ influx and neuronal death elicited by L-glutamate or NMDA in vitro ^3,6. A complementary DNA coding for a major component of the NMDA receptor channel complex, a single protein of M _r 105.5K (NMDA-R1), has been isolated from rat brain^7. Here we demonstrate that inhibition of the synthesis of NMDA-R1 by treatment with antisense oligodeoxynucleotides selectively reduces the expression of NMDA receptors, prevents the neurotoxicity elicited by NMDA in vitro and reduces the volume of the focal ischaemic infarction produced by occlusion of the middle cerebral artery in the rat.Chemistry of the Solid–Water Interface: Processes at the Mineral–Water and Particle–Water Interface in Natural Systems. By Werner Stumm. Wiley: 1992. Pp. 428. £34.50, $48.95 (pbk).BECAUSE of a number of behavioural, ecological and physiological factors, African honeybees ( Apis mellifera scutellata ) are better adapted to tropical environments than European bees. African bees achieve higher rates of reproduction and colony growth partly by collecting more pollen relative to nectar^1 and by allocating more nutrients to brood rearing^2. African colonies generate more swarms^3,4 which travel far greater distances^5. These adaptive traits have been dramatically manifested in the neotropics: African bees have formed large expanding feral populations, whereas few European bees have survived outside apiaries^6. The feral populations consist of African matrilines^7–9 that have not hybridized extensively with European drones from apiaries^10. Perhaps because of their European heritage, hybrids are poorly adapted to the tropics and thus do not survive. European matrilines, however, do not become part of the feral population, even after repeated backcrossing with feral African drones^7–10. Conceivably, negative heterosis could further reduce hybrid survival, where European maternal factors are particularly detrimental^7. We report here physiological findings consistent with these possibilities. Mass-specific metabolic capacities were higher in African bees than in European bees and were low and nonintermediate in hybrids. Thus, higher metabolic and flight capacities may contribute to African bees' competitive advantages in the tropics.A NUMBER of population genetics models predict the evolution of male sexual ornaments through female choice^1, but their genetic assumptions and predictions have hardly been investigated^2,3. A key feature of these models is a positive genetic correlation between male ornaments and female preference for them^4. Here I test this prediction at the within-population level with three-spined sticklebacks, Gasterosteus aculeatus , which show conspicuous sexual dichromatisnr. Intense red males are preferred in various situations^6–10, but there is great intrapopulational variation in redness both among wild-caught^6,10 and among laboratory-bred males^11, which is partly environmental^6 and may be partly genetic^12,13. Also, females show considerable intrapopulational variation in their preference for redder males^6,8,9, which is partly environmental^8,9. Wild-caught, intense red males and dull males were crossed with a number of females from the same population in a full-sib/half-sib breeding design. Daughters were tested for their preference for more intensely red males, and the sons' coloration was quantified. Both traits showed genetic variation. Also the redness of the sons correlated with the preference for red of their sisters, thus the two traits show positive genetic correlation.THE nature of the relationship between Neanderthals and early modern Homo sapiens is controversial, yet it is fundamental to our understanding of early human evolution^1,2. The Middle Palaeolithic sites of Israel are critical to this debate, because unlike those of western Europe and Africa they contain both Neanderthal (at Tabun^3 and Kebara^4 for example) and anatomically modern hominids (as at Skhul^5 and Qafzeh^6). Here we present new mass spectrometric ^230Th/^234U dates for dental fragments from the Middle Palaeolithic burial sites of Tabun, Qafzeh and Skhul. These data, combined with published ages from electron spin resonance (ESR), provide compelling evidence that the Tabun Neanderthals and Qafzeh early modern Homo sapiens were approximately coeval in the southern Levant some 100 ± 5 kyr ago, but indicate that some of the Skhul material is younger. The study also shows that combined mass-spectrometric ^230Th/^234U and ESR dating is an invaluable technique for dating archaeological sites beyond the range of radiocarbon dating.INCREASING evidence that the San Andreas fault has low shear strength^1 has fuelled considerable discussion regarding the role of fluid pressure in controlling fault strength. Byerlee^2,3 and Rice^4 have shown how fluid pressure gradients within a fault zone can produce a fault with low strength while avoiding hydraulic fracture of the surrounding rock due to excessive fluid pressure. It may not be widely realised, however, that the same analysis^2–4 shows that even in the absence of fluids, the presence of a relatively soft 'gouge' layer surrounded by harder country rock can also reduce the effective shear strength of the fault. As shown most recently by Byerlee and Savage^5, as the shear stress across a fault increases, the stress state within the fault zone evolves to a limiting condition in which the maximum shear stress within the fault zone is parallel to the fault, which then slips with a lower apparent coefficient of friction than the same material unconstrained by the fault. Here we confirm the importance of fault geometry in determining the apparent weakness of fault zones, by showing that the apparent friction on a sawcut granite surface can be predicted from the friction measured in intact rock, given only the geometrical constraints introduced by the fault surfaces. This link between the sliding friction of faults and the internal friction of intact rock suggests a new approach to understanding the microphysical processes that underlie friction in brittle materials.UPTAKE of atmospheric CO_2 by the ocean's 'biological pump' is driven by export of carbon from the euphotic zone to deeper waters^1,2. As nitrate is a limiting nutrient in large regions of the ocean, measurements of nitrate uptake are often used to estimate the amount of carbon exported in this way^3–6. This presupposes knowledge of the molar C: N ratio in the organic material exported from the upper waters, which is usually taken to be 6.6 (the Redfield ratio^7,8). Recent studies have suggested, however, that the consumption ratio of C:N may deviate from this value in coastal waters^9–11. Here we present time-series from both coastal waters and open-ocean sites which demonstrate that net organic carbon production greatly exceeded that predicted from nitrate consumption and the Redfield C:N ratio. We found a similar discrepancy in sections across broad regions of the North Atlantic during eutrophic periods. Our results suggest that extrapolating from nitrate consumption using the Redfield ratio leads to significant underestimates of organic carbon export from the euphotic zone.THE annual springtime depletion of Antarctic ozone^1 has been shown to be due to the action of chlorine species, activated by reactions occurring on the surfaces of polar stratospheric clouds (PSCs)^1,2. Similar reactions may also take place on the surfaces of liquid sulphuric acid aerosols when the temperature is too high to permit the formation of PSCs^3–4. Such processes may have been facilitated following the eruption of Mount Pinatubo in June 1991, when unprecedented amounts of sulphur compounds were injected into the stratosphere^5. Here we present observations of Antarctic chlorine dioxide abundances in the austral autumn and winter of 1991 (when aerosol concentrations were at background levels) and 1992 (greatly enhanced aerosol concentrations). We find that in 1992, unlike 1991, chlorine dioxide levels increased dramatically in the autumn, when PSCs were extremely unlikely to have been present. Model results suggest that this was mainly caused by the direct activation of chlorine nitrate on the aerosol surfaces. The effect of the Pinatubo aerosols probably contributed to the unprecedented depth and areal extent of Antarctic ozone depletion in 1992.MAGNETIC resonance spectroscopy^1 is a powerful tool for molecular characterization and structure determination. The sensitivity of conventional approaches is limited to about 10^10 electron spins or 10^16 nuclear spins; this sensitivity can be improved to about 10^5 spins by polarizing the spins via optical pumping and detecting optical rather than microwave photons^2. Recently, fluorescence from single molecules was detected by tuning a single-frequency laser in the inhomogeneously broadened fluorescence excitation band of a dilute dispersion of pentacene in a host crystal of p -terphenyl^3,4. Here we report that, by combining single-molecule fluorescence spectroscopy with optically detected magnetic resonance for the pentacene-doped p -terphenyl system, we can detect magnetic resonance in a single pentacene molecule. We observe two of the three possible transitions between sublevels of the metastable triplet state. The spectral lineshapes indicate that the proton nuclear spin states change during the measurement, leading to spectral diffusion within the magnetic resonance line.THE introduction of optical detection methods for observing magnetic resonance transitions in metastable paramagnetic states^1–4 has contributed enormously to our understanding of the properties of photoexcited molecules in condensed phases. In such experiments the luminescence intensity is recorded as a function of the frequency of an applied microwave field. At resonance with transitions between sublevels of a metastable paramagnetic state, the lifetime of the metastable state is altered and a consequent change in the luminescence intensity is observed. Here we report the observation of such optically detected magnetic resonance transitions for the triplet state of a single pentacene molecule embedded in a p -terphenyl host crystal. This result has been obtained by combining the conventional optical detection technique for observing magnetic resonance transitions^1–4 with the new single-molecule optical detection methods developed recently^5,6. This observation opens the way for magnetic resonance studies in condensed phases with single-molecule sensitivity.SEVERAL recent papers^1–3 have refocused attention on the question of the degree of dust obscuration (or optical depth) of the disks of spiral galaxies. The traditional view, based on the early statistical studies of Holmberg^4 and de Vaucouleurs^5, is that the disks are largely transparent, whereas Disney et al .^1 and Valentijn^2 have recently argued in favour of substantial optical depths. In an attempt to resolve this issue, White and Keel^3 measured the broadband colours of an overlapping galaxy pair, to determine directly the optical depth of the foreground galaxy; however, using this method it was not possible to separate unambiguously the contributions from the two galaxies. Individual emission lines, on the other hand, are completely separated if the redshift difference between the two galaxies is large enough, as in the pair studied here, offering a means of removing the source ambiguity. By comparing the Hα/Hβ ratios for the HII regions in the background galaxy with those in isolated spiral galaxies, and exploiting the wavelength dependence of extinction by dust, we find significant optical depths along three lines of sight through the foreground galaxy.Nature 362, 636-642 (1993) THE date of receipt of this letter was erroneously given as 14 December 1992 instead of 2 September 1992.A process-based model was used to estimate global patterns of net primary production and soil nitrogen cycling for contemporary climate conditions and current atmospheric C0_2 concentration. Over half of the global annual net primary production was estimated to occur in the tropics, with most of the production attributable to tropical evergreen forest. The effects of C0_2 doubling and associated climate changes were also explored. The responses in tropical and dry temperate ecosystems were dominated by C0_2, but those in northern and moist temperate ecosystems reflected the effects of temperature on nitrogen availability.Recent discoveries of fossil primate specimens have produced several surprises and challenged prevailing views of early primate evolution. Plesiadapiforms, long regarded as 'archaic primates', may perhaps be linked to the peculiar colugos instead. Inferred relationships of the earliest known undoubted primates (adapids and omomyids) are in turmoil. Both groups have been proposed as sources for the simian primates. Although the origin of the simian primates is obscure, new fossil evidence could push it further back by at least 10 million years. Such uncertainties reflect the low sampling level of the primate fossil record, which can potentially also lead to underestimation of times of origin within the primate tree.Genetic Programming: On the Programming of Computers by Means of Natural Selection. By John R. Koza. MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 819. $55, £49.50.The Kekulé Riddle: A Challenge to Chemists and Psychologists. Edited by John H. Wotiz. Cache River Press, Rt. 3, Box 239c, Vienna, Illinois 62995, USA: 1993. Pp. 329. $78.Keywords in Evolutionary Biology. Edited by Evelyn Fox Keller and Elizabeth A. Lloyd. Harvard University Press: 1992. Pp. 414. $45, £39.95.Although the US National Science Board knows what it wants to say, it has trouble making itself clear.Expectations are high for the British government's promised White Paper on science, now due to appear next week. Here are some criteria by which its recommendations should be judged.Tools for the microbiologist featured this week include an all-in-one instrument for processing media and autoclaving labware, viral swab transport systems, a portable microplate reader, culture collections and safety videos.Cytotoxicity is defined as the in situ measurement of cellular function in response to a toxic substance. Cytotoxicity assays are widely used in drug screening and development research to minimize the number of compounds on which expensive mammalian animal model toxicology studies are performed.Nature 362, 623-628 (1993) IT has been brought to our attention by Ben Creisler that the genus name Mononychus used to refer to a new flightless Cretaceous bird in our letter to Nature is preoccupied by the coleopteran Mononychus Schueppel 1824 (ref. 1). We therefore propose the replacement Mononykus for this genus whose type species is Mononykus olecranus.Dr Peter Duesberg, the virologist-turned-campaigner, is wrongly using tendentious arguments to confuse understanding of AIDS and those in danger of contracting the disease. He should stop.HUMANS with the complementation group G form of the inherited syndrome xeroderma pigmentosum (XP) are hypersensitive to solar ultraviolet light because of a defect in nucleotide-excision repair of DNA^1–4. Some individuals are also affected with Cockayne's syndrome, and have neurological abnormalities. Here we report that the DNA repair deficiency of XP-G cell extracts can be corrected by addition of protein fractions from normal cells. Repair proficiency can also be restored by mixing XP-G cell extracts with extracts from different repair-defective cell lines, with one excep-tion. Extracts from cells representing group 5 of a set of ultraviolet-sensitive rodent mutants fail to complement XP-G extracts. XP-G and group 5 correcting activities co-elute after ∼1,000-fold purification from HeLa cells. An antibody directed against a recombinant fragment of the XP-G complementing protein (XPGC) inhibits excision repair by normal cell extracts, and activity can be restored with an XP-G/group 5 complementing fraction. These data strongly suggest that the XPGC and group 5 correcting (ERCC5) proteins are identical.DEFECTS in human DNA repair proteins can give rise to the autosomal recessive disorders xeroderma pigmentosum (XP) and Cockayne's syndrome (CS), sometimes even together^1–3. Seven XP and three CS complementation groups have been identified that are thought to be due to mutations in genes from the nucleotide excision repair pathway^2,3. Here we isolate frog and human complementary DNAs that encode proteins resembling RAD2, a protein involved in this pathway in yeast^4,5. Alignment of these three polypeptides, together with two other RAD2 related proteins^6,7, reveals that their conserved sequences are largely confined to two regions. Expression of the human cDNA in vivo restores to normal the sensitivity to ultraviolet light and unscheduled DNA synthesis of lymphoblastoid cells from XP group G, but not CS group A. The XP-G correcting protein XPGC is generated from a messenger RNA of ∼4 kilobases that is present in normal amounts in the XP-G cell line.Europe's plan for electronic services had better be adventurous. If it is not, it will fail.KINETOPLASTID RNA editing alters mitochondrial RNA transcripts by addition and deletion of uridine residues^1, producing open reading frames that may be twice as long as the original RNA^2. Although the COIII gene encoding cytochrome c oxidase subunit III in Trypanosoma brucei is edited along its entire length^2, the presumably homologous genes in two related trypanosomes, Leishmania tarentolae and Crithidia fasciculata , are only modestly edited at their 5′ ends^1. We used a comparative approach to investigate the evolution of an edited gene and to determine how well editing creates conserved protein sequences. As RNA editing probably involves the pairing of several guide RNA molecules with the messenger RNA^3,4, we expected the edited proteins to be resistant to evolutionary change. Here we report that RNA editing is extensive in the mitochondria of four species of the insect parasite Herpetomonas , which is possibly an evolutionary precursor of T. brucei and L. tarentolae ^5, and the discovery that RNA editing is a novel source of frameshift mutations over evolutionary time. The edited proteins accumulate mutations nearly twice as rapidly as the unedited versions.A KEY component of the RNA polymerase II transcriptional apparatus, TFIID, is a multi-protein complex containing the TATA box-binding protein (TBP) and at least seven tightly associated factors (TAFs)^1,2. Although the functions of most TFIID subunits are unknown, it is clear that TAFs are not necessary for basal activity but that one or more are required for regulated transcription, and so behave as coactivators^1–4. The presence of multiple subunits indicates that there is an intricate assembly process and that TAFs may be responsible for other activities. We have described the properties of the subunit dTAF_II110, which can interact directly with the transcriptional activator Sp1 (ref. 5). In addition, the largest subunit, dTAF_II250, binds directly to TBP and links other TAFs to the complex^6. Here we describe the cloning, expression and partial characterization of the Drosophila TAF of M _r 80,000, dTAF_II80. Sequence analysis reveals that dTAF II 80 contains several copies of the WD40 ( β -transducin) repeat^7. Moreover, dTAF_II80 shares extended sequence similarity with an Arabidopsis gene, COP1 , which encodes a putative transcription factor that is thought to regulate development^8. We have expressed recombinant dTAF_II80 and begun to characterize its interaction with other members of the TFIID complex. Purified recombinant dTAF_II80 is unable to bind TBP directly or to interact strongly with the C-terminal domain of dTAF_II250 (Δ250). Instead, dTAF_II80 is only able to recognize and interact with a higher-order complex containing TBP, Δ250, 110 and 60. These findings suggest the formation of TFIID may require an ordered assembly of the TAFs, some of which bind directly to TBP and others that are tethered to the complex as a result of specific TAF/TAF interactions.INTERLEUKIN-5 (IL-5) is a lineage-specific cytokine for eosinophilpoiesis and plays an important part in diseases associ-ated with increased eosinophils, such as asthma^1,2. Human IL-5 is a disulphide-linked homodimer with 115 amino-acid residues in each chain^2. The crystal structure at 2.4 Å resolution reveals a novel two-domain structure, with each domain showing a striking similarity to the cytokine fold found in granulocyte macrophage^3 and macrophage^4 colony-stimulating factors, IL-2 (ref. 5), IL-4 (ref. 6), and human^7 and porcine^8 growth hormones. IL-5 is unique in that each domain requires the participation of two chains. The IL-5 structure consists of two left-handed bundles of four helices laid end to end and two short β -sheets on opposite sides of the molecule. Surprisingly, the C-terminal strand and helix of one chain complete a bundle of four helices and a β -sheet with the N-terminal three helices and one strand of the other chain. The structure of IL-5 provides a molecular basis for the design of antagonists and agonists that would delineate receptor recognition determinants critical in signal transduction. This structure determination extends the family of the cytokine bundle of four helices and emphasizes its fundamental significance and versatility in recognizing its receptor.AN essential step in the pathway by which growth factors trigger cellular proliferation is the induction of high levels of protein synthesis^1–3. This appears in part to be controlled by multiple phosphorylation of the ribosomal protein S6 (refs 4,5). The main kinase responsible, p70^s6k (refs 6–8), is activated through the phosphorylation of four sites clustered in a putative autoinhibitory domain^9, which is mediated by a signalling pathway distinct from those used by other well characterized mitogen-activated serine/threonine kinases (such as p42/p44^mapk or p90^rsk; refs 10, 11). Here we investigate the role of p70^s6k in the mitogenic response. Microinjection of quiescent rat embryo fibroblasts with any of three distinct polyclonal antibodies to p70^s6k abolishes serum-induced entry into S phase of the cell cycle. This effect is preceded by almost complete abrogation of the activation of protein synthesis and the expression of an essential immediate early gene product, c- fos . The inhibitory effect on DNA synthesis is also elicited by microinjection of the antibodies late in G1 phase, consistent with the finding that p70 s6k activity remains high throughout G1.THE development of a multicellular organism involves a delicate balance among the processes of proliferation, differentiation and death. Naturally occurring cell death aids tissue remodelling, eliminates supernumerary cell populations and provides structural elements such as hair and skin. In the nervous system, selective cell death contributes to the formation and organization of the spinal cord and sympathetic ganglia^1, retina^2 and corpus callosum^3. But cell death also occurs in several neuropathological conditions, such as amyelotrophic lateral sclerosis^4 and Alzheimer's disease^5. Therefore an elucidation of the mechanisms responsible for cell death is critical for an appreciation of both normal development and neuropathological disorders. Using a fos-lac Z transgenic mouse^6, we provide evidence showing that the continuous expression of Fos, beginning hours or days before the morphological demise of the cell, appears to be a hallmark of terminal differentiation and a harbinger of death.NEUROTRANSMITTER release is triggered by Ca^2+ ions binding to an unknown Ca^2+ receptor within presynaptic terminals^1,2. Synaptotagmin, a Ca^2+-binding protein of synaptic and other secretory vesicles^3, has been proposed to mediate vesicle–plasma membrane interactions during neurotransmitter release^4–9. Here we test this hypothesis using the giant synapse of the squid Loligo pealei , which because of its unusually large size and well established physiology is uniquely suited for dissecting presynaptic events^10. We find that injection of peptides from the C2 domains of synaptotagmin into squid giant presynaptic terminals rapidly and reversibly inhibits neurotransmitter release. Our data are consistent with these peptides competitively blocking release after synaptic vesicle docking and indicate that Ca^2+ probably initiates neurotransmitter release by regulating the interaction of synaptotagmin with an acceptor protein.El Niño: Historical and Paleoclimatic Aspects of the Southern Oscillation. Edited By Henry F. Diaz and Vera Mark-graf. Cambridge University Press: 1993. Pp. 476. £40, $59.95.SEVERAL observations suggest interactions between the immune and nervous systems^1,2. Psoriasis and atopic dermatitis may worsen with anxiety and have been associated with anomalous neuropeptide regulation^2. Neurotransmitters affect lymphocyte function^1–4 and lymphoid organs are innervated^5–9. Calcitonin gene-related peptide (CGRP) is a neuropeptide and vasodilator^10 that modulates some macrophage functions, including antigen presentation in vitro ^11. CGRP is associated with Langerhans cells (LC) in oesophageal mucosa, particularly during inflammation^12, is present in epidermal nerves and is associated with Merkel cells^10,13–15. We examined the ability of CGRP to modulate LC antigen-presenting function^16 and asked if CGRP-containing nerves impinge on LC. We report here that CGRP-containing nerve fibres are intimately associated with LC in human epidermis and CGRP is found at the surface of some LC. In three functional assays CGRP inhibited LC antigen presentation. These findings indicate that CGRP may have immunomodulatory effects in vivo and suggest a locus of interaction between the nervous system and immunological function.ACTIVATION of CD4^+ T helper cells results from the occupancy of the T-cell receptor (TCR) by immunogenic peptide bound to a class II major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecule^1, together with a co-stimulatory signal from the antigen-presenting cell (APC)^2. This activation leads to proliferation, cytokine production (Th1 or Th2 profile) and cytolysis^3. Engagement of the TCR in the absence of co-stimulation causes Th1 cells to become unresponsive to subsequent antigenic stimulation^4–6. We have previously demonstrated that analogues of an immunogenic peptide could stimulate Th1 and Th2 cells to carry out some effector functions without inducing proliferation^7,25, a phenomenon we term partial activation. Here we study the consequences of such partial activation through the TCR of two Th1 clones using peptide analogues presented by a live APC. A peptide analogue that is unable to stimulate clonal proliferation or production of cytokine or inositol phosphate can induce the T cells to become profoundly unresponsive to subsequent stimulation with the immunogenic peptide. Thus, altering the ligand of the TCR by using a peptide analogue on a functional APC sends a signal to Th1 clones that results in anergy.BIOLUMINESCENT symbioses range from facultative associations to highly adapted, apparently obligate ones^1. The family Anomalopidae (flashlight fishes) encompasses five genera of tropical reef fishes that have large suborbital light organs^2. The suborder Ceratioidei (deep-sea anglerfishes) contains 11 families. In nine of these, females have a bioluminescent lure^3,4 that contains bacterial symbionts^5. In all other fish light-organ symbioses (occuring in 10 families in 5 orders^6), the symbionts belong to three Photobacterium species^7; nonsymbiotic luminous bacteria are Vibrio species^8. The bacteria are extracellular and tightly packed in tubules that communicate with the exterior^7, releasing bacteria into the gut of the host or the surrounding sea water. The released bacteria are usually cultivable and can contribute to planktonic populations^9,10. Although anomalopids release bacteria^9 and ceratioids have pores that would allow release, the fate of these bacteria is unknown and they cannot be cultured by standard isolation techniques. We report here phylogenetic analysis of 16S ribosomal RNA gene sequences from light organs that show that anomalopid and ceratioid symbionts are not known luminous bacteria, but are new groups related to Vibrio spp. They are characterized by host specificity, deep divergence between symbionts from different genera (anomalopids) or families (ceratioids) and, possibly, parallel divergence of hosts and symbionts.MODELS of magma genesis at mid-ocean ridges^1, together with recent experimental data^2 and observations of trace element abundances in clinopyroxenes from abyssal peridotites^3, suggest that small-volume melt fractions can be efficiently extracted from the melting mantle. As shown in ref. 3, residues of this type of melting (fractional melting) display extremely low abundances of incompatible trace elements and extreme fractionation amongst them, especially at advanced stages of the process because of the compounded effects of differences in the partition coefficients. If this process operates beneath mid-ocean ridges, one would expect to sample melts that are correspondingly depleted and fractionated in trace elements. Indeed, the existence of very depleted melts in mid-ocean ridges was predicted previously^4–6 in order to explain the presence of magnesian pyroxene and calcic plagioclase in mid-ocean-ridge basalts. We report here the discovery of melt that has major and trace element characteristics consistent with these predictions^4–6, occurring as an inclusion in an olivine phenocryst in a typical mid-ocean-ridge basalt from the Mid-Atlantic Ridge. Although our preferred model for the origin of this 'ultra-depleted' melt is critical (continuous) melting, we cannot at this stage rule out other models. Our results underscore the importance of trapped melt inclusions as recorders of the processes involved in melting and melt extraction, and also as pointers to primary melt compositions.THE pH of the surface ocean is a sensitive function of its alkalinity and total inorganic carbon concentration, properties which also control the partial pressure of atmospheric carbon dioxide^17. Thus, an accurate proxy for past ocean pH could yield information about variations in atmospheric CO_2. Recently, it has been suggested that the boron isotopic composition of foraminiferal tests depends on the pH of sea water as well as its isotopic composition^1,2. Here we present boron isotope and elemental data for sedimentary pore fluids and isotope data for bulk foraminiferal samples from a deep-sea sediment core. The composition of the pore waters implies that sea water boron concentrations and isotopic composition have been constant during the past 21 Myr, allowing us to reconstruct past ocean pH directly from the foraminiferal isotope data. We find that 21 Myr ago, surface ocean pH was only 7.4 ±0.2, but it then increased to 8.2 ±0.2 (roughly the present value) about 7.5 Myr ago. This is consistent with suggestions^3–5 that atmospheric CO_2 concentrations may have been much higher 21 Myr ago than today.IN one of the pioneering studies of magnetism at the microscopic level, Heisenberg^1 concluded that ferromagnetism could not exist in compounds consisting only of light elements. A few well defined^2, purely organic materials (consisting only of the elements carbon, hydrogen, oxygen and nitrogen) have subsequently been found^3–5 to exhibit evidence of ferromagnetic interactions at low tem-peratures, with a small number of these showing a transition to a true ferromagnetic state. For example, the p -nitrophenyl nitronyl nitroxide radical has a Curie (transition) temperature of 0.60 K (ref. 6), and a possible ferromagnetic transition has been identified^7,8 in a C_60-based ionic complex. More recently, it was reported^9 that the magnetization and magnetic susceptibility behaviour of a crystalline nitroxide biradical, N,N′ -dioxy-l,3,5,7-tetramethyl-2,6-diazaadamantane, are indicative of ferromagnetic interactions. Here we report the existence of a ferromagnetic transition in this system, with a Curie temperature of 1.48 ± 0.02 K. As yet, this is the highest transition temperature found for a purely organic, non-ionic material.PERHAPS the most unexpected finding of the Ulysses mission so far has been the detection of quasi-periodic streams of high-velocity, submicrometre-sized dust particles during the spacecraft's encounter with Jupiter^1. The impact geometry clearly shows that these small grains originate in the jovian system, but it is surprising that any dust can escape Jupiter's gravitational influence. Here we show how the Ulysses dust events could result from the acceleration and subsequent ejection of small grains by Jupiter's magnetosphere. Dust grains entering the plasma environment of the magnetosphere become charged, with the result that their motion is then determined by both electromagnetic and gravitational forces. We have modelled this process and find that only those particles in a certain size range gain sufficient energy to escape the jovian system. Moreover, if Io is assumed to be the source of the dust grains, its location in geographic and geomagnetic coordinates determines the exit direction of the escaping particles, providing a possible explanation for the observed periodicities. The calculated mass and velocity ranges of the escaping dust grains are consistent with the Ulysses findings.IN the orientation-based unification scheme for active galaxies, the most variable active galactic nuclei—the BL Lacertae objects and highly polarized quasars (HPQs)—correspond to radio galaxies with their relativistic jets oriented close to our line of sight^1–7. This otherwise successful scheme has recently been chal-lenged by radio polarimetric very-long-baseline interferometry^8,9, which reveals different magnetic field structures in the knots of synchrotron emission identified with shocks in these jets. For BL Lacs the field is generally perpendicular to the jet, whereas no such trend is apparent for HPQs. This dichotomy has led to the claim that luminous BL Lacs and HPQs are inherently different types of object^10. Here we propose that this difference can be readily explained within the unified scheme by the effect of relativistic aberration: at small viewing angles, the observed knot emission arises primarily from the freshly excited plasma of the shock front, whereas at larger angles, Doppler-boosted emission from the slower, post-shock plasma is the dominant contribution. We identify the former case with BL Lacs and the latter with HPQs.THE monochromatic luminosities of high-redshift ( z > 3) radio galaxies rise steeply between wavelengths of about 2,000 and 5,000 Å, to form a characteristic 'red bump'^1–6. It is usually assumed that this bump arises from the photospheric emission of red, post-main-sequence stars. For a sufficient number of stars of this type to have evolved, however, these galaxies must be at least 0.4–2 Gyr old; yet z =3 corresponds to only 1.7 Gyr after the Big Bang (assuming a Hubble constant of 50 km s^−1 Mpc^−1 and that Ω_0 = 1), bringing the larger age estimates uncomfortably close to the beginning of the Universe. Here we show that, at least in the case of the high-redshift radio galaxy B2 0902 + 34, the basic assumption is incorrect: the red bump is caused not by photospheric emission from post-main-sequence stars, but by the presence of bright emission lines from doubly ionized oxygen. Both the spec-trum and the luminosity of the underlying continuum suggest that B2 0902 + 34 is a galaxy observed during its initial burst of star formation.Nature 361, 623-626 (1993) IN the printed version of Fig. 2 in this letter, several of the 14C dates shown by arrows were omitted. The correct version is shown below, together with the legend. FIG. 2 Pollen percentage diagrams from six sites in Maritime Canada. The thick continuous horizontal lines indicate the boundaries of the KO based on the LOI curves, as discussed in the text.Vulval differentiation in Caenorhabditis elegans is controlled by intercellular signalling mediated by a receptor tyrosine kinase and a ras gene product. The lin-45 gene encodes a homologue of the raf family of serine/threonine kinases and is necessary for vulval differentiation. The lin-45 raf gene product appears to act downstream of the ras protein in this pathway. A proto-oncogene-mediated signalling pathway may be a common feature of metazoan development.Kilauea volcano, in Hawaii, may be the best understood basaltic volcano in the world. Magma rises from a depth of 80 km or more and resides temporarily in near-surface reservoirs: eruption begins when the crust above one of these reservoirs splits open in response to a pressure increase. Repeated rift-zone eruptions compress Kilauea's flanks; after decades of accumulation, the stress is relieved in catastrophic earthquakes and southward displacement of the volcano's south flank.Our Place in the Cosmos. By Fred Hoyle and Chandra Wickramasinghe. Dent: 1993. Pp. 190. £16.99.Creative Cognition: Theory, Research and Applications. By Ronald A. Finke, Thomas B. Ward and Steven M. Smith. MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 239. $24.95, £22.50.A compendium of the chromosomal locations of more than 300 human genes and their homologues in three mammalian species will be a boon In comparative mapping studies.WE recently reported that a wide range of thermophilic archaebacteria have a novel ATPase complex which accumulates to high levels upon heat shock and may be a new type of molecular chaperone related to the chaperonins^1. Striking similarities between the complex, referred to here as the 'thermosome', and the subsequently characterized chaperones TF55 of the thermophilic archaebacterium Sulfolobus shibatae ^2 and TCP-1 from eukaryotic cytosol^2–5 suggest that these proteins belong to a single family. Here we determine the three-dimensional structure of the thermosome from Pyrodictium occultum by random conical tilt reconstruction from electron micrographs. The reconstruction reveals a complex consisting of two rings of eight subunits each, stacked face-to-face. The subunits are kidney-shaped and composed of at least two domains. In the centre of the thermosome is a large cavity of about 6.7 nm diameter; the opening of this cavity on each face of the complex is partially blocked by a mass which appears to be weakly connected to the eight-membered ring.RETROVIRAL nucleocapsid and gag -precursor proteins from all known strains of retroviruses contain one or two copies of an invariant sequence, Cys-X_2-Cys-X_4-His-X_4-Cys^1,2, that is populated with zinc in mature particles^3. Modification of cysteine or histidine residues results in defective packaging of genomic viral RNA and formation of non-infectious particles^4–8, making these structures potentially attractive targets for antiviral therapy^3,8. We recently reported that aromatic C -nitroso ligands of poly(ADP–ribose) polymerase preferentially destabilize one of the two (Cys-X_2-Cys-X_28-His-X_2-Cys) zinc-fingers with concomitant loss of enzymatic activity^9,10, coincidental with selective cytocidal action of the C -nitroso substituted ligands on cancer cells^11. Based on the occurrence of (3Cys, 1 His) zinc-binding sites in both retroviral nucleocapsid and gag proteins and in poly(ADP-ribose) polymerase^12, we reasoned that the C -nitroso compounds may also have antiretroviral effects. We show here that two such compounds, 3-nitrosobenzamide and 6-nitroso-l,2-benzopyrone, inhibit infection of human immunodeficiency virus HIV-1 in human lymphocytes and also eject zinc from isolated HIV-1 nucleocapsid zinc fingers and from intact HIV-1 virions. Thus the design of zinc-ejecting agents that target retroviral zinc fingers represents a new approach to the chemotherapy of AIDS.THE origin and function of introns in eukaryotic genes has provoked considerable debate since their discovery in 1977. Central to this issue are studies on the highly conserved enzyme, triosephosphate isomerase (TPI, EC 5.3.1.1). The 'introns early' argument suggests that introns are as old as the genes themselves and that the apparent correlation of many of the intron sites in plant, animal and fungal TPI genes with the boundaries of modules^1 is evidence of the assembly of ancient proteins by exon shuffling^2–4. In contrast, the 'introns late' view holds that ancient genomes contained few if any introns; introns were inserted into pre-existing genes during the last billion years^5,6. We have found that the TPI gene from the mosquito, Culex tarsalis , contains an intron in a unique position that was predicted by W. Gilbert^2 and the exon shuffling hypothesis.THE epithelial amiloride-sensitive sodium channel constitutes the rate limiting step for sodium reabsorbtion by the epithelia lining the distal part of the kidney tubule, the urinary bladder and the distal colon. Reabsorbtion of sodium through this channel, which is regulated by hormones such as aldosterone and vasopressin, is one of the essential mechanisms involved in the regulation of sodium balance, blood volume and blood pressure^1–6. Here we isolate a DNA from epithelial cells of rat distal colon and identify it by functional expression of an amiloride-sensitive sodium current in Xenopus oocyte. The deduced polypeptide (698 amino acids) has at least two putative transmembrane segments. Expression of this protein in Xenopus oocytes reconstitutes the functional properties of the highly selective amiloride-sensitive, epithelial sodium channel. The gene encoding this rat sodium channel subunit shares significant sequence similarity with mec-4 and deg-1 , members of a family of Caenorhabditis elegans genes involved in sensory touch transduction and, when mutated, neuronal degeneration. We propose that the gene products of these three genes are members of a gene family coding for cation channels.SMALL GTP-binding proteins of the ras superfamily are important for exocytosis from eukaryotic cells^1–5. GTP-binding proteins can exist in two different conformations depending on whether they are bound to GDP or GTP, and are thought to function as molecular switches that regulate a variety of cellular processes^1,3. The GTP–GDP cycle is controlled by accessory proteins that promote the exchange of bound GDP or the hydrolysis of GTP. The protein Sec4, a member of the Sec4/Yptl/Rab branch of the Ras superfamily, is involved in a late stage of the secretory pathway in yeast^6. Here we report the isolation of a mammalian complementary DNA, mss4 , encoding a GDP-releasing protein that enhances Sec4 function. The Mss4 protein also stimulates GDP release from Yptl and from the mammalian protein Rab3a, but not from Ras2. Mss4 shows sequence similarity to Dss4, a yeast protein with similar biochemical properties.^7THE protein Sec4p plays an essential role at the final stage of the yeast secretory pathway and belongs to the ras superfamily of GTP-binding proteins^1, more specifically to a branch that includes Yptlp in Saccharomyces cerevisiae and rab proteins in mammalian cells. GTP-binding proteins change conformation depending on whether GTP or GDP is bound^2 and can thus act as a regulatory switch. The protein remains in its inactive, GDP-bound form until exchange of GTP for GDP allows it to stimulate a downstream effector. This interaction is curtailed by GTP hydrolysis. The rates of nucleotide exchange and GTP hydrolysis can be regulated by interaction with accessory proteins^3. Although GDP dissociation stimulators (GDS) have been identified that act on members of the ras and rho branches of the superfamily, less is known regarding GDSs that act on members of the Sec4/Yptl/Rab subgroup. A preliminary characterization of a Rab3A GDP dissociation stimulating activity has been presented^4. We report here the use of suppressor analysis to clone a gene, dss4 , encoding a 17K protein that aids Sec4p action in vivo by functioning as a GDP dissociation stimulator.THE GABA_A receptor, the principal inhibitory receptor in the CNS, is distributed on cell bodies, dendrites, and in some cells at axon hillocks and presynaptic terminals^1–6. The dendritic distribution is crucial for shunting of excitatory synaptic inputs^7,8. Molecular cloning has revealed that the GABA_A receptor can be formed by a diverse set of subunits and by separately encoded subunit isoforms^9,10, the expression of each of which differs in distinct areas of the central nervous system^11–13 and during development^14,15. Why different genes exist to encode these isoforms is not clear, but may be linked to functional differences^16–19. Here we show that assembly of specific isoforms also codes for sorting and localization of the receptor complex. Confocal microscopy and immunoblot analysis of epithelial cells transfected with the complementary DNAs encoding the αl and β1 GABA_A receptor subunits and probed with subunit isoform-specific antibodies show that the αl subunit is targeted to the basolateral surface, and that the β1 subunit is sorted to the apical membrane. In cells where αl and β1 isoforms are co-expressed,assembly of the β1 with the αl subunit isoform re-routes the αl subunit to the apical surface. The ability to assemble complexes of different isoform composition and to target these to specific regions of the cell surface would enable neurons to modulate GABA_A receptor distribution and possibly alter the composition of its synapses in response to transcriptional levels of specific subunit isoforms.THE requirement of protein and messenger RNA synthesis for long-term memory^1,2 suggests that neural activity induced by learning initiates a cascade of gene expression^3. Here we use differential screening to identify five immediate–early genes induced by neuronal activity. One of these is tissue-plasminogen activator (tPA), an extracellular serine protease, which is induced with different spatial patterns in the brain by three activity-dependent events: (1) convulsive seizure increases expression of tPA in the whole brain; (2) stimulation of the perforant path produces an epileptiform after-discharge that ultimately leads to kindling increases the levels of tPA throughout the hippocampus bilaterally; and (3) brief high-frequency stimulation of the perforant path that produces long-term potentiation (LTP) causes an NMDA ( N -methyl-D-aspartate) receptor-mediated increase in the levels of tPA mRNA which is restricted to the granule cells of the ipsilateral dentate gyrus. As release of tPA is correlated with morphological differentiation^4–6, the increased expression of tPA may play a role in the structural changes that accompany activity-dependent plasticity^7–10.A FATE map depicts how lineages from a defined blastomere will be restricted to particular tissues. In the amphibian Xenopus laevis , the early blastomeres of the embryo have traceable lineages^1–4. However, it has been thought that mixing of the blastomeres of Brachydanio rerio prevents them from giving rise to a fate map^5–10. For this reason the zebrafish has been used as an example of a class of embryos, including mammals, which apparently exhibit little fate until later in embryogenesis. The amphibia were the exception. We report here the use of fluorescent dyes on very-high-molecular-mass carriers to trace a fate map from the first three cleavages of the zebrafish embryo to the three principal adult body axes: the first cleavage defines dorsal–ventral; the second cleavage, left–right; and the third, anterior–posterior.Structural Geology By Robert J. Twiss and Eldridge M. Moores W. H. Freeman: 1992. Pp. 532. £22.95, $59.95.THE segments in long germ-band insect embryos, like Drosophila , are all determined at syncytial blastoderm stage. This is in contrast to short germ-band embryos which show an early determination of only the anterior head segments, whereas the more posterior thoracic and abdominal segments are sequentially added after formation of a primary germ anlage (reviewed in ref. 1). Segment formation in Drosophila involves the pair-rule genes which define double segmental periodicities^2,3 and which have been considered to represent a special adaptation to the long germ-band type development^4,5, hairy belongs to the primary pair-rule genes in Drosophila which are directly regulated by the gap genes, such as Krüppel ^l6–13. We have isolated the orthologues of hairy and Krüppel from the flour beetle Tribolium castaneum which has a short germ type development^14. We show here that hairy is expressed in several stripes at blastoderm stage and later on in two stripes in the growth zone of the developing embryo. Krüppel expression overlaps hairy stripe three and four expression, very similar to Drosophila . This suggests that the segment patterning mechanism that acts in an open blastoderm in Drosophila works in a similar way in the cellularized Tribolium embryo.DARWIN^1 suggested that many apparently deleterious secondary sexual characters in males, such as bright colours, elaborate ornaments and conspicuous displays, evolved as a result of female choice. Darwin never tried to explain the crucial agent of selection, that females have preferences for exaggerated male traits. Rather, he took it for granted that females of many species possess a 'sense of the beautiful', akin to the aesthetic sense in humans. The question of why such preferences evolve remains a controversial issue^2,3. Here we report that mechanisms concerned with signal recognition possess inevitable biases in response that act as important agents of selection on signal form. The existence of such biases may be sufficient to explain the evolution of exaggerated male secondary sexual traits, and elaborate signals in general.ALL described fossil and Recent cetaceans have relatively similar ear bones (malleus, incus and stapes) that strongly diverge from those of land mammals^1–4. Here we report that the hearing organ of the oldest whale, Pakicetus , is the only known intermediate between that of land mammals and aquatic cetaceans (whales, dolphins and porpoises). The incus of Pakicetus is intermediate with respect to inflation, crural proportions, and position of the mallear joint. The incus and mandible of Pakicetus indicate that the path of soundwaves to its ear resembled that of land mammals. These fossils suggest that the first whale was amphibious, and corroborate the hypothesis that artiodactyls (for example, pigs, camels and ruminants) are the closest extant relatives of cetaceans.ALL agnathans (jawless vertebrates) are generally considered to have lacked a stomach, as do the living lampreys. Thelodonts are agnathans of Silurian and Devonian age whose bodies were covered by tiny, hollow, tooth-like scales which are useful for correlating rocks. We have discovered a new group of agnathans with 'thelodont' scales but with a body plan very different from that of previously known thelodonts. Sediment infillings reveal gut morphology that includes a probable stomach, suggesting that stomachs arose before jaws in vertebrate evolution. These new fork-tailed 'thelodonts9 are also the first agnathans known to have deep, compressed bodies. They represent an important new clade of early vertebrates and are potential close relatives of gnathostomes (jawed vertebrates).A meeting of research council heads will put pressure on Brussels and may give Strasbourg a bigger role.THE present eruption sequence of Mt Etna began during September 1989 with extensive fracturing, and culminated in 1991–93 with the largest lava eruption this century^1. Here we present measurements of gravity and ground deformation which, in conjunction with seismic data, provide a detailed record of the processes occurring before and during eruption. These reflect a complex interplay between magma injection into the paths of lowest compressive stress through the volcano flanks, forcing elastic deformation, and fracture growth in response to gravitational stresses. We find that after the end of the eruptive activity in 1989, fractures in the south-southeast flank of the volcano remained unfilled until some months before the 1991–93 eruption. These results indicate the utility of microgravity monitoring, as the precursory processes that we identify were largely undetected by seismic and ground deformation monitoring.REDUCTION of ferric iron (Fe(III)) to ferrous iron (Fe(II)) is one of the most important geochemical reactions in anaerobic aquatic sediments because of its many consequences for the organic and inorganic chemistry of these environments^1. In marine environments, sulphate-reducing bacteria produce H_2S, which can reduce iron oxyhydroxides^2 to form iron sulphides. The presence of siderite (FeCO_3) in marine sediments is anomalous, however, as it is unstable in the presence of H_2S. Previous work^3,4 has suggested a bacterial origin of siderite. Here we describe geochemical and microbiological studies which suggest that contemporary formation of siderite concretions in a salt-marsh sediment results from the activity of sulphate-reducing bacteria. We find that, instead of reducing Fe(III) indirectly through the production of sulphide, some of these bacteria can reduce Fe(III) directly through an enzymatic mechanism, producing siderite rather than iron sulphides. Sulphate-reducing bacteria may thus be an important and previously unrecognized agent for Fe(III) reduction in aquatic sediments and ground waters.POLAR ice contains a unique record of past climate variations; previous Greenland ice cores have documented relatively warm ‘interstadial’ periods during the last glaciation and short (centuryscale) returns to colder conditions during the glacial to interglacial warming (see, for example, ref. 1). These climate features have also been observed to varying degrees in ocean sediment cores^2–4 and terrestrial pollen and insect records^5–7. Here we report electrical conductivity measurements from a new Greenland ice core, which confirm these previous observations, and also reveal a hitherto unrecognized mode of rapid climate variation. Fluctuations in ice conductivity on the scales of <5–20 years reflect rapid oscillations in the dust content of the atmosphere. This ‘flickering’ between two preferred states would seem to require extremely rapid reorganizations in atmospheric circulation.RECENT examinations of the possible hydrological response to global warming have emphasized changes in average conditions, rather than individual flooding events^1–5. Historical accounts suggest, however, that such events may have had a considerable regional impact^6–9 even in the face of any relatively modest climate change^8. Here I present a 7,000-year geological record of overbank floods for upper Mississippi river tributaries in mid-continent North America, which provides concrete evidence for a high sensitivity of flood occurrence to changing climate. During a warmer, drier period between about 3,300 and 5,000 years ago, the largest, extremely rare floods were relatively small—the size of floods that now occur about once every fifty years. After ~3,300 years ago, when the climate became cooler and wetter, an abrupt shift in flood behaviour occurred, with frequent floods of a size that now recurs only once every 500 years or more. Still larger floods occurred between about AD 1250 and 1450, during the transition from the medieval warm interval to the cooler Little Ice Age. All of these changes were apparently associated with changes in mean annual temperature of only about 1–2 °C and changes in mean annual precipitation of ⩽10–20%.Nature 360, 507-508 (1992) IN this Commentary article, the figures in the two left-hand columns of Table 2 were inadvertently transposed. The correct figures are 1.43 (North America); 3.05 (centrally planned Asia); 4.46 (south and east Asia) for the period 1985 to 2025 (IPCC annual growth rate). Theequivalent figures for 1979-1988 (past trends) are 0.X-ray structure analysis shows that the monomer of trimeric photosystem I (PS I) of Synechococcus sp. consists of a catalytic domain and a smaller domain that connects the monomers. The 4Fe–4S clusters F_X,F_A and F_B, 28 α-helices and 45 chlorophyll a molecules were located. The two large subunits of PS I are represented by nine a-helices each; they are related by a local 2-fold rotation axis passing through F_x. Electron densities close to this axis are interpreted as carriers of the electron transfer chain.The voids inside fullerene molecules and their larger relatives offer a cosseted environment in which unusual physics and chemistry may be possible. Fundamental science, as well as applied research, should benefit.Patriot missiles were returned to the Gulf last week. But they were not the reason for the unexpectedly low casualty rate when Saddam attacked Israel with Scud missiles in 1991.Inositol trisphosphate is a second messenger that controls many cellular processes by generating internal calcium signals. It operates through receptors whose molecular and physiological properties closely resemble the calcium-mobilizing ryanodine receptors of muscle. This family of intracellular calcium channels displays the regenerative process of calcium-induced calcium release responsible for the complex spatiotemporal patterns of calcium waves and oscillations. Such a dynamic signalling pathway controls many cellular processes, including fertilization, cell growth, transformation, secretion, smooth muscle contraction, sensory perception and neuronal signalling.The Cambridge Encyclopedia of Human Evolution. Edited by Steve Jones, Robert D. Martin and David R. Pilbeam. Cam-bridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 506. á£60, $$95.The Great Copernicus Chase and Other Adventures in Astronomical History. By Owen Gingerich. Cambridge University Press: 1992. Pp. 304. $á±9.95, $29.95.The Diversity of Life. By Edward 0. Wilson. Belknap (Harvard University Press)/Allen Lane: 1992. Pp. 424. $29.95, á£22.50.The University of Warsaw has made imaginative provision for students in the former Yugoslavia.A British regulatory committee has made a fool of itself by elevating a service for sex determination offered by a London clinic to an occasion for a debate on novel “serious ethical questions”.Featured this week are products designed to automate laboratory tasks, including an instrument for processing western blots, an infrared fluorescence-based sequencer and robotic liquid handling systems.An automated approach for partial sequence analysis of entire cDNA libraries is described with the immediate aim of generating an expressed sequence catalogue and the long-term goal of sequencing by hybridization.Nature 358, 749-750 (1992) THERE is an error in Table 1 of this Letter. The looking times for experiment 2, test trials of group 1-2 are reversed. As printed, the table indicates that infants' looking time LT(1) is 10.98 seconds and their LT(2) is 8.05 seconds. They should read LT(1) = 8.05 and LT(2) = 10.CYCLOBUTANE pyrimidine dimers (CPDs) and pyrimidine (6–4) pyrimidone photoproducts ((6–4)photoproducts) are the two major classes of cytotoxic, mutagenic and carcinogenic DNA photoproducts produced by ultraviolet light irradiation of cells^1–4. The phenomenon of photoreactivation, the reduction of the lethal and mutagenic effects of ultraviolet radiation by simultaneous or subsequent irradiation with near ultraviolet or visible light, has been identified in several organisms and in some cases the enzymes that catalyse this process have been characterized in sufficient detail^5. CPDs are the only known substrate for the photoreactivating enzymes so far analysed and enzymatic photoreactivation of (6–4)photoproducts has not yet been reported^4,5. We report here that an enzyme that catalyses the light-dependent repair of (6–4)photoproduct exists in Drosophila melanogaster . This is, to our knowledge, the first report of such photoreactivating activity specific for (6–4)photoproducts in any organism.CADMIUM is a potent poison for living cells. In man, chronic exposure to low levels of cadmium results in damage to kidneys and has been linked to neoplastic disease and ageing, and acute exposure can cause damage to a variety of organs and tissues^1. Cadmium reacts with thiol groups and can substitute for zinc in certain proteins^2, but the reason for its toxicity in vivo remains uncertain. In eukaryotes, an important selective proteolysis pathway for the elimination of abnormal proteins that are generated under normal or stress conditions is ATP-dependent and mediated by the ubiquitin system^3–5. Substrates of this pathway are first recognized by ubiquitin-conjugating enzymes^5–7 (or auxiliary factors) which covalently attach ubiquitin, a small and highly conserved protein, to specific internal lysine residues of proteolytic substrates. Ubiquitinated substrates are then degraded by the proteasome, a multisubunit protease complex^8–10. Here we show that expression of this ubiquitin-dependent proteolysis pathway in yeast is activated in response to cadmium exposure and that mutants deficient in specific ubiquitin-conjugating enzymes are hypersensitive to cadmium. Moreover, mutants in the proteasome are hypersensitive to cadmium, suggesting that cadmium resistance is mediated in part by degradation of abnormal proteins. This indicates that a major reason for cadmium toxicity may be cadmium-induced formation of abnormal proteins.WHEN the mammalian proto-oncogene bcl-2 is overexpressed it can protect various types of cells both from normal and from experimentally induced apoptosis^1–6 A but the molecular mechanisms involved are unknown. Although the Bcl-2 protein is membrane-associated^7–10, its subcellular location is controversial: two studies have suggested that it is mainly associated with the nuclear envelope and endoplasmic reticulum^8,10, whereas another study has suggested that it is mainly located in the inner mitochondrial membrane^9. The latter study has suggested that Bcl-2 might protect cells from apoptosis by altering mitochondrial function and that mitochondria may be involved in apoptosis^9,11. Here we report that human mutant cell lines that lack mitochondrial DNA (mtDNA), and therefore do not have a functional respiratory chain, can still be induced to die by apoptosis, and that they can be protected from apoptosis by the overexpression of bcl-2 , suggesting that neither apoptosis nor the protective effect of bcl-2 depends on mitochondrial respiration. We also show that the Bcl-2 protein in overexpressing cells is associated with the nuclear envelope and endoplasmic reticulum, as well as with mitochondria.NON-INSULIN-DEPENDENT diabetes mellitus (NIDDM, type 2 diabetes) is a disorder of glucose homeostasis characterized by hyperglycaemia, peripheral insulin resistance, impaired hepatic glucose metabolism, and diminished glucose-dependent secretion of insulin from pancreatic β-cells^1. Glucagon-like-peptide-1(7-37) (GLP-1)^2 is an intestinally derived hormone that may be useful for the treatment of NIDDM because it acts in vivo to increase the level of circulating insulin, and thus lower the concentration of blood glucose^3,4. This therapeutic effect may result from the ability of GLP-1 to compensate for a defect in the glucose signalling pathway that regulates insulin secretion from β-cells. In support of this concept we report here that GLP-1 confers glucose sensitivity to glucose-resistant p-cells, a phenomenon we term glucose competence. Induction of glucose competence by GLP-1 results from its synergistic interaction with glucose to inhibit metabolically regulated potassium channels that are also targeted for inhibition by sulphonylurea drugs commonly used in the treatment of NIDDM^5. Glucose competence allows membrane depolarization, the generation of action potentials, and Ca^2+ influx, events that are known to trigger insulin secretion^6,7.Nature 361, 173-175 (1993) IN some copies of the 14 January issue Fig. 3 of this Letter was poorly reproduced. It is shown here in its correct form.CLASS I major histocompatibility complex (MHC) molecules present antigens that are produced within the presenting cell or penetrate from the vacuolar system into the cytosol for processing. Most studies of exogenous antigen processing have used soluble antigens, which are not efficiently presented by class I MHC molecules^1 and do not elicit CDS T-cell responses in vivo . But particulate antigen preparations with no known mechanism for cytosolic penetration can also elicit CDS T-cell responses in vivo ^2–7. We report here that phagocytosis of bacteria with no mechanism for cytosolic penetration also results in presentation of bacterial antigens by class I MHC molecules. Moreover, this mechanism is resistant to cycloheximide and Brefeldin A, which block the classical class I processing pathway. These results suggest a novel vacuolar class I processing pathway for exogenous phagocytic antigens.THE selectively outbred alcohol-non-tolerant (ANT) rat line^1 is highly susceptible to impairment of postural reflexes by benzodiazepine agonists^2 such as diazepam. ANT cerebella are generally devoid^3 of diazepam-insensitive high-affinity binding of the benzodiazepine [^3H]Ro 15-4513 (refs 4, 5), whereas in non-selected strains such binding marks a granule-cell-specific GABA_A (γ-aminobutyric acid) receptor containing the α6 subunit^5,6. A critical determinant for diazepam insensitivity of this ‘wild-type’ cerebeilar GABA_A receptor is an arginine residue^7 in α6 position 100, where other a subunits carry a histidine^8. Here we report that the ct6 gene of ANT rats is expressed at wild-type levels but carries a point mutation generating an arginine-to-glutamine substitution at position 100. In consequence, α6(Q 100)β2γ2 receptors show diazepam-mediated potentiation of GABA-activated currents and diazepam-sensitive binding of [^3H]Rol5-4513. Our results suggest that cerebeilar motor control may be a distinct behavioural correlate of the a6-subunit-containing GABA^A receptor subtype.MYRIADS of odorous molecules that vary widely in structure are nevertheless readily detected and discriminated by the sense of smell, but how this is achieved by the olfactory system has been a long-standing puzzle. Several different models have been proposed^1, and previous observations indicate that the recognition sites for odorous molecules could be G-protein-coupled receptor proteins^2–4, an idea supported by the discovery of a new gene family that probably encodes a diversity of odorant receptors^5. Here we report the identification of new members of the gene family encoding putative odorant receptors and demonstrate that they are indeed transcribed in olfactory receptor neurons. Furthermore, the receptor-encoding complementary DNA is expressed in non-neuronal surrogate cells, which generate second messenger responses upon stimulation with appropriate odorants, indicating that the receptors recognize odorants and couple to G proteins of the host cells.IN the Drosophila embryo, motor neurons form stereotyped synapses (neuromuscular junctions) on identified muscles^1–3. We have used a mutant ( prospero ) that removes or delays innervation^4,5 to assay the role of the presynaptic motor neuron in the development of the receptive field of the postsynaptic muscle, prospero (pros) is not expressed in the muscles or their precursors. Here we find that the muscle defines the correct synaptic zone in the absence of the motor neuron by restricting putative guidance molecules to this specialized membrane region. Furthermore, the muscle expresses functional transmitter receptors at the correct developmental time without innervation. On the other hand, the muscle does not localize receptors to the synapse without instruction from the motor neuron, nor does a second, much larger, synthesis of receptors occur in muscles deprived of innervation. In muscles receiving delayed innervation, or muscles innervated at aberrant synaptic sites, both receptor clustering and receptor synthesis are delayed or redirected, consistent with the new pattern of innervation. We conclude that the muscle autonomously defines the synaptic site, whereas the motor neuron directs the development of the muscle's receptive field by stimulating the synthesis and localization of transmitter receptors.Light Microscopy: An Electronic Text-book. By D. J. Rawlins. Bios Scientific: 1992. á£52.88 (UK and EC), á£45, $90 (elsewhere) (single licence); á£158.63 (UK and EC), á£135, $270 (elsewhere) (department licence).Advanced Materials for Sports Equip-ment. By K. E. Easterling. Chapman and Hall: 1992. Pp. 127. á£17.50 (pbk).IT has been argued by Watson, Barlow and Robson^1 that the visual stimulus that humans detect best specifies the spatial-temporal structure of the receptive field of the most sensitive visual neurons. To investigate ‘what the eye sees best’ they used stimuli that varied in luminance alone. Because the most abundant primate retinal ganglion cells, the P cells, are colour-opponent^2–4, we might expect that a coloured pattern would also be detected well. We generalized Watson et al .'s study^1 to include variations in colour as well as luminance. We report here that our best detected coloured stimulus was seen 5–9-fold better than our best luminance spot and 3–8-fold better than Watson's best luminance stimulus. The high sensitivity to colour is consistent with the prevalence and high colour contrast-gain of retinal P cells, and may compensate for the low chromatic contrasts typically found in natural scenes.LIVING cetaceans are subdivided into two highly distinct suborders, Odontoceti (the echolocating toothed whales) and Mysticeti (the filter-feeding baleen whales), which are believed to have had a long independent history. Here we report the determination of DNA sequences from two mitochondrial ribosomal gene segments (930 base pairs per species) for 16 species of cetaceans, a perissodactyl and a sloth, and construct the first phylogeny for whales and dolphins based on explicit cladistic methods. Our data (and earlier published myoglobin sequences) confirmed that cetaceans are closely related to artiodactyls and that all families and superfamilies of cetaceans are monophyletic. A surprising finding was that one group of toothed whales, the sperm whales, is more closely related to the baleen whales than to other odontocetes. The common ancestor of baleen whales and sperm whales might have lived only 10–15 million years ago. The suggested paraphyly of toothed whales has many implications for classification, phylogeny and our understanding of the evolutionary history of cetaceans.THE most common and the most primitive pathway of the three different photosynthetic pathways used by plants is the C3 pathway, or Calvin cycle, which is characterized by an initial CO_2 carboxylation to form phosphoglyceric acid, a 3-carbon acid. The carbon isotope composition (δ^13C) of C3 plants varies from about −23 to −35%^l–3 and averages about −26%. Virtually all trees, most shrubs, herbs and forbs, and cool-season grasses and sedges use the C3 pathway. In the C4 pathway (Hatch–Slack cycle), CO^2 initially combines with phosphoenol pyruvate to form the 4-carbon acids malate or aspartic acid, which are translocated to bundle sheath cells where CO2 is released and used in Calvin cycle reactions^1–4. The carbon isotope composition of C4 plants ranges from about −10 to −14%, averaging about −13% for modern plants^1–3. Warm-season grasses and sedges are the most abundant C4 plants, although C4 photosynthesis is found in about twenty families5. The third photosynthetic pathway, CAM, combines features of both C3 and C4 pathways. CAM plants, which include many succulents, have intermediate carbon isotope compositions and are also adapted to conditions of water and CO_2 stress. The modern global ecosystem has a significant component of C4 plants, primarily in tropical savannas, temperate grasslands and semi-desert scrublands. Studies of palaeovegetation from palaeosols and palaeodiet from fossil tooth enamel indicate a rapid expansion of C4 biomass in both the Old World and the New World starting 7 to 5 million years ago. We propose that the global expansion of C4 biomass may be related to lower atmospheric carbon dioxide levels because C4 photosynthesis is favoured over C3 photosynthesis when there are low concentrations of carbon dioxide in the atmosphere.VIRTUAL geomagnetic poles (VGPs) recorded in sediments during reversals of the Earth's magnetic field show an apparent preference for two antipodal sectors of longitude^1–3, not only in records of the same reversal from different sites, but also in records of different reversals. If preferred bands really have persisted from one reversal to the next, this would imply that the mantle exerts a significant control over the reversal process^4. Here we analyse the available database of reversal records from the past 12 Myr, using a statistical test specifically designed to test the hypothesis of two preferred antipodal longitudinal bands. Our analysis shows that the records, taken as a group of independent observations, do show an overall preference for two antipodal longitudinal bands. However, the site longitudes are also strongly grouped^5, and a comparison of the transitional VGP longitudes with site longitudes shows an unlikely grouping under the hypothesis of a genuine geographical preference for transitional VGPs. We conclude that it is premature to accept the hypothesis of mantle control over the core during geomagnetic reversals.ON 28 June 1992, the largest earthquake in California in 40 years (surface-wave magnitude M _s = 7.5) occurred near the small town of Landers, in southeastern California, and was followed three hours later by the nearby M _s 6.5 Big Bear earthquake^1. Fortuitously, the Landers earthquake sequence coincided with the first week of the official three-month test period of the International Global Positioning System and Geodynamics Service^2 (IGS), giving us an unprecendented opportunity to detect absolute pre-, co- and post-seismic displacements at a distance of 50–200 km from the main rupture with millimetre-level precision. Mutual and independent confirmation of some of our geodetic results are demonstrated by Bock et al. in this issue^3. For the Landers earthquake, the observed displacements indicate that the depth of the bottom of the rupture is shallower towards the northern end, displacements were dominantly symmetric, and the rupture extended further south on the Johnson Valley fault than has been mapped on the basis of surface ground offsets. The combined geodetic moment for the Landers and Big Bear earthquakes (1.1 × 10^20 N m^−1) agrees well with teleseismic estimates.The British government will soon have an energy policy thrust upon it.AMINOACYL-RNA synthetases can be divided into two classes according to structural features inferred from sequence alignments^1–3. This classification correlates almost perfectly with the attachment of the amino acid to the 2'-OH (class I) or 3'-OH (class II) group of the terminal adenosine^4–6. Six subgroups of higher homology can be inferred from sequence analysis^7,8. The five aminoacyl-tRNA synthetases whose crystal structures are known (MetRS, TyrRS and GlnRS in class I, SerRS and AspRS in class II) ^9–13 belong to different subgroups. Two of them, GlnRS and AspRS, have been cocrystallized with their cognate tRNA^11,13. AspRS, like six other members of class II, is an a_2 dimer. Yeast tRNA^Asp exhibits five identity determinants: the three anticodon bases, the discriminator base G73 and the base pair G10-U25^14. We report here that the refined crystal structure of AspRS com-plexed with tRNA^Asp at 2.9 A resolution reveals three regions of contact, each involving a domain of AspRS and at least one identity determinant of tRNA^Asp. The mode of binding of the acceptor stem of tRNA^Asp by AspRS can be generalized to class II aminoacyl-tRNA synthetases, whereas the deciphering of the anticodon, which involves a large conformational change of the loop and the formation of a bulge, is more specific to the aspartic system.A hypothesis identifying substance abuse as a main cause of AIDS has naturally excited much publicity. But such claims have no basis in fact.THE protein TFIID is a general transcription factor^1 which initiates preinitiation complex assembly^2–4 through direct interaction with the TATA promoter element^5,6. It is a multisubunit complex containing a small TATA-binding polypeptide (TBP) and other TBP-associated factors (TAFs) ranging in size from about 30–250K (refs 7–10). Although native TFIID can mediate both activator-independent (basal) and activator-dependent transcription in reconstituted systems^3,5,6, TBP itself can mediate only basal transcription^11,12, even in cases where TBP or the general factor TFIIB are known to interact directly with transcriptional activators^13–15. TFIID subunits other than TBP must therefore be essential cofactors, and thus potential targets for activators, consistent with earlier demonstrations that activators interact with TFIID (refs 3, 5, 16, 17). Here we show that the 250K subunit of TFIID is identical to a gene product previously implicated in progression through the late Gl phase of the cell cycle^18,19. Part of p250 may thus serve a specific function in the activation of a subset of genes important for cell cycle progression.BASAL transcription by human RNA polymerase II requires the coordinate action of several ancillary factors (TFIIA-J)^1 and can be regulated by various promoter-specific DNA binding proteins. An additional class of factors, called coactivators, are dispensable for basal transcription but are indispensable for regulation by transcriptional activators^2–4. Biochemical studies established that some coactivators are associated with the TATA-binding protein (TBP) to form the TFIID complex^3–6. We therefore set out to define the relationship between TBP and these TBP-associated factors (TAFs). Here we describe the cloning, expression and properties of the first human TAF, hTAF_II250. The hTAF_II250 gene is identical to a gene, CCG1 (refs 7, 8), implicated in cell-cycle progression. Recombinant hTAF_II250 binds directly to TBP both in vitro and in yeast, and participates in the formation of the TFIID complex. This largest TAF may therefore play a central role in TFIID assembly by interacting with both TBP and other TAFs, as well as serving to link the control of transcription to the cell cycle.SOMATIC sexual differentiation in Drosophila melanogaster involves a cascade of regulated splicing events^1,2 and provides an attractive model system for the analysis of alternative splicing mechanisms. The protein Sex-lethal (Sxl) ^3,4 activates a female-specific 3' splice site in the first intron of transformer (tra) pre-mRNA while repressing an alternative non-sex-specific site^5–7. We have developed an in vitro system that recapitulates this regulation in a manner consistent with genetic, transfection and fly transformation studies^4–8, Using this system, we have determined the molecular basis of the splice site switch. Here we show that Sxl inhibits splicing to the non-sex-specific (default) site by specifically binding to its polypyrimidine tract, blocking the binding of the essential splicing factor U2AF. This enables U2AF to activate the lower-affinity female-specific site. A splicing 'effector' domain present in U2AF but absent from Sxl accounts for the different activities of these two polypyrimidine-tract-binding proteins: addition of the U2AF effector domain to Sxl converts it from a splicing represser to an activator and renders it unable to mediate splice-site switching.MOVING cells display a variety of shapes and modes of locomotion^1, but it is not clear how motility at the molecular level relates to the locomotion of a whole cell, a problem compounded in studies of cells with complex shapes^2–5. A striking feature of fish epidermal keratocyte locomotion is its apparent simplicity^6. Here we present a kinematic description of locomotion which is consistent with the semicircular shape and persistent 'gliding'; motion of fish epidermal keratocytes. We propose that extension of the front and retraction of the rear of these cells occurs perpendicularly to the cell edge, and that a graded distribution of extension and retraction rates along the cell margin maintains cell shape and size during locomotion. Evidence for this description is provided by the predicted circumferential motion of lamellar features and the curvature of 'photo-marked' lines within specific molecular components of moving keratocytes. Our description relates the dynamics of molecular assemblies to the movement of a whole cell.IN the limb bud of the 5-day-old avian embryo, when primary muscle fibre formation is beginning and before specific muscles appear, differences in the expression of fast and slow myosin heavy chain genes can be detected among primary fibres of the premuscle masses^1,2. Myoblasts that form colonies of fibres of specific types can be isolated from these limb buds^3. To assess the role of myoblast commitment in specifying fibre types during embryonic development, we cloned myoblasts of specific types from embryonic and adult muscles, transfected them with a reporter gene, and transferred them into developing limb buds. After transfer, cloned myoblastsF formed fibres in the limb with the same patterns of myosin heavy chain gene expression as the fibres they formed in cell culture. These results demonstrate that initial skeletal muscle fibre type diversity during avian limb development can originate, in part, from the commitment of distinct myoblast types to the formation of specific fibre types.THE cystic fibrosis transmembrane conductance regulator (CFTR) is a phosphorylation-regulated Cl^- channel located in the apical membrane of epithelia^1–10. Although cystic fibrosis (CF) is caused by mutations in a single gene encoding CFTR^11,12, the disease has a variable clinical phenotype^13,14. The most common mutation associated with cystic fibrosis, deletion of a phenylalanine at position 508 (frequency, 67%), is associated with severe disease^15–17. But some missense mutations, for example ones in which arginine is replaced by histidine at residue at 117 (R117H; 0.8%), tryptophan at 334 (0.4%), or proline at 347 (0.5%), are associated with milder disease^15,17,18. These missense mutations affect basic residues located at the external end of the second (M2) and in the sixth (M6) putative membrane-spanning sequences. Here we report that, when expressed in heterologous epithelial cells, all three mutants were correctly processed and generated cyclic AMP-regulated apical Cl^- currents. Although the macroscopic current properties were normal, the amount of current was reduced. Patch-clamp analysis revealed that all three mutants had reduced single-channel conductances. In addition, R117H showed altered sensitivity to external pH and had altered single-channel kinetics. These results explain the quantitative decrease in macroscopic Cl^- current, and suggest that R117, R334 and R347 contribute to the pore of the CFTR Cl^- channel. Our results also suggest why R117H, R334W and R347P produce less severe clinical disease and have implications for our understanding of cystic fibrosis.Quasicrystals: A Primer. by C. Janot Oxford University Press: 1992. Pp. 320. £42.50, $65.Changing Course: A Global Business Perspective on Development and the Environment by Stephan Schmidheiny with the Business Council for Sustain-able Development. MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 374. $34.95, £19.95 (hbk); $16.95, £9.95 (pbk).RECOMBINATION of V -, D - and J -gene segments can generate an enormous diversity of T-cell antigen receptor (TCR) gene sequences^1,2. Although many γδ T cells fully exploit this diversification process, those in the epidermal and vaginal epithelium do not^3,4, predominantly expressing invariant γδ receptors in which the V–(D)–J junctional sequences in almost all the productive rearrangements are identical. The almost exclusive use of identical TCRs by cells in these sites is thought to reflect recognition of a stress-induced autologous antigen^5–8. To explain the prevalence of the invariant junctional sequences, it has been proposed that thymic selection operates on a population of originally diverse progenitor cells, resulting in a homogeneous repertoire^9,10. Alternatively the invariant sequences may result from biases in the recombination machinery in the fetal thymic progenitors of these cells^8,11,12. We report here the use of mice into which mutated TCR γ-gene rearrangement substrates have been introduced as transgenes to demonstrate directly that the canonical TCR Vγ3–Jγl and Vγ4–Jγl sequences occur at high frequency in the absence of the possibility of selection for the protein products.FACTORS controlling central nervous system (CNS) growth immediately after neurulation are mostly unknown. Vasoactive intestinal peptide (VIP) receptors are widely distributed in the embryonic nervous system^1,2, and VIP has trophic and mitogenic properties^3,4 on embryonic neural tissues but inhibits growth^5 and mitosis in certain tumours^6. To address the potential effects of VIP on embryonic growth, we used whole postimplantation embryo cultures^7,8. After a 4-h incubation, VIP stimulated growth, increasing somite number, embryonic volume, DNA and protein content, and number of cells in S-phase. A VIP antagonist^9,10 substantially inhibited these VIP-mediated increments in growth. The VIP antagonist completely suppressed VIP-stimulated mitosis in the CNS while decreasing the same in non-neuronal tissues by 38%. In vitro autoradiography revealed GTP-sensitive and GTP-insensitive VIP receptors which were differentially regulated in VIP antagonist-treated embryos. The present study suggests that VIP acts as a growth factor on early postimplantation embryos through multiple VIP receptors that exhibit tissue-specific responses.SPECIFICATION of the end portions of the Drosophila body depends on the torso ( tor ) protein, a receptor tyrosine kinase that accumulates uniformly along the entire surface of the embryo but is activated only in the vicinity of the poles^1–6. Several genes are normally required for activating tor and appear to define a system in which a gene product tethered to the extracellular vitelline membrane at each end of the egg provides a local source for an extracellular tor Iigand^2,5–7. This ligand would have to diffuse from the membrane to the cell surface of the embryo without losing its spatial localization. Here we report that the failure to accumulate tor protein at one or both poles leads to spatially inappropriate activity of more centrally located receptor. This ectopic activity depends on the same gene functions normally required for activating tor ; thus we infer that it reflects inappropriate diffusion of the ligand to more central regions of the body. We conclude that the receptor not only transduces the spatial signal imparted by the tor ligand, but also ensures its correct localization by sequestering the ligand. Ligand trapping by receptor may also localize spatial signals in other patterning systems, including specification of the dorsal–ventral axis in Drosophila and of vulval cell fates in Caenorhabditis elegans .ANIMALS exhibit a diversity of colour patterns that are commonly used in interspecific and intraspecific communication^1–3. Factors influencing the evolution of signals used in communication include the properties of the physical environment in which the signal is generated^2–10, the perceptual systems of individuals (such as potential mates or predators) receiving the signal^2,3,11–16, and the nature of the information signalled. In warblers of the genus Phylloscopus , species differences in colour patterns are correlated with light intensity of the habitat: brighter species live in darker habitats. I report here two observations that colour patterns function to increase conspicuousness, and are used in intraspecific communication. First, individuals make themselves temporarily more conspicuous by flashing the bright colour patterns in display, and are less conspicuous when not displaying. Second, experimentally increasing conspicuousness of males within a given habitat increases territory size, whereas experimentally reducing conspicuousness results in either a smaller territory or its total loss. Traits used in intraspecific communication are often thought to diverge as a result of variation in perceptual systems^2,3,13,15–17. This study shows that variation in the physical environment can cause species divergence, and this will occur whether perceptual systems are variable or relatively constant.THE marine invertebrate Riftia pachyptila has a remarkable symbiosis with intracellular carbon-fixing sulphide-oxidizing bacteria which was first discovered at 2,450m depth on the Galapagos Rift^1–4. Such symbiotic arrangements have since been found in a variety of invertebrate taxa and habitats^5,6. Studies of these symbioses have focused on temperature, sulphide and oxygen as critical environmental parameters^5,7–9. As Riftia has a high growth rate and its symbionts are far removed from the host surface^10,11, inorganic carbon supply to the symbionts has been recognized as a problem and host mechanisms to concentrate inorganic carbon have been posited^12,13. Increased environmental CO_2 partial pressure ( p CO_2) has not seriously been considered as a critical environmental parameter^7,14. Here we report that elevated p CO_2 (2.9 kPa) in the worms' environment is a determinant of internal total CO_2 (σ2CO_2) and p CO_2, facilitating CO_2 transport and diffusion to the symbionts. We propose that elevated p CO_2 is a potentially critical environmental factor for this species as well as for other chemoautotrophic symbioses.SODIUM-RICH rocks of trondhjemite–tonalite–dacite (TTD) or –granodiorite (TTG) suites form much of Precambrian continental crust^1. They are thought to have formed by partial melting of subducted oceanic crust^2,3—a process that would have been much more widespread early in Earth history than at present, owing to the higher thermal gradients prevailing at that time^4. Phanerozoic TTD suites do exist, however, and seem also to relate to subduction zones^5. Defant and Drummond^6 proposed that these suites form where young (<25 Myr), hot oceanic lithosphere is subducted and melts, thus locally simulating the conditions that led to widespread crustal growth in the Archaean. Here we describe plutonic and volcanic rocks from the Cordillera Blanca complex in Peru, which have characteristics of the high-Al TTD suite but which were produced above a subduction zone containing a 60-Myr-old slab. We present evidence that the complex formed by partial melting of newly underplated basaltic crust, and argue that this mechanism should be considered more generally as an additional way of generating sodium-rich arc magmas.THE eastern equatorial Pacific upwelling region is responsible for up to 50% of global 'new' production^1 and is regarded as a barometer of ocean change. Here we report evidence, from several sediment cores in the region, for repeated episodes of increased equatorial primary production between 15 and 4.4 million years ago, on a scale that is undocumented in the modern ocean. Mats of the diatom Thalassiothrix were rapidly deposited as successive laminations at rates exceeding 10cm per thousand years; mat deposits can be correlated for distances of more than 2,000 km. It is surprising that the laminations were preserved at all: conventional models suggest that bioturbation caused by the benthic sediment community will disrupt such laminations unless there is insufficient oxygen in the water to support the biological activity. In this case, however, the strength of the mats and the scale of their deposition may have overwhelmed the benthos, so that the laminations were preserved by physical means. These remarkable deposits provide a unique window into the Neogene tropical ocean–climate system, and should enable quantification of ancient deep-sea fluxes and the study of short-term (sub-Milankovitch) variability in the ocean.SOLUBILITIES of solids in liquids exhibit a temperature dependence that is correlated with the energetics of dissolution. For organic solutes in organic solvents the common experience is that solubility increases on warming (that is, dissolution is normally endothermic), forming the basis for purification by crystallization by slow cooling of hot solutions^1. Interactions between inorganic compounds and water are often more energetic, and may lead to complicated temperature-dependent solubilities, often associated with the formation of hydrated solid phases^2. We have investigated the temperature-dependent solubility of C_60 in hexane, toluene and CS_2. We observe a solubility maximum near room temperature (around 280 K) for all three solvents. Although the solubility of C_60 in these three solvents differs by several orders of magnitude, the temperature dependence of the relative solubilities is much the same in each case. We conclude that dissolution is endothermic below room temperature and exothermic above. We interpret this change as being due to a phase change in solid C_60 presumably the phase change observed previously in the absence of a solvent^3–5, modified by solvent wetting. A solubility maximum (or minimum) for organic compounds in non-electrolytes is highly unusual, and may be unprecedented. The effect may have consequences for solvent-extraction techniques of fullerene purification.EFFORTS to develop a high-voltage, lightweight rechargeable battery for electrically powered vehicles have focused on batteries based on solid electrolytes, which offer good mechanical strength, easy packaging and high energy densities. An important objective is to identify an electrolyte with the desired combination of mechanical properties, electrical conductivity and stability against powerfully oxidizing and reducing electrodes (lithium is preferred for the anode). Among the most promising materials are rubbery 'salt-in-polymer' electrolytes and highly conducting but brittle superionic glass electrolytes. In the latter category are salts with good lithium-ion conductivity, which are compatible with lithium-anode systems. Here we describe new ionic conductors — 'polymer-in-salt' materials — in which lithium salts are mixed with small quantities of the polymers polypropylene oxide and polyethylene oxide. These materials have glass transitions low enough to remain rubbery at room temperature while preserving good lithium-ion conductivities and high electrochemical stability.THE birth of neutron stars is expected to be accompanied by supernovae of types Ib and II (which constitute the majority). But only a few associations between neutron stars and supernova remnants are known^1; most involve young pulsars with short periods. Older supernova remnants should also be accompanied by pulsars, but these would be less luminous and, because they would have spun down to longer periods, they would beam to a much smaller fraction of the sky^2. This may explain why no associations of this sort have been detected previously^3. Here we report a possible such association: between pulsar 2334 + 61, with a relatively long period of 0.5 s, and G114.3+ 0.3, a fairly old supernova remnant. The flat spectral index of -0.36±0.03 (refs 4, 5) and large fractional polarization suggest that the radio emission is powered by the pulsar. If so, the pulsar must have been born with a relatively short period of less than 100 ms. As the remnant is not particularly unusual morphologically, there might be many more such remnants containing pulsars that are not beamed towards us.THE observable interactions of neutron stars with their local environment provide an opportunity for measuring the properties of both relativistic pulsar winds and the surrounding interstellar medium. Here we report the discovery of a prominent nebula produced by the motion of a high-velocity pulsar, PSR 2224 + 65, through partially neutral gas. The pulsar's transverse speed of 800 km s^–1 makes it arguably the fastest known star in the Galaxy and guarantees that it will ultimately escape the galactic potential well. A deep Hα image reveals a bright head and a faint, limb-brightened 'body' whose variable width suggests that the ambient interstellar gas has density variations on length scales 0.1 pc. Thermalization of shock energy occurs at a rate of about 10^–2 times the pulsar's spindown loss rate. Our observations provide some insights into the likelihood of finding shocks around other pulsars and the use of nebulae to find high-velocity neutron stars either not acting as pulsars or with their radiation beamed away from the Earth.A complementary DNA encoding an inward rectifier K^+ channel (IRK1) was isolated from a mouse macrophage cell line by expression cloning. This channel conducts inward K^+ current below the K^+ equilibrium potential but passes little outward K^+ current. The IRK1 channel contains only two putative transmembrane segments per subunit and corresponds to the inner core structure of voltage-gated K^+ channels. The IRK1 channel and an ATP-regulated K^+ channel show extensive sequence similarity and constitute a new superfamily.Bees as Superorganisms: An Evolutionary Reality by Robin F. A. Moritz Edward E. Southwick Springer: 1992. Pp. 411. DM195, $129, £77.Nature's Mind: The Biological Roots of Thinking, Emotions, Sexuality, Language, and Intelligence by Michael Gazzaniga Basic Books: 1992. Pp. 220. $25.00.Nanosystems: Molecular Machinery, Manufacturing, and Computation by K. Eric Drexler Wiley: 1992. Pp. 556. $49.50, £32.95 (hbk); $28.95, £19.50 (pbk).Nanotechnology: Research and Perspectives. Edited by B. C. Crandall and James Lewis MIT Press: 1992. Pp. 381. $39.95, £35.95.Working with Congress: A Practical Guide for Scientists and Engineers by William G. Wells Jr American Association for the Advancement of Science Press: 1992. Pp. 153. $12.95 (pbk).Cranks, Quarks, and the Cosmos by Jeremy Bernstein Basic Books: 1993. Pp. 240. $23.President Bill Clinton needs to make up his mind on trade even if he offends some of his supporters in the process.The new member of the European Commission with responsibility for research, Professor Antonio Ruberti, has taken a sensible step towards a rational definition of what the European Communities should be looking for.THE Src homology-2 (SH2) domains are modules of about 100 amino-acid residues that are found in many intracellular signal-transduction proteins^1,2. They bind phosphotyrosine-containing sequences with high affinity and specificity^1–4, recognizing phosphotyrosine in the context of the immediately adjacent polypeptide sequence^3–12. The protein p56^lck (Lck) is a Src-like, lymphocyte-specific tyrosine kinase^13–15. A phosphopeptide library screen has recently been used to deduce an 'optimal' binding sequence for the Lck SH2 domain^16. There is selectivity for the residues Glu, Glu and lie in the three positions C-terminal to the phosphotyrosine. An 11-residue phosphopeptide derived from the hamster polyoma middle-T antigen, EPQpY EEI PIYL, binds with an approximately 1 nM dissociation constant to the Lck SH2 (ref. 17), an affinity equivalent to that of the tightest known SH2–phosphopeptide complex. We report here the high-resolution crystallographic analysis of the Lck SH2 domain in complex with this phosphopeptide. Recent crystallographically derived structures of the Src SH2 domain in complex with low-affinity peptides^18, which do not contain the EEI consensus, and NMR-derived structures of unliganded Abl (ref. 19) and p85 (ref. 20) SH2 domains have revealed the conserved fold of the SH2 domain and the properties of a phosphotyrosine binding pocket. Our high–affinity complex shows the presence of a second pocket for the residue (pY + 3) three positions C-terminal to the phosphotyrosine (pY). The peptide is anchored by insertion of the pY and pY + 3 side chains into their pockets and by a network of hydrogen bonds to the peptide main chain. In the low-affinity phosphopeptide/Src complexes^18, the pY + 3 residues do not insert into the homologous binding pocket and the peptide main chain remains displaced from the surface of the domain.TRANSCRIPTION factor DRTF1/E2F coordinates events in the cell cycle with transcription by its cyclical interactions with important regulators of cellular proliferation like the retinoblastoma tumour-suppressor gene product (Rb) and the Rb-related protein, p107 (refs 1–8). DRTF1/E2F binding sites occur in the control regions of genes involved in proliferation^9,10, and both Rb and p107 repress the capacity of DRTF1/E2F to activate transcription (refs 11, 12; M. Zamanian and N.B.L.T., manuscript submitted). Mutant Rb proteins isolated from tumour cells are unable to bind DRTF1/E2F (refs 11–13), and certain viral oncoproteins, such as adenovirus El A, sequester Rb and p107 in order to free active DRTF1/E2F (refs 5, 11, 12, 14, 15). Here we report the isolation of a complementary DNA encoding DRTF 1-polypeptide-1 (DP-1), a major sequence-specific binding protein that is present in DRTF1/E2F, including Rb- and p107-associated DRTF1/E2F. The DNA-binding domain of DP-1 contains a region that resembles that of E2F-1 (refs 16, 17), and recognizes the same sequence. DRTF1/E2F thus appears to contain at least two sequence-specific DNA-binding proteins.Britain's newly diverse universities will be more vigorous rivals for each other's funds in years to come.Most governments have taken fright at the growing cost of welfare and, perhaps inevitably during a recession, are canvassing mean devices for containing costs. But welfare is inescapable in a modern state.GROWTH factors such as platelet-derived growth factor and epidermal growth factor (EGF) bind to and activate cell-surface receptors with intrinsic tyrosine kinase activities^1. Receptor activation elicits multiple physiological changes in target cells, including alterations in gene expression^2–4. Receptor tyrosine kinase signalling involves recruitment of proteins into a signalling complex through interactions between receptor autophosphorylation sites and the src-homology region-2 (SH2) domains on these signalling proteins^5–9. Diverse signals can subsequently be generated, depending on the specific receptor and cell type^2,10. How such signals are transmitted to the nucleus is poorly understood, but because the transcriptional activation of many genes by growth factors occurs in the absence of new protein synthesis^4, one or more signals emanating from growth factor receptors must directly affect transcription factors. We report here the activation by EGF of a DNA-binding protein in a cell-free system where activation of DNA binding requires ligand, receptor, ATP and phosphotyrosine–SH2 interactions.THE most characteristic change in progressive dementia of Alzheimer's type is a tissue deposit of amyloid β /A_4 protein^1, which is derived from its precursor protein APP (ref. 2). Structural alterations of APP are implicated in the pathogenesis of Alzheimer's disease, but it is not known how they cause the disease. Although APP has a receptor-like architecture^2–5, is located on the neuronal surface^6, and has a conserved cytoplasmic domain^7, no receptor function has been demonstrated for APP. Here we report that APP forms a complex with G^o, a major GTP-binding protein in brain. The cytoplasmic APP sequence His 657–Lys 676 shows a specific G^o-activating function and is necessary for complex formation. G^o protein treated with GTP-γS lost the ability to associate with APP. This suggests that APP is a receptor coupled to G^o and that abnormal APP–G^o signalling is involved in the Alzheimer's disease process.KINESIN, a microtubule-dependent ATPase, is believed to be involved in anterograde axonal transport. The kinesin head, which contains both microtubule and ATP binding sites, has the necessary components for the generation of force and motility^1. We have used saturation binding and electron microscopy to examine the interaction of the kinesin motor domain with the microtubule surface and found that binding saturated at one kinesin head per tubulin heterodimer. Both negative staining and cryo-electron microscopy revealed a regular pattern of kinesin bound to the microtubule surface, with an axial repeat of 8 nm. Optical diffraction analysis of decorated microtubules showed a strong layer-line at this spacing, confirming that one kinesin head binds per tubulin heterodimer. The addition of Mg–ATP to the microtubule–kinesin complex resulted in the complete dissociation of kinesin from the microtubule surface.T LYMPHOCYTES are produced in the thymus from precursors originating in the haemopoietic tissues. On entering the thymus, they undergo a programme of proliferation, T-cell receptor (TCR) gene rearrangement, differentiation and repertoire selection^1. Although the thymus provides a unique environment for these events, the role of the thymic stroma in regulating specific developmental stages is not well understood^2. We therefore devised an in vitro system to study the role of individual thymic stromal components in T-cell development. We report here that the development of TCR^–CD4^–CD8^– T-cell precursors into TCR^+ cells expressing CD4 and/or CDS requires the presence of both major histocom-patibility complex class II^+ epithelial cells and fetal mesenchyme. The requirement for mesenchymal support can be mapped to the initial stages of intrathymic development because the later stages of maturation, from double-positive CD4^+CD8^+ thymocytes into single-positive CD4^+ or CD8^+ cells, can be supported by epithelial cells alone. We also show that the requirement for mesenchymal cells can be met by cells of the fib rob last line 3T3 (but not by supernatants from these cells). To our knowledge, these findings provide the first direct evidence that mesenchymal as well as epithelial cells are involved in T-cell development, and suggest that their involvement is stage-specific and likely to be dependent on short-range or contact-mediated interactions.MULTIPLE sclerosis (MS) is an inflammatory demyelinating disease of the central nervous system in which a restricted cellular immune response has been observed. In order to establish whether such T cell responses are likely to be antigen-specific particularly with regard to myelin basic protein (MBP), we analysed T-cell receptor (TCR) gene rearrangements directly from MS brain plaques, using the polymerase chain reaction on reverse transcribed messenger RNA, and compared these with TCR of previously described MBP-specific T cell clones from MS and the rat model experimental allergic encephalomyelitis. Rearranged V β 5.2 genes were detected in the brains of all patients who were HLA DRB1^*1501, DQA1^*0102, DQB1^*0602, DPB1^*0401. The V β 5.2–D β –J β sequences in these MS brain plaques revealed five motifs. One of the common motifs was identical to that described for the VDJ region of a V β 5.2 T-cell clone. This clone was from an MS patient who was HLA DRB1^*1501, DQB1^*0602, DPB1^*0401, and it was cytotoxic towards targets containing the MBP peptide 89–106 (ref. 1). The deduced amino-acid sequence of this VDJ rearrangement, Leu-Arg-Gly, has also been described in rat T cells cloned from experimental allergic encephalomyelitis lesions, which are specific for MBP peptide 87–99 (ref. 2). VDJ sequences with specificity for this MBP epitope constitute a large fraction (40%) of the TCR V β 5.2 N(D)N rearrangements in MS lesions. The capacity of rat T cells with these VDJ sequences to cause experimental allergic encephalomyelitis^2 and the prevalence of such sequences in demyelinated human lesions indicate that T cells with this rearranged TCR may be critical in MS.THE Pax genes comprise a family of transcription factors active in specific tissues during embryonic development and are associated with at least three developmental mutations in mouse and man^1,2. In the developing kidney, Pax-2 is expressed in the induced mesenchyme, in the ureter epithelium, and in early epithelial structures derived from the mesenchyme^3. Pax-2 expression is repressed upon terminal differentiation of the renal tubule epithelium, but persists in the undifferentiated epithelium of human Wilms' tumours^4,5. We have produced a dominant gain-of-function mutation in transgenic mice by deregulating the expression of the mouse Pax-2 gene. The data obtained with four independently derived transgenic embryos and with one transgenic line demonstrate that deregulated Pax-2 expression results in histologically abnormal and dysfunctional renal epithelium with properties similar to congenital nephrotic syndrome. Thus, repression of Pax-2 is required for normal kidney development and persistent expression of Pax-2 may restrict the differentiation potential of renal epithelial cells.THE signalling mechanisms governing haematolymphopoiesis and those regulating neural development may be closely related, as indicated by similarities of higher-order structure and function of the cytokines involved^1, of the regional and temporal regulation of their transcription and translation^2–6, and of their bioactivity^7–10. Here we investigate this possible evolutionary connection using retroviral transduction of a temperature-sensitive mutant form of the SV40 large T antigen to develop conditionally immortalized murine embryonic hippocampal progenitor cell lines^11–14. Treatment of these cells with cytokines that are thought to participate in progressive lymphoid maturation, immunoglobulin synthesis^15–18 and erythropoiesis^19,20 causes progressive neuronal differentiation, as defined by morphological criteria, successive expression of increasingly mature neurofilament proteins^21–23, and the generation of inward currents and action potentials. The cytokine interleukin(IL)-11 induces expression of action potentials that are insensitive to tetrodotoxin, which is indicative of develop-mentally immature sodium channels^24. By contrast, for expression of more mature action potentials^24 (tetrodotoxin-sensitive) one of the interleukins IL-5, IL-7 or IL-9 must be applied in association with transforming growth factor-α after pretreatment with basic fibroblast growth factor. Our results suggest that the mechanisms regulating lineage commitment and cellular differentiation in the neural and haematopoietic systems are similar. Further, they define an in vitro model system that may facilitate molecular analysis of graded stages of mammalian neuronal differentiation.Applied Chaos Theory: A Paradigm for Complexity. By A. B. Çambel. Academic: 1993. Pp. 246. $44.95, £33.AMYOTROPHIC lateral sclerosis (ALS) is a degenerative disorder of motor neurons in the cortex, brainstem and spinal cord^1,2. Its cause is unknown and it is uniformly fatal, typically within five years^3. About 10% of cases are inherited as an autosomal dominant trait, with high penetrance after the sixth decade^4,5. In most instances, sporadic and autosomal dominant familial ALS (FALS) are clinically similar^4,6,7. We have previously shown that in some but not all FALS pedigrees the disease is linked to a genetic defect on chromosome 21q (refs 8,9). Here we report tight genetic linkage between FALS and a gene that encodes a cytosolic, Cu/Zn-binding superoxide dismutase (SOD1), a homodimeric metalloenzyme that catalyzes the dismutation of the toxic superoxide anion O^–_2 to O_2 and H_2O_2 (ref. 10). Given this linkage and the potential role of free radical toxicity in other neurodenegerative disorders^11, we investigated SOD1 as a candidate gene in FALS. We identified 11 different SOD1 missense mutations in 13 different FALS families.INSECTS can effect sexual reproduction in some plant pathogens, such as the rust fungi, by carrying spermatia (gametes) between different mating types^1–5. This function of insects is analogous to their role as pollinators of plants, and contrasts with their more widely known^5–9 role as vectors of plant pathogens' infectious spores. Here I report an extraordinary case of pathogen-mediated floral mimicry that contributes to fungal reproduction. The rust fungus Puccinia monoica inhibits flowering in its host plants ( Arabis species) and radically transforms host morphology, creating elevated clusters of infected leaves that mimic true flowers of unrelated species in shape, size, colour and nectar production. These fungal pseudoflowers attract insects which fertilize the rust. Because the pseudoflowers are highly successful in attracting pollinating insects, they may also affect the reproductive success of nearby flowering plants.ECOLOGICAL study of the role of soil microorganisms in vegetation succession has focused mainly on organisms affecting plant nutrition, such as mycorrhiza and nitrogen-fixing bacteria. But, soil-borne diseases are involved in the degeneration of Ammophila arenaria (Marram grass) and Hippophaë rhamnoides (Sea buckthorn), two plant species that dominate the coastal foredunes of Europe and are widely planted for sand stabilization. We have used reciprocal transplantation and report here that soil-borne diseases may contribute to the succession of foredune plant species. In pot experiments, plant species that succeed A. arenaria were tolerant of the soil-borne diseases of this species. Plant species that were grown in soils from both previous and later succession stages were reduced most in soils from the later stages. During foredune succession, therefore, plants disappear from sites where the soil has become colonized with specific growth-depressing microorganisms. The soil-borne diseases must have considerable importance for the outcome of interspecific competition and may be involved in patterns of clonal growth. The different sensitivities of plant species for the soil-borne pathogens could be an evolutionary response to selection pressures of the succession stage to which a species is confined by the combined effect of local abiotic and biotic environmental factors.IT has long been thought that conditions at the boundary between the core and mantle influence the Earth's magnetic field, but the supporting evidence is rather indirect^1–3. Recent palaeomagnetic results, suggesting that there are persistent preferred longitudinal paths for the virtual geomagnetic pole (VGP) during reversals^4, would provide the first direct evidence of the solid mantle's influence on the core, although their statistical significance has been disputed^5,6. The results are potentially exciting because the preferred paths lie close to the Pacific rim, where the present geomagnetic secular variation changes character^2,7. Here we present a simple model, based on an extension of a previous theory^8, that produces reversals with VGP paths confined within relatively narrow longitude bands despite the transition field having a substantially non-dipolar structure. Thus, although longitude bias of the VGP paths is definitive evidence for core-mantle interaction, simple VGP paths are not evidence of near-dipolar transition fields.THE severely degraded landscape of the volcanic highlands of central Mexico has been the focus of considerable debate^1–5. Although it is widely believed that the Spanish encountered an almost pristine landscape in AD 1521 (refs 1–3), some archival and palaeolimnological studies have suggested that extensive land clearance began before European contact, during the Preclassic to Postclassic periods (˜3,500–350 ^14C yr before present, BP) ^5–11. Here we analyse sediment cores from Lake Pátzcuaro, Michoacán (Fig. 1), to derive a quantitative estimate of variations in soil erosion in central Mexico since 4,000 yr BP. We identify three periods of accelerated erosion and conclude that erosion rates during both the late Preclassic/early Classic periods (2,500–1,200 yr BP) and the later Postclassic period (850–350 yr BP) were at least as high as those after the Spanish conquest. One implication of these results is that soil erosion caused by the Spanish introduction of plough agriculture was apparently no more severe than that associated with traditional agricultural methods; it is therefore questionable whether a return to traditional methods would have significant environmental benefits.